      "identifier" : [
         "8_06912_186"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "PAGES MISSING",
         "]F Hm@. P.IUihi C., Wrnuipeg Pdeh a ut.Jâ.e, 1915 S. B. STEELE, C.B.M.V.O, Mfajor General. Commandine nd Camadian ExpodttionurS oce",
         "IIfiiIIIhIIDflhIDIlhIIlhHIIIinon M nIIIJiiijmmIl Tea Table Talksý \"The proof of the pudding is in the eating.\" The proof of good tea is in the drinking. The great and increasing army of people who regularly drink Blue Ribbon Tea choose it with their eyes open. They know its excellence-its unifornity-its economy. And they know its purity. makes deterioration impossible. Common sense tels them that the new double-wrapper Scores of thousands have proved \"BLUE RIBBON\" \"by the drinking.\" yourseif. Get your money back if you don't-agree with them. Do the same A Perfect Tea in a Perfect Package a This Magnificent Combination DINNER and TEA SET FREE to Our Subscribers [in il Tne n lin TaTTt ion o: o I î- gi: n- tO do justice t.o t hi. i:and.4om' îcnîtinition Dinner and Tea Set, --l, vh we have dvvîded to give awa Free ''..(nnTI T nSi -t nT nniT IsIit4 o(f 47 plînToT TandIis iîind of thje bv.s ng liil S TIonu In e o f tt tiIo t pTpTII:r JInto inHIs %%,n11:1\\- et- e acc. liT. Tolino i ii under the glîize in a richl to%î ToInr, 501 nd výlvTt 'v infl 100. A nent, eml)TTTe(lidesizn follows then edie ot everv pince. Alil hnliTTiiI fT 1 Tmi aTre travoent ih901l1. ELih set N gTl:rantevnl 1,% 'The Ttrf Ilon T IlMIont hîv and inI Y m RoblnTiOnsn\u0026:T\u003c(',T tîllï l lnTOOpi-niTrWnTp. !TirChITIT. nIîtl:t t'nIAI 1-T*il do T ii\u003ejUordrt r .t t1tiiiý t \u003eb II li ', i , init.n'rp IIO TiThle n~t Ilomnîii N hu le ut une dollar aji i e. Sureîv a lagilu- tîcent. oe'n% ard for nu,l a littie labor. 1 ~ The Western Home Monthly, Winnipeg, Ca-Bnadau T, ý 1 ......................",
         "jcontinues to arrivej from England. i There is no advance in IDI price.- Woud-' - 1 1J W-rwriting advertisers please mention ern Home Monthly. ASILENT WORICER AND ALWAYS READY The NOISELESS is fan and away the easiest te eperate Doliey Type band1 washing machine on the ere are n heel%,cpo pig about itto get o.t ofo.=der srg lt docs the work perfectly, quickiy and is a wonder ful labor saver. at yourDOWSWELL. deniers .LIMRed us direct.îà 1ML MADE ýIN CANADA The Western Home Mdont hIy iThe Westeni HomeMnh VOL Xvi.Published Monthly '~ ~* Ny the Home Pmblishnt Co., Ltd., WlndMe, Canada. Nom \u0026 Th. Subacripto Price of The Western Home Monthly is 1l.00 a year or i f thre ea 0fr 02O to any address in Canada. or British Ilae.. The subscription I to fores*n countries ila$1.50 a year, and witbln the. City of Winnipeg limita and i n the ted States $1.25 a year.a Remaittances cf amafl sums may be made wlth safety i ordinary lettera. Sura of one dollar or more it would be well te mad by regiatered letter or Money à a Order. Postage Stamps viiib. received the same m euah for the fractional parts cf a dollar, and in an Y amount when it la impossible for patrons to procure bis. ~ Change cf Address.-Subacrlbr wisbing their address changed must state their former as well as new addresa. AUl communications relative to change of E IIaddress must be received by us net later than the 2th cf thse precedinq montb. - Wbea You Renew b. sure te igu your name exatly the same ans t appeas ilon tihe label cf your paper. If this la net don. t leade te onfso. you bave il recently cbanged your addreaa and the japer has bec. forwarded te ou.b sr àatlet us know thse address on your label.r i A Chat with Our Readers During the period of the past 9 month-the period of the European war-The Western Home Meuthly has told the story of the struggle faithfully in splen- did illustrations, many being reproductions from photographa taiken on tihe actual battlefield. This phase of thse magazine met with an esppcial keen apprecia- tion, for in the West there are ne communities tisai are et represented at the front. We shail continue during the pregress of the war te present Buck illustra- tions, theoigl the peaceable arts with which vo have been blest linCanada for se long wil net at ail be overIookeéd. This issue of the paper wii introduce our readers te the sulnmer months, when nov tisoughts and pleasant ideas are with us, and when many of oui subacribers viii doubtless have under considera- tien the matter o! a brief holiday. Even from thse prairie witis its mazy at- tractions and climatic advantages, it is sometimes prolltable te make a short change for recreation and relaxation. W. have many subseription propositions whereby any of oui readers viso ray communicate vitis us, wil b. enabled te raise a littie poket meney for a holiday trip. Getting subsenibers for Tihe Western Home Monthiy ip at one. easy and profitable. It needs but one or two eutings among one's friends and acquaintances te, accomplisis eonsiderable Ini this magazine you have a publication that has for fifteen years enjoyed \"ppu- larity, and one that now needs littie or nù introduction te any p art of the West. We quote below a few extracts from lettons tisat are continualy pouring into oui office. We are happy te print sucis splendid and unselicited testimo- niais, and pleased to discover that every day brings us ample evidence of tise great pregres being made by Thse Western Home Montbly. The same spirit of progress that gives The Western Home Monthly its great popularity with its readers, gives it at the same time a leading advertising value. Any produet intended for consumption in Western Canada sbould regard this magazine as a necessary ad- jte its sales forces.I Kind Words from Our Readers I for one ceuld net do without The Western Home Menthly. It la tisé equai of the magazines that coat two and three dollars a year, and t suite me a great deal better than any of them. It is always on thse moral aide of things an influence for geod in every home that it enters. John Fluker, Beaver Hills, Alta. This La my fourteentli year as a subscriber of The Western Home Montbly. I anxiously await its ceming cachis mntis. Its contents, alwaya nteresting, have beceme intensely se during the past twelve montha, se that ne one Ln this locality who has at any time subscribed te t, would care te do witbout a single issue of it. E. Wilson, Iver P.O., Sask. When I mention Tise Western Home Monthly te my fniends they exclaim it bas the beat reading that cornes into their homes. I have been trying te get neaders in this remote cerner of Saskatchewan for you, but apparently I am a little late, for it appears te go into every home now however far nemoved from Poest Office and Railway Station. 1 say the same about tise magazine as they do. I subscribe te four others, but I like Thse Western Home Monthly the bos. To my way of thinking it is an ideal magazine for young and oid. I trust that you wiii be able te continue te give us such intenesting and oducative atonies and articles as that which have been appearing during the spring mentis.. An Eyobrow, Sask., Reader. 1 take Thse Western Home Monthly, and think tisat one of it. great charma fies in the fact that its articles and fiction are above ail other considerations wholesome. In this day of magazine frenzy t is nefreshing tefilnd natural optimistie atonies which make one feel that tise vend is flot a place given over entirely te trouble and dark forebodings, but a place visere one's ideals have at least a fighting chance. I nead a great many magazines, and contributo te a very large number, but for thse geod all round domestic publication I give you thse fiat place. - Edytis Bayne, Melville, Saak. Thse Western Heme Monthly War Book Gentlemen: - Permit me te acknowledgc the receipt cf a copy cf \"The 1914 War.\" Thse work, indeed, is a very creditable one. Net only' your colon plates, but your black and white electros, ail cf which I presume are made under the saine roof as your paper, \"The Westeru Home M.%onthly,\" add justice to nny claims that might be advanced for Madle-Tn-Wýinnipeg Goods. My heartiest appreciation for this superb collection cf inost interesting pic- turcs. J. .J. Gibbons, Limited, Winnipeg Office, Gordon E, Huater, Representative. Quality r PrîtFlaver COCQAý- Possssmm AuThre it le-âbao!utely- pure, coeEomi Law\u0026. It isof higqumlty. beirig maefrort Ch\"i Co= ebeau6L Itfaois dd. t dcmUuu becum uit is a sreiihutib 's e heai'a cocoa beam MADE IN CANADA DY Juter Bake line Wbeumung our latent metbod, W%, the New Method Dental Parlors guarantse.te complote dotai work ef any description without pain, or refund your maoy. No Person too Remvous No Work too Diffcut Tisere is notbinIg new in dentaldom that is flot in une by this firn. Office: CORNER PORTAGE AND DONALD Canada's Best and Mont Up-to-date Dental Office. mil 91 Koop the Me, la Cood Humer When, hubby-'llghts up\" for his after-dinner smoke be sure he has a match which will give him a steady light first stroke- Ask your grocer for Eddy's \"Golden Tip\" Matches-one of thefr many brands.",
         "1SOO oner hae gventhe' -idtest. to 38 OMaxwefls hithe-las-t 1 8 monthsLJUJ jrcw nad.hi ii. antic MaxweJIl faaoissjust as fnl insejust anauombie~asit were epcilymade to b.exbtd at the N~w~~Aupmoi1eShowv,ori om dealer's fancyshowrooms. BUT--aadh.i is krat Lg B00.OO a. rough and tumble test that time snd use can of thme. MM\"weUCars have actuay been turned ive a car -.and thates what we mean by the outand LAu 'uJy be rv huacsof acid test. mlsby 38,0M Mawell owners. i-yu ae u - horàmogtese 38 000 T-hes. owners have driven their Mxw.. p hap ogrs skt1ti yuail aLut hlân sd down LIU-over ail Idnds of country thr exerience with their'Maxwells. ro~s m oe itystetsévryhreta You Must go iu and see this \"'Wonder Car.\" foure s\"Winl gow Then you will see an exact diiplicate of these Most of \"these 38%000 Maxwels Lave been .38,000 tried and true Maxwells that have ramsd on, snowed on, sud put to everv kind of stood the rougli and tumble \"«acid test.\"y The Maxwell Company's Guarantee of Service to Maxwvell Owners No other automobile la backed by a more reliable service than that guaranteed every Maxwell owner. Scores of Maxwell deàlers in evey artofthi cunty re lwysready togvexpr advice-to make adjustments and to supply new parts at reasonable pricen ThseleddMawl Daes Service rgnaton is perfected and completed by the great Maxwell Service Station in Windsor, Ont.. The main offices and factories of the Maxwell Motor Company in Detroit, U.S.A.. are wlthin comparatively short distance of many points iOmnada.* This ini tsOIf means rapid delivery of replacement parts to Canadian Maxwell dealers and owners. Maxwell Service is oneO of the great advantages enjoyed by Maxwell owners. Order a Maxwell now, and when yoS vant it delivered you will get your car-not an excuse on delivery day. Maxwell Fiv-Paasenger Tourlng Car, f.o.b. Windsor $ 925 Maxwell Roadater .. .. . o.b. Windsor 900 Maxwell cabriolet f.o.b. Windsor 1,105 Any model equlpped with electric self-starter, $70 extra Wite for beautiful 1915 Maxwell Catalogue. Address, Department Â.V MAXWELL MOTOR COMPANY 0F CANADA, LIMITED,--WNSR NAI i s; a: wI lit ti ti fi WINDSOR, ONTARIO",
         "J-he Western Home monthly Sacrifice In the eyes of the world she was but a young giddy girl. Her days were spent in idleness, ber évenings in wasteful indul- gence. Pleasure was ber goddess and she worshipped consistently'at her slirine. But one day there came into ber life a new passion and ber maiden heart responded. You may picture the littie home to which her proud husband led lier. Perhaps you mnay picture that home when it was cheered by the music of a childish voice and« by the patter of.littie feet. Then came the long and wearing sickness, followed by the ebb- ing of the littie life, and the young mother arose from lier long vigil with a-broken heart. That was ail. That ail? Do we flot ail know from scores of experiences that this was flot ail? 'Tis true she rose from bher vigil with a broken heart, but she rose transformed and gIorified. This is the greatest fact of human experience. The way to glory is through sacrifice and sorrow. The subdued tone, the softened gaze, the kindly sympathetic toucli-these are flot born- of flippancy nor of idie pleasure. They bear testimony to long teaching in the, school of loss and sufering. She was a young country girl, stroni, and self-reliant in the beauty of her loveli- ness. She was flot over-serious for the * blood of joyous youth-coursed through her, veins. She enjoyed to the full the wealth which nature had so lavishly bestowed upon her. She saw visions and she dreamed :dreams. But one day there came to ber thé cail to join her mother in a war for right and freedom, a war against hate and inhumanity and broken faith. So she prepared to make the sacrifice of ail that was dearest and best. Not thoughtlessly, flot carelessly but with higli resolve she sent forth her sons to die if ne'ed be as only noblemen can die. The fields of Langemarck give testimony to the faithfulness with which these loyal sons maintained their trust. But was that ail? Well do we know that it was not ail. Fair Canada, like the young miother deprived of lier child, revived the sbock, but she was transformed and giori- fied. No longer is she a child among the nations, but a serious, thouglitful mother Whio has corne out of great tribulation into the glory of a newly-found life. Verily, for the nation as for the individual the way to glQry is through sacrifice and sorrow. In the limit sacrifice is flot national but individual. There is a littie spot in Belgium that wiIl ever be sacred because the p rice paid to redeem it was paid in blood. Here served those who won a place among the ilnimortals. They placed honor, courage and steadfastness above dishonor and coward- ice; they placed King and country before self. Many of themn saved their lives in the losing. It is a great thing for a man to save fis life. It is the only way to highest glory. In- this supreme sacrifice we 'hear again even from closed lips those brave words, \"How sweet and pleasant a thing. it is to die for one's country!\" And if we listen we can hear from the skies a nobler thotight, \"'Greater love hath no man than this, that a man lay clown bis life for lis frieids\" Y ur have heard of that littie mother who gax e lier oiily son, to this great cause; you haerightly admired lier Spartan courage ieiiabled lier in the hour of lier deepest aie'hto smile beneatfl fer tears. Nor lia i misinterpreted that smiie. Thougli 4ý,( looked upon lier as a wveakling, as EditorialComment lackiflg in the graces which make for public andprivate distinction, no*w she stands be- fore you taîl and sweet and beautiful- glorified. She is the noblest womnan of themn ail, for she lias suifered the suprem e test. She' gave ail she'lad and you îill rendeir ber ail the homage that is due ber. Henceforth she is a queen. Well it is for Canada that there are so many mothers willing to emu- late the floble Roman matron who in the hotir of ber country's need and being in poverty, led forth lier two young sons, say- ing humbly and yet proùdly, \"These, good Roman fathers, are my j ewels.\"- .rhere may be readers of this page who are in some way makipg the great sacrifice and who are finding th ' ir lives in the higlier service. It is a testing time for men and nations. There are many who are ready to follow the brave men who gave their lives at the front. There are others who re too old or too infirmn for action. There are wo- men too and children ý who in such a crisis must always remain behind. Yet let it not be forgotten that for every one there is the same golden rule of behavior. Service of the higliest kind, wliether at home or in the field mnust mean sacrifice. Thos 'e who know this and live up b it in practice, even thougli they are debarred by conditions froni enlîsting will at least derive comfort fron' the assurance that \"They also serve. who only stand and wait.'\" This is'no time for luxurious living~ nor for slothful ease. Anxieties, fears and blood-sweat there must be; hardships born of deprivations and losses there must be; but to every one who gives himself in heart and spirit to this glorious cause there cornes a measure of glory just in proportion to bis sacrifice. There may be some who are not willing to make the sacrifice. The mug of beer, the cent an hour, may be a mightier incentive than the thougît of protecting the weak, defending personal and national honor, sav- ing a world from the intolerable evils of military domination. There may indeed be those wlio send their sons to the front while they themselves remain behind to plot and pillage. It does seem frigltful and incred- ible tlat there should be in Britain or in any of lier colonies at this time a single man, wflo would seek to make personal or party profit out of lis country's misfortune. Surely while the arcl-enemy of freedom and democracy lias to lie reckoned with, there will be a cessation of this internecine strife, this Iegaiized piracy whicl lias at times dis- graced our good namne. This appeal to loyalty is the more neces- sary because we are flot too sure that as a people we have not been nursing a viper in our bosom. Some years ago through what now seems to have been an unwise policy, we opened our portais to the world and welcomed settiers indiscrimiù*ately. They came in and were given freely and fully of the best we lad to offer. We lad a right to expect co-operation, loyalty and devotion. In some cases we received these, but in other cases we have great reason to believe that we have been deceived. So we must be ready to protect ourselves against the enemy without, while we negiect not to guard our- selves against the possible hostile forces within-forces which oppose assimilation, and whicli look to the permanent establisli- ment of old-world colonies in our midst, rather tharn tg-the building up of a united Luatna The crime of -ail cri mes, the sinkingr of the Lusitania, makes one thing clear. Germany no longer ,'oafsiders war as.subWft to any rules what ,oeôver. There maybe rules for friendly sport-f4or football, s~d play, and even for the more brutal sports, prize-fighting and, bull-fiLrhting-but there are no rules at aIl .whe it cornes, to a war to'the death. H'eÏicethe murder of innotent women, and chidi4re,hec also the \"'à,\"g of merchant ships without. warninj. A#Wr- thing is justified that will help to 9tregtIt-0 the German position or weaken the po#ila of'the Allie\u0026' Ther.é is to the Gernitaih- no such, thing as international agretmmtt whçn- it' cornes to war. Nor is thé end *t reached. Private gaasination is next, ad it is juat as wel ha e should recopýi=. it without délay. It w111takeitirne for eivIagd_ nations like !ngland and France to ~It themselve oti' tiue fear but-that the. will-meet the a fully and efcientl'y.- Nor will they_1~ honor nor break faith as they preaw on t victory. The sinking'of the Lu'sitWma wa neither wise, nor clever. - It wgg prenieditated.'xùui4ri r'and -foe mý =ü~ there is in\" this world, but ont fate.- A: Good Lesson The following frQùi an Arnerican. A is fine. Let- our. Canadian 'pretio read it and attempt an explination: '\u003cThese should be cisys full of haph# for the advocateà of a high tariff. Tl-t$ip* is certainly idéal for proof of their Oon*tê ý tions. For years the high tarnif $t speakers, pretending Ito be the protecto r Arnerican labor, prophesied Ütter desol\u0026'do' ruin and poverty for this country unl. e'' had a tariff high enough to protect us frbflh the pauper labor ,of. Europe, Asia qhd tjae Fijî Islands. WelI, the pauper\"labore 1rs of Europe and. Asii are not now cornpen* with'this country. The pauper laborerm4 these countrieÉ, and- in fact eïe- \"d1~ bodied man, have 'joined the colora. - ,IW are performing deeds of heroism in trent-besi; in bloody charges, fàeing death. They not making or producing anything7 that c'i petes with the loring men of pescti America. None of their products corne 40 our shores. We practicaiiy have a free field for American labor and American prôduets. We are actually suffering and b..usne3s tgi dragging, due to thé laclç of importas..- Whyi then, should not this'country's busines b booming? Why is it that- mantifactuti1 establishments are not working overtime? Certainly the pauper labor of Europe is flot hurting anybody with competition in wages or products. That good old word, prote-~ tion, lias been sadly treated by the happen- ings of the past ninety days. Instead of propliets of an ideal condition, the high tariff advocates have proven themselves dispen- sers of superheated air. Wisdom Sir Robt. Borden is to he congrattulated that lie did not accede to the wish of the members of his Cabinet who urged a genéral election at this time. Nothing could have been more unpatriotic than such a move, anid if ail Canada is of the same mind as the M'est, nothing is more likely that at? appeal would have resulted in an over- wlielming defeat for the goverument. It is. well for men on both sides of politiés to know that now is no time to seek party gain. Thank Heaven for every indication that at fieart the people are sound.",
         "Thé Western, môme Mont liy The Last Pioeiees v~ 4J~ qk n oueof a a ýbi w.eoudI\u0026mproyise, but Mot wle ïBg eilvery greenimi thinp, how d.ptns they boniked ia th~n.,afa \"-Mly reiobos of iey' vater pouring 4ufiom on. of the. glaciers on, ma- ,Irto Mourit Bobson. Thon, tired with Mw:ee. amble we had. eeatedl ourselves at one: end of a long pool, niad. had just $eea. a glittering trout ascend into the )rodleafed maple trees that crowded qabot the other end. \"Lookl\" cried tbe lad, \"there goea fano±her.!'And up went trout number two. ' Try the. lsas, sec the Indien hldden Sthe -bFanches 7\" X 1-pause\" the 'binoculars ovor to Fritz, as4 '. looated the.cause maidwent doivn to 4-thç effect. 'ýeentîhe bears raid thelpoola the l revery nec1ared,,\" the Yejiowhead ýLfas man told me, and b.e showed un a long line of -wildeat gut. W. stole \u0026long to,.nother pool, and watcbed hum seerete liself, pressing bis body close to the bo:, of tbe maple and letting the. wood- maUgot baited bock fal splash\"p into tir. voer. Instantly a tbree pound Rainbow trout aized it and swiftly as- tendod inte the tree. We r.turned te our pack animais assured there vas al- ways something new uider the suni. At Tete Jaune Cache vo met tbe camps of the. Canadian Notberu, the last pion- eers te cross thie Roekies, as now ail the. passes, Kicking Heorse, Yellowhead. Crow'a Nest eoho te the snort of the, steel horse, but even e you can yet kill your blacktail or black boar, your moose or elk or grizzly, your sheop or gent witiilna ound of the \"wboof, whof» of the Moguls. Did you ever bear a lion roar ?--a mountain climbing engine gives eut almiot oxactly thie same note. Wo came acrosq a sottler'a veli-bujit sbaekr-anotiier pioncer. Every pQuiid of iiecessaries bad te be packed before the- steel came along, but thbe cabin lI the valley hiAdnot interfered enoug to dim the tracks in the, animal trail that skirted the foot of the. mountain. Her. is an excellent place te start from. Look- ing baek over our trip 1 veubd advise 'hunters Who wish to obtain the full limit of Micek,iin nd te bave some excellent * fishing on duli days, to stop off at Tete !atiiie (avle, anîd get 'a real native te gl1d4e von. 1We -%ere niuciiamîîsed at i t'w~î (io oflVl e emet on evemy Mifliis heiirt of the opening wil- * * tJa'riwer ftýi y wzts unique, * iu~ î irxvrat of l1 i f i wo arelied Ilt oarî,ii]! t( I i l ']F ' t! Veilfo alit lil wo h iii,it- op- i wa 1 (011 y(1. One \u003clial;î\\01.) iado n ef l\" 1e il fonts was plli oIwly iîrîss onei illorning jiîst b l l lîr. IIa v acro--s lie spieI zt iloa ti iIg i()t. Ieilie sa* 'the supposed roee t os a bit,,and ho Lknew lt' V, s ýa lbik 'uek deer.- Castin Iom la orelie hê rowed mrng4 an Lmindovuthe rive after ti.nowthor- b~y ti re \u0026shore, tied our borses, and aeislng BRUe rushed down te- save her If possible. One of the mon,,O'Poots, a (Iosstlndian, was very good with the pack ropes, so we made up .S long Uine, and-ater ý thre. casti lhe managed to rope lber -fair- over the. bead.. «Mem-a- Io\" sis-kiýyou bon-bhon» hié called. fo a4e in, Chinook (\"die or choke, littie bob- tailed hiorse\"). *Now for a mighty tug- of-war, with the full current of thbe North ¶Tiompson on the other end. '¶Loiok ont! As soon sas ees-clear of the rock -we'll get it.\" 1 cailed te tthe mon. Wo ran back around a fr bole and surubbed it once, thon taking up the zlaek, we puiied lier head over into thle noarer curront. Instantiy w. were ail down in a heap, bracing our icet against tree or rock to keep f rom being draggedt-in. She swept across the cui. rent, -4çgd, stood up, shook herseif, eou\\Ïb and started to nibble some spra-th ed ferns. W. \u003cragged lber out .as the cook came rusbing up* \"By gofly,\" ho screamed, \"you've bat my dipper.\" My chum says -loe euid not bolp it. Ont shot bis foot and he çaught tlhat cook as often as bce had caught a rugby bail. Then we aIl washed our tom and bleeding banda, and the incident was forgotten. Bofore we leave this moet interosting part of the trip I want to show you the firat rowboat mado in these native forests entirely by hano; in fact, au axe and a hammer were tho principal tools. For a few miles we followed One bank, thon crossedl the -river again. The Bout Buidng la B.C. Fore oughly frightenect animal. Once hé man- aged te rua the bowlogs up on te the poor thing's back, and it pawed wildly ut hum, and swung ita great borna menue- ingly-just thon the navvy noticed it was broad daylight, ho couid bear the. rear of tAie rapide rigbit abead, se, thmowing off bis bots, ho leaped into the. swiftiy running water and mad, shore safely--six miles below the, camp --h. told me the. buck- sbowly waded ashore as soon as the raft ieft direct pursuit.. Some of tûe bridgea our poor pack animal\u0026 bad te cross were rather \"swingy\" aii Fritz said, the steady \"tump, tump\" of the animais feejv ing the green wood a. meet unu\u0026ual motion, one poor littie 'beast, a pet tee, \"Ninety,\" a bucekskin bronche, essaved te cross a single log, a trail forr mca only, we were ail as busy as 'w. could b. ieading the other berses in %vater well up\u003etoe i knees, the inevitable fails were imnîediateiy below and by the bellow tbey were big one. Poor \"Ninety,\" elle made sevemai eteady stepe along that four foot im, thon aie e eipped and stmaddied it. 1 called loudly te the last man in te drag bis herse ashore andi grab hem rope, but the. roar of the river droivned nîy cmy, snd in see went witlm a great splash. She mnade a noble effort te regain ber feet, but this le rart.by ac- conîplisliedi very swift %iater, and oit se. swept for the fale. Witlîin iftv feet of thei a glacial beuld(ýv-proujeet tii et font aboN e the %vater. A p)iîîe log N%-as zai.s reefed tiiere. 'hf Imly lcpîvs u tlie rock and ijiitauîtlv sti-addkd it. N' (J.NIR.is tmying te save ail the distance it can, but it bas a ough moad te travel rigbt here. Tt is rorn'nrkable, on the nigbits Fritz and I slee~p out above the. camp, studying seme speciai animal, te see thie long string of iights of the van- 'loua branches of the. construction camp stninging aleng the vaibey, like some tvinkling luminous uiet twisting nnd twining its gleaming way aieng the bot- tom of the dark rift some thousands of foot belew us. Me~h salmon woro rnnning Up the rive, now, in countlossa thousands. In one E articularly sballow spot whero our oraos crossed one was killod by being traxnplea on by \"Ninety.\"' Time after timo Fritz and I have turned one, over on its :back with our foot -as it wriggled and stmuggled acroSs the almost dry pebbly reach on ita belly. I sbould estimate in the- bas than two hundred miles course of the North Thompson there was eaeily one million salmon in plain sight during our downward trip. Pour things, they were literaliy worn out. The fins were ail naked, 1k. tii, sticks of a. fan, the skin of t~he boiiy often had great boles worn ia right through te the red fiesb, the eyea were tomn or fungus hidden, 'tii. moutha hooked., Struggling on to die at the «,Cache\" or the \"Paso,,\" for ail Pacifia salmon, iso cailed, die at four year old maturity, once they have epawned. W. wero migtly amuaed by the an- tics of thie blaick bears. Fritz and 1 penetrated the untrodden sources of un- named creeka, but even here the. salmon had foreed their way. It waa October, cold nigits and gloriona days, and the big cowardly black bears were hungry. Seated astride ofa pinnacle rock with eur glasses sea.rching the stream below I feit Fritz nudge nie. Sbowly I turned niy 'head. Ro winked and cast his oyes down tiiere, right below our feet. Some five hundredl yards down was a big biack animal squatted on a rocky point. With xny peerful glass I couid see ber paws plainly.. I knew she was a common bladk, as tho grizzlies show the ends of their elaws. As still as the rock on which a-ho sat squatted the bear. 'Mid you sec that T\" whispered Fritz. \"That\" weas a swift pass of ber big black paw and B sbining salmon sent flying through the air full twenty feet behind ber. She peered back at it witb ber piglike eyes, and went on fishing. She ciawed the nexit oneut, and tore it a bit befome placing it behind her, but she t-hmew ou-t the next three. She seemed to ce satisfied witii five, and started ber sup- per. It was getting a bit dusk, but we couid see ber plainly. She tore the head partly off the, llrst one, and ate inte it, evidentiy -the tiny heart first, as they are vemy fond of the eyes, brain.and heart. This first fish a-h, soon discarded, and ravished the. second and so on until she lîad tomn the five ail to bits; thon sho iicked bier big pawe, wiped ber chopa, ivaddled down to the watem's edge, atuck ber big blunt snout in, shook off the water that clove to the bair and disap- peared into the cedar bruali. -As I turned over these stained note- books on my desk so many scenes rushod back, making it bard to chose of whioh to tell you.'» Our capture of a Biacktail fawn was interesting. We were walking along the west bank wben we hoard the shrill yeiping of the native doge, yellow curs from the obd eath-covered village :bouse. Right abead of us, acress the, xnouth of a brancb, spmang a litho bound- ing deer, ail four feet hitting the one spot At seemed. It was travelling very rapid- ly, but no faster tban the long lino of yellow streaks tinat now paesed thmoiigh the ferns bebind lt. Wo ran as fat as the nature of tbe ground weould allow. us, and opened out a wide ptretch of waters. -1 tuu' Caliijin Nortdi Tlhonpson Valley, BC y -4 t t t T t t 1 d it t a i fe tf 'V Fr pal Ta",
         "Thé Western Home Mfonthi y Out the tide flats splashed the deer. ight n its, foamy xtrack 'bounded the suer11 brutes., To add ta the poor thiwgs r en'Indian ean'os ohot out fr-on th maubherie en the east bank, and tobk the chas. as fast as- paddle etrôkes - id urge it. About every twenty- thatroke the paddle was laid do\" nh 'sang the rifle. Luck. fly, lh e deer was a scant hun- dred y from the rifle, and fifty from the . d tne bounading of the animal Mud the lling of the canas made aim 'dI~ult~ the doge were gaining, 80 we toka ii the gime and leaped into Our 'we lied left that marning ion the t. Witl might and main we uret lig'ht cedarboard craft while ii es and doge bayed. . Finally the pac caught up -and the deer disap- yred eath a mass of churn'ing heads sdwa tails. Into thie mass the ndan's noe darted. With outstretch- ed a flashing paddle he belabored tt arling pack. H.e had heard our a, k-kum uan-iteh mowitsh mah. kook» (take cars of the deer, we buy it) but, 'w'en we iarrived, it was hard ta telwhich was deer and which wae dog, and, by George, which -v'as Indian, as a few of the ortarving pack ,w\"re off the. shallow flats right into the canos. %Or paddles joined in ki 'fray, and we soan beat off the. mon- grfls and picked up the exhausted deer. It lay in the bottom of the. canas withaut s motion, but befors we got ashors w. had to tie the feet with bits of old burlap and bowline, as it recavered very much indeed. Wihat a dainty plaything thkt Blacktail fawn became. Within a week * tlearned to oearch rny hunting coat pocket for lump augar or carrot, but even these dainties would not keep it away ýfrarn Fritz. It followed hima like bis own shadow whenever he entered the wmr enclosure we kept it in. Once it escaped at night and -wandered along the lower edge of the high tidal clfs. W :Îound it next morning straddled, haif drowned, acrosa a tide-washed pile of flotsam, and it whigtled and bleated fo r US, snd actuall1Y toars ran down frorn its grest browu cyea when Fritz passed hie arme about it. The firet thing in the. marning and the last tbing at night was a visit to \"nimrod,\" and, of course, ws did not go emptyhanded. Ou Christ- mas Eve, as vs vers returning from a friend's home, Fritz rau into the deer Yard and opened the pen. A few stops ahead af me, i ths lantern light, I saw him raise hie arme and fali into t:e stra'w with a loud wailing cry. 1 darte'd i and kneit beside thim. Hie arme vere around Nimmylé neck, hies'tears were failing an the shapely head. Aise! poor iSimmy, he bad fallen before our over- feeding and kindjnesses, and, on this eve of the sacred day, had died-\"ail alan. whle we vwers enjoying ourselves,\" as Fritz sobbed out. Temperance is reasan's girdie sud paesion's bridie, the strength of ths soul and the. foundation of virtue.-Jeremy Taylor. W Iootng is not ee.y. No rth Thomapson VafleY, B.C. How the \",Axe\" Fe11 at semie Written for The Western Home Montbly 1by ChareDorian TRAINMASTER MeGuire blinked when h.e read the. essage hsnded ta hfim by the. operator ut Benlow. It rau: \"Go to Semia and report to trainmaster Hughes as hie assistant. Ain trainmasters' positions abolished effective this date.\" He turned ta the operator ta, ask far an explanatian, thouglit better of it, paced the statian platform umtil the. train for Seia axrrived and departed m supreme dudgeon. Ta the canductor who read hie passelhe nadded curtly instéad of indulging inie wanted family talk. \"Ai traiimnasters' positions abolihed\" hie mused. \"Hughes ie one and I'm his assistnt-h'm. Guessa the other two trsinmasters have been let eut. Mabe it's lucky l'v. got a job at * aiut Hughes ie only a kid and away junior to me. This ie war!\"l He knew that hie daren't protst i these days of drastic staff reductione and alter- atians but hie would show Hughes that he'd have a- Devil'a own time of it with hum as assistant. \"How d'y. do, Mr. MeGuie?\"geted Hughes upon lis arrivai at =emo. fHuggh neyer used ta say \"Mister\" and thia aggravated b naw. \"nsei'm oI' o orbs.Mister, b. hanged. What're yrou \"I thought you vas,\"isaid Hughes, i- solently. \"You're hie boss,\" calmaly responded Hughes. \"Ive ne juniadction nm the \"«Boss, b. blowedyo0r my boss What you taUu' pabout?\"lur Hers the. operator handed him a red enveloe marked \"confirmatian of' tels- gram?. Beflre' opening-it McGuire rea- ommended a choic.' ocation iHades for' Hughea. Hues païd no attention ta i but comued- bis. conversation with \"Ifs coertain1y a shame \" he said. \"«So many of thebSt menaiâ off. In lots of placéesne heed was paid te seniaity- simply the. vorst men vent. Bers the. senor ons stay rgrls of ability.\" MeGuire broke open bis message and. read it a~nd for the. second time tbat, day h. turned -upen an operator ta begin a = ia ht better ,of -it, and ;insed brmade. . -Wbat d'ýye know.about that?\" h. asked Hughes, handing hlm the. telegram , vich r.ad: \" -J. êG. MeGuire, 8Superintendent,..Ben- low- .Go te Semie and report on trainrnaster Huge as. possible asistant. Ail trsin- Mases positions abolished' effectve this \"Know ail about it,\" replied Hughes. \"Our Supe=tendent Je nov SUeMtod enV of Trini;Mr. J. G. MoGune ài promtedtoSuperintendent and J. C. £luçhes rune a pretty good show of being Assistant Supérintenident effective thila date.\" McGuirs fisb.ed the. other mSurse out, of he poet and aaked Hughes wbat lie kwaot that aso. À Blaek Tail Buck \"You tbink that way sud I vill b. Wbat, d'y. vaut me here far?\" \"When yau cain dowu came around sud talk ta me,\" said Hughes, haughtily sud waloed away. \"9Just as I thaught,\" commneuted Mo- Guire. \"A fresh case of sweled head. I've a mind ta tbrow up Vhe jab night here. This knucklin' davu ta, a cub isn'V sain' ta agreevwith me. Ivoild resign if times weren't 80 rotten. Such le vwan. If HUghes vas a Garn i'd e usiidin chok-iini.\"y H. naticed that the. train he came i on vas stiRin h the statian. He glanced at the trainmen sud carmen blankly until one etftthe rainmen camne up ta him and epake. \"Mr. McGuire, ve've got a case of al pipes trazen sud plenty of vater in Vhs expansian drum. What had we better do?\"p \"Go sud ask Hughes, be's your boss. If iV vas up ta me I'd fine yqu for net knawing your business. Lots' of good men walking anound looking for youn jobs.\"y \"But Mr. Hughes just sent me Vo yau,\" affered Vthe trainman. \"'Oh, he did,' did hie? WelI, -go sud light s lire in Vhs Baker beater as yau should have dane long ago, then start the train sud point eut Hughes ta me.\" \"There h. la talking to Vhe aperator,\" indicated the trainman. MeGuire found him double-quick. \"WMhat d'y. mean, Hughes, sendin' that lawdlin' train hand ta me-w;hat did you want me ta do with him-pceerve hlm in alcohol?\" \"Oh, operator Bell, bers buh.bad tihe openator ut Benlow sveating blaed ever bis errer. You neyer sav anyone more pentent. He'. not manried long and it vould be a handahip for hlm te las. hi. job juet nov.\" 1\"Oh, vs vont talk about losin' job- Im tee vorried aven my appetite just now-haven't had a bite since merning.\" \"Neitiier have 1-been vonderin' what yrou'd Viink of me fer Assistant. Que.. ve'il go sud make iV a banquet for tva.\" Denylng the Master ,Can' ran vho spoke thase vards ofde] e Vhe same mai vho atood up before hs crowd on the. day oft Pen- tecosV, the. man who said Vo Vhs impotent beggar at 'th. Gate Beautiful, \"Silver snd gold have I nons; but vhat I have that give I thee. In Vthe name ot Jesus Christ et Nazareth, valk t\" Yes and na. Peter oft hs déniai is Peter in the. grip of ths devii, viiereas Peter eftVhs day et Pentecost and oftVhs Acta and the. Fpistles, is 'Peter cleansed Vhrough peni. tence, filled vith (3od's spirit, and held fast inIi hieSaviaur's grasp. Peter noV only possessed ths advan- tages, but vas liable ta Vhe dangers ot bis big nature. Forceful, commanding personalities, whosc nature ie strong sud vigorous, may go far either vsy-up or down. They don't do 'things by halves. Wheu Vhey yield themeelves te Qed they do it viiole heartedly, sud the Christian eomniunty lu -which they live aud vorkr feels the forwardimpulse of their adhe- sian ta tii.Christiaii cause. They.are men vho do that littie bit extra beyènd the. normal, which tells se-much. IV may be a littie bit extra i efort, or Iunsac- rifiS, or i ourage. luchamater,-too, the. forcedulmess-' 3ftheir peronlity lUft. thèmÉ a noteh or two above. the average man. But they-,have\u003cdap ira corne- epouding V o' their advantages. When, for example,- 'they are desobudent,, their despoud.ncy i. otieu of Vthe 'darkest' sud blackegV' hue. ,And 'when they leave 'tii paths of 'virtue, they are neyer'cotteuut ''the .edge et the m a 1 dhe uit on gon griat ue-the midt 6 t.' u a L mai jug.Peter Vo 4l'ave b» .. 'W#Meî such a man talla, h. fais . gris vôuuîàý of the'ught and action 'on Smdat a thes worWe. stan«ird trN h W. deny our Lord 'vien vs eai thmgIng - thVei.pulpit aud' the - Sù»uO« \u0026ihool cas, aud sot au entirely dtst\u0026 thbg ng luoursocial and comiér.lal, tioniliip-penhape lagin'f.hscp tradietby te «idoiome maxie I 1k. \"Wel4 busiueu. la busiu.ss,»' or!'U: f in love sand ver.\" ' Chritatyn~ knows eue moral code, sud iV' l fo. -the dsysof theweek alik». - PrO»g$hs. « trueoIu tii#o \u0026la aiso00 k Testament -kind. (1b) By open Infraction of 4'Vhsu Iaw. Ou.e et th. sddest *kilste liappen u onuection wlth Christ'. Ch**n~ in 'wheunmre hlgbly-plsoed ofiolel gl3 Vo .mbesslemeutor sdultery. ,-Atobes, the «»me ofChrist -are Ù lmO portomlty '4. bla.phere, su ofteitb\u003c aenot slow Vo tae .tii he ne.Tbi gay «T$ga FMe Catian For T«- s iiauting, psslm-singig iiumbugl'P IV ifs .very nad \"When asm-isuoes bis -.èe.' 4hg1 t tiough s% bolIer explosion or l19 striea ndowu linmddile 111.by. lueur- able dises.., but, mottl degradl4ou lM sadùiaVtili.li. eblund nai sm4d _t, heipleas lnvalid my keep *tboir '.,o intact,' but when the QhrlaVIsà% e I la g¶e h. -48 denied Ëhie 8.ylour -î»« ho hs cueffedsfreabhe ii. rd .iU-1,4 (e)'When lu RméBorne dlng:8114 do~s, .g.' hrowing a five-fri. ~I ou te the roulette table at iM= te \u003clkào àýbd .eeklng te mUtfle Vth. repovhf \"lu »« -voies by rseiarklug that 'eOvey do.« 1t, that à is tih. reognâiedi 6lg (4) By alleos..Whex ChràltalV ia apoken et sllghtfuglyluyour we doeà.-your oTe e «erc ey. t ii.r4of your arof insu, Tour Feu of. Ellisul? Neyer letV*ue ho silent At 'sueli thues. Lotus blurt our- testimen3\", hW simple sud however iitltln.. WI siiouRd wvs l ishaned -'et, ounrd Why, lndssd? %M Llvlnguo si.ld,:.'R ha. ever ' been «a Gentteman M ti stricte.t houer.\"1. . (il.) Denta la apt Vo meove ifrom 1ldes Ve- more, Iu the. case of Peter the. frat dental vas tVhe simple statement, 'l kuow noV what thon sayewt,\" thesuse- ond vas accompanied 'by an oatii; viere. un hs third vas preceded by a boutet cursing and swearing. Note the feu- dency et one wrong \u0026et te bring other. i iV. train. (il!.) Hinte for Vthe avoidance.oet de- niai. (a) Beware the Iliret suggestion ot ~evil. la it tee much Vo 'say'that ths wvay vas prepared for Peter'. deial 'whea lie fallowed bis Lard \"star off 1\" Psy heed to the sarliest symptomh' et caldnese or indifference or glackhess in your devotion te your Lord. A. ' soon as yudeteet iV throw yourselfAnl humble peniteuce before your Saviour, and sec BRis pardon and. reitorug grace. (b) Avoid the. spirit of vauntlug. Peter had been tee boasetful, mmchii te vehiement iu hie protestation that noth- ing would cause himu t stumble aud ho * as ready te, dis for bis- Master. In epite oft ail ths Vhe curies- ity cdf a maidservant laid him by the. heel.. \"Pride goeth bel are a tati.\" Ther, -ie only anes pirit in which the. hcavenly pthway can b. trod. W. muât \"walK iuMbly ith acur God.\"",
         "The\" Wetern Home monthl.y Oùriktirds\"and their-Economic Value ~Mranlu a l, Preaident Audubon flociety, Winnipeg Y\"7 e1wcpbexoepting the.ho - cmaube «.r«r..sinluterna botter under- b# avea -mtter smre attention,: *0 d .. eenoomutod that about tl~ otstidea cf the. Value 9f.. ~eseinsecte 1AUa bushel mns- relaionte aricltur, u ..7à\",l. means that the daily eon- lA.faët that bt sa;\" etf éi.fy chuozins necteini SIedStates Goy.ramqt. a aachuetts ài' 91,0 00 'bushels. Thia ~$~~\u003eo dPOte the farmers \u0026long Ostmate lu good for -about ive montha '~I~W h'eu- x mention -qû o@Wn -of *4 7.r, lMay to September inclusive. t ispaë1iuarly'te la Durilg. the. remainder of thie year the. hm 0-fiàtarlo# whih bas damW anad, larve. destroyed by our p tiN_xe218-Jirda wiutt, -L «efan1 and early apring cil . IReltion 4t. Agrlou«tu, »I àlpmatswilll b.equivaient to ueariy haif W. inuih. Tda n eub.)d hsqaty. f«\" *. ekm\u0026.ui ultheuli Atsfu n instructive bock 'Xcw bb* . ofy« fari er, gardoner sa# t\u003c\u003e Attract and Proteet Wiid Birds,\" eau *Uu4 epoNrer, as it would ithout doubt be Precred'fron the. National Audubon I fgeasbeel e hIn.,SElety,2New 'York. (price.40e.), sud in ~Kitutr.s lubird. frori the. ecouqmlo tii book vil be fouud evidene cf the. =leVIewla quit. e et. . Ite ltudy v£hi.of rotectilg bfrdsas apracticed by *» . r6velgtion to me;,and-.fertn\"t Gunay under Gcvermnmentupervision. 7yqMZ bave been doing ail 1 sa e in- -la 'Tianta Umeful te Attraet Bird. auï tii.edi board, parka board àadi agd Proteet Fruit E-ast cf the. Rocky IUIl$haiate ereet n.stlng bu\" ~for' Itoùntalnsp W. L. Mctee, Assistant tit4dl1itfd frenda. MgIhad the. Biological Survey, United States, makes pWmur. cf edlng several varieties of the. following at*temet:- btwxb d4ring the gant, 'wlter sa, 96 -St. \"RIldently tiiere need be ne eason ?*uon the teast aide of tii. Red River, without its fruit if judielous selection àwI ëàey siiowed ti.rapprecation bY cf chrubé and trees is mde by those ee- Sta Igthiere.iring te attract\u003e birds. Thns a tiiicket, vaT al. u ides cf the ecopomrii worth of raapberry or dewborry, eider snd dog- Ut lirde te the. agriculturiet I1oePY a wood grouped about smre taller umaeh, là*\"etrot from 1the Ontario Bulle- Juueberry aud Juniper would uppiy ,t alu c b*. fruit trongbout tihe year.- àlesi theservice th. birda render ila 'kesel.g witiâl proper limita the. various ir orcfinsetsWh\"care injurions te eur W% cr anm'ais; in preying 'upon r\u0026tqý mcsud other destroyers cf cur gain d fruit trees; la devouring weed 'la ,hiacting as acavengera sudlanthe. caa6Jof \u003carn. birds, furnisiiing sport sud \"No* reilabie estimat. bas over been niadé cf 1he manual loua te ifarmera of Ontario by the. depredatiou cf insecte. In the 'Unted States mueh careful at- tention ha\u0026 been given to, the aubjeet, andin a report te tii. Departmeit of Agriculture et Waashington laiied la lgdt, Dr. Henaiaw estlxnated tiihe..nste the. gricultural lutereats cf the country at upwards cf aeven huudred millions cf dollars (*700,000,000.\u003e Our loases vil certaly b. as large proportionately. The Io in caused ehiefly by su lusuf- ficienoy of bird lif. on the cuitivatcd banda. Experieuce the venid over kas ahovu that as bird lii. decreaaea, lu- smita lacrease; aise that birds are more effcent In kesping dowu insect- pestea than a\u0026U otiier aîenciea natural aud ar- tificil c ombined. \"Experience iaesiiow tiiaï; lawa are \"Bird Lore,\" the. officiai. organ of the cf but littie lise in accompiihig re. National Audubon Society, published by fer -ma uniess ustained by au intelligent, D. Appleton and Co., New York, at $1 sympatiiotic public opiniou, sud this la er year, should bc ini every home. what v. require te cultivate on behaif \u003e '' cf our bird.. W. have a protection law -I have quoted euough te prove the im- wieh la amply sulffcieit if properly eu- imense value te the eommnunity of our forced. Every persen eau proteet th wilL birds, aud it is surely the. duty of birds on -bis owu lauds, aud if hie vould ecryoue te do wiiat lie can te protect onby do soe ii. ouett teb. derivod fromn and encourage theni by putting up nest- his effoits would accu be apparent.\" ing heusee snd feeding them in the épring and fall aud tniose that remain with us in Beautiful littie peeket book-\"B Tird winter aise. A litti. suet and grain Quide\"-\u003cpart 1 Game Bird.) (part 2 wil go a long way. Laud'Birds Esat of the Rockies\u003ei nat- ural- colora, by Chester A. Roid, Worces- 1 hould like te seec ur public sehools ter, M.anas, nay b. proeured at the book take a few minutes a week te teach the stores for 75e. each iu cioth, or at $1.0() childrou tuis subjeet in connectiou with in loather covers. Tii... viii b. found cur wild lowers, as I arn sure they meat intcrestiug both to adulte aud would bc intensely intercsted, and their gWdidreu, and iielp te create a love for our natures would b. materially improved. béautiful birds. (1 might mention tint I had the ipleasure for several month4 another poeket book by the. same author of listeuing while one of our city mis- la \"Wild Flowers East eoftthe Rock ies,\"' ters gave the cildreu ef the church a aise lun ustural colore). Mr. Reid in bis ten minute taik escli Sunday morning on preface states:- our wild birds, sud tiiey as well as aduits \"It lias been found by observation sud were both interested and profited by dissection tint a cuckoo consumes daily these short talks. 1[ venture toesay the 50! to 400 caterpullars or tlîeir equivalent, chldreu viii nover forget them. w .hile a chickadee wiii cnt 200 to, 500 in- Mr. W. G. .Sett, for many years our 8eets or up to 4,000 inseet or worm egge. city treasurer, who in a great friend of ]W0 iu bcets is a conservative estiînate of ail wild birds sud game, was the inspira- the quanitity (uunsumed by eaoh individual tion that caused a meeting te bc called înIsectivo)ruus bird. liv eurefully esti- recently in the. Industrial Bureau to formn iuating Pie birds ini scverai jreas, 1 find a provincial brauch of the Audubon So- that iniM- ahuqt1tte are- not iess ciety, and it vas very gratifyiug to fiîid thani five inseet eating birds per ace. that the board room vas crowde\u003ci with TIns this State with its 8,0 square friends of the wild birds. I hope that miles lias a ugeful bird population of flot vou, dear reader, viii show your interest loua. thau. 25,600,000, 'whieh for oaci day's in your province by joiuing this society. tare requirea the. enormous total of The secretary is '-%r. J. Ji. Wallis, of 316 %M80,000,000 insecte. That such figures l3oyd Avenue, Winnipeg. National Asocation of Audubozi Socie- ties Speciali Leaflet No. 22 Aanonceentto NanitobaTeaciiera Tbrough the generosity of a friend cf the. birda, te Nationai Association cf Andubon oioties in at proeut able tb make the. followig cifer of assistance to those teachere in Manitoba who are In- terested ini giving instruction to, pupils. on thie subject cf bird atudy. junior Audubon Clannes To forrn a Junior Audubon Clasa for 'bird study, a teacher shouid exiplain te the pupils cf her grade (and others if desired) that their objeet will b. to learu ail they eau .about the wild birdm, and thut evoryone who becomes a member will bc expected te be kind to tihe birds and protoot them. Ba.ch pupil will bc required te, pay a fee cf 10e. eaeh year. Wheu ton or more have paid their fèes, the teaehers will moud their money te the Auduben Society cf Manitoba, and give the manfe cf 'the Audubon Cla\" and her own name and address. The soeiety wil then forward te hie teacher for eaeh pupil whose fee bias boon paid the. boau- tiful mocking-bird 'Audubon Button,\" and a set of ton eolored pictures, to- gether witii outlija drawings and loaflets, liet of which is given herein. The. 'toach- or will aloo receive, free of cost, tho spiendid magazine, \"Bird Lore, \" which coutaina many suggestions for teaciiers. -lt wili be expectod that the. toeher thawk give st least eue leason s month ou the subject cf birds, for which purpose aie will find the lenflets of great value as n basis for the lessons. Bylawa for Audubon Ciase If the teaciier wisiies, the. Aubudon -Cluss may have a regular organization and a ipupil eau preside 'upon the occa- sions viien the. class is discussing a lessou. For this purpose the fdllowing simple set cf by-laws is suggested: Alticle I.-This organization shali b. kuowu as the. (Webster Fifh Grade) Junior Audubon Clas.' Article II.-The objeet cf its members shah b. te learu ail they eau about the ivild birds, and try te protect them from being wantonly killed.. Article MI.-The officers shail consist of a president, secretnry and treasurer. Article IV.-The annual fees efthte class shall consist of 10c. fer eacii mtm- ber, sud the nùoney shall b. sent te the Audubon Society cf Manitoba, in ex- change for Educational Leaflets sud Au- dubon Buttons. Article V.-The Junior Audubon Class shall have et least onie meeting every month. Subjects te Study Besides the. study cf the particular birds treated cf in the lcaflets. with colon- cd pictures, the foflow-iîg subjects xnay be discussed with profit: BIRDS' NESTS-In the faîl, after the birds have all left their nests, these mar be coilected and brought to zhe sehool reem. Study thern and learr, that the -Chippiug aparrcw's iiest :,- ncde of fine twigs, grasses, aud is l:xed wth horse hair; examine the mud eup of the. Robiu'a neat, the aeft Uing cf the. Leggeniiead Shnike's neet, etc. FEEDt\u0026G BIEDS-Iu vinter arrange \"Bird -tables\" lu tithe trees sud by the windows, and place suet, cheese, and seeds on tiiem; du summer put eut bath- ing aud drinkiug pans, and note vhat birds come aud how frequently, and report lu detail te the dlass. NESTING BOXES-Iu early spring iput up bird boxes for Bluebirds, Wreus, Cliickadeee, Nuthatehes, Martins sid: snd others. ii, leaflets vil be fourni te contàizs mauy suggetions about bird f eedig sud nesting boxes. Tii. ehildreu may use their.cfayons aud fil lunthe. ustursi colora c i . ýbirds in the. outiue drawings, using thô'cdl- ored. pictures for comparison. This. vii help fasten iu their minda the, coeect coeings 01 the. birds, thua lielpiug 'te identify themin luthe cftli List of leaflets, colored plates sud eut- Ue dravings supplled pupils. under «tho plan es outlined in tiiis. announceme'nt. Nightiiavk, Mourning Dove, Meadow'- lark, Flicker, 'Sparrow iiavk, SereeclrdiéKI, Purpl. Martin, H'urmiugbird, Cuelkue, Robin. Teachers may id the. followiug-booka ef value lu tlîeir work: 'Tirat B6o1fl Bird.,\" by Olive Thorne ifler. Piric. $1 (contais many valuable suggst« a) \"Stories cf Bird Life,\"y by T. GiIhkt Pearson. Price 60c. (written speci yl for achool work). \"Bird Guide,\" by 0. K. Reed. Land birds, prie. 75e. Water birds, prie. $1. (Cotains colored pictures of birds, very useful for field work). Correspoudeuce AUl teachers sud others interested in bird study are invited te correspond freely with the soclety. Perm-.for Reporting the Organization cf A junior Audubon Clama Mrs. C. Percy Anderson, Treasurer, Manitoba Audubon Society, 238 Oxford -Street, Winnipeg, Man. Dean Madam, With this 1 enclose $ ...in psy- ment for the fees cf....... members of the .......... Junior Audubon Class, which vas formed st ........ on.,... Yeu, may send Audubon Buttons, leaflets and \"Bird Lore\" te the following addrcss: P.O. Address........... Express Office................. Have you previously formed a class under this plan?~ Yes. No. Joy is for aIl men. It does net dsepend ou cirCUinstances or condition; if it did, it could only be for the fcw. It is Dot the fruit of good luck, or of fortune, or even of outward success, whici ail men cannet have. It is of the seul, or the soul's character; it is the, vealth cf the soul's own being, viien it is filled with the spirit of Jeaus, wiiich i. the. spirit of eternal love.-Horace Bushnell. G t o t o c s a t v I h 'J",
         "The Wester'n Home Monthi y An Interesting Peep.'at Natùre'si ______ \"«Beauty Shop\" By G. M. Mackness. I1N an Interesting littie study of bird life, piiblished a year or two ago, eu oe of ý ur most observant natural- los s sid thatbirds deserve te rank as the most refiuied class of living beings, if oniy for thei.,attention they bestow on their toilet. \"«Tiey are' the only creatures,\" lie observes, \"wliich bathe for cleanlines' sake; beasta may lick therneelves, or wa.low luxuriousiy for pleasure-in mud as readily as in water-but deliberate washing in water is purely a bird cus- tom-\" Now, whie the toilet ia undoubtedly a more elaborate affair with the birds tha the. beaats, it ia hardiy fair te assume tliat the liekinganad the wallowmngs of our. four-foeted frieuds . are indulged in for no otiier purpose than that of mere enjoyment. The mud bath of the, .1,- pliant is an excellent case in peint. It serves a very practical purpese indeed, and, la carried eut in s50 tiorougiily sensible a f5shion that w. can hardly dôùbt its-iniportsaice, from the. elephant'a point of view, as a toilet acessory. The. elephant, as .we knoW, bas one of the, thiekest skins imaginable, *but i spite of thia, in hua wild state he frequently graceful creatures carry, fixed te their front flippers, a sort of littie comb, which ordinariiy they use for smoothing' the fur on their faces. But in warm wcather they use thia eomb-tipped flipper as a fan, waving it te and fro in the most natural mnanner possible. Thousands of them have been seen at once on a hot day in the \"rookeries\" ef the Pribiov Isiands and eisewhere, al iying on their sides and busily 'piying these natural fans. Showmen have taken advantag. of this habit te erganize \"seals' orchestras,\" and bave. taught their seals te beat tambourines and cymbas-a task les difficult than it appears, if w, bear in mind that the movements are practically those whicli the creatures make when fannlng them- selves on their native rocks. Among the. commener animals the. palm for careful grooming must be awarded te tth. opossums. Tiiey are wonderfufly' particular about their per- sonal appearance, or penbaps it would be more correct te say their Ïbodily com- fort, sud are modela of animal cleanlinesa. Indeed, their ablutions seem te occupy most cf their waking heurs, and the. attention -tiey bcstpw on thir M.adWlark suffers great aunoyance front a species of tick, whose unweicome attentions at iength become more than even his teugli bide can endure. To rid himself of his tormentors b. therefore takes a mnud bath, and this is how h. does it. Seeking soute haif-dnied pool, the. mud cf which is still soft, the. elephant lies down and relis about in it, wailowing after the. manner cf a pig in similar surroundings. Having plastered hirnacif with mud, h. cornes eut, and taking up hie position in the full glare cf the. sun, stands motionless for heurs, until his aliiry eovering becomes dry and bard. Then, by audden muecular efforts, he breaks up tus ceating cf mud, which falis te tthe grouud in great flakes, carry- ing with it ail the. parasites thtt were on hie bedy, and which bad become im- bedded in the. hardened earth. And so0 the sagacious creature moves off, freed for a time from hie minute termentors. Ordinarily, however, the. lephant takes his bath at nigbt, and it is oniy en an exceptionally hot day that he wil bvthe, when the. sun is high. On such oecasions he eitiier submerges hirnseif eiitirely, or else stands in the. water and spturts it tiirough his trunk ever hie bead aiff shoulders, after which he retires te tIl. foot of some shady tree, where, if 'tmiay 'believe wiiat travellers tell us, Le ili sometimes industriously fan hi-nself witii a branch in order te keep u:the files. This use of the. fan as a teilet aid i:or nmay net be true in the case cf t ltepiant; it ie certainly- in force 'bl, the fur-bearing seals of the nerth. Da eautiful provision of Nature these bauds and feet la particular is really quit. remarkable, for thiey wash them, ou, an average, every two or three minutes. througiiout the' day. Lieus aud tigers wash thcmselvee juet as a est does. «With the. tengue tiiey firet moisten thoroughly the. soft, india- rubber-like bail cf the, front paw, and tiien pas it daintiiy over the. face aud behind the, cars, lu this way the foot serves both as a sponge aud a brush, the. rough tengue acting as a comb for smoothing the. rest cf the. body. Rats and hares aise use their feet as sponges and brushes: in faet, there is ne more perfect natural brusii in the, worid than the, iare's foot, and for tiiat reason it is always employed by the, acter when mak- ing-up for the. stage. Doe are remarkably qulek and clever i~ erforming their teilet. Most of the, wok is doue witii the tengue, but sporting doge after a iieavy day witii the guns tiirough mud and rain, bave a natty way of using a tiiick bush, or the side cf a baystack, as a kind cf rougi towei for prelirninary cieaning purpeses. On reaching borne they loe.ne time in completing their teilet, and every sports. mnu knows thnt mud or dirt on a dog's cent on thie morning feiiowing a day's shoot is a pretty sure sign that the animai bas been over-tired the day before: nothing but excessive fatigue would account for such slovenly scamp- ing of bis toilet. Indeed, se pronounced is the instinct cf cleanlinese in every kind of sperting dog that sorne cf them wili even strike work before the. shooting is over in order te give themeelves a goed \"dlean-up\" befere tiiêy becorne utterly exbausted. 11w iii STK POWDER \u0026lîUun\u0026$C Eüt4 patuxs \"FROUFKCTORY TO Hom* 17 WESTERN »R\u0026.CH.'XTORgS The Mason \u0026 Risoh Piano baî eatabiehed itzellfauasufflin- strument of exceptienal worth. In-bufit quality explains its lea'dershi.p. It is a n instrument for those who want not just an average piano, but a piano far above the \u0026ver- age, yet at a reasonabie tiret cst, and with that real economy which makes it easy to own. It cornes te you f romn Factory te Heonie, saving al middiemen's profit, and thus it reacts upon your pocket- book as weil as \"pon your joy in the. possession of \"The Best Piano Buit.\" Wheu writing advmiia.rs pisse.muuntion The Weutaru Home Montbly. M",
         "The'- Western Home Monthly Make This Work Easier for Yourself y OU'~wil find that Sunlight Soap is the be«t and handiest helper for wash- ing \"ises you ever used. Try Sunliht, and the Jiardest part of dish-washing wiil disappear. The work wiUl be quieker douc, too. 0f conrne, Sunlight le the best ail-round soap you can buy-good for dainty fabrie, and those woollen -Mbankets you want to keep freeli and fleMc. Remember, it is kind to the Lande. Sunlig.ht Soap Ail grocers seland recommend il A BAR 0f the larger domestie animais, herses and cattle net ouly cleau, their own coats, but often assist eacii otiier ithe. case of \"«difficultV' places, Buch as tiie neck. Tiie eat, witii others cf her kind, han neoexiciidifficult places. 8he con- trives te 'wash every paFt cf her body, beginning by licking her coat upWards and backwards, as far as her tengue will reach, and flnieiiing, as han been des- cribed, by riubbing the. back cf ber neck and tiie parts behind her cars with cars- fuily moistened paw. Herses and cattie, cf course, cannot do this, no they wasii for each other such parts as tiiey cannot reach tiiemselves, the herse, however, using his teeth wiiere the cow employa her tongue for this purpese. But the birda, after ail, perform the. mont careful toilets cf any creatures, and, curiously enough, they carry on 1heir own dainty little persona \"aids te beauty\" which few of us would suspect them cf possessing. Cold cream and vaseline, fuller's earth and pearl-powder, brilliantine and pomatum-all cf these are in daily use among the birds, though few enjcy al cf them at once. True, mud serves for cold cream and vaseline, and, mostly, commen clust for pearl- powder and fuller'e \u003ctrth, but the. brilliantine is actually carried by the birds thnt use it in a emali and iiandy reservoir on thie upper surface cf. the taiL mhe brilliantine in used by the, birds for anointing their plumage, and la really an oiiy secretien which in yielded by a tiny gland, shaped semething lik. a heart and often tuf ted with feathers. Typet iBird Houee. In the case cf water-fowl this cil-gland is exceedingly well developed, and the. bird dra-ws very freely on its supply cf niatural pomade when niaking its toilet; se, when wie se. a duck burrowing, in- dustriously among the feathers cf ber tail, we xnay be quit. sure that she is en- gaged in 'tapping\" ber supply cf natural cil for titivating purpeses. But the use cf brilliantine is net con- fined te water-fowl; a select coterie cf ]and-birds indulges in It alse, ameng thern being the hoopoe and the. great horubili. In the case cf the hornbili the secretion acts as a staining pigment, and the yellow eler cf the neck and wings is entirely dueto t frequent applicati3n.s of this natural pomade. This use cf a \"hair-dye\" on the part cf a bird is a toilet secret which. se far as is known, 18 sbared by ne ether creature that flues or creeps. The powder-puff is another toilet appurtenance widely used by birds, and it is responsible for the delicate blom Nvbich may be seen on the plumage cf iany species. The powder is produced from certain featbers which decay or crumble away as they grow, and among the birds wbich carry it are the cock- atoos, grey parrets, and nient cf the lierons. Pigeons, too, are powdery birds, ns any one knews 'whe is in tbe babit cf hiandling thein muchi. The finct ion cf powder and cil ln birds la obvieusly one and the saie-te tlirow off the wet. At ail events, it is a iatter cf cemmnon observation tbat amiong land-bir-ds the pewder-bearincg species de not get nearly se wet in a downpour as etbers lcss fortunately equipped. 'Many cf theni, indeed, especially tbe pigeons, appear te enjey a geod sbower quite as beartily as do duéks aud other water-fowl. -y f A Many birds are, prcvided with stili anotiier useful toilet accessry-a fine tooth-eomb. And bore we are presented with one of thon. paradoxes wicid Nature apparently delights i serving up for the. puzzlement of inquiring students. The comb is really the. serrated claw of the bird'a third to., and the puzzle lies ini the aeemingly haphazard way ini which it hais been given to sorne birda wbo could manage very weil without it, 'while it la withheld from others te whom it would really b. mont useful. Herons and bitterus have it: so have cormorants and grebes, and barn-owls and niglit- jars, and it ln present i other birds cf species wich differ even more widely. In the caseof the night-jar the oomb is particularly weil formed, ani natural- iste have offered many ingenicus suggestions te explai its extraordinary development. Some affirm that the bird uses it as a moustaciie-comb, for remcving the. tiny insece which, as he flues thrcugh the. air, become entangled in the long straggling haire about hie mouth. This may indeed be the case, but if so, it in difficuit te explain why other birds of the. same family-the American night-hawk, for example- should have perfect combe, and yet at the same time b. innocent cf beard. The. heron also in a beardiesa bird, but it has a tomb littie inferior te that cf the, night-jar; and, te complicate inatters still further, the. barn-owl lanet only beardless, but la the only one cf his kind that has a eomb. AUl things con- sidered, it la probable that the comb is intended for scratching purposes; at al events, the comb-claw is the. on. that birds always use for that unpleasing feature of their teilet. The, birds have, cf course, other toilet accessories besides those wiiich tiiey carry with them. Water, as with us, is the mont important necessary, though many birds prefer dust instead. A few only use both dust and water, and oee cf this minority la the sparrow, wiio, by the. way, in rather particular as te tth. quality cf the duat h. chooses. He generally selecta the. driest and fineet possible, such as is found on the surface cf a sun-baked country road. Larks, pheasants and partridges are otiier familiar \"dusting\" birds, but whereas the. lark-shares with the aparrow a partiality f or the dust cf the. road, the partridge prefers te scratch about among the. roots cf dry meadow grass, ruffling hie plumage until the feathers are full cf the. cleansing earth. Birds tiiat bathe are equally fastidious, and, as a ril., nothing but newly failen rain water thorcugiily pleases tiiem. Sparrows, chaffinches, robins, swallows, and martins are inveterate \"«wet-bobs;\" rooks and wood-pigcons, toc, bath. often, but always in the. early mcrning, and se do the wild ducks, who, tiicugh they feed and liv. by the. sait water, prefer to wash lu running brooks or ponds, and will fly long distances inland in searcii of these freshwater pools and streams. Goats, whose good qualities are being discovered by many people who only discredited them with \"butting\" pro- pensities, are careful cf themselves and spend time daily in their toilet. Their doinestic utility in of proved value, and lately such writers as \"Home Counties\" have sung their praises. Squirrels are scrupulous in cleaning themselves, and it is one of the. pretty spectacles of a wood to see a aquirrel, higii up in a tree, busily engaged iu clearing himseif cf any brushwood whicli has adhered te hie lithe littie body. The coy look onhi face when discovered adds te the charm cf the situation. Rabbits kept in cap- tivity are conscicus cf the. need cf cleaning their fur. A rabbit's foot, however, is net quit. so adaptable as the hare's foot, te wbich allusion has been already made in this article. From what has been said it wiIl be seen that te bird and 'beast alike the question cf toilet is a matter cf imi- mense importance. To some, indeed, it is cf vital importance, fer on its successful aceompflishrnent depends, net only the coinfort which helps te make tbeir lives endurable, but, in inany cases, the veiy fact cf existence itself. Every studet cf animaIs and birds is surprised withl the marvellous wiay in which Nature ba-s anticipated their needs. And this is specally evident in the means provided for making their toilet. a' d p n ti h ra n 0:",
         "The Westeimn Home Mpont hiy Prairie Perseverance wriute for Tihe Wetern Home Monthly by Edward Bruce Msfltt People of almnost every nationality, dldknd or description, corne to Our Weer prairies. The oppressed of for-. \"ig lands here behold their burdens fail rom their shouidera Thoee who perhaps have become dzSuraged, take new hope, and thoee wh@ have met with reverses here behold the, tide of fortune turn, and are carried on to success. .Aznong such a motley throng, it is not surpriing that we find a sailor, a turne- exphred pensioner of the. Britls Naval Servce, wending bie way th the boa open prairies of South S sewazi, to talc. âdvantage of the. Canadian Govern- ment's gift of one hundred and ixty acres cf fertile pramre soiL The train rumbles aud roars weýtward, and çwe again pick hum up .im a South Saskatchewan Land Office expeditiously :making entry ou a very choies quarter section of land, which though situated right among cattie ranchers extremely eppceed to the lncoming of the home- steader makes not one jot of difference. te Our Iriend. John Jones went eut, built a neat shack, purchaaed the necessary outfit, built a good fence aroumd bis domain, and settled down. Herds of cattie roamed on every hand. Standing i the door of bis neat shack, with a powerful field giss in bis banda, ho cab*mtyarveyed the. surroinding Native Grth Of Dougla !nr in B.C. As 1 have singled out this characer and as we are te follew him ln bis west ward way to take advantage cf the best that may off er, (for he is shrewd, that 151énetrating, observant, steel-grey eye is net there to, no purpose) I \"ha furtiier describe him. Axnong the rather picturesque throng ini the Eastern Station, there -in nothing about him te attract attention. Heie l neatly dressed, neither too loud, nor too plain. Heie l short of stature, thick-set and of powerful build. li l bearded and bronzed. A few grey hairs show among the jet of fils closely cropped head. Hie la ca.hnly observant of aIl around hlm. He reminds one of a slate-grey battleship in a thin mlt; ful of power, ever ready, but so unobtrusive as te fie scarcely visible. Hec cornes of a race of men wflo have ever been England's pride, men who have fle er failed fier, and upon whom she may ever place her proudest hope. Strong, resourceful, close-mouthed men of deeds, not w,%ords, are they. I speak of the men of Devon. John Jones la bis naine just plain John a name as unobtrusive as fils 'iacbut nevertheless, thougfl an nukrusive name, borne by many a V hvan.Thathfi a aman of action, evident from fila quick, decisive, like movements, and fie is soon :i- in the train and everytfiing in ofor fils journey westward. country, the n grumtej UHumph, ranch country now, farm country afore three y ears. Durned valuable one too. fron horse asnortiu' by afore that,I' and fie slamnxed fils door. Ranchers an~d cowboys visited hlmn ail stating the utter uselessness of bis es;ab lisin himself i these parts. They silesoil was unsuited for agiculture. Stampeeswod carry away fil fences. 11. cropa s l i destroyed. In. short hinted that fihad better take filmacif off. The veteran said nothing but when alone exploded, \"Take myseif off, 1 be durned if 1do. Here 1ie, and here I stays.\" lHe stayed. He peirformed bis fiomestead duties faithfully. Cattle ranchers and cewboys continued te visit film, and lu course found eut that fie was a veteran of the British Navy. The sailor becaine apprised cf a meurt, underhanded scheme ou their part, te cancel his hoxnestead. The fiomestead inspecter stood b yhim, as Helhe migit~, as fiefiad faithfuily perforrned his duties. He did more. Hi lformed the veteran cf the plot. W/heu alone the sailor exploded, \"Cancel eh, cancel bie blowed! Huil Canadian Guvermunt ull stand by. To blazes witfi um!\" A long, lank, lean snd tougfi middle aged cowpuncfler called on hlm one day, and was invited indoors. The conver- sation ultimately veered around to marks- manship. Said he, drawing the heavy Et lkeepsE fuitume in the pauor and oua of the. attic. Ay\u003eile caro snd a litti. FLOGLAZE will work wondas infremsonmg old furutur. to new uses.It Scovamtii. scratchs sd dsmaod spto mnew fumiture sd Laspe it lookmng uew. -e WEAIRS EQUALLY AS WELL ON FLOOIRS AND OUT 0F DOORS Folue. Renews:.- Garden FuruitureMotor'Boqts1 Carrages, Wagons, Fa=m Implemeuts. Porch Fumituma Automobiles, Screen Doors anything t\"a requü«..a long saddLard wearng finish.",
         "TheWeseiw41 rnemonthly. A Ioney-Sv~ A Boutle of Bovril in tue.kitchen will cut down ~ W~FUU~butcher'. bill8.it eilormusinceases lthe s'Dq _B~g, value of food-infNet its body-bulding pove hvers benproved -th otwenty ieth amount taken. It muet b. Bovril. LookOqrer. Your'Sgmmer Things M\" atmh±nwuth M.jpo SO\u0026p Dosons of tbingayen wore lust smmer need freahmningto e bmasgood as new. Tbis yenca do witi Maypole Soap. Clgm and dyea at oee peration. Freshene, brightens everytbing at mai cost. Twenty- four beautiful, lasting colors, for dress goode, cottons, woollensibon , laces cueiene, pailso% ,etc.. Coloin,10c. Blaçkt 15c. te Dyre,\" from . Pramk L Bkaedict \u0026 Co., Montreal I MATPOLE SOAPThs Cleaz Ea~Home Dv. FOOD lafor, Infants and Invalide and for dio.e whose digestive powrshave become weakexicd by * un.., or advancing ae If the digesive functions, however weak, can do aMY'cwat allthey should be given woktodoto the exienl of tbeirpommrs In the easy process of its prepara- tis ttie digestiblty of Beners can be regulated to give ikswo\u0026 with exteme, nicety. Tne \"Bd\"hh4ediad Journa ad y-'BSnger*s Food ba u\u0026 ili .encesthui\u00266hed a reputadm iasoits own.\" BmpsNaw BOOKLE deale with the. mot comnion doubts and difficulties which uiath.» havi to. enCounter.' It is set pout zen on application to Bengers Food, Lui., Ou ,Woekà4 Manchuster, England Boq.ss Fwd ù »ZM ii ifi1\u003e' D-wiss, c., gv.YsIew CLARK'S PORK \u0026 BE ANS The value of BnANS as a strength producing food needs no demonstration. Their preparation in appetizing forni is, however, a matter entailing considerable labour in the ordinary kitchen. CLARK'S PORK \u0026 BIEANS save you the time and the trouble. They are pre.. pared only f romn the finest beans cornbined with delicate sauces, made from the purest *ingredients, in a factory equipped with the most modern appliances. THeY ARR COOKED R\"ADY-SIMPLY WARM UP THEM CAN BEFORE OPENINO W. Clark Montreal Ask your Monthly. neiglibor to take The Western Home It pleases every one-it will delight him or ber also. Il i Cote forty-five from the oue lu;a bis aide: IlThar'. as good . a pn sver barked. I kin drive a nlwither every shot. Kin shoot the. pipe outen yer teeth. Don. ber many a tame.\" The sailor .continued to calmly samoke bis pipe. %*Inllho burst ot \"Do you oeil that a gmun be bloweD! What'd you tbink of agun ut weighed llfty tons. One shot out of ut ud blow yer old ranch house to Davy Jones. That's wot I oeils a gun.\" \"I nover seed nor hearn teil of sucb a gun as that afore \" said the. cowpunchter. The. veteransaior made no reply, and the cowpucherglanced somewhat uneasily, atthe heavy navy revolver, and magazine rifi; wbich adorned the walus of the neat shack of the. sailor. Eis sbacjc was alwaya dean, spick and span. The cowpuncher took bis leave, mounted bhs py,and started for headquarters. As heo bwly rode away, ho muttered te bimeoif, \"Dura it al!f A gun as iieavy as bft oad o' hayl Beate al! That chap's purty cute. Only tbinç I know on as'I1 start bùiom ore lrdnd o shenani- gan.\" Ho reached headquarters, told thean about bis visit saying te the amembled ranchers an7d cowboys, «fiat thar sailor cbap's ne krind o' tenderfoot. Onlything as'il scar that feller off is some kido' shenanigan. d Savvy? Some kind o' giiost bizness.\" \"Bah! said the oow- bons ghoet business andge lead in' e carcsse fer yer pains.\" '«Waal\" =draed the. cowpuncher, who bad just visited the sallor, \"sometbink like that nil work. 1 tel yers I ben snd know. The critttur A dù4ient Spring bnffl a bountdW b arvest aint afeered ' nuthin' livin'. It's only some km. eo' shenanigan as'll get 1dm. Thar's Charlie thar as uster te be with Buffier Bill's Wild West, and iearnt the. trick o' puttin' bis squawk whar' it hadn't orter ho nohow. Yer kncw how he\u003es worked the gang eut. Mebbe we could werk hirn in oh this biznes-s.\" \"Charie,\" had learned the art cf ventriloqism and ceuld \" tbrow bis voice.\" It was accerdingly arranged that he sbould visit the sailor, and \"scar him inter fits\" Seme mon who follow the sea are very superstitious. Probably they are miade se by the dangers which constantly threaten tbem, at any rate some are se superstiticus that a slightly peculiar cir- cumstance will be construed ite an il omen. Our excellent friend mws cf this type. It was bis weak point, and the only weak point in bis nature, consequently when \"Charlie\" visited Mlm one evening, and began te tbrow bis veice lie bûcamne very much disturbed. Uncouth, unaccountable noises pro- ceeded from the roof, and further corners cf the sback. Strange voices addressed bim. H1e asked the eewboy if he heard anything. The cowboy said he didn't. The veteran was nonplused. \"Charlie\" saw this and inmcdiately proceedeçl te tell a gbost story, saying th:kt, a terrible triple murder between {owboYs andi catit l rustiers, had taken place tilpoîl t e veav -spot upon whieh the s1taek Nwas biffit. The cewboy said tIhe spot Nwas iitî The -sailer then fMl tofielyWtcin Ille(-0wýy.lie had Seen ilthle tlijng practised lu shows, but. oeî it had' not oocourred te bim tbat ho waa hbein; victimized. The sailor waa uow mntentîy watc=athe cowboy, and gradually the wholetligdawned on him. Ho said nothing, but ubowly arose, and on pretense of examining from whence the strange sounds proceeded, slowly approached within reach of bis boaded navy.revolver. Deftly b. snatched it froan the wall, anid the cowboy found bimseof looking into its ugly muzzle. \"'Move a limb und 1 plug yeh.\" said te sailor. The cowboy con- tinued te gape in te the ugly mizzle etIt's bamozle is it? Yes, or ne. Quick nOW.\" «Yes,\" said the cowboy. \"Git!\" commanded the. sailor. The cowpuncher E -st ad wau glad te go, the sailor covermng nwith bis weapon as ho went. Tii. other cowboys nover could get anytbing eut of \"Obarlie\" about the affair, but they knew that it had failed. They gave up bothering Mr. Jones. Re got bis patent. Other homnefteaders came and settbed . Ranchers and cowbo disappeared. The railroad came. r Jones sold bis f arm te tthe railroad com- payfratownsite. Mr. ones may sometimes be seen sitting ini the rotunda of a first class hoteli in Victoria, British Columbia. Soclety le Not 1Lité While itag narrow round la éoundîng ite brasas and tinkling its cymbal. life is go- ing fierceiy on, down in the. narrow street where we struggle for bread, out ini the barn-yard where the feathered folk are stirring te espring industries and the patient beasts. are waiting our demande. Life is bore, in the kitchen, wberethe woman must, with consummate clever- ness nover te b. excelled by any art or accomplishment, minister te the bodilyr wants of a few of ber fellow-ereatureB. It is the woman who bas walked aeros the fields on i wild winter night te help a sister woman in ber heur of trial, the weman who has dressed the new-bora baby, and composed the limbs; of the dead, iearned the rud. surgery of the farm, barnessed horses, milked cows, carried young iambe ite the kitchen te save thern from periehing in the rougk March weather-it is se who has seeil if e. INSOMNIA Leada te Madness, if Net Remedied \"Experiments eatisfied me, some 5 years ago,\" writes a Western weman, \"that coffee was the direct eause of the ineomnia from which I suffered terribly, as well as extreme nervouness and acuýte dyspepsia.\" (Tea is juet as in- jurions ae coffee, because it, tee, con- tains th~e health destroying drug, caffeine.) \"I had been a eoffee drinker sinco chiidibood, and did not like te think hat tihe heverage was doing me al Vis harm. But it was, and the time came when I had te face the fact, and proteet myseif. 1 therefore gave up coffee abruptly and absoiutely, and adopted Postum for my hot drink at meals. \"I began te note improvement in my condition very soon after I teck on Postum. The change proceeded grad- nally, but surely, and it was a matter of only a few weeks before I found my- self entirely relieved-ithe nervousnese passed away, my digestive apparatus was restored te normal efieiency, and 1 began te sleep restfully and peacefully. \"These happy conditions have contin- ued during alh of the 5 years, and I amn safe in saying that I owe them entirely te Post-trn, for whîen I began te drink it 1 ceased to use medieines. Name given by -Camadian Postum Ce., Windsor, Ont. Read \"Che Road te Well- ville,' in pkgs. Postum cornes in two ferms: Postum Cereal-the original form- must bc well boiled. 15e. and 25c. pack- ages. Instant Postum-a soluble powder- dissolves quickly ia a cup of bot water, andl. with crearn nd sngar, makes a de- licious beveriage instantly.. 30c. and 50.% tins1. liothi kiins are equialvdehicioras ai ew;t .1bout thie saniie per ctap. -3ilei us a Rtu*i-oaa for Pos-tiua. -sold by G rocue.- 1' cx th, frc dr br do Fa Of 9",
         "The Weate,\"n Home Monthly Dan as a Pion eer Written for The Western Home Montbly by Mrm. Robert C. TaMbot. In thesgummer of 1894 we arrived in a smali village in Aberta. It waa a queer littie plame.1 say littie place, as there e oni, tiro general stores, a depot, one hotel and a drug store. The only side-walk ire had, was a path, se yeu migh lcal it, made of woodasalies. This iras muade by sone Chinese% from their one-tub laundry to a general store, one block away. Cattie rau freely tbrough this littie burg, and nearly ai]. the people went bare- foot. In the sumamer time, we only got Our mail once a week; and m the winter. time, perliapa every twe weeks. My father liad only three hundred dol- lmrs irlen we landed therp, with my mother himacf and three children to keep. 'Myself, the.eldest, a boy of seven years It ias \" a e and my father, anxous taZi sould be settled before inter came on, filed on a homestead. Re paid one hundred dollars for the im- provements that irere on the place. At this time we irere staying with our, gradmother, who lived six miles from the homestead father bad purchased, but in tire weeloe ie moved to our new and yeu kueir hoir it hukts a Scoiclmn when lie is deprived of bis \u0026 ai sok Weil, father nover m*oed 4a these day.. In tlie fll au y ter Lucy. and 1 gatliered wild sgansd mother dried it, and ilion father smokedl this stuff ire would open the doors and windows snd even the fiies . fleir out Our second year iras a failure. Our only coir commtted suicide by trying te sneak turnipaeout of a pit This coir father bought fram bis step-father in the sprng I ias muddy ireather at the timeolithe ipchase. A week later when the roada hMddried up alitt1% father irent over te Im the oow. This cow liad been resentedi with a oel tire days previeus, but the aid man would net give ;up the caif, lie nid, 1«1t did net go with 0h coi, as8lie gessed, the caif wus bis, au he had kept thecow on greenugram for a week. -Se father did net get the caf. In the flU of1896, ire lad eue hundred bushels ef potatees. These ire aeld te a local maerchant for tweuty cents a bushel. Fatherbhad tohaul the potatoes to town while mother sud i fllled the.saoks tra a big pit at home. Our iheat wua badly Don't mins haif the usefuinesa of this Cocoa. Try it for iclng- good resuits! c -mu- Fled Mazohafl H. I. H. the Duke of Connaught ianom hm. tqoetînt thres thond Cmana volunteer et Montreal on the eve oftheïr deperture for the Europema War. The ImnkiofaiuWtt @ho.n emong the Canadiens and their devotion to the mother countr'y ha. ezoeedod the MahenS Brtâhhpo tationsaend the. volunteer furniah proof for the bolief.-Photo Underwood. abede. I tell you, it iras funny. The- frozen that year, but father hauled it te log cabin was only sixteentfeet by tet Edmnonton te hoe made into, fleur as ire four feet. There iras aise, a omall stabie could net afford te, buy more. It took that would accemmodate only tire herse. him a week te make the trip, but hoiddit. We had a irel, and the people irlie lad hnmte rt ahefo,ée lived there, had left mre urnipa i h humte irtsi.tefer b gardenmany hanka t * themttht said, \"Wliy Jim, it is black. I don't tbink gardn-mny hans tothe. fr tat.the miller bas taken ail the amut eut of The winter irae a very liard one., My it.\u003e' But father only lauglied and said, father'. amail amount of money did net go \"It il turn white whlen it is cooked, very f ar, and soon our cupboard began te dear.\" Mother neyer could telirlien the get bare. The only meat we had was bedwsbkd si a.Aadhay ralibits tliree times a day, but mother breadit asake, ait waau ad s heav. eoeked thern several different ways.. Our Ou ieth weas oldait as a bar s re. fleur had four X's on the sack. Tis was cOurthe eat ere ar asfatbeavuerstm the cheapest fleur you couid buy. could havct gen hakof h.egx Wlien our neiglibors came te, visit ustrattgew they would bring us smre rabbits, snd Our Amusements ihen we ment away trorn home on Sun- days, as me usuaily dlld, there would be Serne of our neiglibors were Russiansi. rabbits hung on the door knob and some They lived in dugouts, as we cailed tliem. live once sitting on the deor-step toeet The people were very good niehborsas us when we got home. thiey ere very kind and sociable. iy The next s pring father.got a tean etflhad a dance very often, snd me mould oxen fromn a friend, intending te pay for always get an invitation. Tliey danced thern in the fail with mliat lie realized te accordeon music. My tather played from lis crops. The oxen had neyer beau the violin and lie mas always a welceme driven before and father lad an awful time guest. They danced on the dirt fleors or breaking tlimte drive. This had te be ground, I guesa we il cail it. The dust done befere the ground could be plowed. would rise se thick sometimes that it mas Fat ber made a harness of rope and a yeke impossible te tell whiclioes as your of tarnarac. partner. Wlieu it got tee bac! they would ail take their seats and semeone One day when it was time for plowing would sprinkle water on the floor. Wheu and father thouglit that the oxen were this would settie tliey mould al maltz well enough broken te plow, lie took themn again te the accordeon music. te the field and hitched them te the plow. Away they ran te, the bruali, plow and al. Every year, Treaty was lield for the This was tee mucli for tather and lie traded Croc Indians. We would ail go tee, and the teamn of oxen and his gold watch for a JOIn lu with the amusements arrauged by bronco. Weil lie could net tiil the soil the business men of the littie village. wit h the one herse, se lie traded soeaThare were foot races by the Engliali Pot atoes te a Cree Indian for a cayuse. speaking people, and pony races by the -l, imagine what thay lookad like wben Indians, and the most amusing feature 1lywere hitched te tIc plow together. wa s the foot races ef the Indiau's Squaws Ti,,-roroncoas a foot and a halr taller with their papoosas on their backs. fil n the cayusa, and I thiuk the bronce Early-in the morning, the day before PIIIA the plow himself and when tbey the Treaty oe could sec liundreds of c.m~to the end of tha furrow, the cayuse Indians, some ou herse back and others '''M lie down te take a rest. witb their two-wheeled carts drawn by ;i1 thcr was a good natured Scotchman, one cayusa, trudging their way along the HORROC- FLANNELJ (madeby dis manufacturera of the ceebrated Lmugclodiu, TwiIIs md Shecting) ARE MADE FROM CAREFULLY SELECTED COTTN' The nap Us short and close. No Injurlous chemicals are used. - Quallty, designs and colorlngsar. unequall.d'. If purchasersof \" m uel uateria for Uaewcr al the ycar round woud buy THE BEST ENGUISH MAKE tliey would appreciate the comlfSt and durabiity which infetiot qualiies of Flannelete do mot poosuu See the name \"«HORROCISES\"' on tihe sevedge every two yards. - \u003e~ Il ANNUAL Sab upwrds of TEN MILLION yards Awarded the CotmOctof.the ncorpoat Intitut.eof bimivhu Fm, Wolmm u to dae e art Star.whu.m romb av* oAem JOHN E. RITCHIE 417 King% Hafl Chambers St. Cabherne Str eds MONTREAL I - rate te CANADk k\u00264",
         "The West en Home Monthly Caluswy sud Edmonton trail They Uuy pftoedc th*f tepees aI the fooit We wQ g atelatcbn h. beautiful *Pm',Mq-ifather nid to mether, Z h*~ os~ethngteasak you.\" «Welrn\u003e ahind her bright eyes giqgmmn, Whi lit\" alplàdo brou thi o f us selingthe fam nmda'ing tetown te live? I1have mast bee eckonlng that those youngsters iI bave b o le sohoolyou know Dan laeWS elvn mdLucy la nearly nine. And how old à. Bort?\" \"He in sèven,\" my mether replied. «WeULJuiitlsasyouaabut really, I dotllMe té,soU h. farm,\" snd tears wero iahrgu n y'.mother's eyes. \"But,\" iii. id, \"l 1 do anything for m ehildren.» A fow days later father soid the farm. Ho got seven;hundrod dollas for it. Wo took our stock and chickena and one pig 10 town. 'Fither bought a very cornfort- ahl, hous. and ten acres of land ln town. Of course, we went 10 achoiL. By thia tim6 th. littlo berg wasbudding mbt a niae. aized place and my father becamoe oneo f thoernany proepeous busi- ne@ nn,.aad.torday it lu th.e nterprising rloualy affeoted. Thus, la Rollad are a»a vomon hauling oarts whloh ane too bis and toc heavy for th. draft dog of the country; and la Swltzerland many of the *oen lhave putý on trousers to aot as Alpine porters, staff in band and loaded pannier on th. bonI and patient bick. Only on Sundays do these loyal creatures permit thetaselvos the \"lux- ury\" cf petticoatal Those remarks apply particularly to the valley of Châmpery, above the aouth bank cf Lake Geneva. Other Swims women 'have left their homes to brave the early Alpine snowe as shepherda, cowherds, and farmers, for their monfolk are away at groat mili- tary, contres like Andermatt, hauling big guns up wall-like precipices cf the St. Gothard. There are women minera in the Westphalian pits, and aise la the Pas de Calais, for, whatever bolide, the. warsbips must have teal herowith te patrol the seau. In Ruasia yen wiflueo gangs of f.\u0026 maie navvies repairing the. roada in view of winter campaignu. And tbey are very cheerful over it squatting upon atone piles aI the wayaide with hammer and1 wire spectacles te uhield their eyes from TrhoBit . ioh Eapg for bimmèllthe good opinions cf the worid. He mounts bis bus \u003cme trudges along the roads on route te the tronches in the same liglit and ar fashion as when lie goes te a football match at home. M. Clomenceait. laye: \"Hle treats war as ahiglier fora of sport\". Our picture shows them'at the billot drawn up for the mardi te tthe tronches. TAUGHT FREE IN YOUR OWN HOME l~themlendamiBut lNule Suul of r oIodthe oulio e Study Ku lo urie or for itbr bgineror dvacedpupla. Our lestons are fzuhtedl = to mu needa.ILmatea lifyodo nt knov one note frcm anouhe. ouriomous anre10,O int ad s iit -y' rSow o co eadEuiih ca- t eor opa.-. sout r o i0 ekjsd wth our liree.iltuP offr, your oniy ~x aitoptgand mu\"c youI use. which av'erag.. ahute. taa. Tho Zu:ad fppl alvrh oi wrie-'iabI ld lowu ofyoir.wndrf\" aholbeor. X rie today for our convinelng free bookiletwbich expiains eftrythlug nfuill.Writestow totOie AMERICAII SOHOOL 0FP MUSIC 2 I.akemide Bldg. Chicago, Ilinoais How Women are Dolng Men's Work By, Dr. Leonard Keene Hirsbberg, A.B.. M.A, M.D. (Johns Hopkins). There la De stranger feature of this world.war than the readiness of women te sîep into the breach and undertake labor nover befere associated with their sex or physical càpacity. Sixteen mil- lion men are marching ho battie; and were it net for lie nations' women, the industrial maciincry muet seon corne to a standatill. Germai maids and ma- trone are hoeing the best fields and cleaning atreets. Even in Munich, fa- mous for gentle associations -with art, there arc girls to-day acting as lied- carriers, cliînbing high ].adders ivith loada of bricks even te the fourth story. Many cf the Belgian wonien are re- turning te their villages and demolish- ing bouses which are ln a dangerous condition. Otiers are rebuilding in a quiet, businesslike way, praying soft1y over their work, and even mnoulding tlîeir ow'n bricks in the abandoned pits and ovena between Autwvcrp and Brus- sels. But it te ta France thiat wornan lias coinpletely stepped iîîto lier husband's ilioes. Thousands cf wives and widows are now eîiiployed on the railways, others as special constables ut level crossings, where they close the gates on ail motor cars,. takej their numbers, and show the atranger's paspers te an iîfficer ii talled close b 'v. The street train- -wavs cf France no- v itiploy an arrny cf w\u003c)tten as conduit ors or pointsnen- eveyi as drivers, fori thi.. reticli hiaNe a natuiral apttitile for ilevi alies. Ail over Europe -u sentîmle sainie tlîigii- nii ieutral as ' .1I as helligerentt C\"Iliutries. for ln the Coi ler the wiliole Iiielîtiiqg foree scalle-1 îp and put upon ar ~afooting, seluim-,)tiiierce is me- flying fragmenta. Woen are aI werk aIse in the Finnish foreats, felling trees and burning Urushwood, as their bus- banda did before the great Tsar called -upon the Grand Duchy for its fearless anîd ruggcd inen. This female labor ie cheap-perhaps one-third the price of maIe labor, and this, again, helpa the nation economi- cally. Il le \"the silver bullets'\" that win. Even Italy's wometi came te the front in early mobilization day. Tiey are scen bauling plougbs, wheeling bar- rowloads cf stone, doing men's work la factories and mines, and carrying loade up te, 110 pounds. Ne ene would wisli te see their wives and daughters slaving ln thjis way, but thîey are certainly doing their slîare. Net alone do they tend the eick and wounded, or sew and knit for soldiers and sailors; but tbey take upon them- selves mren's work with real zest and iit ln the doing cf il. The Women's Emergency Corps are seediiîg out gardeners, chauffeurs, ini- terpreters and groomes-these last sport- ing and huîîting M'onien to whon the care of a herse le seconîd nature. There is even a womah's riflé corps, and a body cf seîi-military volunteers wlio are ai- ready expert shots, and cia keep np with Territoriale in. the longest route nmarcli. These wornen would have their plae la eoast or hontie deftie !la case of thireatened invasion. \"NVe eau guard cables anîd bridges,\" thîev sai-. ,or we cat i mantain Cotiil'lui'tiîa t ion s. da sema- îlîore signalliîîg and sentrv ork\"L. There arc aIse iniporta mt mîovemients te replace smn assistant.,in slaps. and te swell Lord Kitcloîîî-r's armie %vit],- omt detrimiet te brade. of0f11(l great ioeyfirin, 500 enmloyees ]lave al- rî'ady joincd the colors anid te relace tu, young womea bave bien advertised for - t 85 a wvuk wlth no objection te inoxperience The girl rocruita are -dressed la White with neat white aprens. They'are seon! serving out coffee and sugar, and la spare moments Iearning the. mysteries cf bacon alicing and the blending cf lâne tes. Se many women cf Ibis type are out cf work that iu some cases two are employed te keep sa man's post open for hlm until the. end cf the. war. Male teachers, civil servants, postrnen, omni- bus and tram conductra--all these and others might be relieved by women and girls. The. railway companies, Io, have been approached in the mnatter cf installiDg women in their ticket offices, thua 11h- erating thousanda cf yeung fellews cf militar.y ugo. The great drapery stores have already don. their duty nobly. 0'04 1SeOi» Two reeruits had been brought in by the sergant. EnIlisting Officer (te lirst one): «What's your name V' \"Watt, sir.\" \"What is your naine 1\" \"Watt, air.\" \",What's your name!- 1 aak ye- impatiently.' \"My name is Watt, ir-W-a-t-t.\" '«Humphl Where do yeu cerne from T\" Ware, air.' \"Yeu, dunderhoad? 'Where do you erne frem 1\" \"I corne from the town cf Ware, ln Hertfordshire, air.\" \"Oh! That'l1 do?' Turne teseecond recruit. \"What's your name ?\" \"Mee, sir.»\" \"Yes, yen, thickhead! Will yen give me your narnet\" \"My name, sir, is John Mee.\" \"ýHumph! And where do yeu corne from T\" \"«Hec, air.e «Confound it, yen blockhead! Don't yen understand? Where -.o yen corne frorn \" \"4Hec, ir.» «Well, if ever- Sergeant (interposing): \"The man cornes from the village of Hoo, near Chatham, air.' \"Oh, 1 ece!\" WHEN DINNER CONES One Ought te Have a Good Appetite A good appebite le the beet sauce. It goes a long way toward helping in the digestive precess, and tiat is absolutely eseential ite health and strength. Many persons bave found that Grapo. Nuts food la not only nourisbing but is a great appetizer, and chilîdren like lb. taste cf il and grow atrong and rosy fremin ts use. It is especially the food te make a weak stomach strong sud croate an appe- tite for dinnor. «'I arn 57 years old,\" writes a grand- mother,\" and have Iîad a weak stoniach frein childbood. By great care as te mny diel, I enjoyed a reasonable degree cf health, but neyer found anything te equal Grapo-Nuts as a standby. \"When I bave ne appetite for 'break- fast and ju.st cat te keep up my strength, 1 take 4 teaspoonfuls cf Grape-Nuts wibh good rich xilk, and when dinner cornes I arn hungry. While if I go Nvitliout any breakfast 1 neyer feel like eat ing dinner. Grape-Nuts for break- fast sens te make a healthy appetito for dinner. \"My littho grandson was sick with stomaoh trouble during lbe past summer, 'aîîd finally we put hlm on Grape-Nuts. Now he is growing plump and well. When asked if he waats bis nurse or Grape- Nmts, he briglîtens up and points te thie niîpboard. He wvas ne trouble te weati at alI-thanks to Grape-Nuts.\" \\Taine gis-en liv Canadian Postum Co., Windsor, Ont. Reail. \"TIme Rtuad te Well- ville,\" in pkgs. 'There's a Reason.\" Ever read the above letter? . A new one appeare frem tixue te lime. They are genuine, truc, and full ef hurnan interest. 1 1 he au an er foi au r lai wo Be Ti th, th, ivl cci N( thq we cf col fa tha by a t Of t fro IA Up At fre tin Uni tht Th in sufi wa ais Lis art agi Leý Ul) yei in of i",
         "The Western Home, Monthly The Orignal Tenantry 'of Rupert'S Land Written for TeoWstern Home Monthly by J. D. A. Evans. Chapter IL In tiiee years Winnipeg'a thorougiae present a panorama eftoteig bu!1i~ street cars, Streama ef humaiaty. D iiow litti. do we resus.e concerning the, draina ef a once Fort Garry and RIed River cart. 1915.- Marvefleus transformation! Yell of Indian a he trekked aong the crooked trail te the -store at the atone pateway- silenced. Upen site of aborigmnal habi- tation bas arisen a great city. Ris fore- tathies never dreamed ef thils. Who the. Indian? Frein whenoe came lie now dwelling witbin reservationa aeleted for bis domicile by the. Dominion Goverament? Wbat the. genealogy of the aberigine? And when bis entrance to the great plains whreon he cbased tiie bison nd deer; spread bis net in lake and atream; sang weird cbant te tthe dronet the tom tom? t la feasible i accordance with the, legends df bis peoples, te consider the. Indian tenure ef Western Canada to bave extended bite eras long remote. His fereather erected the. wigwam; in reverent submon bewed bis head te tthe Great 8 *irtà yt ho knew not that Spirt's ':od. Wken frein bis ut lie gaze acrcstiisnow, peered at thietwinkbing Mmarof wintry sky recognised tbatthie ice on the. lake oid float away ito the~ rieforest glades break inte leaf, wood- ladchorus of the. featiiered songsters greet b is eaua i due season, lie was assured a supremacy ifinite in power waa the. creative force, and te tbat Unseen Beinghe owed if e and bis possessions. The Idianrealised a \"sotrength\" caused the wwlnd sterm's roar, rol et thunder tbreugii the valley, flash eft htning over the kueillbe wendered wiierein tbat gtentiality was secreted. Frein wienoe e, thie ndian, came was net known; at bis departure frein eartbly scenes, lie as witii bis forefatiiers would enter a zone in whicii pleasures eoftthe chas. existed. Perhaîja, ah, but the. bisterical enigin ef Indian flei s ebscured ithe, miats et centuries, he may b. a remnant of Nomadie Japhet, son et Noah. Japhiet the wanderer, bis footatepa inprinted upon meuntarn passesoe Asia, traversed once peninsula et Bebring Strait te tth. main- land, frein thence departed in quest et a contnent. Tii. Indian may have sailed away frem distant Japan, bis crstt wrecked on Vancouver's Isand. W. possess ne autiientic bistory. But we are cog of tetone teature in the. ife oftthie uIn asie is to-day. He isbe- comlng a usefiil ineiner et soeiety, a certain agency bas been the. responsible factor efthtit transformation. Tiie writer knows whereot b.e apeaks- h. bamknewn the. Indians in the f ar no;Îiland lengyes ago. And he is acquainted with the Indian i1915. I long years ago, the, Indian purcbased by barter ef skins and pelta, bis necessaries at -the Great Company's stores. Ris Lourney, peniiaps te the Fort on Red River ankwas a lengtiiy undertaking. He Oftentimes trudged'across the de.ep snows frosi teresta etftthe tamarac on shoet o Lake Winnipeg. Or, percbance lie dwelt upon the plains et Rupert's Land proper. At this latter abode lie was visited by tiie fre trader Whoe at every epportunity vie- timnized bis custorner, wien at prices the. Unscrupulous trader s'pke of as the. tariff, the. aborigine exciianged bis offerings. Tii. Indian is yet one ef nature's chlfdren; in minimnised degree, iiowever, te thaï wiih constituted bis lite a few decsdes 5ince. lie was with iavisb hand turnisbed sustenance from produet et woodland and waterway. Ris ancestry were, and leie l aise a rôbust and iies.tby manihood. To is Peoples the, thre. score years and ten are an imherjtance. If we enquire from sn agdIndian bis age, the, response is a eadshake; he will commence a calculation uI)ofl his fingers eoftth. many moons. The very app)1earance efthtie aborigine advanced ?n ve:îrs will delineate a lenqtiy life span, In fI\\ instances appreaching a century. Tlhe'iter has known Indians in the. no~wlwhbse years approach figures Of u..ad of eleven decades (one hundred \"(I mil nvears.) I ý''.ident of Manitoba to-day rarely sthe Indian population. Occa- abuckzboard (the Red Ri.-. cart is now a relicet the puat) with its decrePit horse is seen along the hiçiiway. Tlhe traveller on trains sometumes passes tbrough a station with _perchanoe an Indian standing pnthe latferm. Yet, how frequent wasothe silt twe decades Smoe. The, stores of the Great Company formed the Thdian glace of assembly; they of distant north ga iered in ompay wt tiiose froin the plains. The atone gate- way at Fort Garry and walls of Lower Fort are silent 'witness of strangeba- penings. To a fort the. Indian wouid convey bis pelta or seneca, excbange bis off for goode, perbapo clothing for Indian lokws contructed rude sttuary a skirt for bis squaw, or tea and, repreenting. the \"Spirit\" ef bis worabip. sugar. It wau not requisite lie labor In varieus reservýaticasetM ofbà contiuously. The, forest furnished meat; e figures of- suoh charactrai from lake and stream lie netted whitef-Ïiaiiceldimsen. Indeed. until witbin VR7 and pik. It in true that to-day traita reoent years a bideous object hewn eut di of tbis ciaracteristic continue. The wood stood upen abillock in southern Indian bas net entirely cbanged. The, Manitoba. It- Mi known ] acesoettbiu modes and habitae ofbie former lif, are, nature were viuited by 'teldian st however, igtbreugh transformatory qertain tures et the year, wihM n desd stage ite and better ideals.- Even of niglit myrsterious cermoniesoeccurred bis Nomadic propenaity las undergoi gwbich miglit bave been onsldeed a fom cbançe; he la becoming mSoulated with eof rsip If we vicit a reservaticli en a desire te remain witbin the, reserve and Sunday lenooui lu se days, arn ca plant bis crope. He bas followed the eara greeted \"w\" ithdordant ceund ef C pts aught him by bis foretathers, tom tom; et ofdpue? No, we- enter leomxdan unuee Provider te, the achhoobveý lksep pthie, poweiftM whom lie contributed respect. In the. voices -ain1 \u003e n tb! n Ofgsetth* Maitoba oetot-day the Christian Churclifrfaies i.PraJsé Pt l!Iàb h is teacbing hâmnet ef the \"spirit in the. haadi1voek theii, iùnlèim tant\" but ef au Omnipotent (3ed. Tiiereognlimsmoetino W« sw A Waltka je th~ perfect Grdulat,0, ~.4 4 Now ;othe t;me. to seiect a su;ta\u003elc wa±cL\u0026*\u003e i tliat oon or claugkter, brotker or SSoter,,as a gft. A kancisome watch expresses *t60 sentment of suc11 an occaoion, and1 a gooci one continue as a Èl.eu.fl remincler for znany yearo. WTaltkam Watches are not only t ncome to look at but aloo perforni Iancsomely. Tkey laut -for a generation and sometimeo longer. Tiiere arecleautful and convenient wrnst'watches for women., elegant oiencter watclies for mmn and good sturcly timepiceso for everyone. At ail leacling jewelers. Waltkam Watck Company Canada Life Blclg.,St. James St Montrea 4-. .4-' 13",
         "Tube Western-Hoe m oni Listen to what Nurse w rOARNS says about \"Run Down\"l WHEN your system 18 under- mmned by wory o'r overwrk- when your nerves arc '«on ecde- \\when the Ieast exertion tire yo- you are n r'un clown\" coacliion. drooping for Iack of- watcr. And just as water revive a clrooping flower -so WINCARNIS. gives new life to a \u0026run down\" constituion. WINCARMS la a tonic, a restorative, and a blood \"aet comebid in one cear deliclous beverage. It dmesnet contain dnq. It does not merely \" patch you up\"; àt gives you nez'. lii...ad nez'.' nergy for the dais work snd pleasure. If you cannot obtain Wincarnis from your dealer, write to our Canadian Agent, Mr. F. S. BALL, 67 Portland Street, Toronto, who will send you the name of our nearest reprçsentative akaaof his reurve.. Re=a, profomd interest as the mii.Ioary ofdsc mighty hunters in Biblical daya, and how the Great Master cnt a net ito the wateii of Galilean lake. Wbat transormation scene bas been wrougt mi the Indian life? * ELUTM I fINe Indian in yeara, net remnol assembled grest gatheringa cofbls trib i council. Many localities of Manitoba, to-day Mcmes cf pastoral activity, bave witnisned thee meetiNM. As exarnphe the banka cof Assiniboine river itbe vicinity of Rolland and Treberne; Rock Lake, a frequent location; tie butte of Pflot Mound. It is a matter of authe ticity that froin the apex of Star Mound, an élevation ituate near Snowflake, Custer in 1862 addressed a hugcocourse of \"Braves\" congregated to=use diffi- oulties in connection viti certain, tribes located adacent to the froatier on the American aide. Tie resuit cf this con- ference may be termed disastrous; upwards of one hundred of !ta participanits are knowa te be buried ithc immediate viéinity. The natural prposity of tbe Indian, in nortbern latitues sucli as yet promn- iently identified with tie aboriginal lif\u003c, wu te bunt and fiali. Amid densty c the foresthe would spend monts in the clisse and trap line. Ris limted stock ci powd and shot was utilized te the ietadvantage. The Joac duclc upon thé- creek was not attractive te hlm. Rather would lie await the arrvai cf other birds and tins secure a number cf the prey. In early yeara of the asat century the bow and arrow constituted the Uisa1' wveapcn. Even to-day the Indian capa- bility with the bow in unique- the writer buas witnessed a yauag Cree dIsciagan arrow tbree turnes succSsfully ito the keyliole cf a docr at tbirtyv paces. The trait cf local ity ise cf extreme developinent ia the aborigine. Re will be çbservant of varicus landmarks an bis walk through the woods; a atone odd in appearance, mess covered rock wlll f crin t:efinger post for the return journey. .Anothier Indian asset 18 retentive memory; once bis friend, that attacbment ia perptua A custom lin the long ago was neyer te violate faith in any promise or undertaking with him. An important factor cf the tribes was the medicine man, làs kncwlcdge cf rootsansd berb-the inheritance cf father and son. He was feuently a practitioner cf clairvoyancy andtbis deceived the unwary Indian by Ileed mytialpcwer. Therebelion cf 1885 formed an abject lesson in wich the pctentiality cf tbe Great Mothelk (tie late Qucen Victoria) was impressed upon tbe abo*ii*alpopu- lace. Beattie, now a résident cf the Swan Lake Réserve, présent at Baloche and Duck Lake engagements, officiated as the scout for General Middleton, commandant cf the forcés. Many facts related by Beattie would be remembered by inembers cf the Ninetieth Winnipeg regunent who were présent during the campaiga. As a computer of figures the Indian 18 a bora inathematician. RiaskIland that cf the squaw 18 noticeable in the bead work designa upon cloth. The Indian was given te superstition. The bones cf largew gane werc treated after the fashion ofhsancestry; the skull cf a bear lic hung u at the place the animal was kIlled; te boues cf a beaver were returned to the streain. Risasquaw was not per- mitted toeset certain portions cf bear or inoose, and the Indian who subsisted larqely an a fish diet, was net considered fitting the requirements cf a warrior, rather was tbis honor donated te those cf flesh eatig prcpensity. The ineat of various animalis lanet consumed by hlm; bis Vartiality 18 for muskrat; the lynx la coniidered cf epicurean characteristic; the white owl a favorite food. As a lust resert oaly will an Indian appease the cravings cf hunger with mink or otter. The dances comprised forrns in which war, Sun, inoon, rain! dog played prom- inent part. The Indian annuJy lldected (this practice la in vogue to-day) a chief and four councillors for cach reservation. At the annual Treaty Day a cash grant cf twenty-five dollars is made to the chief; each coundillor a lesser arnount and blue coat with brasa buttons; te the ordinary Indian 18 awarded five dollars, a similar suai for bis squaw and each child. Ilence Treaty Day 18 the most important feature af his calendar; at its conclusion the 1-Agent la addresued by vaiius spea:er r(Indiana ar\" peseedsed of great oraterical eabulity); if re4uisite an interpretera serice ar alaysiiireainesa. In 1821' the Hudson'a Bay Company abolished kthe sale of liquor to the Indianaswho are yet preservedfrmhraaeof aoho0 mdulome by statute c f teDominioni Goonent. The Indian races inse far un Manitoba la concerned, are flot dimin- eishing; recent statistics assert thc cotrary. Let usi; briefly consider the Indian as lie is to-day. Hle is a fariner bisb ouse and 160 acre of land is witbin the reservations. A amal ecentage do not avail them-. selves ofais opportunity. This class wilî annuae decrease. The chidren. receivýe every edlucational faciiityr on the reservea; ochools for sucli are Iocated at Brandon Ekhn Bti~ Portage la Prairie an otherp 9. -day1915 that which bas been donc for thenian 18i teîling ita own stoRy. Wby suchch nge he abor *lie, wbat its chief basi? It àa onyattriutbl to one factor, tbat is the Bi1e Te missionary bas tauglit the lndiaii tbat Britain's emblein the Union Jack means protection and prespr lie pons othscbvn oer ool- 'bouse on the reserve as planted upon God's word. Now we bave the reason for the transformation sene i the draina of Indian life,' babitsmorais The state- ment is mae that j\u003efr the scripturea were dariied amngt the Indians, sucli were a better people than at the present turne. A deiberate falsebood net alone a vile insinuation upon the BibL but te tbe Indian bimlnef, whoee life is being modelled into, accordance with civilization tbrough means cf tbat Book. Let those who knew the Indian a quarter century since, apeak of wbat Cbristianity has accomplished for him. The writer in closing this article in compefled te refer te certain Estatementa concerning the Indian in a book of recent publication: \"Good Indianas died yearm ago, in fact at the turne people who did not know bis character, and thouglit te do him. a Rood turn, invaded bis reserves with the Bible. As aresutthe Indiana bave learned every evil deviceof the white man and none of bis virtues.\" Readers cf The Western Home Monthly can relyr froin the experience cf many men, the wrîter bimacif bas lved with Indiana in the Far North, that the baok's aim la a base and deliberate falshoodl Rather can we rely on the 130th verse cf tbe 119th writing cf the P9aImist- \"Tbe entrance cf Thy word giveth ]ight, it giveth under-. standing unte the simple.\" The Bible la responsible for the trans- formation scene i the Indian life. There las no cther agency by which ie lbas been brought out cf darkness into the liglit cf civilization. None. True Courtesy Clvility bas been defined as benevo- lence in amali things. This is well il- lustrated by an anecdote 'told cf Gen. William Napier. Takinq oa country walk onc day, ho met a littie girl, about ftve yeara oh!, eobbing over a broken bcwl, which ah. bad dropped in bringing7 it back from the field ta which ah e-had taken bier father's dinner. She said aie would be beaten on bier retura home for having broken IL. With a sudden gleain cf hope, ahe innooently looked up into bis face, and said, \"But zu can mend it, can't 'e?\" Ile explained that le could not mend the bowl, but hoe weuld give bier sixpence te buy another. Hrowever, on opening his purse it was exnpty cf silver, and le lad to, make amenda by promising te ineet bis littie fricnd la -the samne spot at the saine heur the next day, and te hring the sixpence with him, bidding hier tell bier mother she had seen a gentie- man who would bring lier the moncy for the bowl thc ncxt day. The chuld, trust- ing hlm, went on lier way comforted. On his return honme, le found an in- vitation te dine the following evening with someone whom hie especially wished te sec. He hesitatcd for some littié time, trying te calculate the possibility cf goin'gta meet bis littie friend cf the broken bowl and stili being tu time for the dinner party; but fIndiýjg-ibis déýld net be, lie wrete te decline thc dinner invitation on the plea of a previolls engagement, eaying, «I cankiiot dissp- point lier. Sic trusted me implicitly.\"",
         "15 The Wèâtern Home.Monthly Bringing up a Homnestead Nrtten for The Western Hlome Monthly, By M. E. RP'man iainiC e o geoU?8 f T hapened juatthis way.Lois wN'o I~ ~ n mare i ete lwn at home, for pa had told Alden that hie couldn't take ber away from us so he'd have to cone thereaid Bye if he wanted her. you sece Lois was our youngest and haci al- wIýys been the baby though she was grown up aid had been teacbmng achool for thre pars. The other five were alwars want- aigus to viait them. \"Not a ha day or week-end visit, but a good long stay 80 that we could get acquainted over again\" Ben said. Weil, ater Lois and Aiden lsd got home from their wedding tour, pa said: \"Seeing y ou cildren have J4ad our wedding trip, it's about time ma aid 1 had ours. 1t's a littie late but as we didn't have oie when we were young, we'il take a longer oie *1 as neyer more murpnised if 1e. Pa badn't said a word aboutit before 'so we ail asked \"Where are you going? \"O round yisiting the chiarn ad eeing a little of this country of ours.', I didn't mee how we coud leave, there We5 soiy tbmgs to look aftcr. Lis and Alden are real sensible young folks, but tey haven't had the experience; but Pa would have bis way. First we visited Daniel, hes our eldest, then Sarah and Benjamin and Mary and at Wsa Horace, wbo lives i Cahiforma. The wanted to go home by the way of We got as fan as I,- and pa was s0 taken Up with the country aid the rush for lad thathlegt am-antogo0with him and look the land over. Notbing would do then but he must have a, hometiad. Jit madle him feel young again, he said, to begin oven as those young felows were domng; and of course lie got oie, though h e had to stand in line bcfore the laid office tiR bhis corna achcd. 1The îext spring we came back and built a comfortable little cottage and barnanad liei house, for I wasn't go U live with- out hens aid such like. Ater we were settlcd and the garden started, it did look kind of cosy and homelike. 0f course, we lad to have four horses instead of two for a work team as we used to back in Con- necticut, but that suited p a ail the better. Oie of thehoeta boysa worked for us. At firstI couldn't imesan more than haif he said for he was *ust out from Scotlaid. Pa said it didnt matter, though, for lee meanttail igtaid we could gues atthrsoitlwgot better acquaiîted with bis lingo. Pa is dreadful on slang wonds for a deaon .of the church. Pa hired a mai with a gasoline engine to break up some laid; but oie day some- thb.ing broke adthey had to send for ai expert, sort of ai engine doctorl1i should say. He soon had the machine gomng again aid it dcl run fine. 0f course, Pa had te try bis hand at nunning' it. When they got most te this end of tle field, the expert juinped off and told -pa that he could nuitto theend allnight. Pa for- othow te stop it aid steered right for te barn. The thing woulnt stop and pa began to hoUler: \"Gee 1 tell you Haw there! Whoal IWhoa,\" but the tbing wouldn't \"WhLoa,\" aid before Mn. Stemns or the expert could reach bim he lad crash- ed right into the end of the barn aid broken it to splinters. 1 heard the noise and rai out t seec what wais the matter aid the new ministen came along just then, too. 1 alterwands wished he Liadn't for when I asked pa if hie was hurt and what was the matter, hie shook bis head and said: \"Not a bit. but the goldarned tbing rai away with me aid busted the barn ail into smithereeîs.\" And then how hie laughed. The other two men just lay clown on the grass aid bol- lered, and the mister sat clown on the fiat thing hie came to, which happened to be a dirty oil can, aid laughed till he al- most cried. Afterwards lie had te Put on a pair of pa's trousers wbile 1 cleaned bis and it took me most ai hour. .After the minister had asked the bless- ingI atthe table, Pa said:\"Well, ma, 1 sup- pos(C vou'il be writing ail about this accident of mine te the cbildren, and you caTI iit tel lem that 1 am going te have onc ef those pesky critters for my owi and 1 e.i going to break it in mysef\"l Then zhat I began te look anxious, hie ''\"Just as soon as the crops on this homestead cii pay for oie.\" 1 breathed casier after that aid we bad a real pleasait visit with the minister. wc were ail just beginriing then, aid didn't have ain cuchsor achool bouses, so we hl the services around the country in people's bouses. It was retty crowded sometimes for the claim ou'-s axe small, but it was real enjoyable aid if we didn't alsing in time, we sang with al our heats aid i. guess the Lord llked it, just as well. One day oie of those mounted policemen came around our way aid pa asked him in te dinnen. 1. was alwa-ys glad te bave anyoîe stop for after ail, it was kid of loniesome sometimes. * This oie îoticed my littie silk U. S. flag that BWns wife had sent me te keepus .fnom forgtting wbere we came fnom, draed above the children's pictures, aid asked if we came from the k3tates. \"Sure we did\" sad pa, \"and when ma gets lonesomne she goesanad staids under that wec bit of aflag. Oh,ishe's joined-to bier idols, ma is, anu it's bard work making bier over into a good Canadian, seeing oun six children are ail settled back there in the stats. That policeman stood for smre time lookin at those pictures, then said: \"That's the mothen of it, I suppos. My mother died when -1 was a amilboy so 1 don't know much about thcm, but-\"' He seemed te. ull himiself up sudden aid didn't =i'i~ the sèntence. lta oie of the troubles of the west--so many young men, all somebody's boys without any réal home aid they ail need mother- qhtred-coated boy used to, drop in quite often after that sm'S the home- stead boys did. I useatotellthem tbat 1 believed they smîeied my cookies aid doughnuts for they were almoot sure to happen around on cooky day. Aftr that policeman was tnansferred to another station, he sent us bis picture and a littie Union Jack. Tbcy bang on the wail over bis favorite chair. Straige how kid those young foika were to old people like pa aid me. They were always doing something for us. Then there were our married *eihbors. Moat of them are young teo.Some of those gir wives have neyer been so far from their fols before aid they have maiy lonely hours, especiaily when thein husbaids go te town for it always takes two days aid if they bavye much business, tbree. But we are gomng to have a nailroad nearer sonie day. They come to sec me real often aid briig their babies aj4d their liopes and fears aid it seems te cheer them upto talthem ail over witb me. Why, 1 ahost feel as if they belong to us for it makes it seema so bomey aid I do enjoy it so. And such babies. Fasanys the babies here are the smnartest babies i the wold aid hie beieves its the bright clear air. But, deary me, it is dreadful what these people have te put up with. No doctora nor nurses within thirty-five miles, except oie or two nurses who arc mîrnicdand have familles of their own. Aid when the pooir cropa come how maiy of them have to pinch aid plan. Not hîving eîough of this world's goods te tide themn over a leai yean, they bave te mortgage their home- ste;ads and those debts eat Up ail the profits o! a good year. But when they get more broken un so as to mise more crops aid spare a littie laid for alfalfa aid timothy aid such like, thcy will get along better. The main trouble with this country, seems te me, is that ail aid sundry have packed up their old ideas of ways and means along with their old duds and brought 'em along for ecoîomy's sake, and arc trying to make this new untamed land wear cem whetber they fit or not. And, somebow, I feel kind of sorry for it, sîm's I would for a child that's bemg brought up by foster folks who don't understand its disposition and are rig7ng it out in some cast-off clothes that fit too much in some places and not enc'ugh i others. Why, even pi tried to fit bis New Eng- land idems on t-o. this hornestead without sorting them properly, and one day hie came out on the porcb, where I was danning socks aid sut there scratchine bis bead till I got real uneasy and askcd if lie didn't think l'd better get the fine comb. That rotited him up and he laughed and said he wished I would and comb orne o! 'r Cet a suit that's Bil every inch -ade by British warken *ln Yorkshire, the world's w*oollen centre, where British wool is woven. No middlernen's profits to pay. Canadian or London styles, smartly and accurately cut. Save you 30 to 50 per cent on Canadian prices Carriage aid duty paid, only .. suit Lengthe. %Ve will send a suit leîgth which you may bave macle up by your own tallr. This wiil cost you only $4 carrnage and duty free. Splendid cloths. Highest pric- 88*50. Highest priée only $19S0 \u003cCardage a\"d Dey PaidLo latest fashions and styles. Also scientifit and simple »êI- measurement form M9Sure yourself as thousands of Canadi- ans do yearly. No ri*. bMFI MEANS MONEY \"ACC Groves \u0026Lidq, 19~oDdip Whcn writing advcrtiscrs plcase mention The Westeçn Home Mo ntbly k $10",
         "* T\u0026 Weate,'n~Noeîe -Montbly . Il' a'.', Es bih mat \"uv-dm r' For Tha9t' BigýMonday Riiht mter tatSn It sinte rndue h testup--er at1~*-ng lflt mi\"S Ste or wth ton gentier Steet ettbm.tlea eevecy oth a lminute for amorniugwitLw thge tmaofVBdM -Wok SM ldonc b~y $n lk br uebl luMWp eh\"Ilvin I\"\" d mml vlth. New 1 m 7« cm thne .job et Ifà aà - --«teId oor ime ylm sq-with one WM eaieru:.j 'Y\"u \"Mil g good estisfac tion and tèe beat possible eush resû[tî by employing our services t.\u003e look after and dispose of your canlot ahipments of Wheat, Oas, w ansd-Plax. Liberal advancesa aginst shipping bile t 7 per cent intoreet. Thomupson, Son s \u0026 Co* 700 W Grain Ezobange Wnnipg onn y IPrm \" la bmd beit \u0026.Omo FROM HAIL means that an entire season'a hard wotk, timne and money are gane. The Canada Hall- Insuranco Company stands between you and loss with an insuranoe pohicy that POSITIVELY PROTECTS YOU snd at a vezy low cost. A policy wth us ia not an expense but !aan in- vutmSnti that farmers ail Ibraugli this western country endorse very highly. FuIEl forman fl. re., ur Brancb Rec.rdling Offies P.O. Box 8tu REGINA P.O. BOX 232 CALGAÂRY et sur Local Agents. Camisona Willams Brothers Llmlted UNION BANKC BUILDING, WINNIPEG 4 Canerai Agents fer Manitoba, Saskatchewan sand Aberta Ask your neighbor to take The Western Home Montly, 1.00forone year, $2.00 for three Motlly $00for y e a rs. I \"G6od Save the Queen\"l I hJ T ii gin of our National Antbcm, \"Gaod Save the Queen,\" has been much debated, andi with unsatisfaetory recuits. We have, on the one hand, the positive statement that iu 1794 a gentleman named Townsend was able ta report that, in 1740, bie father, wben present at a banquet in celebration of the taking of Portobella by Admirai Verndn, heard King Caey--the composer of \"Sally in our Alley\"--sing \"\u003clad Save the King,\" as a sang of bis own wniting and coin position. This le supported by the cvi. dence of Dr. Hlaminglon, the famous physicien of Bath, who affirma that Carey wrote bath the words and music of aur National Anthem, but that at bis (Dr. llarringtcn's) requesb, the hasa was re-wnittexx by J. Chnstopher Smit.h, Hoan. dol's amanuensis. On the other band, fu the \"Memorials of the Guild of Mer- chant Taylcrs,\" the dlaims cf Ben Jonson le have written the words, and Dr. John Bull ta have composed the mu-3ic, i.re tersely and temperately stated; and the tune la saidt tahave been llrst sung before lhe Merchant Taylors when King James I. and the Prince of Wales dined in their ball. Into the much.debaied question as between Carey and Bull it would be unwise tu enter here. Suffie it to say thal, while il is nowv impossible ta decide the matter with perfect cer- *tainby, the balance 0f testimonv is grcat- ly in favor of Carey. In 1743 '-soi Save the King\" became puhl!elv kioven by being sung et public entcr:aînmcnts, as a \"loyal song or anthcmi,-\" during the Scottish Rebellion. Jamnes III- the Pretender-was proclaiii11d at Edin- burgh on September 16,. aiid the first public hearing cf what lias îlc;vbecome our National Anthem was at Drury Lane twelve days later. Tie tune o \"Gotl Sdve the King\" vas a f.îvouri,3 witil several cf the great conipo- *rs. Weber introduced it in anc or two of ]Lis 'o rks, and -Beethoven, besidee writing Seven variations on It for piano, used it l isj\u0026 Battie Symphony, apropos of whîch lie said lu eue of hia lettons, I muilt show the English iwbat a blessing they have in 'God Save the King\"-Cassell's Family On the Northand I\u003e' HX Bedford Joues Rude la tbe home, but a cradie toases aoft do the 1111 of the pines aibove, IIned with M;e fleeciest wOd-kissed asses, touched with the tenderest suother-love; White-saared atumps tbrougb the trees are gleaming, seal of the axe on the wilderness, But here in the shack is a mother, dneam- tngZovr a babe that the ions winds Lost inuthe lure of bthe'wood-emoke 'wreathing, washed -by a whispering wave of w\u0026ud, Wrapped in the hymu of the forest'à bneathing, purpled warp of the hil -behind, Rougii nd udedc lathe.home, aweeping fragrant cedans and pines eJlmve; But soht t» a woman's face ia creepi ng the wonder-light of a mothe'. love I te khikis out cf thisM DOt~fer he'd kiokodover tbe traces and bulkd mo n a whllê. Ihn1askd vhe didn't tink it was sbo m t me10takebkerfeelingsintoaccout Mud cut bis idea ovS t10suithe home- stead? Re lookedat me kind cfii*uical lka fer a minutei thon c 9re bshand dowa auto bies ue. sud -e. At at hé #*d,\"'fat'is il, mail e begun ail W!Oag! The neit timë I go to tovu, 1'il cet ànew Wnipe and ab4an newboutle; âbd we'fl tudyout a new formula lihat ilifit 1h. oàstitution of Ibis infant ho -J dcfor;tewe'll begin and bring it up .an over ag-xI. Thme.nextda;, he got lam11 11te lin homes snd file\u0026tbem with so\"lfroin dif- féront parts cihIMMfansd sent them 10o the gverum. t chmist. -When Le got the reurns froen that -a, Le drew a 11111e cfEILe Iand dividiug it up into fields aihs rotationacoin undrS a job, he's* boumd tao me it *t il mversi yenus mnce we tba up oeir homeat d dive ' dePa bepzmbIa systemati.e rop rotation, W. 'lven't =n pa aenuemmu10 brag of, nor, on the thebaud, s\"Y geatflures 10 complain Of. Tii. ]and ia mngood 1111h. Our alfa and brome have donc weIL Our crops have neoly always paid for themmelves, aud sometirnee a good deal more. We have gone 10 nu extremes -in either rn or mizedfa.%ng butstuck toa middle pabi, keepm oIy ht stock w. could resouably expeet to keep well,.aud il Lhm paid us. Bout of ail, pa's farminghas helped to in- terest some of those aroimd us in botter far*m or rather farming for a home in- ý\"e spoculation. Our cottaýe with its setting of trocs sud shrube snd ils bigt flowers, is veny csy. but thegers are telling on Pa sudme The bilrcnare urging us ta retura lu them. TLey say we are too old te ho awaY off out Love alone. They amr ight. Wo are too old. Yoéunerf bandseam now do more toward the building up of West- ern Canada than ours. And yet-and yet-wo ahanl miss il so w~hen we have lef t it ail for good, for, es pa says,\"«It's a grand work helpmg ta biing up a new country.\" Parents of an canlier generation oflen deemed il their duty to nepres rather thon ta encourage outward manifesta-' tions of affection wbich bended, as tbey bclieved, to lessen the -wholcsome awe surna'unding parental authority. A littie girl eloyen years old was sent to live with her grandparen ts until her widowed mother could make a uew home for ber. The child bad beenbnoukt up tcnderly. On the firat night of h stay, 'wheu she reluctantly took ber candie to *go ta ber lonely rooxu, ah. paused ta kisa ber grandmobher gocd night. The old lady stantcd baek in dismay. \"Child, cbuld,\" she exclaimed, neprov- ingly, \"Judas betnoyed bis Master with a kisa!\" 6uehi a nebuiff b an affectionate and homnesick child atrikea us to-day aluiosI with borror; yet the grandinother wua good woman, and did ual mean to ho unkind. In another old.fashioned family a 1k. attitude led ta an amusing stratagem on the part of the youuagest son and hi\u0026 bride. As honeymoons were then littie known, hie brought hier immcdiately to live -in the formai and rigid atmosphere of a borne wholly unîlike bbe one f roin which she came. Moreovcr, it waa ne- garded as an offence for the young couple ta eeek seclusion. The poor Ihte bride, bamesick at best, sadly misscd bhe cheer- fulmes, and petting to which she w«s accustomed. Then, suddenly, \"Love found out a, way.» The head of the bouse, an austere andi dignified clergyman, had always insisted t.at coughing, sncezing and blcwing the nase were acta toc inelegant ta be per- formed in companv; any of bis children who found them u4#,tunateIy necesaary miust hasten into the outer hall and clase the door. The lbvrs, taking advantage of tbis mile, acquired twa amazingly se- vere, coincident and continuons calds. And as socu as one began ta cough, and bolted, it seemed ta set off the other, who hastily followed. Then one day a bon- rified aunt cama through the (hall unex- ectedly. A moment later slie burst into the living rocm, and exclaimed: \"John and Louisa aren't coughing- they're kissing!\" The minister rebukzed her sternly. \"iEmily, 'tis impossible! Unless, iu. deed,\" lie dded anxiousîy, \"the moment mîarks a crisis; a terrible discovery, and the need of conjugal consolation. These coughing spells have certainly inéreased. I wiII admit 1 have feared consumption.\" ,\"Thev w ere latiging,\" said Emily, dry- \",Then.\" announeed the ainister, w1ItI relief and also ý%vith finality, \"as ta their otlier-er---occupation-your eyes de- eived vou. M son, Emily, bas dig- nity; and bis wife, I trust, lias sense.\" *~ z: --s'.'.., They Found a Way",
         "The Wdstepa Hom Mbnthly W RAT one of us while reading \"s toria\" from w 1ig, w golden pe 6bs flot feieispulse hl ijat he 1: ocoud have =iedthos ourring turnes and shared with thSe hardy fur tracters the. firat sWght of the Rockies thefr aides green with virgin foest and thefr snow msantled summite reacbing up té theheavens. What a. eodo nl axon cuae aid endursne o f indomitablesrge aanttangle forest, rugged precipice mè etliing rapid; Of expaSure to winter b and sudicy river snd the red danger that lurked ever alang the trail McKenzieý Thompen, Franklin, Fras- er, de Smet m CoRose, Franchere Ové' one Iiuucire years ago thes. ad- *Stnrous pioneers cut trails now long forgotten, exploring sud naning creks, riveriansd mountaihs which were but maume on mnaps until a year or two agp wbeu they were re-disoovered sud the glorius stary of their original discovery rÏasIled. I'FheBeCoourageoUsadventurers tntheir way through the mage of 2-n'ufoe dr.ahi.d of the tizne het. tide of Anglo Saxon energ udopen up and populate thewid ough which they strupl.d with patient 1rsueasudthe visions 'wich amam ore 'their dauntiessa syse have now iu bonomerealitien. No longer do *e The only mothocd t smu oetunt h. mlv oi the railway. The Brewater Bras. (MnOM wgida and huniers) throwint th. damondvhtch out before us. To the awu* are enormen. pinuales arising Stern sud\"gri*m above the Colubia oe Feld-.there are Alberta, Columbia, Àthabamana sd the Doms wbile to the northward rss the. king of ail the Canadian Reckies-Rbosu.; Now, with Com, Bossasd Franichere we travel the Athabasca tuan sd lu look with regretful \"yeson the rioC ering. New Ihd Iinder for Youridds'ý: r0say, '\"Tihe bindei th eDmov-mg Nei best possible resuits at.ha The main fimo of the 1 mnade, of tough, strong ste forming a, unit which the hL of àhapé. .Ba and roUer béuj runnlng. The rosi fa et nl\" r MI1witlithe outto. bar whslioc wu A apeciai Zo.hapod cuttebsu with top of pltform, uo*s shot frosiy Utlodglng on th. Ott Ciemous d kua »«Oh« blàdor.. Cuit th.\u003ca stili f b.Oel*gtwluo. S\"sthe D*mssiaà Do 1\"g ooiageuts PlawÔ ~~uesf rolù bu. owrt rw your\u003cuse, i mt1a Win4~ A baie camp for the maly surveyoeu A huutlng pr \"about a av for th. e loh' a P have to wind. ourwyeary way acrose the lirnitiesa prairie, no longer pole Our cano.. urapid running rivera or cut aur way tough matted forests. A day or two in the train and we are in the iLa of those memories which must ever live lu the pages of bistory suad cause bearts to, bound 1wherever the. tale of a brave man's 1f. is told. Setting out frei jasaper w. travel as it. wpre with these empire builders pusbing Our way through dark férets and sunlit clearing, aver snow cavered suxumits sud gloomy deffles, seeing with their brave eyes the saine mountains rising majestical- ly on al asides, with restiess McKenzie we cross the mauntains sud stand-the first ta make the overland journey-on the. Pacifie shane. Again, with Thompson we discover tbe Athabasca Pass during the bitter winter of 1811 and froin this heigbt of land gaze aven the vast pgnorama of peaks spread 1 1,rn PaIls (double) recentv made accessible 'liucinof the Brazcau Branch of the i\u003e .' Jasper Houa. sud Henry Hans. now marked mereiy by a few heaps of atones sud the graves of namneless dead. With thein we aseend the Riviere de Tran (whinl pool) sud befor. beginnig aur steep descent ta the Boat Encampinent, pause for a moment by the. Committee's Punch Bawl allowing aur minda ta canjour up the. vision of the aid turne fur caravane atruggling up the steep declivities ladened with tbeir beavy pacla. Here they rest and the chief trader opens the eusftomary battie of wine. Ca. are naw forgotten, jakes pase baeic sud forth until, at ]ast beiug re.ted.they paou from aur sigt ou their long journey esst wsrd. With Pere de Smet we tail aur mountain trails earrying witii this indefatigable M stetidings of the salvatian of mani- d eteIndians. Once mare with Sinon Frazer we cross tbe moumtains sud, with hum make that terrifie voyage down the river wbich bears bis naine sud s» we' in reality look dawn luto the boiling cauldron af this mighty river we realise more vividly than ever the glaious hemi- tage thnt these explorer. gained fcr us yeana ago-a beritage that will ever in- crease as9 the years pasa by. The line cf the. Osuadisu Northern Rail- way ta the Pacifie Coast, naw fast nearing campletian rm right through the. heart of these districts which have no imany; romnantie associations. It passes Jasper Park within sight of Mount Robeon suiid the most inspiring scenery lu the Rocky Mounta!nsm per* sthen tbrough the YelowbaclPass, and failows the North Tbompson sud Fraser ivers ta the Coast. The park which was formènly the hame of The Yellawbeaded Indian Jasper, wbe name survives flot anly bere but lu tbe Tete Jaune Cache sud at Yellowhead Pas., bas been set aside by the Dominion Gov- ernment as a forest and game re8erve; its area is about tbree tbausand square miles Saves one ton ln Seven. lAINo lutely Gas \u0026 Duat- Seýnd for use-the Coupon \u003e1 i',t umoe às j aire pot that mimn~ W~ heat you et.fre tb amolmtit la wae ph*# The. Hée!. rs'., wkth 1 Its i enables yen te cdoma-out ii isU hê of dis goo4 cou1s-a.othsr avini waee Pen ofthe . l isa lvsyt out the, whole boum Every - Joint- wIsoeTSs-Or qhe warm air cbambersu ad m ýInto thehousels g-ruiA. fordv, _aboolutely gt ln a. CD~os.W~ternLtL ~Ij Sucoenor~ 10 Clqre I Brockus~, LSmkd The Home of Jasper the Yellowhéad Sevbis tch lie show ave jaL 'amily a soft kisse'! lerest trees nl the ream- winds ~moke )ering 'rest'à hil 'eping B; eping v.! often athor they ave .t to 1 her ber prov- ith a and! [mopt vua a boboe L lk. m on 1 bis littie [y to phere f romi a re- Oul' ],ide, heer- W8 1,ove -and! ,isted Dr the per- Idren esary close itage y se- !o1ds. and Who hor- mner- into",
         "'Thbe -Westepf om onIl '4 t. e, rcid-W. -ME: AOU Courses Oly. 'UMM ER ÙNtVBRSITY ;\"M. ONTARIO._ OF lId[NG as4I~w the Aierta. as, towu- hehodqbgtors of the Dminion -tIk taff, iuouna level fiât ?y*sorv I êY I ounaa, just east cf ý14re1tDm lin. utsWest lp the Miette STta Oovaim~ent %- p tqup a lutende\"nt cfthe Park, Mi hiolhis ôffice 'I'rin e na iot being oeae b the Cnaia NotheuRaiway on Ed- ýietsAxâhQUghftelbshm enlaidinito ili osornborder«o British Columbia. Mnq jWrte, howeme, was fortunato -eue glto.getthrough ssfar as Jasper ?u* lastmaumn., jmsr insathorough- idg outpoot .of civllization, sud the pre- ',lkg canvas orIoreducmksa utrikinig ountret Zt a white brick ten- 'Itl i ndouse sud thc fine atone qua- ters of the. superntendent cf te -art. Aftoe 'breskfatt aerved la a oue-toiy, stW«gg1 trpiper hotel, I set eut for the Brewster camp.where I'could find somns one to show me thie ights. This wus quite s pretentious log shantý, aurrounded by tentsu anuggoing close to, a sheltering bil It wasa 8unday sud the camp was taldngtblingses, but m'th generous bos- pitality.I wasofee my choice cf a ride oft the -Malgne ,Glacier or adrive- to' Pyrsinid Lake.' Mfter a hasty review cf my knowledge cf the art of hcraem\u0026oship, sud the consid- eration cf adipose tissue induced by sedentary occupations 1 voted la favor cf the drive; and, accordizngly proteqted by warm robesasd armed Wi1liquid lunch, reasi plaoeswM efuitho Wet in the Jsupfe Cache.. wi tèpUng we aSt d9wN t6 an in- Vi dnieiof; t\"%e-n6tthe dis- pisieà8tern - rigtaurants, *but the gefli- me article-w-hich tUone waa worth the trip. After the dishes had been washed by the. united efforts of the companY vîitrs e to drop la from the nearest caPs an settIementa\u003e it wus an inter- esting gatheing there m that log sbanty lit b a big oila\"p Thesend waa the Ldtcheu the dnn room was next, and the beda were m the west end, al- though théir divisions were, like the equat- or uré . a ar nes. Our hots wereprodfuctsofthe UiveraitY of Man- itoba, sud thoe Fnglish Public achocis sud universities were aleqmmted. There wus the acooitsut of the ofllieries at Pocohontas, down the line,and three Or four railwy e'r eea.One of them was goint.the Old Contry for Christmas to Le bi wif e sud cbildren, while auother bad only just returned from there with bis bride, who was pluckilY makinq, ber first acquaintance witb the simple life. A strict sabatarian would probably have stronq1ydisapproved of that evenmn of songu, yarns and good-nature horse-play, but it is doubtfül whether any church service could have doue more for these adventurers who wrestIed with nature for their living sud were lucky te foregather once la seven days. For orchestra we had a mouth organ and a jewsharp improvised with comb sud On the top of the world. The ,,nowcapped Rockie,7mouth of Yellowhead Psu w Send us your combings-we cao make very prety Switches, Cornets, Trants- formation, Puff Chignons, under ruE at moderate cost. Write us to-day for particulais. We can save you money. European Ilairdress- ing ParlorsMru%?f! 102 Carltn Builng 352,q Portage Ave. WINNIEG we set ont up a well-built road breasting the bll. From ita shoulder a mag- nificent panorama unfolded itseif. To the. Southacross the valley, the Maligne Mountains confronted us. Northeast, Pyramid reared his icy summit i the sky. Southwest, a chain cf lesser peaka spread où# their evercbanging glories cf light and sbade the stems cf the naked trees upon their alopes, rnaking, as it were, bold brush strokes cf mau.ve, with a blue back- ground cf their shadows on the crags. The sky was cold sud clear with large lazily floating cloudà. Wctward the land waà lower but in the notch there could bc distinguisàed against the horizon thc majestic beights cf Mounts Geikie and Hardisty, two cf the monarchs cf the range. The entire drive was picturesque, thougb the trees along the roadside were a littie marred by burning. Past the surn- mit of the bill the track led through open and fairly level country. At Cotton Wood Creek, some two miles frorn the railway, a nearer view cf Pyrarnid Moun- tain was obtained, and finally -we came out on the miniature Iovcincss cf Pyramid Lake, with the full height cf the mountain rcaring up almost frein its vcry shores. Work was te bc startcd the next day on the excavation for a hetel, and while we were on our drive, Sid, t le cowboy, and a cempanien set eut te round up for this work cerne herses that wcrc ranging on the clopes cf the Maligne. During tHie day they covered corne thirty-two miles, and broughit in about a (lozen liorseý,. 'li.; seeNýied like pr(t ty liard %vrk toele bt Sid regarded it merely w;~ a Stîndav'ýS revre- ation. Ret urne\u003cl to camp, i1sentthi afternoon in following the steel along t 1w, b:ink ocflw 1laeLeotl River, wieh iis ut that. poin a iizrrio\\\\-but rapid streain. Standing in tht' ceter cf the valley it '(eVmed ditliient to imagine sccnery of grvatcr grandeur, but 1I w stgld thiaÎt thc wrappinp-paper. The favorite songe were \"Thora,' sud musical comedy sciectionsq from the year before last. In the civilized. East, with its tango teas sud hesitation waltzes, these would have seemed archaio and hopelessly tame ne doubt, but here in the fastnesses cf the mountains they came with snu iminished appeal. The stories that were swapped were worthy cf Wister's Virginian for picturesque exaggeration sud straight-faced mendacity. It was like breaking awaLy frem oldf friends when 1 had te board my train for Edmionton that Ove of tlip \u003c' ,ncp partivel wl, hlorated ithe We wowui 11k to quote prce n Statioeiery w i. la at cucé hol himpYlllve, and dainty. We make -a speciaty CE Wedding Invitatins snd Society Stationery, and our plant -enjoya every facilityr for turningout work of un-- StovelCompany, Ltd. Prntesn d LUtbopsph.rs Winnipeg an ONE HEINTZMAN \u0026Co*. PIANO Orwglafy 660.00 For $2çgo.oo Orne NORDHEIMER PIANO, Cabiai Gran\u0026, Swgi.iy *$«0.WEf«r$275.00 Orne NORDHEIMER PIANO,.em aiy $« ........... fS*12.= Orne BRYANT Qpa\u0026tiina\" $0. 0..........fSM gieap ylàsak ba m J t eep- bonalvalues wame ofermgtitis \"mmoin Second-hand P%»\u0026s.W. have quit. .umber. ai througly ovauled md pu into furt-da imshp. Write ntt\u003crac for full pasticulars and f-r our special riees on Cburch Organs J J. H. oLEAN \u0026 00., LTD. W;innipeg's.Greatat muic Hou.. The Roue of the 5.1. zun ErCo. Pie». and thme Victrela DEPT. W., =3 po~ .Art.. WinuiPEG, MA». Wigs SioIrs omp\u0026- mai teed to beco S qdecu \"v of best qua yhuit and aS\"rdn*lyw. do the laretbusa nessni ai 800\u0026 inWster Canaa. Switches, amy lernod or color, frorn. ..$1.50 Combings mde up.$I.00 Wae soCam ru d a. send Yeu a capyf tcioe\u0026g Seamnan \u0026 aPeterseni NEW YORK HAR STORE- ]Kensington Block, WINIEG $1.50 Ripid Vaoum Wasbe $1.0 la- na fi The real, orginsi t ibaeetivacuum washer. Thý w auher that wiUI wach anything-ehirt bands, dirty cuffs. collea, anythingÜLa three minutes. That la what thé RAPID does. For a Short time only, we W Il send the 1RAPID p ost- paid f or*.0.But -you muet send thl advertiseet along with the dollar. Don' mniss this chance-lt won't bc repeated SOUB $1.00 to-day with this ad. If not satiBiaOtOrY# yuur muney will bc returned. FISHER,-FORD MFG. CO. DE PT. 13 TORONTO, ONT. W UMW--p .ut741 I. t 1a~",
         "Raue eYourRooftng cornu, -PmutedYour -U lin rom Pire. Ighta n id W\u003cather You accampliali mul these re«Itmby uing out hevily zinecoSated EtdLm'e Theo g*vS lcagW mhrolce =Y other toofing. Cot MM ito lay. Amrm nt-peo\u003cM md do iôt requfre CâIn' Thm blad tM yeam mgo a\" ig go.d uéivice* end* for fi« ookthat iiowu. how UEatlà.e»' ~«lMg 40 miyona buüiflgslightaitfre, aud weather-proof and '12y they omt leua per yer tan ay other rooflng. W. ~mm umo et bd . s~Ud- Seul MRIbNakdhasA,, JIN m For fi». Thbe W il 111 i wfqM onb nigit, andýhe warmthoet h.invitation to 'corne agai n d brimg m blankets\" wms no sto~rthan My o0Pn \"ule donoa sonnas88 I t bc. At Poofie excellent view of Roche lnttbymoon- light. This poulc, altiioughnot of unusual heighm very spetacuàla iits cléar-cut UsiigrJa s-aconite, Umorn e ti Lest hunting districts eau\u003e resdly be reached, and the. guides wio amike theïr headquartors there miy they eaupar antee to securesiiimten moimiin si and mountain gpst on the confines of the park. The sport of huntimg mountain .heop and goat ie one of the. most at- tractive in the. world. The ambitiqus nimrod cmn hardly b.c omuided to have aehieved faine until ho bu eas d.- trophy of one or other oftiese lin 0\u003cnl the mountains. Mountain he az more commbu in Alberta thaý, n Ii Columbia, but mountain goaL are ctei found on Brts Columbia aide. There are numerous good hum Vudbut the. best areuuafrht frmcivlistio.iiey a e fre racluod by trail sud pack ypoy. The goqts, how- ever are always higii up, o that itmkem diffcult climbing sud al- round exorcise to reach their foedn ggrom once there the. goat je not Mdi@\" Eýa mark sas the amutdhies\u003e na-7 notable tact thM t ti.m. both~M% M0 » Te.m M markable violon..s\u0026dW iM 9M tua mamfl mçpow,, .E . SAV~OS Iiorae .orrk and Cure Hlm B a , ..t i. Ir .d oi 'Eh~eIuoin »L P*w(t »uOn.uwm a mnm Md\u003e.Ab«o 1,0? ai UUNIO. OUi they are siglted. Whenever the hunter -ay people. The route is verybeuiu cornes actons tiiem, hm faet, th.y oma aud, moreover, parectly Sfj whihe the \" always b. t'Ind locking at him. On. return journoy eau b. mi\u0026e by rail. of the best p=ae for mountain sheep i. iEBut from Jasper the. limere m lk-g the. the. Braseau district where tuer. iJeal\" river bank with cliff anmd mnýtaiis-lu thi.es abundance of U\u002611k bear. The. gret background, cuttimg the. uouth mnd et attraction, ot course, je tthe grisuly but for Henry House's fiat which is vory besutiful these the hunter goes rather fartiier' d dd with trees. rom Henry British Columbia. The best Ure e me the. Siaring River ruas for about i the sesn arties usually start about \u003cste sud aqure miles te, the uvpe u the twety-fltii of May, sud \"tY out Of. Jasper Lake t whose mouthok until the mniddle et June. Good sport River fiows in. Here the lino cornes rlght mai aIse bc had with caribou. bak out on the shore, sud runs the entir.egIQ talddeer sud moose. amid *beautiful seenery, outtlng boh Brewster Brothers and Moore have ýa the aide of historie old Jasper Houme at the moat complote organisation at Jasper, easteru end. including pack horses, ponies sud outflts, Leaving thi pint it ruas lnd teor covrin evrytingreuird fr hndlngthre.-quaïte eta mile, and crosses the parties *hio want te go moutaielb Stoney River, whlch has a luci flfty-four mg, botaniuing or huntmng. Tiie game feot, lctedsabut twenty miles tram its m law ae lnint, two heads of each variety moutii. It ielers ayool eatc being allowed. In the waters eoftth. dis- bull trout. These talla are a two aYs trict are found splendid rainbew trout, journey witii paek hoess but are wl 1particularly in Braseau Lake and Brazeau worth seem 1 River, about seven or eight days'erjurmey Steel agalin tollown the. banko f the. river from the railw.Tiie fishig t Mro~- for two and a hait miles te the junction -ci out is remarkabl good, sud the. question the Mocee River, a amali glacial stresin - among the. guides ienet whero the flsh are wrhich can bc jumpedacros at most seasons- mont numerous, but as te where they are Of the year. Juet bolow, su 800-foot tun- the largest. Very notable waters are nel enables the ime te, pais Bowling Jack Lake about a day's journey trom Mouatain. Here a nual ereok with vr Jasper, sucâ Rock Lake, about two day'.prtty talla, similar te the tamous Punch journey. Pyramid Lake only one heur'.Bo1lFalls, passes under the lino, sud here drive away, affords good Laie trout flshimg. wo teuch upon old time romance, for it in Practîcally every one of these are virgin atatod that su Indian went inte a canyon fiahing grunda. Tiiere are trails te al- ef the creek over a iiundred feet deep, sud most althe lakes, and thé Goverument waa nover seen again. However this may EA Park and Forestry Departmont'are fim- bo, it in a tact that several engineers have o proving them each year. Tiio park a\"m tried the ascent without success, sud the qi offers te the photographor sud explorer only way te reach the lake -ia over the aninparable field, as tiiere areh- mouiptains. nuirable uinnapped talla, cascades For eight miles the route follows the valleys, lakes, rivers, mountain rne aud shore et Brule Lake, at whose nortiiest peaks now made accessible for oh ie end is the mouth of Selornon Creek, where P. time by the epening et the ralwa. there is some very good fisbing. This is A magnificeiit esue tniP cai teinmade supposed te ho the site ef a very old trading from jasper down the Athabasca River post, run by free traders in opposition te right through te, Athabasca Landing, the Hudson's Bay Company, sud l isec which, when botter known, will attract considered the rastern boundary et Jasper The 19 ýW. ft~ra TrIh1 wtfil = MW. aida m .cCi. 'Purity'OraMg. Mc. 2 f« 269postidà luenohng dik AGOEN A»NDZALURg VANTI omd MW. fS mmom.a\" PUUURn\" 1.0. son Us ,..d, sg âoeti0wdti;f mentio",
         ",~.,. ToWetSn -HomeIM ont hi Y Park, althoue he .GoVnnnàent survey ham fltbo cmpileted as yret. Wetfrom Jespo up the. Miette RiuèeLMoimtain towe on al ides afforin eenery of- the moot mi=nd desâiption until the deep green waters cf Yeflowiiead Leke ame reached. Thon orn e tn miles through a rather interest- ing and heavly-timbemd country by Mooee Lake and alontheii Fraser to the croesing -et Mcci.Rive, which bas very beautiful falie n\"a a big canyon. A trail folio\"s itas core b o mt Rcbace, wbich, alt1hpueh iot aetual?: within the, confines of tbe. Park, may 'yet b. regarded as among ils groatest ameta.' WThat 1 would do if I were Premier Written for The Western Home Montly,By Mrs. H. M. Enter, Winnipeg Kà- Ir 7-- - *s i4taA a lwHmvl;Çflflumo a hrU kaf onju Meifwho hold bigh offies ithese bard timebave the power to do good in greater proportion than ever before. Whcn w. tbink of the tboumands of immployed and wonder wbat Ïbey are going to do, w. won- der whytbemen in powerdo not help them ini sornie way. There is a great cry of \"Back to the-LIand.\" Pol aieta r do flot resus. aill that it meane. Do you know that even to take up a bomestead it takes money? On December 21, 1914, there were 8,000 men out of work mn Win- nipeg alone. How msny of them had $W0.00, let aloyie enough to pay the. fée for a honmestead and move theen. lrue, land in the. West. Te .the. Swan River Valley, for instance. Tiiere you bave good water at twelve feet. You can mms strawberries snd fail wbeat. Thie winters are not so cold and the summers are not so bot as i outbern Mamitoba. As 1 writé I bave a letter from the. agent. at Swan River arid be emys that tiiero are stili smre two tbousarid bomestoads tW be takeri up i that district. The C. N.- R. rume up tbrough the. nortier part of the Province and none of the land tbrown open for tbat purpose la very f ar from a railroad. How are the people to get tiithebomoateads if tbey don't get help? Who wil belp them Yukowmi hotow aMUik md prepmdmg It o bawbouleti. You know i: d1ýeu\u0026ty of mmhsmg t d4uIentd that the m'odifyhmg isui 'be-obanod ta mpi4oIWsfbmby's growind neods. You kmow dhs uulk le. esly tu b. infoted wath dorme mend eft.. cause Orie-ou. troubles. * Y Tom .t baeibe at for baby. Justa word @bout th fe nurm ' Foo4e-frch, pure, rih milk front .INMly eowopatured in.old Bnand-handled in modol labÈwàaède.J . ideï.I aurroundinga-mnd modifiod by- ~ps in a Sw codanos widih Mh.st mediomi k» os f baby'.. need. T line Ailmurm' Fonds comprise a ne. iesdi re. ko-i.msýiil. - baby'. meodsanmd progrese. A lomemt' a thoumLt willI canvince every mother of the gueoa' hne f iièmthod. What could ho more irrmfliomml dimuta feed a baby of dire. we.k. mnd orne of dz xMunthe on «WtIY tdisMmre food P XilenurgFods M\u0026Food Nu.L MiIk Fod No. 2. NaltedffoadNo. 3. 1~.mi1b 08 M MM aIre' 6 Siutb. raiOMaM 6 h No 1 lsa like healthy modier'. milk diat it cmn b. gien, to, dis oungo.t end moat dolicato baby, cidier in oounton with the. breat or alan.. No 2 i. prepared * xmOty »eNai1, with neocesary addition. for dis for- sciétion of houeenmd .trong nrve tissu.. No 3 food elrds-ths idomi food outil the. mixed diet is Introduc.d. \"Infant Fe.diug fund of valuable information. Write in for\u0026a free copy to The Alen \u0026 Haabury, C..,Limite\u0026 U66Gmrd Sbet\u0026. Tmo'to bo THE LABEL on your pat1)( wil1 tell you whien your aaa..~ IA 3ELvsu1 scription expires. SUDEN» TOUR RENEWAL MUEN DUE Woenensweep the streots of P\"ri. now. AU avallAbe - b ave gone bt th Front. but the. streefa have 10 be swept and so the. women of Pari jump right in and become meinhers of the. atreet cleaming force. you may eay, tbe fe l only $10.00, but that ie the emalleet part. Take, for in- stance, tbe case of a marn I know. He ie thirty yeaxs of age. For fifteeri yease bas been a railroad mas. He bhs beld the position of trainmnaster of one of the large roads running out of this city. Last auturon, after the war started, the road on which lie worked decided to eut expenses and as a start they abolished the position of traininaster. This mani then went brick as conductor. Train by train this com- pariy took off tbe road until now this man, although still running a train cari only make betweeri $110 and $130 a month. He is away fror borne all the time and it costs him from $15 to $2-0 a month for board. Hie farnuly which numbers sce-en live ber. in Winnipeg, paying $30 a montb house-rent. Taking their rent, fuel, meat, milk, groceries, mnsurance and other littie thinge too nuinerous to men- tion, their expenses are $100 a month. Now the point is riglit here. This mani warits to go oni a homestead in Manitoba. and wants to go at once. How cari le do so? Mho ie going to help him? Are those men in Winnipeg who have been uttering the cry, \"Brick to the Land,'\" go- ing to help? How can this man move bis family of seven to a homestead from M'in- nipeg? W-here le the money coming from to pay the expenses? Now7 suppose the Premier passed a bill sctting aside a certain amount of money to hclp homesteaders. [Let. them pay six per cent interest. Soîne set tiers wii re- quire more than others, stitl I think $:300 %vould help out fairir weil and flot be a burden to repay. The mani who goes on a homestead needs moncy to miore from the place lie is now to tlw, honwstcad. 11e needsînionevyfor a cow.' lieu-. -.eil. Wlivre is it voining from. r There are to-day ivin in pgloe24\u003e) w~ho woul go on a hotnu ieaij if tluv tuh only get a lttie hellp. nt\u003eaj-hr- ing open for homestcad Luintc of the best if the goverrnent don't? If the powers that be would put aside, say, \"10,000 or a $100,000 and lban it out to bomesteaderg at six per cent interest, gvng tbem two or three years to repay, then it would be s\" sornething Wo cry \"Back Wo the Ln.'The goverrnment could lerid from $200 W $50, according to the needs of tbe man. If sometliing le not donc and that at once, the. lard times now will look 1ke prosperity alongside of next year. We do not only want wheat but \"produce\" of ail kinde, beef, hogs and poultry. The mari wbo le not too lazy cari make a good living and help othere but first h. muet have help himself. It takes money to get that start. Where le it coming from? I think it le up Wo our Premier. Wbat do 3-ou think? The cyriierl person was standing in front of apart o f an exhibition of loalart talent laholled \"Art Objecte.\" \"Well, 1 suppose Art doee object, and 1 can't blame hier, but there doesn't seèm ta ho any help for it,\" lie finally said.- Chicago Inter-Ocean. A Progressive Hair Store The New York llair Store, which for very rnany years lias been so weIi and favorably know-n to our readers, have once again folind it neccssary to iove into larger quarters ia order to cope with their rapidly growing niail-order busi- ness. The new premises whieh are situîated in the Kensington Block oni Portage Aýve-Winunipeg's niost impor- tant tixorouglifa re-a re most elaborate ,111( flnujsh everv faeiliti- for bobli eity an nlina il-or(der depa tnîiients: \" W'estern hToine Montlily rvadvrs wheu l inthe citi are cordially invited to visit the new home of the New York Hlair Store. v",
         "The -western Home Mont hiy SThe Young Woman and Her Problemn I ) Pearl Riehinond Hamnilton. à reas amoming daity. hit l toc, impostant to be made \u0026litstfu. It is Natureslaxative. In Pettijohns we hide the bran *I bedons soIt wheat flakes, loved by everyonâe.1 The dish ta orne- lourt bran, yet few people know iL Seive à thrice a week Note how folike iL Note wliat a cilference it makes in the days. You will neyer give it up. A ilion miles a day are due to Petmjobns. RoflldWhet Wiuh -da.Bra If your grocer bas't Pettijohn's, stamps for a package by parcel post. We'Il then asic your store to rsupppyit(4. Address THE QUAKER OATS COMPANY EMs of -Manitoba, Peterborough, ont.; wcst of Ontario, Saskatoon, Saak. Your -Last Chance!s!a TMi:Ad. W Uffor 5b te Yu î~Iu In the last few ia. ontha we have sold ~ ~10.00Rapid Vacuum Washers with the ab- solute guarantee that they would do ail we cim.fur them or we wouid return the yr chase money .i l We have flot been .sked to returnaa 1 1 9 ingie cent. We think that tbis in a ecrd to be proud of. There art over one hundred thousand delighted userai daf As RpidVauum Washer in Canada to- d.Are yo!i one of them? If not, send this ad. to-day with one dollar, andf your washing troubles will be over. The Rapid is the origin- al Vacuum Washer. The only washer with thse famous bail valve. There Lave been many imitations that soid at higher prices, but none that couid do the work. The Rtapid will wash a tub full of anything washable in three minutes, without the slightest injury te the Foods. Lace curtains, wooien biankets, com- larters, socks, waists, overalis, coilars, cufs etc. Nothing too dirty for tihe Rapid.' Sena this ad. and one dolar to-day, and we wil send you the Rapid Vacuum Washer hy mail, Post-paid to any address. Don't forget this is your LAST CHANCE te get thse Rapid for $1.00. FISHER FORD MFG. COMPANY, Dept. B. TORONTO, ONT. Don't ouiti à 310E BOUL, OAPPED RO08 BOR BISITIS ____FOR I wil remove theni and leave no blemnishes. Reduces any puff or swelling jD4e5 fDot blister or reniove thse hair, and horse cari bo worked. $2abottledelivered. Doo6Kfree W. F. Yoaq, P.D.I. 138 huams mdii. Mnou\u0026S.Go Absorbine and Absorbine, Jr. are made lu canada Artificial Limbs MADE fl IN unwiPE W. oca fi t you at shert noie. with tuho beet that money eau buy. Write ua for fuli hnfermadj\u003c\u0026 J. H. M. Carson 357 Notre Dane Ave. Wlnnlpeg The Poisonous Park Worm Rlas the man vampire monopolized the city parkaT Girls and women, too, tell me that they are afraid te ait on the seats in our paria-that a certain class of pai*k \"haunters\" tako for granted that a female aitting in the park ia at tihe mercy of ail kinds cf objeetiônable flamil- iar attentions. Especially are young girls bothered. It la a pity that a tired girl who has atood behind a ceunter al day cannet rest a few minutes in one of the breathing spots previded and support- ed by the city-without being molested by men who have ne -regard for \"some- body's ister.\"-Scores cf wage-earning girls cannot afford a vacation, and an heur or two in a park isa ah the recrea- tien possible for thcm. I trust they will be reasonably protectcd this year frem the sl*my eosvards w'he sneak into the beautiful parka of ont city. The Soul'a Emphasis Imagine, girls, imagine-do met dream the. hours away. D)ay-dreamirng is -a ferm cf intoxication indiilged in by many girls. Imagine yourself thse creator of ý21j Opportunity cernes oftenest in the humblest, most unexpeeted manner. Nearly every girl in the iverld excels ini eome one thing. Iît may bc humble,' but whatever it is a way can be found te make it profitable. Two officeg iris started a wayside tea room. ýil te motoriste of the city knew the place, because the tea, bis- cuits and home canned fruit were a rare treat. They served home made cakes for a. little extra. As the -little lhonte- was fifteen miles fron the city their rent and living expenses did not cout, mucli, and they had a nie bank aceount at the end of the seasen, besides a sum- mer'e outing. Josephine Jenina, a clever newspaper wernan cf Boston, once said: \"With al thse wieh uinte world te earli moneye, girls let many ways of doing se escape, their notice simply because they 'are lacking in practical application.\" 8h. mentioned a visiting mender-a gel akil- fui 'with -the* needle, whe goes from house te bouse te mend -the family stock ings, sew ou buttons and repair what. needs mending. This mijght b. carrled eut auccessfuýlly luboarding and rooming housea where young men stay. Many Engiand Training Women as Farm Woskera, te rêlease Mon for tbe War. In connection with the acheme of thse Board of Agriculture, the Hampshire Farm Institut. hm. beena inaugurated at Sparshoit, a village near Winchester, Enicland. The girls are taughti te taiet.heb place of men n every brandi of farn work. Photo shovrs them at work in ltee clbage patdi. a kind of work that people are willing te pay for. I have watchcd the garbage picker-you know, hie la the mani with tihe hemp bag. who xnikes a living and sometimes a fortune by handiing acraps that we throw away. Yesterday hie filled bis sack with things I regarded as useies-old clothes, old botties and bundies cf paper. Perbaps one day I shaîl write a letter oncdean white paper made from thse worn eut dresI threw away. Hie knows bow te, produce a need from waste niaterial. I -have in niy ibrary a large volume about women who Lave created new work-womcn who mnade a special busi- nesase successfnlthat they began pro- fessions and business ventures now fol- low-ed by theusanda of their aex. A girl shonld have enougis sense te se order lier prescrit that it wiil con- sistently lead into and beautify lier future. Most successful girls use the heurs that othier girls throw into the gairbage box cf amusement. Useles excitement la a huge social monster that cats up a giri's tume. Some think that in order te be happy one must lbe ex- cited. There la aiways a market for good wvork. People wiil pay for what they want. Fili a want, anmd yen have a market. No girl wiil accomplisis any- thing in life if she its waiting utntil thse time cornes when she can do wl'at aile wants te do. There is a weman in a New England citv who has raised and educated a famnily by making doughiiuts. Every; body in the city wants hcr doughinuts because they are the beat made. a tired xnther- dreadé the sight of tho weekly mending, and would be relieved te get a few Leurs help from a devisiting mender.\" Mrs. Elizabeth Morand, o Portland, ýOre., makes her living by re- pairing shoes. One weman in our city bas organized a clans, to train domestica in ceeking. Others might organize classes in lbenne- keeping, ironing, sanitary washing of dishies and the fine art of serving. The demand for competent domestie far ex- ceedstthe supply, yet to'-day scores of girls go from door te door asking for housewerk, which they cannot do. Somne people regard imagination as a misty tlîing. Imagination in the master build- er ef one's life structure-it means imag- ing; building a theught-pattcrn, a men- tal model-an ideai. A perfect thing must -have a perfect pattern. Suceesa is an individual thing. A character who failed in Sophie Mays book said: \"Wel I have done what I could.\" '«Ah, ne,' replied lier siste r, \"yen have done what yen couid net.\" This girl had written a book, net because she bad talent but be- cause she considered writing \"«genteel.\" Many girls ailow their carcers te, be wrecked on the rock ef gentility. Cboose the werk which lis chosen you. There la ne real personal power outside of one's seul. An Honor Rol The Manitoba Agricultural Coilege has just p:lîîted tue naines of the girls who grailuated from the domestie science course this year. I read lt with -p'ea'xre in our daily papers, and wanted to put at the head the words-\"-ýHonor MADE ON CANADA Write l.sah'IwoekigC~ ooCnd for 2r, bookkts \"filaTI . llusewlve",
         "iheWestepÉn HoànW Mont hi\u003e Roil. That a large nuniber of Ouaa dian girls have studied the practical science of homemaking ii ment promising. T3iese courses are fast gaining popular- ity. Pour nourlaliment and peor cook- ing are moe.closely related to the drink probleni than most people realize. The Mau who cornu home- te a half-satlsfy- imgsupper, or te a cold meal, or te a apileid M o indigeetible pie and baker's bread, wanders out afterward for eome- thlng more comfrting-and ftnds it. The firat Tear or two of a married couple's lif e is the index te tkeir future. Just now many Young people thiuk \u002bhey eau begin by living in a room in a -board- inghôuse. This nearly always ends in disappolntlnent. When a Young mnan marries hoe wants a home, managed by a homenmaker. This eau ho realized in a tiny suite or house, but neyer in the role of boardere. If hie cones home to a healthyv xxeal prepared b h is wife-tbe place is home te hum.IÏ have in mind a Young couple who began light bouse- keeping. lu a rooming bouse this winter. The wrfè could net cook, se eh. bouglit roasted chickens a6 a dollar each afid canned ineats by the dozen. She bought prepared salade and cakes and breads. There vas no charm in this canned cook- ery for bIer huaband. One dish prepared by hiis vife from nutritious meat would have made hum look forward te the home Loin. ith eager anticipation. The little home-made surprises are.baits that make home life attractive to huabands. I where. It may ho that of a wife, a mother, a siater or a eweetheart. But L arn te day tlhlnkin of the aoldier's iweetheart. I have sun lier tuw.stained face, and have board h «'s1d reget Of' wrecked b My hurtaéhs for ber.- Yet trgh it Sil h. thankful my dear girl thatye have plaoed your alfe- tides\u0026seworthll1.Be the womaii worth 'while flghting for. While lie -l at the front let his memories of you bç sweet with the fragrance of pure, high-miudied, Ohristly love1iness. Then shahl he flght withI greater strengtlý and determinatien. 'Nearly every day lately I have seen our soldier men marebiug. They are a splendid type of clean looking men, with face\u0026 firmly indicative of their responsi- bility. We are sinoerely patriotically proud of them. Just a word te the young girl who 'tbinks ahe muet attract a soldier at any cost. Last week twe soldiers tried te lbe themselves in a crowded. store. One of them said te bis companion. «'Let us get away from those two girls. [t la impossible to get rid. o thern.\" There la a type of girl who le seo disguating in ber gaine of flirtation that she neyer vins any admirer -Worth wbile. Someono bas asked for rny creed. It is summed up lu these two linos: \"Ho, who ïserves bi» brother best, Geta nearer God. tban ail the rust.\" Oum~ I Tle more economical to use Paint th\"nit la flot to use it. Lumber costs more than Paint-Paint presrves- Lumber. Ail Paints are flot suited to Western conditions. House Paint has been made ln Western Canada for 33 years with thorough knowledge of cllmatic requirements. Genuine white lead, ozide of zinc, pure colora and Manitoba linseed oïl, ground by per- fected macinery-these are the points that make loe House Paint your most economical purchase for ail outdoor work. :: Write today for Free Book of \"Suggestions.\" G. F. Siephlens \u0026 Co. lImiIed PaInt *Bd Vawnm Ma\u0026Immw Winnipeg, Camaila 23 I 1OUISE PAl N Funeral of Gladsione's Grandson. Lieutenant Wiliam Glynne Charles Gladstone, Wehsh Fudiiers grad on ef the laie W. E.Glaitom* lepgIa'r eutmiimawsbreaiaareonArl2r.Let wowmklJ know of nething tbat a busband admires lu -bis wife more than accoxnpliehment lu the eulinary art, and 80 I urge young Sirls te train themselves ln the art of ome-making. In the mad whirl of business competition men lead a hard, strenueus if e, and home should be a p lace of reereation for them. It je the lack of rest.ful atmosphere in domestie life that ruins, many men. I am convin- eed tthat the average woman in the home bas au easier time than ber busband, and it is Up to every girl who in'tends te be married te study her part of the work of home building. There le a tendency for the new -wife wlo bas time on ber bande te speud it ln stores, where she wanders about wishing for things she cannot afford. Do flot begin idly, but spend that spare timneila wise study of ail that tends te buiid a good home. The Soldier's Sweetbeart Every girl is in love Nvith thie soldier these days. ILow ean they hielp but Adniire the brave, courageous nien who take their lives in their hiands to filht for our protection? One of our spflenidid lads recently said to aniotlwî: -iVhetlîer you live or I live niakes littie difference. but whetber our flag waves twer anl Em- pire of justice and Honor niakes ,mn eter- nal difference.\" Anid Yet (ýeerv lire tilit le sacrificed on the blood y battlegrouîuls of Europe ineans a broken hiýar't soule. The -joys of if e corne tbrough service. Tbe regrets of 11f e come through selfish desires. \"Billy\" Sunday says we sbould look Up for belp and tiiej dowu te help. A Cail te Women The tragedy and trouble of to-day wifl bring out a new type of weman. She will learu te elimxinaîte unneeessary eo- tionalism. HEer interest lu others will torpedo the mental warship that carnies the enemie-worry, fear, jealousy, anger and personal hatred. One of the greatest gifte of use lu the bringing on of sucees le the ability te eliminate. The ability te eliminate every thought, habit or action tbat dees net construct toward some useful pur- pose. The soldier going on a campaigu straps te his baek nothing but the lightest equipinent-'vet he carrnes everything neccssary an d every article figures onle huindred per cent effitiency. Mien why fume and fret and fuse ever little allom-anees? Eliminate them. Then ste1) ahead and yent wiil be surprised at your iincreased agility tbrough lighter equ ipmen t. Someone has said: \"'It je a libel on t1id Creator to be depressed.\" Speils of temper are net excusable. Fits of biueness are net legitimate. -J ar wi bu lei to th lig to th Fe da a giî im it Co: 'nE til an, lis is tc a r wl fil! pe. foi I :1 d.. .1PALM- = teo 1UXU1 saLsssui lin a a\"~ SEVt nw. Ive oa il74 O",
         "The Welstern Home Mon thly if every woman in Canada exerted bier- self a littie forothera there would be no army of unfortunate sisters. There are .womeu in Winnipeg to-day, and in West- ern Canada, working for home and coun- try, each one of wbom is shouldering the. work of a huiidred women. ]ýnvironment-what is it? aSurreunding conditions, influences, or fprees, by whioh living forma are influen- ed and modified i their growth and de- velopmeflt. n Fanty Crosby was blind, but hier afflic- tion brought ont strength and beauty in ber girlbood. When ahe was a very young girl she wrote tbese lines: \"oh what a happy soul I arn! Although I cannot sec, 1 arn resolved that i hi s world Contented 1 will be. Hlow many blessings I enjoy That other people don't! To weep and sigh because Fm blind, i cannot, and I won't.\" The. slightest incident offered bier in- spiration. There are probably more of bier hymne aung to-day i churches, in missions, et evangelistio gatherings and elsewhera than from any other Àmerican composer. «An unborn charmi of graciousness, 1Made sweet hier amile and tone, And glorified hier simple drtsa With beauty net its own.- The'dear Lord's ceat interpreters, Are humble human souls. The gospel of a life like bers Je more than books and scrolls.\" The uni to women of to-day is a call to service-a\u0026 eaU te patriotism-a call te, inspire men te noble and splendid aehievements-a caîl te, urge them on in their service te humanity. With a work se great before ber she muet be able te conserve li energies towmrds tue.highest possible degree ef womanly strength. The Marriageable Age Strange and varied are the letters that corne te my desk. Here is one asking: \"What do yen consider the mnarriageable age?\"» 1 At wbat age do the. majerity of men Ilnd that perfection i women which influences men te marry them ? At flrst I thought from twenty te thirty, but upon second thouglit I shati say from eighteen te eighty. . Love that will last bas its foundation in reverence, and if a woman would ibold a man's love she must grow inj eharacter. Wben Madame de Stahl was forty-flve, she married a man of twenty- three, and they were happy, because a marriage that baasnet a pretty face orj a pssing fancy for its foundation, but1 appreciation of a noble beart, a beautifulq mmnd and a pleasing personality-such a marriage stands the test of time, and tuis kind of marriage would put divorce courts out of business. When womcn rnarry for convenience, position, rnoney1 and reputation tbcy commercialize the affectione of men, and these marriages1 are a curse te hummnity. one bachelor wbo bas a large fortune and a profitable business, when appealed te on the Bub- ject, bad this te say: *\"As for myself, well, wbo is net ready to admire the candour and beauty of1 the debutan te? They arc always de- lightful, ebarming, yet I should net care1 te ask one of them te be my wife, for4 the reasen that 1 consider the match 'would net be altogether a happy one.1 Feiv men can keep up long te the stan- dard required te dance attendance UPOfl a gay will'-o-thc-wisp of eighteen, The1 girl of the period of two and twenty imagines herseif a social qucen, and rules1 it riglit ever us peor men. She is quite1 confident she eau get any ene, and that mien are to bow down te ber if elle gives themi a glance or a amile. No, they1 are tee seif-enscious at that age. \"At twenty-six I find thema infinitely miore sensible, if I may be perritted te uise tliat expression. They require less conipliments and flewery talk, and that is a relief te moat men. At thirtY we- men are at the zenith of their attrac- tions physically and mentallY. Thiev are the fulli blown and perfect roses, ~veenpossession je positively deliglit- fi.1 \"At thirty-five, men find in tbemi thsat 'perfect repose, that magnetism aud coin- fort whidi the wisest rnost appreciate, and companionsbip with them brings a Mau those elysian dreams of what a home and bis owu fireside would be like. Just such a thiug is the brigbt star of hope about which those, dreams clust\u003cèr until they fiud fruit.ion in reality.\" Anether says tbere are charming wo- mxen at flfty wbe make ideal wives. A well.known ,bauker aya: \"cIf I fell in lôve with a woman, and she could be persuaded into taking me, were she eighteu or fifty-one I would rnarry ber. ,,Age does net count in the rule of love and marriage. lu selecting a wife every man should go ccording te bis own judgment, witheut prejudice and simply search for the heart that -beata respensive te bis own.\" But listen, girls, wben yen are twenty-five yen will met look at the man you wauted te marry at sixteen. The Encyclopedia of Life In our school days wben inetructors assigned difficult lessous we searched through enicyclopedias for information. It is more difflenît now wbýen living buman problema are assigned us. There iis se much of the unkuown quautity and quality that no theorem or algebraie equation can solve. Only. a study of living people can help ini the aolution. This is why 1 urge girls te read biographies of women, and that re- zuinda me, wby is it se difficuît te, buy biographies of women t I have searched through book stores and libraries for them witbout succeas. Recently 1 bunt- cd througb every Winnipeg book store for a biography of Queen Mary. Evcry experience of succesa in a wo- nan's life is worth recording A girl cernes te me in distress. Her future ila a black blank. But, I urge, \"«Jane - experienced your trial, and to-day ehe is a happy, -useful respectcd woman.\" \"ýHow, oh, tell me how sbe livcd througb such a trouble?\"tute girl plead- ingly asks. ThenlI relate ber experiencc-m lesson i life, but eue of life's lessons worth knowing. The rising step by step, from deep, muddy .deptbs to au atmospherc of jey and light and love is an accemplish- ment worth while. The girl feels likze a ncw being, and begina the upward elimb. Last month a young girl of nrneteen Sassed ito the Great Beyond. Besides cr nurse, one other person attended ber funerl-a girl wbo might to-day have been a beautiful woman if someene bmd found ber in time te place a loviug arma around ber, and say, \"My dear girl-I'm your friend.» Some of life's Most fragrant lowers bave been gtbered frem the green scum of society's poison- ous pond befere the killing gerrn% bad pentrated beneati the surface. Nothing se affects the character and beauty of a girl as ber tboughts. Guard your thoughts-thcy aré the die that stamps your ceuntenance. A girils life story lies written in her face. i shan close witb this poem, whicb I ask every girl reader of this page te place whcre sbeecan see it every day: \"'Would yen bave truc beauty, deart Watch your thoughts. If old age you~d neyer fear, Wtch yeur tboughts. For the face but shows the growing 0f the. seeds the mmnd is sowiug\u0026, Watch your thoughts. Would yen bave truc friendships, dear? Wateh your thoughts. Keep them ever pure, sincere; Wateh your thougbts. For the whole world seeks 'with longing For the mind witb good thoughits throng- ing Watch your tbougbts. Would yen know truc joy in living? WVateh your thouglîts. There's an art, that rare Iocn givink, Watch your thoughts. For a noble mind's a sun, (lear, Whicb will make life bright tîli donc, dear, Watchi your thougbts. urePURITY FLOUR xM \" \u0026\" n otter Brad. (Sec BarkCorei) h la the Mail Order usiness to Sa EADING notices have recejitly aerd in a number of local newsppfl a idd ledreaders to belie've t, ô .ar nly, E temporarily in the Mail Order Busiess These notices have appamet4yý, e. î t LLJout by sorne central ooncem wit:tt LeO*Q\u003c of injuring us; and as ,the ta à4mét k absolutely contrary to fact, ire e to adequately deal with' the- author and p of the falsehood. ~ ~ We have been thoioly e-r Mnsd axi4 now financially one of ý the strontmcôiig\u003c establishmnents in Western Canada$, and. we W' be doing a Mail Order Business for mmay yw8 l. to'corne. ' 7 At 'present our large staff of artiste arê -preparing our Fail anid Winter Catal\u003c\u003egue, will' be bigger, and better than any\u003e previ~a6Ï' issued and will bernailed at the usual time.. If you have not been receivig our oaa i the'past you should send us you namê= vt you think of it-better do it now. CHRISTIE GSN ~um WINNIPEG *A UU CANADA 'A 1 TU. %à Mccormick A FTR your labor and your timre, careful ié.ùd.- ing, and axEty have gone ito prep=rig your seed bed and tending your crop all es8on. long, you can't afford to go after tbhareswt any but the best machines. Buy a -cC-mui; e blader. For Western Canadian fields the MCannic'k biÏder is buit -with a floating elevator which bandies yawyiing quantities of grain with equal facility. A third pmker assists in the handling of gin that às very shbrt ,%\u003c mfha of undergrowth. T1he improved knotter hbu only two moving parts. The tope of the guards are almost level with the platformn canvas, Jeaving ne led5. where short grain might accumulate. For these and other reasons the Mecoenack binder is efficient in Western Canadian fields. Look for the samne high-çrade workmanship, the same famous 1 H C quality, in McCormick twine and in McCorînick- mowers. Make the Most of you crpe.Seo the mecCoick local agent for fuIl infration, or, write the aearet branch bousm At DANCII HOU\"E -kl",
         "7h WetMaI1o~-Mty What- the World is. Saying -Pau 1Wm e~u~ho.l il-pover te li, t the. Rua as too IN» OulavPMUr 'àî 1 t~t~ ta burglar vith Iq a zatu.g hot.-Vietoria Colo la toing t.etb. a -long var andahbard \u0026 ma t weRset is java bard aud M» Oiy WaY t.e but 0ou Tbe Oaàins lbave founid tht the. only ay t. M11àý olint.e hlorofSilm thel.-Pont ~b.t. tw Eriih Tuatioss t. Jlie em.. d dtheir duty r bavely!Y Tbat le ~4b tadus,.et the sec. Thiy wverBitish ailors. -'-I~...JournaL. t iat civilisation Cannot ADfori Gtviu»4kq unot afford to let Germany vin 04 w«.ar4Tbb in the. outntanding lesson of the. ?svui hast Auouag the.Nations IU.bout bas tan6d of blood and tbat the. only W\u0026 -1w t», ciYiised nations la to hunt it 4d.w-I. o detii-lew York Sun. Viat Elrgh VOusa re oing Th lsh** *aqw.boing domi, by Edinburgh \u003cSc-ot.) wuem~ébirauIug levators, and street cars sim dt*ubgmal.. Whole brigades of street a.q n e omposed of women--New York Tri- Quito go An te prolhbWing the. erport of arms, that Weien boiled down t6 ita boutes, means that the. United States would make Germany a present of au equivalent to the ffBnih fleet-Boston Berall Ne Csadmlom about (leuerai Joffre Gene Joffre's ambition after the. var l. to live ou \u0026 obanty boat vith Mme. Joffre and go fisiiing. ]le\"' la mie \"man on borseback\"' that the. republic x.04 n»t fsar.-Manebester Guardian. A Nation Gene Insane It le a terrible thing to consider that a nation mair \u0026o insane. But the evidence that Germany bas l)st ias moral sonne, its sens. of ethical values, its ability 6o judge between right snd wrong, is over- wbelming.--Toronte Globe. The Lusitania and Cawnpore Th e massacere at Cawnpore pales before that of the. passengers aud crew of the. Lusitana.Tite vie- time of the. former sufféred st the hanas of religions louatics; those of the. latter at the bande of expo- nents of Kulturé--liew York Worid. Prusuianinn.isu Cotng Canada Heavily Prussian militariem bas cost Canada more than it was ever worthi to Germany. It will cost Germaitv ytt ore than itfiV 011141 hve been wortii to her even if it hiad sucetl.od in spreading lier Kultur ail over The. Reign if Terror Eciipsed For veai-s Y-î'rîn- k\\ (hdered over the downing of a fem i ..oua:hiSouthenn France at the time of theliiL ci Tvi-rôr. Genenation', of eoutanapt were prepared for ;~nî~ by tbe eink- ing eofithe Luitania.-Montrei Frrl The, German nabllity te Tldnk aStalit It Wonder if any Gerusans bave yet metioualy aaked themselves the question, why. God ahould \"punis Engand?~DuIthHerO.ld Exutl.g ha tbe Luuitaula Atrocity Wlth joyful prîde w.eoeeaplate tii. latent deed of our uavy. The. sinking of the. Lusitania in a mm»es of moral sign$flaie--oue of the mratent achievements of the. naval war-Coogne Volke Zei- tung. The Demsatigg R\u0026vage of War Anl thie latin places in the. dstriet whoe the. «ret fight i. now progressing have been utterly destroye.msye a report fron tth. Northi of France. The. term battle-scarred Europe wil ho more sp- plieable than ever, viien this war in ended.-Ottawa Citizen. Tests Of Natiomal Character in Var Tiier are thre. associated tests of national charseter in a great war; a peoiple'. attitude towards ia enemies ithei1lid; 'its attitude towarda noneombatants in occupied territory, and its attitude towards prisoners of war.-London Dally New.. cowl On. A\"awr Posuible IPpooe that junt at the. moment atter th.e Lntel Priedricki ha4 bou lo Pthe William P. Fryo but hm*l Rot finihed it, an Anerican warship bad appeared on the. sene. What would the commander of the Amurlean vessel have been likely 6o do ? Pleanedon't trouble 6 oud the anaver. We know it.-Louinville (Kentucky) Courier-Journal. An Obvions Reply If the. Wilson administration mad ciomen 6o re- tort in kid 6to t. German communication about neutral sales of war munitions tehoiligerents it might have alluded tii.h fact that Gerinany bufit Up ia wonderful Krupp industry by selling war 2naterials to anybody that wanted 6o buy, in peso. or in war, wiieuever bc was preparod 6o pay--New York HerakLd For Ruman Preedom and Progreîà, W. -are fighting not to impose our «culture\" uspon any, but 6 ecure 6o every nation the. titi. 6o the. quiet onjoymouts of its own. W. holieve not only that the. vend i.n icher aud happier for vani- eties of culture, but that the. attempt 6o force on. nation against its wiil into alien habita of thougbt and life i.n ùproduct-ve of any result but misery and mutual hatred.-Toronto Mail sud Empire- Tii. Rejoicinga over the Lusitanla Crime Tii. murder of over on. hundred Amonican citi- zens by tbe warlik, under-water representatives of his Imperial Germanie Majesty, and the. reception of the, news of this outrage by the. German people, shows tiie inhenent racial traits of baniiarism wbich, until now, thanks toe echange professora, have been successfully submerged.- -New York Times. The. Fauît Reseswith the German Àeople A, prominent Amenican witer declares that the orld's present troubles are due te -an insane Hohenzollern.\" No doubt this je iiterally truc. But the German people caniiot be excused on the pies that tliey followed a mad monarch. It is a people's duty to have sane monarebe or none.-Peterboro Examiner. Germauy Luke a Besieged Fontresa Germany to-day is besieged like a fortresin former wars. The contrast between ber efllciency on the land and hier inefficiency on the water is sncb that Bismarck. if he could be beard, would utter a scatbing criticism of the War Lord. Germany's dreai of world empire is bafled siînply by bier ri- diculous disailitr at sen. None but a seafaring people can pretend to world power.-Halifax Hlerald. An Outpouring of Kuitur As we do nlot stop to arguie with a mad dog before wc batter 1dmi on the head, we noced waste 11o more precions iîîk ln the vain attempt at adding to the already firmnly inplanted conviction of our people that tbe Englîsh are animaIs in buman form. Wýe do net blame tiiem for being sucb xnonstros- \"ieq. but as we have no use for such devil-spa-w n w %ýe ltould reserve our energies until the great longed-for ,Iax dawne, when we can rid the earth of their .îteful presencc, 'nien blows wiil b. our argument.. .îrtlery fine our nîethods of Persuasion. and th,- ro..r of Krupp shelîs our conversation.-Franfrt (Germnfy) Zeitang. te iw, 24 1 eredity and the. Kaiser Ufl* vlvacity of My temperament, My well- fifled war chest, a favorable opportunity, and an ambition for glory,» were the reasons givon by Frederick the Great to Goethe, and by \"ethe re- eounted to Dean Milman, for the. war againat Marie Therese, of Hungary. No doubt, 'Wilhelm il gave equally convincing tessons to hie Chancellor in Augunt last for hi. attack on Belgium.-Vancouver Province. The. Customers of the. United States The, British empire purcbases over one half of the United States exporte. Last year for the eight months ended February, Great Britain snd ber over- seas dominions purchaned forty-five per cent of the, total American exporta; to-day they are purcbasing over fifty per cent. France cornes second as a pur- chaner of American goods, Itaiy third, Rolland fourth, Denmark flfth, and Cuba ith. Then cornes Spain, Germany, Japan and Norway. liast year Germany wan second to Great Britain as a purchaser of American gooda; now éh. is far down in the list, and for the. past two months has been ont of the market altogether.-Journal of Commerce. Canada'. Pride in Rer Brave Sons In our pride over thoir bearing in action we do mot dlaim fonr the. soldiers of Canada qualities greater than tii. troops of Britain, of Belgium, of France or of Rusai\u0026 posse.... But we are proud b.- cause they have brought honor to the Dominion and 6o the Empire and that thon. who have fallen, as Trevelyan said of the beroes of Cawnpore, \"bear in tbefr breatiith woundn that do flot shame\"- Toronto Ne'ws. A British Characteristlc Fortnnately we do not- feel it to be a neeessity to b. aiways boasting, as, the Germans do of our irresistible power and our inherent supericrity in the. material, moral and mental charscteristics which go to make up buman efficiency. We prefer, as a ruis, t6 dweil on our own shortcomings; and w. aceept with humility and submissîveness the. dem- castrations of our national an,£ personal unfitness which appear at short intervals in the. German preas and are faithfully reprodueed for the. welfare of their readers by the iiii newspapers. Thin, on the. whole, is good for our characters, and in any cane it produces an appearance of humility which may b. dangerously niisleading 6tiith enemy. Stili, .*e may now and again permit ourselves a littie1 lief from these penitentiai exercises.-London Satu1 Re.- view. Staunch and Truc Tiiere is no nobler chapter of the whole naval war than that wbich tells the deeds of the. men who clear the. seas about our islande for the. battie fleets and for the commerce of our country and the world. Theirs is non. of the. excitement and rapture of battie. In tiny craft, expoeed to ail the. inclemency of storrn and sea, they labor at their taek, bourly facing death in its most terrible form. Drawn for the moat part from the merchant service and the. fisbing fleet, they have displayed the same cool, in- vincible courage as our seamen of the Royal Navy. -Edinburgh Scotsman. Germany Self-revealed In the seventeenth century thie pirates of the Spanish Alain scuttIed the eaptured ship after aIl the passengers and crew had walked the. plank. Vhen camne the drunken orgy, for they were not cul- tured. In the eighteenth century the American In- dian scalped bis suffering victim and otherwise tortured hini. Then came the war dance, for they were not civilized. In the. twentieth century the Germans torpedo a nierchant vessel ou wbicb were livsterical woînen, helplesa children and heroic men, ail noncoinhatants, and a large number foreign to the governinents at war. Upon publication of this inhuman outrage in Dresden na haif hioliday ie or- d( ced ini honor of the occasion. Germiany cdaims both culture anud civil ization.-Boston Transcript. Germany and its Allies One of 1Punchi's cartoons depicte a battered and hedrag-gled Tiurk limping toward a German sentry. \"Wiîo goes there ?\" eliall\u003e'nges -tTe sentrv. The. an- swer, evidently f romn the bottom of the battered oîle' heart, is: \"A friend --curse vou!\" The sen- ti-viiian is one thaRt will becomie p'revalent tbrough Týi'ýe itbeome geeralyknown that David fnc1ii al 41in ilitary aid, has beeiî unsuccessful. Tivhre are îndiiCatitoîîs that in AuIistria-Hlungary also thu ~urmn callenges soon mav be met bv the sanie frïend-eturse responti.e. Au4isri:a-Hungarr ~ufffil'to iundolrstand that if sacrifices are t*o i e w 4ermailv exipects its allies ta make theni. ~pr n~1eld Rpublican.",
         "The W08ftrin 1Honte'- Monthly Thé War and After Wrjitten for The Western Home Monthly -by Wiliam Lutton Sone hundred years ago, the nurse gr truok terror mto lier re- ti fractory infant charge by crying: \"Bèiey is commng,\" s0 for generations, the hoeS cf tii, \"Lusitania\" will haunt the, 1. that witii the report of the. Cor»- Mnili (of whch Lord Bryee was the àaàsjman) appomited by the, Britishi gov- erenit ta mnvestigate the charge of brutalty brougit against the, German \u0026Minjits first mad rush on Paris. A report wiich, tiiough cahi ton., sïimed the. general mind with the. horrors il oould only hint at-horrors of wanton taac - afnamelees crimes committed s i l innoet women snd childreLL, rcligthe most flendish barbarities of ii, asiBazouk-and the. general con- coaesu ofmnkd wil, for generation feithe aeseOf horror, oppression and Tii, dread of tuis war is, not that men are being kiied evety minute day and nigit that thouisands fail mn the protracte trench flgitinig. Tii, dread la tint the. spiritual 80fl50 of the race may become o±ropbied. of. pledged honor; above ail, for the, free exp ression of tiie human soul. These are noblh things ta flgiit for. Many had iioped' tiey would b. realised to the. full by the, graduai evolution of milder man»- ners, and nobler thoughta, by the. doser intercourse of separated peoples, td11;MM, fusion of culture and educationm in forgrcussel tih * * . an u nationl i e hes ual in -an, whicii differentiates m from. lower forma, bas been assailed by a: brutal power, whicii denies every graciaus an- quirement or sanction in theii,1fe, and insista that the. only appe. is t. force which is t. b. exercised witii wiatever \"frigiitfulness\" ta the, aceomplsiment of thesudin iewwhih l tie universal triumph of an abihorrent materialism,' of whicii German militarism ati i tincarna- tion. It is moaery t. teach the. Decalogue. Civilisation is expressed i moral values; and tiiese have been asat in the. gutter. Tiie graciaus restrainta of 1f, are gon,. Tiie relations and usages which were sanctioned b y exanipe and time, are trampled under foot. The sacreduess of to- tihe scream of the sheUl wil succeed t] studie4 aqou\"iofaidiplomacy. What kIdd-o a world wiil bec onfrontf when the. w ai over? Non-combatai populations saw the wreckage of the civ laatonwbich bas been evolved with ii finit. pong .and suffering. They witne the dethroing of ÇWxd and the puttingj wH plae aprud ana imperious huma who omne Divine worship after t) model Of the. ROMAU EinM os Miflio of people wiio believed It in an age1 general ,elightenment it would b. hm posible for the. great Christian nations1 go0 tÔ war, fpebd themselves, ail unco àciously but s~ influencedbyb tl ~asuo i been aose y count, were trampLed in the dirt; and ti a new god had been enthroned-tii. god1 force-ckruel and remorsèless as the gra as the, Frenchi Revolutionsta enthroned prostitute. on the, altars of Notre Damene Paris. Unless the. chaosnaietth, Prime is1 corn aginsociety muet resus. lthe c herc alt ei war. The. world wil 1 reborn. What wiil b. its inheritanci The. frightful memories of thé0 past- memories which wil live inu uiavall r id in dumib reuiguatioii, mi passia ZEac ountry wiU hbave îl e ota which wil b. put luto the. moutlu ofai he ;ed vi- in- m jie ma ab F 1NE FU ha E? M~,. tb kat Of be At*raln d %e? Ord.r am mw bS Md-spam AioSîw How a German Submaine sighted and sunk the \"Lusitmnia The dagram shows the interior of the lateet tyPe of aubmarine nnw empleynd by' the Genman navy againstthe b. bpping of the ailh., and probably tb. trzi which sunk the Cunarder. The periscope je seen protruîding above the surfasce, and in the tower offioers are getting the exract location of the intended vieltas. ielOW, the crew in seen preparins torpedaem for the tube. b be launched sa soon athe range of the big liner ham beau obtained. la 1he background ta ii riglil in seen th ill-fated \"Lusitania\" The martal fear la that moral values may loe their saving significance. The tragedy is tint the. laborious culture of the spiritual during tie pant centuries, sud whici so savingly redeemed tie fluer elements of the race, may be wielmed by tie onrush of barbarism an the Huns whelmed the culture a»d grace ai the, Roman Empire. Tiie inner meaning of the. war is spirit- ual. The allies are flghting for the. fine sud noble tings of the. spirit, against a power which expresses ý a ferociolis materialism wiichi i would force upon mankind. The. fundamental reasons for this titanic confliet, which appals tie world la- day, go deep down inta the texture of lhe opposing nations. Germany is figiting for conquct; for the lust of the dominion for the predominancy whici would give her the hegamony of Europe. Infected with the vicious teaciing of ier leaders, ah. is inspired with the. conviction tiat she haq a Divine mission to fulfil, wiicii is ta enigraft German e'Kultur\" upon man- kind by the murderous processes (if nced be), wýhieh were employed with respect 10 the ''Lusitania. \" T]w allies are in the war for the trial of ! n1wf liberty over a hateful and grind- Illu vranny, which would mould the gen- ei 'l Ef of the world after a singlepatter». Thoy ire fighting for the right of every rnan tri live bis own 111. sud think hus own thcvihts in his own way; for the, inde- p'.:,-ee of small statea; for the sacredness Hif. bas beu ciiespened t. the. point of wiiolesale sud uuconsidered kifling. Tiie human relations wiic made society pas- sible have been disrupted by the, power wii sent the babies to the, bottomn of the, Atlantic. Thia la the.tremendous thig-tiiat al the. higi sanctions of 1fe are trampled under 1 foot. The beatitudes have become a mockery: Millons of young people, the, world over are nursig the. seeds of hate in their innocent breasts, whici siould be the. home of ail things fair and graciaus sud lovely. Tii. world ai decent rela- tions, of iiappy intercourse af regularity sud usage, is gone-tumble over mto thse abyss. The things whicii gave us security and freedor» sud happiness are no more. Ail tiiat the. race han worked for in ils struggle upward, with its face to the stars, is lest sud a bestial power annaunces the, new gospel of force sud ravishunt sud rapine and bloodshed. Tis f what haunts the. mind-what wi11 become of organized society? Tii. war must end, at long last. Peace wilt supervene. Haif a dozen men will sit round a table-wiii htiiey coulil have sat round before the war, witii restraining effct-n-nd arrange tie ternis cf pence. What tiiese wiil be no man can divine. Napoleon said that God was9 on the side of the biggest battalion; and th.eCerman machine is Sa powerful thnt it will need every fighting man in tii. empire ta crusi il; but the. cannon will cesse ta boom; ehildre, who wM gow up to fel al the hatred whichi lal the more implacable because it la ucooisidered and instinctive, as the, fruit of early training andicul- cation. Tiie moral, mental, and spiritual retrogression wiil b. appalling. What moral forces will remai sf- flciently loi ty sud commanding Wo recon- struet the, world ? For nothig leu. than this in the problemn whicii will face society-the rebuilding of the, fabrie af the planet wiiicii ias been reeling in a ferocious topsy-turveydom. W. have seen that the, belligerenta laugiied t. scoru lie appeals of the, moral forces whicii, in the, iour of need, confessed a painfu ipoec. Wiil tbes, forces, at tii. end ai tii. war, have been strengtii- ened or will they have confessed the, new aud hideous doctrine that lier, is only one vital tiiing in the. world-and tint la force. Tii, vista opened Up bewilders the, mmd. Ca» the, other nations of the world, for instance, hold intercourse witii Germans afler the. war, and engage i trade and commerce? Ta tiiere not that dark and sullen tream of blood makcing an im- passable ciiasm between the world of justice and pity and love and thnt powcr wiiich han divorced iteif fror» the. ii- lowaiiip ai civilized men? Wiiat wiil the. achool books teach? And tiiink of this fearful tiing-that our tender children, who siiould b. taugiit the. goepel of gentienessud love, will learn, evdsi at the, breaat, tint they have been brougiiî lt. a world in whicii violence may b. ex- peoted arn a lwnralexpeoSc; that pu sud justic and mecy snd .quity; m to b. deopised; that the thln t10 ii*«%- 5lûpped là force. Audif tboïn ouldbe anthrauhcatsclyom as Ut ti, which weane pm4sit inth nation. Comider ail that and wonde what the 1fe of the, next twenty-.flve yem rs ito be Mercifully, tii». ausaff b!tter fweg; and though the appalln da à nbY the, Germans will long lhsyet itii upward history of the race il M'a ii.viii. aotment that the eprnOe hould b. chequered; and that tidrkpm hok fade before the stronger hlm s.cft life ait inlived from daytoday. 1100h afflualgei»eit cudnot b;\"a.u het. torture of memory wouldb. itàlmble. but we need not doubt tbt tli.;;0Im world-ttruggle Mwini many ways, pv- manently affect human cbarsae fr gcfler\u0026t.iofs. Carry your bead s0 that you can look everyone In the. face. Brntbe plenty of air. Drink cold water. These are natures mediclnea. .r A -- - - - - - - - -",
         "Th. Western Home. Mont hiy The. Young Man and His . Problem *OVIAG~ lttbam U*is i»On, villalittie native %_ob PareW,, -uuiémd a i baffaire of 6,êhets witk . Muagistlent -aoempbih tabsèn in h\" lia lsosie m t h. 0,QMPoule t tof Iheir.disposition, WU~%Uuppetatlae lafao. cf ail diffi- ~ limitations, 0thetr e.ly on- àwelaus rocognizo t~s~yp*ve 01mand that thon. i~ vooom~g Tin re th men who ~. *ibp uê~wiom~in labusiness nmre .\"*k u.\u0026 aboolseer of Augsburg ýby the ýjhe liemfortune là be 1~.oUm-$#biit enabled hlm te rie dns dte pro- la\u003cu~ -anlise ns a respectable =,pZet un.him. Hie à ouns and these were 'uu.AB mm0Eas h. aoquired a new ~ ~tiusa7 of esela book ver ed te hiia enableal bam té ix its Ni h \u0026 heoli . as able te necognize any e~fla uesow~nover filed him with regard ~ ~ e t ofhi. hop.mHaehonesty, bis takgluwldge'ef books won for him a lit Eglolat)he power of au unbending will à'iu''Srne eeyhu for greater ~aua l Ihfroua yru every cant and show yourself .A~a.uotng ili ýyour pui.pose 'drant, led by the POLITENES ~ Onaentay nTnedte make light of are âknowx aS 'the feminine vintues. Among is ii ilnueofPOlitenese. Yet every one ktw*s fro*l-enpenienoe th.t thon. la ne virtue which eqàssuda' a onerespect Or vhioh la more essential fP eommrcial suMensa. The mnan who je reasonable sd \u003e1t,-n. matter-how decided hi. opinions may lie o M - Y gfeia ubJec, vffl advsnco them with ýuavltY andlmodéaty, -and h viewil aise blisten with pt*t,$Otbnal defèrence to those of the pensonsa'who àa~p~nstO -diuset frein hhl.If lhe objeet of 44en . o Cos le eavines other of the corectnese of laisopInons ilschanes ie h.ten-fold greater ln iri -a' the-n b ns. ouecurteous methode of bluff «OI'INY MMad Lay Montagne, \u0026\"coste notbing 1 I~ uys everythlng.\" Hors -wo have the financial valus of, politonesa le, a nioety. If one le net polite té hils oustomers.they yull go te one more sensible ti*rade vio\". là polit.. One woubd rather pay an Inlaeedipios e Wau:ttentivo dealer than buy et a low prie.nfrum -A.ealer ho la discourtcous, .Thrée or four nulea eveny business man should fauUor: ý Bî plit. e lustomres; be polite tb em- ploeea; h. plit. e tanigers; be polite even to CLERKSHIPS Tberéo are many .young people who cannt under- st.pd..,y their. services are not more fuliy appre- cist\u00261 dby*their emiployens. Perbaps bhey wilI under- sitààid;wâybv i f they read over the ules set down* y.. oesof '1h.: eiding business mon of tbe I. Bs accurats. - Do not keep the head of a aepantmnent atyour ebbow bo check up your womk. 2. e honsat. Do not exaggerate non inak-e promises a atcannot h. fulfflled. *. - 3. Be reUlei. Do not corne labo and do not beave any of your. dubies unfinished. 4. Be faitiu. Do not scemp your work and do nedt né~iiet lb whèn ftbe supervisor is absent. \u0026. Be polit.. Cultivate a refined manner, a pleasant voie, an even *temper. It might net ho out of place bu bey down for employers a few ules: 1. Be honeat. Do net cheat your clenke nor expect lem to cheat for you. 2. Be polite. Treet bbc meaneet ofilce boy as if hoie ere a king. 3. Be generous. Pay a little more blian tbe average salary and alwavs bc sure bu add a little ini bbc fori of a gratuity. 4. Be reasonable. Do iiot overwerk and do not scold. The best is not obtained froni. people by scobding. .15. Be sympathetic. A kind word le often more then money te even the most needy. Kindness le 1h.efinit chanacteistic of a gentleman. 84 f.1 I J ~, SELF-CULTURIZ A man reýeives very littie of his education at school. ie attaisment deead upon hie own exortion, after ho beaves sehooLI The best the sehool ean do in to givo an impetus tpwarda satudy and te show tho way. A man who depends upon hie own ingenuity will get aIong evon if ho ha\u0026 very Iittlo schoolinq snd very litte equiprnent. Bonjarnin West, tho artiet, made hie fret brushoa out of the haire frorn hia cat's tail. Franklin got his firet electricity frorn the clouds by means of a kite mado with two 'cross sticks and a silk handkerchief. tIICI i By John Vance Cheney I Toli the slow bell, i Toli the low bell, Toli, toli, Make dole 1 For thern that wrought so well, Corne, corne, With muffiled drurn And wailing bmr a' 0f dolorous horn i Tho solerna measure slow I Toil and beat and blow; - Put out ail glories that adora- !i The sweet, unheeding mr.nI Corne, corne; To tho rnmuffied drum I And the nad home :Bring flowers for thern that took the 3 thoras. a KneIl, knell, lot the slow bell I Be struck with tho troubled drum; f i Corne,corne, I The solemu measure slow 1 Toil and beat and blow; i For thern our beauty and our miglit nu Gone on the unreturning way, For thern that took tho night - 93 That we might have the day. I Harki voices, joyous voices break n *E F r o rnt hoeg relen martyr-mounde; nu \"Wake, wake!\" The Lord our God, once more he saith, This hand made al-it made not death. n Let the blithe belle ring,=M The May air ing; n f- Strike the quick drun, n ii Smite sorrow dumb; E Blow the glad born, n - This glad May moru; Lift the valiant measures bigh 0f the proud earth and sky For thern that tentE iM Beyond the firmament, And on the field of light StiR gather to the fight. ' Blow the glad horn, This glad May morn; Stauncb, undaunted measures blow, Gathering courage as they go,- Valant measures high, Caroljled of earth and sky; SeJ\"$he bright, triumphal stave For them that fought no well, That faltered not nor feil; -- For them and ail whereso yon colors Ivave, Unto the four winds given And the proud earth and heaven. There believe and battie they Whose face is toward the day, The ever-living light, Where is no night, Where is no death nor shadow of the grave\" Newton, with a prism, a lens and a sheet of card- board explained the composition of light and the origin of colors. Watt made bis first model of the seama engine from an old syringe. Rettenhousrcal- culated eclipses on hie plow handie. Sir tav'id Wiikie, the artist, having no pencil and canvas, uqed a burnt stick and the barn door. AUl these men hadI wil. A poor boy Nvho bhad Ilever been to secool andi whvlo becanie a great scbolar, explained it bv saving: «'AIl a man requires in order to learu anything is to know the letters of the alphabet.\" ý The man who wishies to cultivate bis powers will inake use of aIl bis spare moments. Ferguson learned aetronomy while watching hie shoep on the bille; Drew learned hie philosophy while cobbling sboes; Miller taugcht bimsecf geology while workixig as a day-laborer in the quarry. TENIPIRANCE A man to succeed requires to lbave liquor alone. This neede no, dernonstration. Recent experirnents have proven over sud oer agamn that even a moder.. ate amount of stimulant injures a man's capaeity for work. Even when a man feels himself brighter and better as the resuit of taking a drink, ho je not, doing botter. Intemperaeosonda annually te prison on tbis continent hundreds of thousands of people; it, re.- duces 250,000 children to a stato worso than ,orphan- age; it sonda 75,000 annually to drunkarda' graves, it senda hundreds of thousands te poor houses,- and lb carnies untold misery' to two -million. poo.pb-mïoet of thern voren sud children. Intemperance ie the mother. of crime. The fifty million dollars spent each year, on prisons ins chieffy due. b the amount spenit on spiritlous liquors. From, a business mian's point of view, intem- perance le ene of the greateet evile, for it not cdly stands in the way of economy, but je a hindrance to the practice of ail -the other virtues that are esseii- tliai-,,to- euccess,* such as industry, perseverance, pria- dence sund.good 'judgmenb. A:. business house lin one of ýour growing cities some ýyears eg6 went to pieces. 'WLen asked how it 04*eurv§ça \"the manager said: \"A'glass of wine didi it:\"1 The house did a large business. It employed, albolf-g'othe*rs, a young, mân of talent and e.martneose. Howt k~ ent out to 'colleet funde, was very succees- fui ai 'at the close, of - his'tour found himself with adla*rge-saum of'ntoney in a southern city. Ho tele- gra-phed, home 1 is« succese and announced that ho woùld: retura home on Mondey. On Sunday he made the acquaintence of some strangers who after sorne general *conversation invited him bu take a glass of winé. Ho knew nothing more tubl Monday. His money, wabch sud jeweimy weme gene and ho found himself bankrupt and pennilese. Ho telegraphed hie bouse. The news came et a financial criais and the firm was ruiued. HIC HEARD A VOICE Destiny is speaking. The voice of Go# je heard in the wind, ln the water, in the forent, in the jungle, in the* city and ln the street. The m]an who can liear that voice le a chibd of destiny. An American preacher remarks: \"Out in a Denver court, four yeers ago, a judge pmonounced sentence on a 12-year- old boy for'stealing. He committed him to jail. From the boy's mother, who was a spectator, there buret a heart-piercing cry. That cry went to the heart of the judge, and then ho asked himself if tbis sentence was beet for the boy. Would it be well to send that boy to jail to be a companion of hamdened criminels? The question answered itseof. The sen- tence was revoked. Frmr that day Vo this, Judge Lindsey bas been asking, not bow to punish boys, but how to save them. He is a friend and helper of boys, and it. ie as such thet multitudes of boys go bo him ather than as a judge.\" TWO CLASSES «God divides men into two classes, Spiritualiste and Sensualiste. Body men and Spirit men. Let the body master the soul-and you have a sinner. Lot the soul master the body-and you have a saint. Paul affirmed, 'l keep the body under.' He restricted his body and fed hie soul. ThoLe were sad words of Darwin: 'For yoars I have not been able te endure a lino of poetry.' A famished saint was he, but a splendid soul with ail.\" AIX HIGH Aim bigh. B3e noble in vour aspiration. Be in- tense in your ambition. Believe in your vision. Fondle your dreain. Exorcise the faith which would attempt the impossible. Boliove that ail things are possible for you. Remember tbat there je elways roorn et the top. Be satisfied with nothing less than the supreme place in your profession. \"Such was the motive which animated the American orator and senator, J.ý C. Caîhoun. When at Yale College on being ridiculed for his passionate devobion to hie studies, ho, replied 'Why, sir, 1 arn foreed te niake bhe most of my timo that 1 may acquit myseif creditably when in Congress.' And when this saying '%vas greeted with a langh, lhe added, 'Do you doubt it? 1 assutre you, if I were not convinced of my ability to reachi the national capital as a epresen- tative witbin the next tliree years 1 would ]eave colleg-e this very day.\"' You are inover defeated until vour spirit is broken. So long as you bave couraige, enthunsiasm, spirit and determination voit are tde master of yo0ur coul and stand a fair chance of w-inning in the conflict of life. Fortify your souil. Lcghe or il Garrison your spirit. Rein ini your emnotions. Inside victoriee prepere the beart for outeide 'conquests.",
         "The *Wâatern Home MoPdnthly, Catloue Ho.... a Neoessity The growing demanda of the public for grester chôie snd a wider range of gtyles bave brought catalogue bouses into existence. Througb the medium of their cata- logues the dwellers of the amaller towns wid villages and likewise those Who live inthe rural districts, 8o fer as selectioe, Meaice and -velues are concereed, eejoy *»!-the« . dvantages of shopping ini the lner cities. ~he Mail Order business bas assumed sen ormns proportions that the es- tablishment of purely Mail Order bouses bas. become a necessity-bouses that de. vote thefr nndivided attention to the neede and cere cf out-of-town customers. It was this consideration that prompt. ea Christie Grant. Limited to estabhish e ,ueyCatalogue bouse, and its rapid 1 roV th, since its orgauization is proof M~itv that it is a publie convenience jo the degree of being au absolute neces- Lcapital 'bas been very substantially inemsed, no that it in now flnancially one of the strongest merchandizing con- cerns operating in Western *Canada. SIts close connection with Stoberte Limited places àe in a peculiarly fortu- mate position in the matter cf b ig gooda and in the securing of merchan- aize to 1il orders Teceived by mail Chrstie Grant Iàmited.' enjoya te, the *Met extent \u0026Il the ladvanteges cf the vide connetion i the leading markets Construction Caip nur Dean Creek, D., It may intaniot aur neadir. te know that evary imac employ.ed in th\" camp in a siusdber to lte Western Home Montbly. of the world built up by Stobarta Limited during their forty yeare of tred- ing in Western Canada. Cristie fGrant ILimited ba\u0026 aise the abundaetly stoeked wbolesale warehouse of Stobarts Limited -to draw upon et euy time that any catalogued line may he temporarily out'of stock. These two advaeteges mean better value and hetter service, better value on account of better purchasing facilities, btter service on account of e wealth of Merebandise being always available. -At the preseet turne Christie Grant Limited has its large staff of artiste busily engaged in the preparation of its Faîl and Winter catalogue. Thtis cata- logue will be larger and better than any of its predecessors, and will ho readly ffor mailing at the usuel time. Some of the Spring snd Summer cata- logues reniain for those who write for themn. Why Should 1 WorryP If we could have anticipated our rom- ing into this world no dream of irorror Coll ever have seemed so dreadful. If we could have stood and said: \"I ai ging into that strange world the 111()-,t lelpless thing in it. 0f course, 1 shlah know nobody, and, of course, nao 101W wilI know me. I shall not be able to iuxferstand their language anid I shall 11()t Lave the sense to know my own W.iim nuch less to tell them ta any 1se. I shall ho so littie that, of n~,fo one waili care for me; I shall i1 everybodv's way and.quite unable t tout of it.\" Oh, the agony of it, rtul loneliness! The angels sunelv L!rdthe first tirne they saw a ente', the teeeber'e snd the boy's. When these three are equally fait and acted upon we shall have the perfect system of education. Meentime, the thing that cornes nearest to it ie such a private school as one occesionally ieds. I know that private schools are not possible for every cne, nor even for many as com- pared with the vast throng of our popu- lation, but those who cen command this tsystem for their children are wise to, do so, even at considerable sacrifice, pro- vided they cen commnand it at its best. I do not enter largely upon the suhject of publie schools because it er entered lergely into my speciai proli- lem-but I have studied the inatter enough te hold a decided opinion. Publie schools were creqted to rneet a neces- sity, or, rether, were evolved frorn the necessity itself, and, ini its way, there in nothing finer, as yet, than the school svetem of this country. Doubtiese it wýil continue te improve upon itseif, as it lias improved upon what went before it, but when ail is said in its praise that cen be said there still romains, and al- ways will romain, the fact that chtîdren were nover intended to ho brouglit up \"in platoons'\" It la a substitute mothod -as orphan asylums and Sunday- schools, and day nurseries are substitute methods-better than enything which the rnajority of childnen would bave otherwiso, but only e distant appnoach to what they are meent to have, ought te have, and whet they wililhanve when the law of evolution has worked its way with us a while longer. Our most succossful'men in Americs to-day are those who neyer lift a wine glass to thoir lips.-Edward Bok, jourtialiat. OLASSIFIED PAGE FOR THE PEOPLEISWANTS, If you vant to buy or selU anything in the Hlue of Poultry, farm Propertlr Machiery or if you want Help or Emaploymeet mbmhe tt th i.Cau= alvertisement columna of The Western Home lontl r tlay to help you accomplieh your objct., Coat Uc word, minium àz wlth order. POIJLTRY AND EGGS FOR SALE lion CLAUS ROSE COMB RODE ISLAND REDS-Egga fromn beanties, $2.00 per 15. Jobsj Duff, Mekiwin, Man. 6 HATCH Rhode Island Reds for winter layera. Settinga $3.00. W. JA. Chant, High Park Avenue, Toronto. 6 PRIZe-WINNING W H I T E R 0 C XS- Eggs $2.00 per 15. Reduction on larger ordora. A. Gayton, Manitou, Man. 6 .EXPRESS PAID - Brred Rocks, layieg strain. Egea $2.00 per aettiuig, elivered fric. BealmosscaiFema, Hfford, a thewan. 8 baby, and wondered that God dared make anything s0 awful lui its help. lesesa. No terror that ever came into a man's eiind in thought of going out of this world would have compare\u0026 with that terror of coming into it. And Io! we ceme-and a mother's love bent over us. Oh, the marvelous aed perfect ministryl Little-and yet becauso littie, so unutterably dear. Weak-yes, omnipotently weak. Waited upon day and night with a service un- wearied, a service that found i¶ýs heaven ini is ministry. The power that made a mother in the power that I cen trust for' ever and ever. à mother ls the \"Fear not\" of nature to our hearta.' Now may we think of our gracious Ood speaking to us: «'Come, let us ressort together, my child. There was i-time 'when thou wert ail want, and ie that time didet thou lack anything? Was not every went antieipated and perfectly supplied? Aned the love that fashioned the mother for thee at -the beginning of thy if e la the love that stili holds thee dear, carieg as surely and sacredly for the wants of manhood snd of old age as for the wants of the littie child.\", School and Home The distinguishing feature of school life snd influence in the feet that ini its goverement and conduct are involveci three several responsibilitiesî the par- PARTRIDOE ROCKS-Partridge Wyse- dottes, White Orpinetons, White Langshins, White Rocks, BuE RYocks, Black Mînorcas. gggrand pens, three dollars fifteen. Frank PWe, Guelph, Ont. 7 BABY CHICES, DUCKLINOS and ha tch-, Ing eggs; poultry and fruits form paylnt combination. Strawberry planta, 100 0 cents' 1,000, $5; currants, 10 cents -goopqelîu cents; raapberriea, 5 conta; rAubarb, 10 cents. Pruit trees, perennialilowors, r\"'~ dahlias, pansies, etc. Carniage repaid. Catalogu frite. Chas. Provan, Lagley Fort, ner Vàan couver, B.C. 1 REGAL WHITE WYANDOTTPS-Amer- ica's fineat, champions et New York Stat l'air for ten yeara; 100 fine vigarous, well matured cockereI,ý $2, $3 ced $5 iaeh; bens and pulleta $2 an $3 ec;:efgafor btba from record lavlng, prizse nning 901$! and$3 gnIy ud ce im er:for 1er Whie ï«Izote ook tl t l bout WhMe 'Wyandottes, catalogue and matinrst fete. John S. Metin, Box 146 R, Port Dover, ent. 8 FOR SALE BILLIARD TABLES-For \"faran homes, portable and stationary. The gaini of kings. ~5000 tip, easy terme. J. D. Clark Bi1lprd Winpeg. PONY OUTFIT-Single or double. Empire cream separator. No 35, 3 seated Democrat platform gear, capacity 3,000 lbo. Real bargains. Frank E. Hatch, 443 Greenwood Place, Winnipeg, Man. 6 BABY'S LONG CLOTHES SBTS-50 dainty article.s$5.50 canniage praid nture mail. Lovely robles, day and rig, t gowna, flannels, etc., fineat materials.- E9verytbing necesaary for instant use. Lista frite. Mns. Franka, 175 Alfred St., Nottingham, England. 9 BUSINESS CHANCES BARGAINS! BAROAINSI-Send for free magazine, 1,200 bargains. Farm lands, huai. ness chances, any kind anywhere. Ourn service free to buyers. Western Sales Agency Minneapolis, Min. y CASH-If you want to seli your real estate or business or other property, any kind any- where quickly for cash write us. We brnn buyers and sellera together regardless .1 distance. Buyers located free. Established 1893. Northwesýrn Business Agency, Minneapolis, Minn. 6 FREZ FOR SIX MONTHS-My special offer ta introduce miy magazine \"Investing for profit.\", It is worth $10 a copy toa nyone wîho bas bieen getting poorer while thé' icb, icher. It demonstrates the Real erniiatg power of moncy, andI shows. how. anyone, no Inatter how paon. can acquine iches. In- vestin g for Profit is the only pnogr'essive financial journal puhlished. It shows. how $100 grwa ta $2,200. Write now and l'Il \u0026end i t six months frae. H. L. Barber, 471 28 W. Jackson Blvd., Chicago. lô PAT1ENrS;AND LEGAIL. PECTHERSTQNBAUOH a Co., Paten Solicitors The old eatablished-firm. R=e Office Royal Bank Buildiug,.Troto- il S Elgin., St., Ottainaand ot\u003ee'piacPitiF *ELP W4NTED WANTED-Reliable prdi, to do Iu~ Knittng for unat honme. $7 to $10 ewl easily earned. Wool, fu n1sef* m tàceno blndrapme ~tH1eâum addp ~ The Canadien WholuaeW D tibutyt Co., Ol S, Ont. WANTED-To bien fdotwe WANtD--To boa'ron w~ far= fo len. Sed desertioa re ti O.0O..Iatq,6AnuaB\u003c,JIUg Mian. PARUS WANTND -IWa dr Maces.*oodm WANTEldist-dSelor ea e to r et v9kltiag fre. g arslat Pelle, Cinada. D-Ç SON O7 ATDfrpbIeIa Dept. t7 WehlgoDC Ave.,Winue., Pirie osteonru BROADENAXU 5JE\u0026 1Om Owows bain like niagie.Wl n*d',h* nounishas the çolor glands to. %q~slu Directions'for arma on-Jer. 1al or4t. s $1.0, ost\u003ead. Bnoadanaxcer o!, nncù oer..ipeg. (Mm m.M 4806 Establishad 9 years WHITE WYANDOTTES-Stoclc or es, piewinners, hardy and 'rs heavy Ont.gn EGGS-Prom record cgg.producin g stockc. White WaeotsSigCob ieLg PAXENRAKS SILVER CAMPIN»B wo et Ontario Winter Pair (Canada'a gf«ut show). Eggs et reasonable prices, Write for circular. W. . Pakenhain, Box 10 Norwood, Ontario. BABY CHICKS-Prout .Guild's famoui laying strain of Barred Rolcg s, record 20.% lay wben five months old. Cicka 20c. each. *1.50 per IS. Clinton Poultry *Yarda L~on, Ont. THE LA13, oYOorpeper wmll\"tf 7« w my~ae Seuid hi your renewal NOW",
         "*1 ~ put1s.nontb vas fought !etenth.of June, the t ofl hich vas a emali affair, ,-Mwaàïed and the d tù. round atuly but $Mt iits offset upon iz oiing of ,fIutsy. on a YY\"dy4\" The batis *as es~~ Uéndy4arenysen uinage in iinoble ~ ti. 4~th ïhe u=eof Wellington: 4,st~zt butDq i'~ron c«owf l~mIs*hIioktu spollsr deun. a, a.odr gt un there hearts comM do,. o nd ake, Waterloo.\" Wat.ioovârfoget in- an- ari decidefly lees than b:~r-*Itbrthîiînta -the city of Win- etp~. Vliatn'svlctory vasaâa victory of pi i*n van'il-po*er.- It I. one of the most îuboý,,dpvopienfa .. M\" -ail hstory -titat -the. ~ln*hrfort-fisyears ines Sedan, have be- ~adg~sly esoutopeole,ow brothers to the ~-~WtIsbr~d7Tiéyh!egven auper-poof *U hiti.ometw var. a tii.day B ot far 0~1$Wii. th' Wtero f tie var viii eome, -à-UsAilme 'hako dowîi the. spoiler -whose atro- 4ItiS 'nlanand -on ua ihave* made new pages in àab i eriis ca veri ss ot of huma» memory -ti.ho gia atrocities p oIsonod Wells, poibonous aon -the. b\u0026tettld inesdiuy bombe rained from oyon nproteeted villags.and towus, the mur- I11of non-éombatant men and women and chil- diei uI ea wl lithe othor savageries and banbari- .. sof homiidal mania againet whieh the. Allies are £efhbing ivilisao. -= m ýï'à . .BI4NAA»TEWAVES ..ýTais orovf aG*ihan'mbmane enquired of the trewwgi.a sinkinit British uhip, \"Do.. Britannia rule the *avem n Ow? They munderstood the import iii tfi. anthem , \"ule, Jiritannia,» and, indeed, mis- quotsd . a.li4,e of lt. In the poemi the guardian angesaWho I'sang tuis str\"i,»say: * \"Lais, ritannia. Britannia, iule the wave\u0026 Enitons neYer, nover, neyer wiil b. slaves.\" The. misquotaion made, by the. erew of the. Germau ubmaa'lns sets forth a boaet, which ia not voiced in tbo * \"neR, ipstead of tho inspiring -iiortation of the. gurdlan angela of Britannia, that so long as Britannia makes it ber poliey to hoid eommand of theo sea, sho viii never fail beneatii the tyrant's yoke. Tht Britmnnia dose hold command of the vi)Ves le po- ad bythti act t.hat German shipping boa. long ainero. sbeen swept f rom every one of the 555 es, amd'that the; German submarines have nover sueeeeded lu getting near a transport carrying Nrtitli- troope to the cotinent. If passenger v..- sels anid merehaut vesselu hal not pref.rred to take their chanee\", ipstead of inoving in ami out of the Brtish home .vaterp in flotillas eonvoyed by de- stroyers, the. Gèrma» submarines would not have been ablo to perptrate the. atrocities wbich ii ii be à staïft on -the Germa» namne as long as human mnt- ory remains. OUR SEADOWS Tt lananoid folk tale, vitii a deop menning in it, vhich telle of the. man viio sold te tthe devil bis shadôv. That, h. thought, h. couid easily spare; * there vas notbing else he had vhich vas se utterly * useless te hlm.- But ho suo»found tint viion bis shadov vas gene, a bond of symptby betveen hi. felov me» and himacif vas gone aise. Men feared him and vomen lied f rom hum. Tii. sunshine that fM11 viere hi. »hadow ougit ,te have b..» divided * hlm front ailthe. reat of mankind. Hoe learnnd that a-man's shadev la that outvard manifestation of himsif vhicii shows that h. bas been touched, like o4thers, b\"- the'iigt cf heaven. Just as pain in tii. body'!i; the stn'ickeni nerve's appeal te tthe beart and .baip.for. help, se grief in. the anme sort of natural *ppeal Wo our spiritual -fonces in» time of distress. The» huma» mind cannot comprehend perfection ex- eept througli imperfection. W. couid net knov 4 appn~ but for grief. Thon. are philosophies, cae.edpreligio n, vh'ich m.y b. summarized i» the, ene ~phriue, \"Do nt grieve.\" That injunction i. the. quintessence of seh-centred stagnation. If one bas no griefs of one's own, thon. are ethers' griefs in abundance te b. shared. And the shning of others' griefs is practical religion. Do net gri-ve, unies. voit mut-but . iince you must grieve, remember tha t there is good even in grieving. Alas for on, vho is too- blind to sec that there is fan more than grief in grieving. * * THE BRYCE COMMISSION'S REPORT The. report of the Tritish Commission upon the Belgian Atrocities. of? wlîih Visconnt Bryce, long tihe British Am6Îassador, at Washingtuon, i. chairmaîî, sets forth unansverably and couviningiy the. proof s that 'the horrible iflood o? German murder, rape and arme» in Belgium vas deliberatoiy pianned, gjthor- lid and dirscted by the. German Govennment, vhich 'hewestern HOMe monthly: ThePhilosopher deiiberatcl odeed its generaisa an soldions to do the thigs' ti.did, i order to destroy the nerve and spiryit of the Beigian people, and to mako the French and British and ail otiier peoples quail before Germa» military might. It vas the deliberate car- rying into. operation of the Germa» poiicy of Schrecklicbkeit, or Terribieness. If anyviiere i the world there wau doubt in regard to, the Germa» atrocities in Beigium, that doubt sank vith the. Lu- sitania. Now the report of the. British Commission sets forth the. positive evidence. \"For ail *wio knov Viecount Bryce,\" says the New York Tribune, \"and no European* lu better knowa in this country, bis name attacbed to tuis fatal document te as finai as that of the. highest court.\" The viiole civilized vorld realizes nov vint a sacrifice ha. been made of Bel- gium, and vhat thie Beigian mcn vbo are in the ranks vith their noble King are figbting for, vbule their vomea and cildren romain vithia the. Germa» lines exposed to ail that vil make the mxemory of Louvain and of a score of other sucii memories en- dure aide by side vitii that of St. Bartholomev's massacre as Iandmarks in the. history of huma» ahame. NORNING AND EVENING 0F LIFE Tt comnes naturaliy, perhaps, as a neflection of regret for the happier day. of cbldhood, that one siiould speak and write of those day. in a manner almost of sadness. But usualiy the poems and other witings ini tus strain are by men and vomen not moro tha» middie-aged, vho on revisiting the. scenes of their childbood idealize their memories and senti- mentalize thomeelves into a. gentie and agreeable m.lanciioiy. It mnay veli b. believed that the man or voman, vie after tbreescore or more years' ex- -perience of life, after decades of struggle, success or failure, achievement or disappointment, revisits ciudhood scenes after a» absence of haîf a century or more, viii se. tbem in a truer light and vili recail the. joys of chiidbood, vithout any distorting idealizations or sentimental melancholy, but vith somothing of the. real feeling of chiidiood coming back again. WOMEN AND TEEC WAR In the. lands across the ocean viiose men are en- gaged in fighting, the. vomen have an active and nocessary part te perform, and tiiey are performing it well, just as in our own country the women are hearing tbeir full sbare of the. vork caused by the war, in addition te their burden of anxiety and sor- nov. The men at the front constitute the army for figiting; the. vomen at home constitute the armny for preservation, wbich is nationaliy as important. Imagine vint sort of homes Fronclimen vould have had te go home te after even the. comparatively short var of 1870, if the. vomen of France had mot bravely don. their part. Imagine boy mucli longer it vould have taken te rais. the. tlousand millions of francs levied upon France by Germany. War i. net aIl figbting. Strategy on tii. grand sa i i made up of factors whicii, on their surface, seemn far ne- moved from connection vith decisive operations. But they count effectively in producing resuits. Im- portant aniong these factors i. women's work in var-time. MOVIES IN QUEEN ANNE'S TINE In lookinp, over an old volume of the. Tatier recentiy, the Philosopher noted thnt in the Tatier for DecembÈer 29, -1709, appears an advertisement under the titi. \"Neyer Seen Before,\" whicli deciares that at a certain place in the. Strand, in London, \"viii bc pubiish'd for tihe flrst Time a PICTURE, finely dravn, by an extraordinary Master, vbich bas mnny curious and vonderfully piensing Motions in it, al natural. It is afton the. manner of the. Foreign Mov- ing Pictur, formeniy shown in Fleet-street, -but vith greaten Vaiety, and far exceeding that.\" The foiioving month the Tatier contained another ad- vertisement announcing that thore vas \"'te be seen daily at the. Thke of Malborougb's Head, in Fleet- street, a new Moving Picture, dravn by the best Hand, vith great Vaiety of curious Motions and 'Figures, 'which f orm a most agreeable Prospect-.. .This Pitur, vas neyer .xpos'd te Publick view 'before the. Begfinning of tue present year, 1710.\" la this connection it is te be noted that in a poemn of John Gay's, \"TIhe Fan,\" there is a reference whichi may ho regarded as beiping te expiain the nature of the device:- \"ITn darlcen'd rooms, where light can only pass Thro' the sînail circle of a convex glass, On the white shect the snoving figures rîse, T'le forest waves, elouds float along the skes.\" ( ay's* poem wias written in 1711. Que.» Anne was tîten on tic throne. Two centuries have pasged away. and now iiaoNing pictures are Iooked at every day hy coîîntless tliousands of people ail over the ivorld. But we are remninded o? boy much jes for- gotton frorn age to age hv the fact that the moving picturos advertised in the Tatler and mentioned in Bay's poem 50o mystify us. TEE DIPPERENCE The. secret of British naval greatness lies in the c ourage and skili of the splendid British sea-fariing population. Germany gets a large proportion of the men i ber navy from the fields of Bavaria and the industrial towns of Silèsia. They are in the navy as the resut of the Germa» systéï' of conscription. Every man in the Britishi navy is a free volunteer. The Prusian, ais between tii. army and the navy, prefers the army It vas - noted in the London papiers, alter the North Ses, lght, that more than one Germa» viio bad bean a waiter in London, vas res- eued from drowning. The. Teuton is dragooned into a sensé of duty, and does his duty doggedly-though it i. an insuit to a good and faitbful beast to liken to the. dog the German creatures combining the fer- ocity of a wild animal with the lust of a degenerate human, viiose atrocities on land and sea, have bor- rifled al ight-minded huxnanity. The man of Brit- ishi blood, like tbe man of French blood and our other allies i» this life-anüd-death struggle in def once of civilization, is flghting at the prompting of deep conviction. The. difforence expiains, among other thinge, vhy the -German vili become a murderer of non-combatants, a slaughter.r of women and chli- dren, at the. word of command, and wby the Germa» ships in the battie off the, coa8t of Chile ploughed through the British mon swimming in the water, whule British men in the North Se» fight cheerfully risked their lives.to pick up drowning enemies under gun-fire. 1* THEE-COMING RETRIBUTION A correspondent 'of on. of the London papers states that a German-whom hie encountered.-on the frontior of bis own, country oxciaimod more than once in thie course of a brief taik,- \"Wir Deutschen furcbten Gott und Kriegsonde!\" That is, \"lWe Ger- mans foar God and tbe end of the. var!\" And wby sbould tbey not? Has not Germany violated Divine ordinances as weli las human iaws?, Ras not Ger- many rutbiossly outragod the most sacrod principles? It may weli be bolioved that desperation bas now taken Possession of the Germans-that they are otrugging against wbat they know and that they realizo that thoir defeat ls inevitable, and are striv- ing to delay as long as possible the. retribution that cannot b. avert.d TEE GERMAII DOCTRINE 0F TEE STATEý Viscount Bryce, whom it seems more natural to speak of as James Bryce, explained in an address in London recentiy the Germa» theory of the state. To Engiish-speaking the world pver, said Lord Bryce, the state is tbe nation under anotiier'name, and con- sista of the people wiio form the. nation. But to the Germans the. state is a mystical sometbing wbich exists by itself apart from the people, and wbich is supreme, being xnerged, of course, in the self-pro- claimed divine right of the German Emperor to rule. The great outstanding thing about this German doc- trine of the state, vhich the German peopie are taught to believe in with a religions fervor, i. that the stato is exempt from moral consciousness and ia above moral sanction. Thus it is that the obedient Germans in the. army and the navy commit atroci- ties at the I. Ading of their supeniors, the funda- mental pninciple of Kultur being that orders from Berlin supersede the. laws of Heaven. This doctrine lias been buit up by German professors as the. in- strument to enable the designs of Prussian miii- tarism to be carried out. As Frederick the Great said, \"I take what I want, and then I set my p.- dants to work to justify wliat 1 have done.\" The German doctrine of the state wiil have to be drive» out of the heads of the Germai people by this war. GERMANY'S LONG-NURSED DESIGNS The Empire in which Canada is one of the self- governing nations, and the ideals for which our Em- pire stands are the chief obstacles in the way of 1Germany's carrying into operation ber boast that it is lier Divinely appointed mission to dominate the wonid.. This purpose bas shapei l al Germa» poiicy. That i. why German intriguing- had been going on in Egypt, in Indi» and in South Afnica for years before the war began. It was with that purpose unceasingly in view that Cermany watched with malignant vigilance the domestie eontroversies ini Great Britain and the other things wliceh to German eves seemed to b.e symptoms of British decadence. Thbat vas why Germany soughlt cunningly again and agaain to sow distrust between Great Britain and lier Allies who are now fighting shoulder to siiouîder with us in this great struggle; and why, at last, Germany souglit to bribe Great Britain by what Sir Edward Grey denounced as \"an infamous proposaI.\" nanely, to sacrifice France. Gerrnany hates everv%- tiig British, because she envies evervthingy Britishi, aiid because British blonor and British clear-sighited- uiess and British steadfastness have foiled ber. Tt is to save ourselves and the cause of civilization and hurnan prog-ress fromn the deadly consequences of Gerrnanism that we are at war. .-**-'* ,~, 'v ~ I",
         "371 Thbe: Wetepn Home Mdonthly The Fight ,at -Langexnarckj GrapMUPaly Dewdrle by Charles L.. Dolg in a Latter to a Friand. Beeçiers of The Western nome Month- ly. -wil no doubt be înterested in the . fol- \u003eow'gltter from a, member 'of its staiff. 7niéyinay alsobh interested ini the fact, tl~'froin the staff of the publishers of ts . magazine, no Iess than f teen are j\u003c,ý.l1tiag. the Empire'à batties on the plain of 'rance and B 11,ium. Severe~ cif 'them participated in th'e great strug. .tei\u0026tI*aemarck, whore Canadians, as '2ýqanddefndes oftheBriishfiag, won immortal fame. May lot 1915 Doar John-By this time no doubt you ,wiil have read of the magnificent vork donc by the Oanadians, and believe' me, Lane-Corporal Charles L. Doig A member of The Western Home Monthly staff who went to the front with the lO6th Winnipeg Light Infantry, attached to the signalling section. we desorve a share cf praiso. We'e- tainly stepped in at a critical moment and by sheer deggedness saved the situa- tion. There vers overwhelrning numbers against us, but the boys stuck at it for a couple of days and nights vithout either f ood or water. It vas no0 picnic, and how I xanaged to corne through unscatbed beats me. It was about six elock on the evening of the 22nd that the Germans commenced shelling the town wbere vs vere biiieted. At this tirne a few of us vere playing bail in the street wbenail of a sudden a \"Jack Johnson\" wbizzed over our heads and dropped about a hundred yards from 118. Every or.e cf us made a dash for the shbelter of the doorways, and. a good job %ve did, for every pane of glass in that street feli smash n the road. I looked around to sec if anvone was hurt and then I thought it best to make for Illeorderly room. I just got there when enoiie shll itthe bouse where five of Ni or1e tuartered. Shelis continued do;îgail around and T took a chance Wtii to others to run to otir billet in ai iiil](avor to save our kit. Mlien I 1'i'ithe bouse it was practically a hesp of ruina sund ail my \"junk\"' buried underneath. It aid not take me long to get.back te the orderly roorn; 1 believe I arnashed the 100 yds. record. ;Orders vers given for tiie battalion to, advance Up tic road as the Germans had broken tbrough. I threw on'my equip- ment and overcoat, shiatched up my rifle and hiked off., As vo rushcd Up the road, shrapnel, \"Little Willies,\" UJ'ek John- sons: '\"Coal Boxes,\" 'etc, verse bursting ail around, and vo had some ziarrow escapes. Our battalion vas not very long going up that road, and vs vere passed by the Turcos (French troops), vho vers retiring. At this juncture the fumes -from ths German sheila vers ter- rible and nearly overcame me altogether. Water ran frorn my eys, and 1 could bardly breathe. At laat our battalion halted at a farrn bouse, used as head- quartera by Uic Brigads staff. The colonel of thie lth told the. mon there were soe Germans ini a vood where four of our guns vers poated, and vo had to drive them out. Not a man vas dis- rnayed, every one vas eager to get at 'em. Off vent our battalion towards ths wood, vitli thc signallers behind running out a ins of ' phons vire. The sergeant had charge of te party vith the wire and I vas to his right with the remainder. About 200 yards from the wood our mon formed into extended order, and the lth Battalion did like- vise, as our supports. Slowly our men advanced until vithin 75 or 100 yards cf the vood, when the Germans opened a terrible rifle and machins un Ire on us. ve ail dropped fiat, and, believe me, 1 lay tbere for haîf an hour vith those bullets vhizzing ail around, vondering vhen my turn vas to corne. Presently I heard a great shout; then another, and as the fling had ceased sornewhat vo know tbat our boys vers after thern vith the bayonot. I got my party on the. movo and vo dodged and rested until vs carne up near the vood vhere lots cf our voîuided mon vers. We could not find the hattalion thon, so vs assistod sorns cf the vounded baclc to safety. The bulleta came ovor in shoota, and how I oscaped beats me. Our bat- talion dug themselves in for the night, and kept this largo force of Germans at bay. The rest of the Canadians assisted in keeping back the great rush ail along the line. It vould have beon a sad day for ail of us if the Germans had broken through. Our boys put up a splendid fight and deserve the credit that has been bostowed upon them. The day following the charge 1 vas asked te take a despatch to the firir\u003c- line frorn headquarters. It had to go at ail costs. The sergeant carne with me in case I got bit, for our route vas right through open country, and really I thought I would n ver get b ck, but 1 got through ail right. Our battalion vas taken eut fer a couple of days to re- oraieand vo are nov nearly up ta steghagain, having hoen reinforced by sorne cf the 2nd Contingent. They are now in the roserve tronches. 1 arn feeling fine nov, and hope you are likewise. Rernomber me toalal the boys, and show this letter te anyone. I rernain, Your oid pal, \"IChick\" Doig. Msplaced Precision \"«Oh,' I just love cake and it's awfully nie\" t\" cid little Dorotky, regarding her chocolate-fioeted ,dessert with high sp- proval. ,,' \"1You7should not say you 'love cake,' reproved ber mother; \"say you like' it; and do't say 'avfully'; say 'very.' Don't sey 'nie-,' butc'gcpod.' And by the wqy, the word 'Wasould heo oritted, and aIso the 'oh.? Nov1 my dear, repeat the qn tenoe eorretly. ' \"I Mile cake; it, s verv good,\" repeýatedl Dorothy. \"'That is much better,\" said ber mot ber. But Dorothy *was fir from heing satiq-. fied. \"It sounds as if 1 was speaking of bread,\" she said with a air of disgust. I j 't The Governmeft Blue Book, recently issued, con the. impressive tory of Li g surance li Canà4a. Over $1,200,000, -held in-force àt the o 94 0f that largeo u't Tii. Great-WeSetlLif ehedmr than one -twelfth, and, for eight sucessive yep'a. bus stood fiirit of'ailtii. Odàn- panies for new -Ce.naia Bu\"iess. * ~ ~ 'r - I * t.. ~ 4. Il. Ir.at-W4st 11h Imm ~ HEAD O7FICE ~ ~5~Y~S~' Y Asic for pompbleta snd ~rmonaI r~1es. State age izear~,st birthdmy. , \u003ct a. t a .~ ~ 'III liii il I WB ARE AMÂKIG 1,00O\"New Idea1TR8. hnd à wthv , ori u o = !tl THeE M r la SUatebmwau und.r m m.ngsihIt entuIOl tnt. betvus fl .Ooauy ay athelb aUhinhswaa rat n Orowere AmoebIon for the pusbuingalud baud. lingofmmgw sufor tarin. en in -giaakteewaii. ordon fmn Iis proine shouM be ment to the ceuliaiQom etc\u003cthe AMada\u0026\"lae\u0026290(ma Jaw. whsthoe ye vi to MNF» u. UsosuM PI.monP...io. coeime nluMmd The ores wl L Truste. Lupuaqr end MW a ofhighte m htroml And We Oun \"\u0026h.m bIl~s The Ia'aint*esdt BEOINAAAaI\u003c. £aA.aA.m - d CALOAW~ALTA WUUIflUflA6.1WblS INwvas4ANMIr ..u5p~wpa.~~ 8 -~ ~ lo- ri~ IAsk your nelghbor to $ake The - I t pleaMa everyon-it wlll dé_h lmWhram.",
         "s - r.. WtatéFip WI, ~,. w ~' 4 h Boys! and Çach l hoeeeý * OUX 'FR:Send us three new subscriptions t4, ne. Western flome Monthly and we- make you a pestof this cmploteBambau Outfit. GIRLS! Wouldn't you Die to play cro- quet this* year ? Well, we have a first clm scro- quet~ set - for four players - ....... .... illready to ship Ooetwyou cet Just send us mi three subscrip- t'ons4 The Western Home Monthly and the croquet àet lÉSbe ent YOU ff SSiummer is here NOW so act quickly. For any Th Wstern Home Monthly, Winnipeg A Week from Micky's 'Diary Writui lfa, The WestIe n m Mby by Min'Mae Mcah doSforth, Ont. *~. , . ~ .toeday the e 'rmTe wring wn just cumming up fro te rn--h- wodid webang inté 1)aok u ma' brute and itshIuckýE for hlm that ho aintpa's beraus pa '.7. if ho had. a relaahunmthatwa b ;g afîWoensUnkls Dick ho would shanghe u n or ship bound fer the west indes'a, maybo the féje Hams i liko Unkie Dick fine, ho aint a bUt tito with bis muney. WeR entnenhe aysas oe as a i dont know wbat cQmiseat men says skinzW browu but wo trimmed them 24 to 7 and lookit *y would u? it dus o W a truffol bnrml . y Unkie Dick grinnlg whats the other toilus lke? he's got two nays @ldnny. Weli Mlky old top sayu Unkde Dick to me reyuredy too home yet? tho horse'is round the korner at tomaone livry barn. i klinda hated tc eevoy the foUlas but Unkie Dick lets me drive some times whn imwith himaohbcgave the feoUas a doler to by bot doms with sud wo went. I ara -W.t oemming to the part wbaro IU\" eDick sy eacted lk aeo blind luntiabut ho it onthalof again because bad CT1 ike thaZt 1nly cimes once eer- fv ri4anahus Unkle Dick went tocilJ. i gess thata whare ho got ail the big words. Howsomeve i was teljing 'Unkbe Dick about the gaine and had j sgt to wbsro i was put off fur soudingjaok berry izto the bords when we turnd the kerner aud had a head on colfishun with à girl cummlin the uther wa. i yelld and Unkbe Dick graned and the girl said darn rite out oIddwhen ah. lit the sidewsik aud ah. mneant it too. thon none of us' said auything for about a minit. Unkie Dick says ho Lad to swaflo for times and lik bis lip twiso beforhe could say any- =hmgthenbhe ssidoiilid yu fal? me that was sum questahun when thmarshe was sitting on the aide- waL wby no she saya i just sat down bor for a rest and befor we ceuld do anything or ytin he got up sud walked away. MAymaemy luvo says Unkie Dick have yu ever notist any sines of mentel dencity about me at any time? naw i1sy1 was kinda flabbargasted miself. Mwe'lnver se ber agen. i trust not says he but if we do i'll know ber. id reconise that voise in a thowaand. better remoember it i your prayrs tonite Micky. just menshum it cashully that The -People Are tht« Best Judges What in t that hankept the wbhele-Mannln Pane Faetoeyiunnlng with a full staff ever mnethe begnninothe war? 7 aat th\u0026t hancompeledutoeam ecor plant no leu thau fve timn .$e fwdn fti unaPbi oMn. W mhveinticonUfidence of ttheCanaianpeople, and connider it a priceleomet in ..rbumn. ThrpýI are tii.bmb Juju., and- they pronone the SHRLOCK-MÂNNING CMua\u0026r PIANO gàVAA',4$JU DME8T PMANOVALUE\" you. would oonsde t a faver if it coud b. arranjod that w, should nelvoe meet agea in thé M he.l'lbot as h an a nasty mnunday, Iieà quit paym lta ju:t ,t m' m Mvet ber agon and hir naines MieI Manning and sbe bords eam us and shes my new teecher. wouldnt tiiat jar yu? i dont tbink as nme me tho and asu y she basnt a nssty disposislum. i havnt told Mânle Dick yet. ho says he's tbinkingofgo'mg to the war. i gem he would go for Shure if ho knew mis namnmg waas no ar. tusday the 9 i Mok.mie mnlgfine. she's a craker-jaek et skating and playing holcey- she canplay ingaaround an yofuskids. as e .m.unshow to pay cobn- ashun beeause she mays eembmmamhun us the wkret of algood hokey playing. cbc says if we keep our beadeansd cayem- binasun that we can beet the hilikoo). she cums dowu after foreand cochas us. sbe's a good sportand she's got red haro. wensday the 10 i toldUn9\" Dick about teohcr to d. not about her beiug the wur we nearly sainted but what a good \"kter sho was and aithât buit hao oyawnd andusaid a red hemded amaucul Rod nito? whsr ywtBait Mioky? U\" lernaked me tliuraday the il Tnkle Dlck Lam men tecer and think ho'.sor for ail the thinga ho m about rod headed amazons. we wore down oh therpnd me and Unkdo Dick and suin ci the kii playinghokey. we werhaving a petgod gaine when sum of the kida hee ero cuma teecher. i saw Unkis Dick look round for sai- pisse to bide but tharo wasnt any. hello boys she eslled Mnd the mii Unide Dick heard ber voise Le knew it snd i heard hfim give a paone. i dont think she nase him tho. we pikt Up sides agen and put TJnJde Dick and teecher at center. i was et beft wing on teechers aide ami wo beetqýmhello. teocher cbekt Unkle Dick to astand Matnd ho bardly ever tuched the puck and when he lid ébe ton it away from lm every turne. Unk\" Dicks wind is no geod.. aiter the first ton minits ho took off bie cote Mnd thon bis cap wont into the diskard and at the end of the flrst lisE the ateem was rising of hlm and floting over the tops of the trocs. à bet ho smet off ton pounds. i ast Unkle Dick if ho didnt like teecher and if ho took back ail tho things he bad said Mnd ho aaid Micky my boy we bave beon fronda but if you ever teillier wbat i said about ber red hmr etaetra i will brake every bone ' erbody.Of course im not afrade of Mubut Y\"at tho use of baving a frend if yu cant stick to hlm m said i would be -il- as an oister. friday the 12 ITnkle Dieks got lhekey on the brane 1 tbink. he's at the pend most ef the day. teecher must bo getting tired of it ho- cause abo wasnt down te the pond atal if Le deesnt watch eut ho will have a nastY disposishun like ho said teecher bad. smiday tho 7 saterday the 13 this has been a turrible exsiting day. 1 nover bad se many things happin te, me Ai ia heep befer. i botter start at the be- gining or iPH get ail mie. as soan as diner was over me and Unkie Dick beet it dewn te the pend with aur skate and hekey sticks and Lad a dandy praictis. i wanted te, cail fer teecher when wo went past ber hewse but IJnkIe Dick wouldn't let me. ho said that Iily she weuldnt be cuming anyway. the rest of the kids came dewn sfter à mile and then teecher came and we had an au-fül geod game the teecher loekt kinda mad when she saw lnkle Dick thagre. Unkie Dicks playing has impreeved a lot and teecher didnt have it al ber own way like she did the ather time but stili we beat Unkie Dicks tcam 16 to 8. as i said befer Unkie Dick playcd better and didnli puif se much. * y",
         "The Wmtern Home monthly .1he Art 0et 8hsg Too rnaziy of us'start out on * ahop- ping tour vith but vague ide\"s of vhat vo are to get. W. fooliahly fancy that a sightofteço' Mbigisra tin Th odsweifl br ninra Wheu or purc a e »finally spread befooee us i the quiet of our cvii homes, and we examine them aIt leisure, vo dis- caver that they are not what we vaut. Whatever good qualities they may have to reaoosnend thien thoy do not suit our own partcular neede. The lamp which wo thought such a boauty is deoorated in colore vhioh jar with aRl Us surroundings The dresa goods which seemed so attrac- -tive on the counter ha 'too heavy or too ,thin, too light or too dark, as the mae mnay ho. Thon cornes a vcary, and often unsue- oessful attempt to make exehanges, and in the end vo have spent an incredible amnount of tiiuo and atrength upon an apparently simple watter. As the hero- ine ini a recent \u003cagazine caricature ex- Canada'. Azuwer bo Ypres: Rtushing More Troope ta the. Front. Ile Dominion'. answer ta the British losses et Ypres, even as the heavy caualty liste were be irg m liihd. as t hury ore rooe t theFrot. he fat artof te aawe w..euiiie 1thepaltia new C. P. R.lmrMeamaomaded when uhie truck Montreal on her mdcii voyacce, kft Montreal crammed with, troope for Europe on May 6th. The phot6 shows the 8.8. Metgm uin out of Montreai Harbor with 3.000 troope on board. saying my prayrs agen sud teecher gays with her teeth cbatertng oh Mieky im afrado w'ro going ta o dround sud ius all my fawît. Av gwan i says but i didut know what els ta say until i hoard somevwun yeflmg ta hold on a mint longer and tharo vwas UJalde Dick eununung down the ise ilty aplit. i took a long breth and anuther ari nsd the next thing i 1ev Unkie Dick vas havling me out at the end of bis hokey stick. teecher made me.go first. shos a brik. when vo gaI out toocher sat down an the ise and started ta lai like sixty and Unkie Dick stoad besid her looking like ho had been dravn thro about forty ual hales. aftcr a wile she looks up at hima with a kind of a grin sud say s i supose ve'tre even nov for that vilent assavit yu sud Micky co- ited on saterday. what says Unide Dick stuterimg. oh she mimika did yu fall? il vas 1'nklc Dick to a T. lHe lookt like six sense but i near dido lafing. t) Ien teechor began to shako ail over and 1-ilkle Dick takes us vun on each sideof Iili and we beet il down the ise for home. Îheard pa tell ma that she btter proz- 1v:to welcum a sister-in-law. he sayvs 1:1 LiUnkile Dick sud teecher going to flh ilwater and ho said ho never saw à ].i h ookt so Completely galle. wudrif vou have ta arc a standing .ulrat a weding. claims, \"LIt is not'shopping vhich tires us, but ohanging the goodea afterwards! \" The fact -is that for us who have not the tact the larger part a!' shopping should ho doue in our own homes. Every proposed article of clothing, and every article of househiold furnishing should ho considered in its relation rcspectively to the lothing and funnishings alreay poseessed. The principle is the samo whether ve have much or littîs to spend. Johnny Canuck This stirrung patriotic song which made its firat appearance in the Docem- ber issue of The Western Home Month- ly, and which bas since met with great favor, lias now been published in sheet form by the Whaley-Royce Company of Winnipeg. Proceeds from the sale will ho donated by the Author, Dr. Hugh .Mackay of this city to the Red Cross, Fund. Among the many oplendid con- tributions which the ver has called forth, Dr. MaeKay's sang ranka high. Tt rings true ta tho spirit of Canaclian loyalty. The sang is dedicatod ta Major-General Steele, nov commanding the Second Canadian Expoditianary Forces, and the frontispiece is taken up with a splendid colored portrait of hitut. iReahrs of The Western Hloie Montit- iv have copies froin the lublihers of the 8011- at 50C. aftor the pMe vasw over i hoard Unkl e Dfek $M-tîec o\u003ctoso fdr ashate but sho ithank y-utimu prefer ckting bym lf h,êbowt! lke ho had a S Uiikle Dýck etran pqkçinside et.s w o addidant uay anyhifg sd ent and skated byhixnsif but he l1\u003c4 kmnda vite arpumd the gflUs 'k tod uptt»i north end of the pond. wethre b\"fobut i kliéw thare lý L LIèm upthare sud'i told but she said Uhpydbo froeen U~~ islme but if i vanted to go back Up eanso vre ~. sho aktedasm if ah. uni suer about uomething but i dont kiow, what il oould have been. we vuin tue UhOesy. *c_ i no equit sud i vont on wt hdjisit asi oxekted vstruokone cf ertIsne air hâles sudwdown un vwent. tried ta crawl out on the ise it would nesr pulled us under. vo hollered for heip but nobody heard us sud i startod The Song Divine There's music, music everywherc In earth and sky and ses, Ta sauls attuned ta rare response 0f mystie melody. Each life is one essential note In. same clestial sang; ,Sa strike thy note on earth ihat Ring clear, and true, and stroneg With vibrant echavs that shbah f11 $Some chord else incomplcte In t'uat eternal svînphony That sur-eà round Ilii. feet. Ther's mus#là hehlnnw#b'* Whlh a esamet re, Reecivès lif.'a disoords lâlaimeh TranseWmmt hpoy,. Tha -14 ap illwi, Make thu h' Itàut atm: BReeeom M n Tlîy'silence vere thy'nhane'.' --G race llartmars . 'v krange Tour Yc~iàV Ton dan.. o untiOWo funsp Lantto7 field and track mues aquti and a. hoet of othersgoaq»\" tc~i~ The purpoSe is purely patriotic. The net proosod*M flb. e voted to the l¶enefit of the oidiers at the front atd d!pIde through the Patriotic Fund aùd Red'Cjoem iSety oula enjoyed annulal midsuner v;sita tb Wuinin è.f~i The Carnival this year will surjs.sthe. Pbdubition iohh been map.nded. TH(URDAY, JULY 1: Childrea's DAy-1ý-omWnon Dgy pù*\u0026Iaè t$* - bhibition Grounds. Children's î 7e. iIQyihu. ot Racés. Dominion Day Spolts. P5Iyi 61121 tôbUFO~I Songf est. Relay- Race. FRIDAY, JULY 2: Business Diy-This da~ devoltod toe buslzm#ýwl tovu; no sporting progra. peçiaI Sales am4nohImi.~ tures at all stores., Publie Recoption lu IadustrW-al Bu Il 6?O' Band Concerts. Nilit eauiyaL SATURDAY, JULY 3: Iforse Show. IIofial 'Openlg Day. Ali*qm Sports and Baseball. Twenty-miIe Road Raeei. -hnWd OiSe. Folk Dances and DrIIli Evening. A#to .a4e Niglit Carnival. Military Parade. Dip MONDAY, JULY 5: American Da7- au IowigU wpiÀ qt- Billiard Tournament. BasebaiL Hore fSho. Twaf-\"'MI7htIo Down-town Carnival at Night. TUESDAY, JULY 6: Ia.dies' Day-Lawn Bowling TonnoimL vlug Club Horse Racing. Bazebail. BïMhard Tourmauf. Uà Show. Lacrosse. Band Concerts. lght Carivl ew4oU WVEDN-ESDAY, JULY 7: Cic Holiday-Lawn Bowling Temua«v.. r Dog Show. Poultry Show. Uoru RAclng. -Potiu.M Burlesque Racing. Billiard Touru*ment. Horue Show.. D'=iOn Championship Track Athietics. Band Concrts. N1*1Lê QÇWw4*1. THURSDAY, JULY 8: Dominion CaplnhpDyLw ~g Dog and Poultry Shows. HosRsng aefl Whiet Races. Championship Track Aheis os hw lh nival. Baud Content. FRIDAY, JULY 9: Patriatia Day-Lava Bowling.-Dg i.Pfalt* Shows. Automobile and Moo Cycle XaeS. \u0026 *Cnst Lacrosse. At night, Maso Meeting \u0026t Convention UaWf orp ms.- tation of prizes and patriotic addrepse. SATURDAY, JULY 10: Regatta Day-Ua Bowling. '-Deg- \u0026M.ndPuni- try Shows. florse and Auto Races. Band OàattB1Ur. Regatta and Aquatie Sports Cone and bring yoUr flsn*. Winnieg Wwl eme Fou th the rmtst glïr\" eont ««or h.d in Wsatwa a0M., RedcedFares on al Railtoatb PaWcularsat yo iKoaiSm tti 89.",
         "Th tYat.s'n~mo M0WI*\u003c~ ftIaess si. -ive 0 m-nbbm «or dreup, 0-el vS, mes Bdiimi cm- Puçaa .......es$10,00ME 'hiaamjwm chagiAa i~\"E 'th ~aousAutomai c 3vrylousekeéeper la Inter- mm.dl a good waaher, there- fore vo know the. folowing foatures cf the.Autoanatic. Washer wil Intereot yen. \u003c1) Simplicity of Desigu baving a strong steady anglfe- Iron -frame assebled wit\u0026 nialeable caatings, end design- ,ed to take up amail apace. (2) ýA Reverauble SwiIgIig Wringer, wiiich swings over al tubs, thereby removing the ne- -0 eesity cf lifting hoavy tuba. Wringer bas safety, resese, wbich eliminatea danger of tom olothes andijured ingera. (3) Hia a removable aide bench which can b. iiung out of tii. way when not in use. (4) à Universal 'Rod cai aise be'attaciied, b y whieh you cmn run a Churu, Cream Separator or Mangle, eitber *ile washinq, or at any tier time you may deaire. This speciai advantage is found oniy on thie automatie vasiier. (5) 'A Five Year Guiarantee goes wlth each machine. We also give YO san extra rinsing tub with eachi purchase. A complets catalogue wii bô sent you on roquest, either for the power or electria 'washer. A card viii bring you full information. ikJSTA» \u0026WRIT% 2« 5Pilum ss t , WaapegBa!n. The National. Patrlotic Carnival Winnipeg July lat to Juiy i0tii A great. National Patriotie Carnival wili ho held in Winnipeg from July let to lUth. Tii. pumpose is pureiy patriotie. It is net a profit shaing undertaking, and ne individual or organisation wili bonefit Ilnancially by it. Net proceeda cf ail events vill be dividedti t the worthy Redi Cross anti Patriotie Pumds e.ually; to iielp aick and vounded sol- diers at the Iront, and te take care of th. mnothera, ives and cilîdren cf our mon who bave been lcft behinti. Reduceti lares w.-»I be in vogue on ail railways, ao tiiat doubtiess a large mumber cf eut of town readers wili corne jute Winnipeg for the. event. The Winnipeg Tndustrial Bureau took up the. preliminary work on the sugges- tion cf a delegation of business interests, te organise tuis patriotic tournament. Representatives cf ail organisations who weme likely te cotribute te tthe auccescf the. project ver. calieti together. Follow- ing thia preliminary stop, these organisa- tions, roprosenting a total meinbership of 0W rtec thouimal, Mad denthu. sla.tlolly .ndorsed thu Idea. 'The .ttire programme là to b. orgiai lud. md, -omduct.d \u0026Io leltimat. editcational, and ail sports elean. The proosd oenngDominion Day Parade Mii . f ut :a patrlotioebaracter as nover before vitnessed ini Canad\". Evéry success-bringing method will eP3 broegt. into play by united action of ali où the. various organizationa wlxo are participating. As a citizen-wide move- menit, aiming for the. greateat possible fluncil ucea, in the aoe interest of the. vorthy and patriotie causes men- tioned, the management ask: for the cor- dial ami linancial endorsement of West- erimCanada generaliy in the -undertaking. National Patriotiec arnival interests are your interesa, the Intereste of ail West- ern Canada. The ostimated limanciai requirementa to enable the Patriotie Car- nival to carry out the. plans that bhave been considered as adequate -for advertis- ing, pinti g, distribution of literature and tii. holding of the big opening Do- minion Day Parade, togetiier wlth the awarding cf auifable diplomas, puraes and prizea la *25,000, dotails of which cab. b. obtained en application to the. seeretary. Again your attention is called to thé aima andi objecta of the undertaking. No individuel or organization. viii profit by it. Donationa towards the National ,Patriotie Oar 4ival wkIl enable tiiose in charge-tè carry out plans on the baais outlined, vhicii if done, wiii increase the gate receipts andi make your contribution to tlie Red Cross SociezLy andi Patriotie Fund produce finanetial resuite tenfokLd .\u0026rong the organizations, athietie bodi- ies andi societies, taking part in the. Nat- ional Patriotie Ton-day Tournament, are the. following: Military District No. 10; City of Winnipeg Pire Départaient; Win- nipeg Heorse ýS'ow Association; Dominion Championsiiip Track anu Field Sports; Aryand Navy League; Veterans' As- soiton; 4lighland Cadets; Knight Tem- plame and Sister Organisations; Knigiits of Pythia. andi Sister Organizations; Can- tons*--lO.O.F.; Boy Scouts; School Cad- ets; Pony Show; Winnipeg Drivin Club (speeti events) ; Winnipeg Parka Board; Univeraity cf Manitob; Publié Sciiool Bloard; 1Ldies' aC olege (lavergai) ; )augirters of the Empire; Women's Vana- dian. Club; Womnen's. Press Club; Wo- men's Equali.ty League; Labor Council;- Manitoba Law Society; Manitoba Lawn Bowling Club; Bazebal 1 Associations; Manitoba Lascrosse Association; Mani- 'loba Motor League; Winnipeg Automo- bile Club; Motor and Cycle Club; Win- nipgRPowing Club; Winnipegt Cano. \u003cClb; Winnipeg 8vimminq Club; Win- niipeg Musiciana' Association\u003e Western Billiard andi Bowling Association. The, Carnival will ho inaugurateti on July lat, Dominion Day, by a huge par- ade, eonsisting of ton sections, andi with- out any doubt will be the most preten- t lousat tbas been iseen in Western Canada. Further particulars inay be obtaineti frorn Mr. Chas. F. Rolandi, Secretary cf thec Winnipeg Industrial Bureau, who will b. gladti t give any ndditional in- formation wbich any of our roadors may douvre. MAN1TOBA'8 NEW CABINET lion, W. Armstrong, Lieut. Govern\u003cw's Secy. Ron. V. Winldpr. lion. Tnn, .Tnhnson. o .,.Hdn, o.Ew~dBon Provincial~ccrctary.Minister of Agriculure. \\flniter of Plib! je Wnrks. i-r lnra.Trauurer. Si ogflCameron. 11i. T. C'. Norrii, if-, ir TIrit,)n Lieut. Governor. Primec Minister. ,];,e of Edu,îiOu .1% *~\u003cf. 790\"NL ISS THIS CHANCIR for only $1.75. Beai ad mÇat comple Waée@ tub cf o.c thusin thremho. UteI. Waçen an\u003e tblngfrcin thefine lacste ti.he ee blankets. Un Baves rubblng eau oern ut cf ithé olte.Women d. card $15 and82 machines for iL. a\"ntte MWny eddw OMstpId. Oeni u exait prutêftvmr mii a O4lCb~~*f5 \u003c\u003el~ S15.whithp. .vmrIkpiaEh4 050E TO-DAY. DONT vAlI. AGENTS wAmi « GRANT \u0026 980MiILAJ4 COUPA»., flepi. \u0026A..m m UtTormteo, Ot. The Cause of Dyspepsia. tié SymptèeandmiThe cure., THE CAUSE, Toc rapid eating, eating toc much. i n\u0026 toc cfiten, improperly chewing the foo4, eating too much stimulating food,sd indulgig in imüproper diet generaliy. THE SYMPTrOMS. Variable appetite, rlslng and souring ôÈý food, heartburn, wind in the stomac1i a feeling of weight, iu the atomaci, th\"~ fact afeigtayorso chhas gord6 ailwrog sd tat he codyoueat doos TmE CURE. *URDOCK BLOOD BITTERS.- Mrs. E. Williamson, Wheeler, Ont., 1 writes: -I have been a sufferer for years f rom dyspepsia, and could scarcely eat anything. 1 tried Burdock Blood Bitters, and I amn entirely cured. I1 have flot been troubled since I took it, and that is two years ago. 1 eauL now eat any7 thing I wish.\" B.B.B. is manufactured only by The W~. Milburn Co., Limited, Toronto, Ont..",
         "ibe Westeign Honm- Mont hiY Eas of tCorn By Mary E.(à. Bruali Dinner was ovor- at the farmhouae and Thihl Ann was clearing away the dishes. The rost Of the women folk had gathered in a litle group near the sunny south i wn- dow of th. livmg-room. «Brush-braid wears the langettheysay, but accordin'- te my notion, velveteen hindi' looka 1h. moet genteeol the dress- maker Serepta Clementine, was ssymg as she hield up Ruth EUlen's new blue skirtý The tivewearer and her mother ho= overthegarment with-m absorb- ing interest, though neither said anything, because Graxidma Harrisbrisk, blsck- eyed, and voluble, was n digher sharp, lte chin and giving abrili endorsement to 1he dremnmker'5 opinion. Graudma Milton'a massiv, figure loomed i the background-.3omehow, it memed as though ahe were always li the bacgrund-as she tried te put li a word ofadvie now and thon, but nobody hee\u003ced it, and the decision i favor of uigvelveleen intead of braid was made Zu2t contrary te ber mildly uttered pro- toit. Whereupon Graxidma Milton pluck- od ber blue Ringiz-am sunhonnet froin its nail behid tIi. kitchen door snd sallied forth from the. bouse wilh ponderous tresd and grn msage. «Where ha you goi' Mother Milton?' th. fsrmer's wife calle ouIt i a tone as caMeess as her grammqr. \"Gemi' oui te the cornfleld topick a pum- lin! Guesa you folks hev forgot that if we're le hev pies fur Thanksivi',tbey've L ttbmde to-morrer,\"was lb. reply fimgackwitb l.theuÏtn tino he ouler door. The quartet around thbe hue sirt ex- changed g lances. Sometbing of the besuliful dsy'a bahm and blsing streve te banish th perturbed feelngtrugÇe wthiGrdma Mil ton'ahart.The jbard ngry lokmh ler eyee waa submred i bars; lms tartnew and rancor were in ber toue as she turned inte the serried ranks of th. corn. \"IWbere bel goin', Johns wife asked me,\" shesidtoherselfinsàquaveringvoice «I expect she didn't car.! Nobody canes mucli wbere 1 go or wbaî I do, as long as I don'I git li the way. An' as fur my ad- vice, nobody cares fur that, nutheri If I oould have talked 10 Ruth EIllen alene I could bey made ber se. bow much more economical lb. woollen braid wau than that slimsey velveteen.. But Iawsy me, il don't matter-only il's jestli1k. the way I'm always treated. John's wife's mother -that Jane Eliza Harris--she's got il ail to say. An' te tbink that this i the place I worked for an' belped pay for-my bore where I was mistr-ess fur so many years1y\" Quile out of brealli, Grandina Miton sat down on a shgck of corn which the wind, or playful children, had tumbled over, and fanned herseif witb lier sun- bonnet. a That big feller over there in lb. fiflli row,\" she said, refiectively, \"ll take that one an' stearn it Ibis afternoon an' early li the mornin' l'Il make the pies-that 18, if Jane Eliza Harris don't take il ile her bonad t make 'em. Hurnph\"-with a sniff, \"I'd like to see the folks a-eatin' er pies! Crust as tougli as my old rubbers an' filin' as tasteless as punk! Jane Eliza's no cook an' nover wasl But sbe's a rnaster-hand at talkin' an' makin' mis- chief!\" Grandnia Miltons brow was clouded a.-ain. Then she continued li ene final, vo- bernent oubursî Ibat thrillod wilh tbe Sent-up niisery of days of loneliness, iti erness and wounded pride, \"Day after lo-morrer will ha Thanksgivin' and I know I ain'l got tbe foelin's i my beart suit ahie for thec day. Seems as Ibougli ltcvIwa'n't noîbin' uer uobody. I'm ge in' so that I feel i bbe wa-an' li rny ow)%n home, tee! As for bein' lhaxik- fu'-lre Grandma Milto~n paused, lack- ifgwords. ý !e lifted a corner of bier apron and W ilier eyes. The mist heing cleared a,,, he gazed down îhrough the rustling rLP. of the corn le the very end of the fIý ' and even far. beyond, wbore the. b'vsouth meadow stretchod ils acres. F ~raway still #as the littie village ai \"The Corners,' wbere the brick churcli slood, its, spire turxied te gold by the suubeams. 1\"Oh, 1h. uittie old churchi\"' sigbed Grandma Miltou. \"Il seemu as thouhl it'd ha jest like a bit o' beaven if we cold all go together te Thankagivin' servieim 1h old churcli once more. Iî'd kinder brh*gback tbe good old times. Mylbhow tbafll'd feed! But il ahit tebe-it ain't te ha\" And dolefufly sbaldng lier head, Grand- ma Milton went toiliug up the-palb, the grea Cowglobe of the pumpkmn tuck.d H ardly was ber broad, plump back lot te view bohid tb. raspberry bushes bordering tha field, when lbere was a vigo ulIltle ralle among tb. long, dry leaves of the corn and a lender figure and boyish face appeared fromn behind alarge, lied-up shock. Buster Brown Say- 1I can wear these stocklg without ever getting a ho ea them, and you know mne. I am, net too careul. Thie best thing I ever did was to put my name on this hosi- ery, so moth- ers would know how te buyDarnless Stockingm.pt ?NY ~O1'I. 4 CftOV~-'FAU Girls, Too- Buster Brown'\u0026 Sisterus Stocklin for the girls ls a splended lookinj stocking at a moderate price. J two-thread HEngliah mercerized Ilsh stocklng, that in shaped tofit \u0026oc mears very wel l deedi. Color-Black. Leather S badi Tan. P\"n. Blue ad Whte. Young Robert Milton's face wore an unugu\u0026llS àobr expreesion and there was a little quav er of tenderneas in hig tone as lie exclamo \" Poor dear grandina! 1 neyer réelied-before juBt how she feit! I don't bhee.-the test of the folks do, eitberl And something' s t te be done!i i'm going te tell Ruth le' and mother and\":-a satisfied, determined nod and a cheery. whistle completed the sentence. The weatheu, changed a f ew. hours before Th\" cgiiaDé,; blue sky turned to ga b]my bee te cold northern bls iha hint of snowflakes i it. ««I'd botter crew warm, \" 3he said, te, lierseif. «I epect it'Ill bea' chily walk ovor te 1h.e chuirch. Once I thouh I'd as* John to hitèbh up an' let me ride.bu te thinirs 1 no'use in al that bottier, -sèeln' it's for ma ýalone OnIyIl bore the old woman's lips quivered abittle--onlyit'd seemed kinder nice if somebody hasug- gested it-jeua ug ydi! Sivthed i thWeigbtblanket shavel and ber own gloomy refiectionsi Grandina Milton went down the stairs. Il seered unuqually stillin he h.lower hall; oly the ripple of Tir»s Ann'sao and the i=up cf the'oenngand shnttmg of Lthoe u door and the amel of roasting turkey floaled i from the kitohen. « Salces alivel1 1 wondewbere 1 aU the fo1s\"-Oerpdma Milton bogan th. »en- tence, but i.ndod it abruptly am ahe opened th. hall door. FSr behold there on the porch stood the whole Mifilton f amily, *hile the Milton teàm hitched te the two eated carriage awaited at the front rtel 1 «Ofatem-,you aý- r*uma--we've beuwaiting for yeu!\" R o alled out eheerily \"we're- ail ready 'foe cb#,Mc)i What! càidn't think \u0026àybodywa~ and on Thankegie », 1 are. Coôme lot mean the robe arc'd ou tMe' drive and RuthEllen ad IuiÏ wuz we'll mSet you at the ohurI%.\"ý \"At Lb.eohurchr' Oràau d peaedteh.aef.Muffied 'ipi V sud m araeobe hr fuse pîîw4çm and - iours Itckug.Thert.,'b Stockings - made of the strongest, long fibre Cotton# specâali twisted and teste for durabilityq kai t te d' - double or treble whee the wearila the bardest. Save money, too 1 DROWN 1e (9tffi uttai d MILLS AT HAMILTON AND WELLAND, ONT. a Alào makers of h. e ébrated \"Ltti. Darling » ai «Litti. Dalay\" Hl'y for bInfantn6 Childr.m Vloun g People A Redl Darnless Stodldn for - Yom dealer»Nsethm inBla\u0026k sudL«\u0026«h 0\" d.Ton.. Coo mO mrs than h rdry k\"nd.Lok forStsoub.bul",
         "-f .fl W6~Iêé Aft,èthLy rho hbad evehemtd hewbile: you know ita h theu -eveiyo ýèil- àw 1lAthe WateBarme ji ýFrabii.a argaret FoL. 7k ras no üé well and there was ne *ýèj:nhéTbrse Bears' boume. They *û t h' 1 4, uver for, wmeto edrink, bl jttout\",ie .baék deor Ibere was £Inw»;ber liarréL* Every Saturday, i tilké vas no vater 'intthe rain-valer baorel,- the Tbree 4ars uaod to carr -4tot bahé L . They took theïr baiaoeeaI a time lu a big waâh-tub. :ÇOsm eaudy nil h, wbeu al 1fr.. 4 b4 ;lalçpma 1Juin a ndwere tuck.d * wýy. sug and coinfortable lu Iheir beds, itl egan 10 ramn. u7t'iiralaingi\" said Pallier Bear, iu a Sèd lW- \"nthie duoks vil b.e oba\"yI\" P inumure-thelittl. Baby Bear,. iu a b~E4aaitÇàin\u0026 ail thail night and all day Fudy allier Bear. told Baby Bear M m8 d ti. ~I~t~ui-. MoMiay rnorung the sun shone briglit pndvwarm Mohr Bear said il vas a *beautful day for washing loîhes. d t B'ut) Baby Beur,\"» sid she, \"whatever you do, do' go nLear the rain-witer rebecameuoyou eight faninlu. ~ ~ Baby Bear vas net always gocd. While t bicszmother éleared the breakfast-table, ~a~o1~b~Baby'Bear theuglil he would look at the ~ outaide of th. rain-water barrel. Next J s~wj ny..h. if ted one paw as higli as h. could, Pa M, MM \u0026W '.ndreach.d th, top of the barreL He r to tl» i.od uld nol see in, so he burned the cboîhes- Day.,,TYs, I basket upside down, which in the same I spolie rigit thing as bottoni aide up, and then lie Wi dowu my climbed ou top of il. Ho could look into the water-barrel. Fr few inmntesBaby Beàr bada. \u003cced lime playlâg inthe iwatçr. Then ho leaued over te sée.if he OMMd sS.bhe bqt1oufl àd the -barrel, when splaabity- apl\"I ho li U u eàd frit. \u003efother Bear heard the aplashity- epaIl ad rau out ini tme te snée:Baby Bor' te., lg d w , down n l l water.. PatlleBear ran. by leaps te tii. tain-avaler barreL \"Poor luttle Baby Da» wailed Mother Bear when Father Bear pulled the lle fell\"ow ont, ail drlpping wet. The. fira tlhing Father Bear did was to poud Baby Bear on his back, to \u003cet the water out of bis lungs. When Baby Beair had been scrubbed dry, Mother Bear wrappedhra in£sblanket aud put bim iu Pallier -Bear's big cI*ir.' Then she made him somd bot %nger-tea, and -cer- rBed hinm le drink il wirle it was lot, 'TII neve r: c limb up aud loo\u003ek in th. 'çater-barrel again!\"l promised Baby Bear, wbez h. at wrapped in the b1ankt? watchiug bis littie shirt and 1ruer lapping on th. lin.. And lie nover did. *A ShInIng Beo By Julia H. Jobuston. - Once upon a ime a large farnily of children vere fouud in a sad s\"te of mmnd. Eve~r oue of them bad a trouble of some kin d seemed t e b- holdingj il up ever th rest te keep every bit of briglibuem awa. Thene vas te bave been a pieni. anid it rained se that ne eue could 50 much as Ibli c f giugout of domr. Seme tblug that ]ad been prornisd had net comne home, and there was-great mourning over this. One child had a bad pain, aud muother bad broken lier dol and suadlier hoart vas cracked in two ever .1, il was somethiug sereus. Nov ile these childrnu were broodiug ever their dark things, mi came the Diý,etOnrý who wus in the habit d,'tUin hatto do. MWa have we Jure?\" eh. cried. 'IIneermw o-agy dark mnd dutre.iug ojumenuste bave ometbing black. It .'wM lneyerdo iu th., worL.Coe now. Yo utpolh up althedark thinges Bo th. Dkwetoçý,Geîera dpt out smre fim p Wde hich Wma mau9Xture of con- tenttnllues and good'epr u set oaci child f tîem- ilt shrnd the partcua bit ef blacimesa iu baud. \"W. wIl bae a hing be.,\" imad the Directer-Genra \"W. wiil ail be as busya pqble atthe ame work axjd kepoli up our dark thinga il they aiee agrle ta bave areumd.\" Boley al fell te wrk with a wiil, and as they rubbed away, the childreu's faces too, grwbrighter, aud by and by, after the 'iu bee, ail these dark troubles were pelished Up bll bh e houeand, al- thuhothing uew ha b en iJ tem the chidren were al happy aud cheerfui once mcre Neighbour: \"ýHuleo Joues how are you? Paent seyou luin t aenfor qut.a time aud you neyer core ne u set e su ow. Whylat\" Joues: \"Well, th. façt is, old cbap, that it's uot through iil-wifl or bad feeling, or auythlng lilce that, yen know ouly you and your wife have borrowed so0rnany things from me that wheu n ee 1 lc it makes me feel quiteh. hoe-siOeP Auth-a la Torture. No one who hasn't gasped for breath in the power of asthma knows .what such suffering is. Thousands do know, however, from experience how im- mneasurable is the relief provided by that marvellous preparation, Dr. J. D. Kellogg's Asthma Remedy. For years it has been re- lieving and curing the mýost severe cases. If you are a sufferer do flot delay a day in securing this remedy from your druggist. t Sixîrtih -Hero ponsfor Two. New4 S ubscription s You have heard about these famous spoons which are advertised ý'4,o freely in every Canadian newspaper and now have the opportunity of poesessing the complet. set of six at no cost whatever to yourself. £ACH SPOON 15 GUARANTEED BY THE WM. ROGERS CO., whose reputation for silverware is so well known. The six heroes who comprise the series are 1. Lord Kitéhener' 2. en. Sir John French 3. General Joffre 4. Laie fanl Roberts 5. Admirai Beatty 6. General Pau There is a tremendous demand for these spoons which are at once both artistie ,and useful and we urge our readers to take advantage of the offer prompîly. SCGus in two new subscriptions bo The Western Homne Monthly at $1.00 and tfl-e six spoons wvill be forwarded youpostpaid. Uddt ess :ll orders Thne Western Home Monthly, Winnipeg",
         "The Westera HOoMionthly Fat Passengers B[adhýelivedmtin day f rteam, elec- ~. tricity and Pntor cam, tDaniel Lambert, Must famousd'ffat mmn, would flot bave bn drivoen#bewaain bisowndayto h avi oaspéia vehiicle construte for isconvoyance. the atout men, some- ïdiat leu fat and le. proaperous, who had go make use of ordinary coahes built for buman beinas of standard ie, xpnece ad madle a vast amomt oi trouble, as Mr. 3. B. Walkenside wri recently of aoaeing ayi ~i XIIng ash amusingly Mr. BeBnnn of Bath having been re- fued a plac m the coach because of bis CSpulene on the excuse that the place ,*de ail engaged, made. no demur, but .,mng early tb the sarmgplcesmply g i, pullsd cownthe blindaset'e bn îW oifotably, and fel aleep. -Other passengera arriving anid Peeping la aI bis enormous bulk, protested to the hostie thal it waa impossible to travel with suoh a gimnt. M.ze argument awalcened ML. Benum , ho lifted the blind, drowsi- l dl'r-d t,,t h. should flot get out, but Ifanybody chose to pull bim ouI h. would ,ode no resistance, and went 10 sleep agai. When he agan woke.up, aI near- W. an hour pat midnigt, he ýÏî out to nes at wbat town the coach was stopping --nd found himaêlf stfil i the inn yard at Bath. The horsesad been quietly taken out during bis nap and put to anotber oooeh which chanced to b. in the stble watnmince repaira, and lie bad been Wt. beWmd. An immensely fat Quaker of Hudders- fiekd\" having been firet refused transit un- ne asu lber at ninepence per stonaI aitho even then h. wue auued ho ôul beaninconvenient varie , mace wiauusualwaa finafly bdthat 40 would b. aôcepted sa a pasegr but he must puy for Iwo places 41 will fot dispute thy decision, frienld. 1 shall need them both Il h. asented, good, humoredly, and paid bue'money doWn. The next xmorninq he macle an early ap- perace, accompamed by a sister as fates , anid the Iwo climbed -ito6'their places, from which it *as imosile Iodia- lode thea. Neither coul\u0026 th. other ini- tending assen essueeze i with such an elephat e inthe proprietor hadat l,.tttefconsentb' send them on by poBt- ««I applaud thy decision, friend,\" cop- mentedthe huge Quaker, pk\"l.\"a chel and 1are not ueci ,andcoble we should have enjeyed the gentlemén's company had. n~o mlobaP occurred. But' Lad we chancecl to lurch upon thêm la de- acending a hilB, I fearithe convesto 80 interrupd would« neyer have been We sumed. achel is tender-hearted, but gli, weighs tbree bundred pounds, nid I my- elf am four'and forty poundla beavier. -It ia bet that our flesaly. burden should afflict ourselves alone.\" Abaces The name given te a collection of \"Mat- ter,\" or, as the surgeon cails it, \"pus.\" n abacess la the reault of inflammation ehc bas proceeded to a certain stage-that cf #\u0026suppuration.!' Beyond tbe formation of matter, inflammation may extend b pro- duce mortification or death cf a part, 50 that the formation cf an abscess repre- ents a kind of half-way bouse in tbe course of the trouble. Abaceases may fomh ainiost any part of tbe body. Te BYMfP. toms are a certain amount cf swelling throbbing pain, with general redneso the part and a rise of temperature. nhe treatrnent cf an absceas resolves *ibse firat, into the encoraeen f h eX formàation cf matter m the opening-cf the abscess so as bo allow the matter to sae The sooner this simple operation igeffecte ini the case cf large abaceases bbc beter it is for the patient, inasmucb as there mut always exist a certain amount of danger m respect of bbe mater being absorbed from the âbscess and conveyed te other p arts cf the body, where like effects may b. pro- dured. Abscesses which it le intended shou].,d corne te a head, se that bbe matter mûav be \u003crot rid cf, should b. continuouslY PCuaiiced, care being taken that ne poul- t's allowed te grow cold. Hot fomen- ncontinually kepb up may b. u5cf as asubstitute for poultl='z. When the absoesa is opened, k sboud!iethorhy cleansed with hot fomentations to which a littie boracic acid bas bee added. The best dressing for an abecea f ber it has been opened ia carbolie tow, ora dressing cemposed of some diinetaht ganse. The dressing will require to'b. 'changed at least once a dayso lonq as any matter is abaorbed by it. Occaici.A mallab- sceases may be prevented rm comin.toi a head by restinp the part and by smearmg over the swelhng a combination of 1 dracbm extract of behladonna and 1 drachm of glyterine. ;- Cold water dreas- mg ket continuously applied, may alse eet e samne end, that of pwivnting suppuration. Styes are httie localed inflamnmations 0f tbheroots of the eyelaah bulbe. .They indicate, as a rule, that a cild'sath sm below par, and they ought 10 b. attended tofor remm nof healh a well as beauty. lxi~~~ the eal sae, h ye huld b. bathed w,969 hot boracroltonh b strength of a teaspoonful of bondce pow- der toa tumbler of hot water. Wheà the stye bas formed, th. eyelahoh\" b b puhledout te let the malter escape.A httlebmm cntment houd b. rubbed a thgIe 11d. A chlld who le suet to ste hould have the e xa miud\"wasou err of refraction ikl cause irtgt\"o -a---dO nfa a tonc1h. 1. tu isbngfodplo 'd cffreSh. iand t4\u003e mUvrymama a*Don.o b1h Weak Amides Weak ancls lauchlldhod are fM49 commxon. TMy Oug- lt b.e t.4 b effort directed towarde the cbld do tto . exerd»'uu ldpn developin b bidgigr e idmk =Iendid game hinlthe nuà y Ta may be'balhed eiur1 water, té whlc M thmslIb b6m, 4s..bf ame ce r a f aitsoitblh chemist, whMch can b. used for the purpose, Whioh niasesthe water almost as0.04 um sai _wt.r fronithe.88. Mmoqge01 he ankis with a ittle olive oitcmle ,with Ibis Ireatment,- wil very MMoonk- prove econdiion f lthe. joint. This le a beauty point, -but it lsa alo ofbeaut lm- o% obeea ekMa child who e s new in any occupation li after life wbich entails constant standing. When Bathing Baby (1) Don't put bot water fiet imb Lb. bath; tbis is eapecially necessary bo remem- ber if. there are amail children toddling about the nursey. ÀAdootoe knew of a litie creature bemg scalded te death by faDing into *a bath biBl fulli. ofbot water wbile th nurse bad gone to fetch a can of cold water. (2) D\u003cm't use much soap i waabing an infant. , No mater bow excellent and \"'superfated\" the soap mnay b. there la always nmre akaiin it, and la8 istoo dring te th. delicate \"kmof a baby. A lot of soap removes toc mucb cf the nabur- al cil of the \"kn and this lsau grat lous te the nutrition of le cbild., (3) Don't use powder on tb. baby'sakn or but very, very littie of it. Greas is ever se much better-a little vaseline or lano- Unie. Just a slight smear of either ia an ex- cellent proteètion from cbafing. Tt is usually safe ta say that when a chlld is paie, sickiy, peevish and restless, the cause is worms. These parasites range the stomach and intestines, causng serfoui disorders ef the digestioniand preventing the infant from deriving sustenance front food. à[Iller'a Worm Powders, by destroying the worme, corrects these faulte of the digestion and serves to restore the organs to healthy action. Gined 30 Lbs.in Few'Wu Neyer Fii.h W.. Pal% Wei»d ndfiu, and, Hait N1«.V\"1n Before Using Dr. Chi.' vv od It a tulrwondèriul what Dr. 19M. # ILe,.4II M\"10 M NeVIe Po\"d doos for vomen 80* wlt.:--au *\"p who are w«L.akwar7 ad rn dowa la me wrltlag yi\"uat healtb. New, rtch gv i ydco 14 blood l wbat la Pr hana 1 Nerve Poê\u0026 a qe la açaly ipeut oured me- afl sjr Lehcase% t anId becanss Mr.- eA .aLI Oha.aelleNervieb' l) Food forma ew ~e~l ~l blool t . brhfgfl. Oure - uot iewe = tiyet nu*l anse ~ ~ ~ ~ M Of togtrefS i aqarot~a blood ouau throuh the YMvelt.* . .to..oe* goo4 \"d 'l w a ewt :. 1 1 Write It on the fil-at the tEum, Mak.-evey nepative more vluabi.by ing, at the time of exposure h ail kmpota,. date pu4 tidêh. Ib's a simple and aum almoot Iaatieu ro w# m Autographic, Koda,,ký T61 ahKda#m is d6o AUIUSuI..A bà 1»~UIW du i od d \" ýmtmvLi hm d. p m nduain .ubLdbh Viasi., .\u0026amo puhm 60 .dsmm ad%« n roi.uoof eduu m , 0 ai hs i ms i th timLA ru oaa. .Thwe M\" ~éu wliSu ho. $7.00 W. AM ur dodu ,or wrlk no for Okoék e.mAurn uma b U UIustatud hnkli Iht ud muL«.)Dg. 2 mm ab m CANADIAN KODAK et\u003e. LTD., 610 King St., W., Trosozro. -~ . .~ -'~*1 The Home Dqctor 'I",
         "Arne western HMO monthly AVlwofelruns __è cive Um ~wk1\u0026iràu usuhE 1ý Ila. - mxail xhomta taken aI frequeut iftlteVa18 Nor doms the large amoumt you drink aiter exmeuuîsgor iwhen perspirhig; inbot weath- er tereo a ur sile perspirft- lio,\"fo at such times'you only quench yorthirst, wbich isas burried demand of thdryin oeils for nutrimnent due to tbe unusal limas of water.. Týo keep in perfect healtbsand so preveut the arteries from gowing brittie in middle 78you ohould drink two or mo r lae cue ool water every mornigbeore estmng tiWÙ1cfa. Between mel a gIse et two sbould b. laken. Do not wait for thirBt, but try tb keep the moisture of the body at a perfect balance., Do not drink iced water at any lime. Bad compleions aud troublesome indi- gestons may often be traced to its habit- ual mm. Many popealtougk they know of nervous rataon do flot kuow what the srmtos ae.The principal ones are,~~ a eln ffîht whemn nicrowded places, a dread of being alone, fear of belng mu a conflned place, a horror of society, a dread of things falling f rom above, fright at travelling on railroad trains, sud disturbed and restiess, un- refreshing sleep, often troubled with dreams. Mrs. George Lee, Victoria Harbor, Ont., writes: '« 1amn wting to teil you of the experieuce I bave had with mil.. burn's Heurt and Nerve PUis. I was 90 nervous I could not do my own work, I did ut want to see any one, or would I go any place My nerves were bad for three years, sud my heurt *was so bad it made me tremble ail over. I took three\u0026 boxes of your pilla, aud I neyer was better than I arn now. f-% 1 weigh 20 pounds more than I ever did.\" Milburn's Heurt sud Nerve Pis are 5kc per box, 3 boxes for $1.25, at ail dealers, or mafld direct on recept cf Lmiceby The T. Milbu±n Co., Lnmted, TR t.Ont.. nom Duaght Fýr. .the.Faile Fm CmElahb and Bl hakes For te Frn tdth 1 is dmà ne a cma 60 d6\"Jaaoe dub e uo\u0026e ia u. . d ýitan maI.du bi. à ib a wu i 46B\"tob m\" DR. AEER r-0\"\"'C. LI.itsd OUTEEAL TORONTO WàiNNIPEG Iaaribd 1883 whh DdB\" Cavii bfe tm AnU Dto.dftt@ H g h Grade BicylefttedwithROlkrChailh, ieu Dearture Coaster Brake and Hlu\u0026, Ddtachable 7?res, hlgbgradeeqtuipment,lflcid. ing Mudguards, $25 PU\" and Toole$25 for FREE 19 15 Catalogue, 70pgsof Bi\"yclesSundries, asdRepaïrM\u003cU iL ou can - yoursupples from us at T. W.DBOYD \u0026 SON. Owlng tub tah of homes the R.F.A. et Salisbury ame bema tasiglt to ride mules which serve the puroe etr=eey well and become sa, docile as to shlow tb Tommies to perform cirrus tricks on herbêa. Our picture shows smre of the R.F.A. going througlé nmre of their rick riding Performances thinga with; you cannot do anything with- out touching thingansd that means con- tact with germa. B ut there ia littie danger if we keep our hands as dlean as we can and observe a few simýple precautions. MSt important of ail, we can learn to keep our banda away from our faces. That la a rule tbat parents and teachers should beach the young i the habit-forming per- iod of life. The banda should flot even be used to wash the face with unless they have been thoroughly waahed themselves, sud the eyes should neyer be touched by them. Finally let other peoples' towels and bruahes aloe That is a measure of pro- tection you owe not only to yourself but to them. Drlnklng Water Every twenty-four hours there passes out through the pores of your skin about a quart of water. This \"insensible per- spiration\" goes on in the body of every healthy mani without his knowing it. This evaporation from the skin is necessary in order that the body may reniain at an even temperature, and able to resist audden chills, severe eold or ext remne heat. At the same time, a still great er ainount of water is passing out of the body t hrough tbe lune, and other organs. Now if you allow the body to part with all this water without supplying the ]os,-. cvery t iny ccli in the systern is robbed0 if$' opportuflity to grow, and one of the trina lIments due to poor cvIl growth is bound sooner or later to devvIop. Thus, file linportance of drinking enlomahi pure wat er to keep the tissues of tlh b Iy sup- phied is it once apparent. M'ater taken in great quantilis i~ d t long intervals is not so beneticial tu \\-ou as dabbed ou any inlamed area, of skin or rnidge-bites etc,With a litle sponge or cotton-wýoL Neyer rub vaseline on to a child's akin before it goea out of doors, or y u wili cause burning sud pain. Vase-. .ne la quite a good thinl; b use at bedtime but lbe bot sun makes it into an irritant a child goes out after it la applied. Salt Water Salt water la an excellent thing for strengthening the ankies, sud every child loves to \"paddle.\" So that if y-ou happen to be at the sea, by ail means let the littie ones wade in the waber, but do not let lbem remnain long enough to contract chill. if a child la allowed to stand about for an hour or longer in cold water, the circulation la disturbed, sud he mvay have a severe \"liver attaclk\" t la bctter bo allow child- ren to paddIc f'r) ten or fifteen minutes, ancr-then :r3 the legs briskly sud makze thern run abcdt on the sand. Warm sun- up days sh -uAd always be chosen, sud paddling discouraged if the water sud at- mosphere are ce'!d and depressing. Fact, n't t ancy \"If vou plt1a1Fe, n \"a1r111.\" said the servant from Finlsud, \"theictt 's lad ciekens.\" \"Nonsense, Gertru de !- roturned the rnistress of the bouse. - oun II(til kit tons. Cats don't hav-e ci n. '-Was thern chickons, or kiuen, tltit mas- ter brought hom e la-t niuhl' ' 'Chickens, of cour-st.\" ý\"lVell, ma'am, tliat'- wliat the cat Las had.\" Strawberries TOAS\"MD Corn Flakes lOc PER PACKAGE Partly fUi the dish with straw- berries, cover with sugar and let stand until sugar is dissolved, then add Coru Flakes and serve with whipped cream. KELLQGG' S Corn Flakes MADE IN CANADA' When writing advertisers please menltion The Western Home Mcnthly. 'c f t' -'s' ~' -t-'', 44. 't\" lu 00 MW qui woI doc an] Enl affi gri2 UP aie I alti Wai fine a P, eii g' $",
         "thopautthe montb it has been rny * *piffg to viit Nelie L. Mc- IL7h irnew~ in Edmonton and ý a oo ùIlàwill be interested lu earinisomething of how shela s tlndornin new Woman urroumdings. Already ahe la st Houe a power in, Edmonton and workers along limes of social end economic rsform arm Ieaning On lber adlooking te her for alkidnds of amsjt- uc and they are mot looking in vain. as. wl' talcs a very active part i the eomig ornpignfortotal prohibition of ti.liquor traffc and bas proniised six wssof lectures and talks througbout thervUice. Sfio bas not forgotten hier old friends lu Manitoba, the men and more especialiy tbe woen with whom ahe worksd for se ipany ye.aIw, and she la franlc i sayln MM hab misses them and often lnsfor tjiem, but the faot that sebas be iansly la not preventing bier frorn work i her mew home. Going about the city and meting men and women in various Unes of activity 1 was amazed, mnuch as 1 knew ]er capacity for work, at the arnount abs bu a cornplisbed. Fier home la a beauti- fui sunny windowed bouse on a quiet corner and the young pe of Amon 'avitate te it as naturaily as the nd1-e ethe pois..1 «TNnere are your pe ople?\" I aéked. The chickens were forot*ea by this time. \"My brothers are te army,\" ahe said a=dly and 1 amn looking after tbmngsmyself. I had almost expressed rny rpatby before I noticed the look on lierse. Se I extended congratulations instead. \"(Do you live alone?\" I asked. \"Yes,\" asesaid,, \"aincesmy young brother wet-of course it la net seoba -1 have the horses and stock te look afterand I bave a cat toe.\" \"1III talcs ailtbe chickenatl\" I said,\"cand wbat else bave you?\" Tbiat's how it happened tiiashe carne borne, witb me that night?, and I had the et plessure ci entertamning this brave Sugterof he mpiewbe taya bythe stuff-while lier menfok go out to it \" I would bave ornoe,\" abs mid y p «f1 a ena trained nurse, but Isimn fot, and they do net want wornen i n 1id, now. My aister- who la a nurse-lied booked ber. pasaae te Canada wben the war breke eout, but then @lbs atayed of course, sud in now PSr the two months preceainx the campaign for prohibition Mrs. M\"Zng bus reused ail lecture and recital engage- ments and wiil devote berseif te thé merw book \"The War that Neyer The New Ends\" and whicb la the Book etermal truggle of biumity -towards equality of oppor- tua tyr. Iaà book, of which 1 bave bcen privileged te read a few chapters, wiil bc aVSret asset te wornen'a organizations al over the country,' dealinga tdoca, briefly and cocretely witbcorne of the -ratproblerna wbiclito-ay aepuzzling te world of men and women. It la eas te predict that a chapter of it read aoui wiil talcs the p lace ofaaspeaker at many a meeting of hornerakers, grain growera and homie ecomomiies. The style la pro- vocative of discussion. It dose net clam~ te be the final word on any problern but is deined to tart people thinking anqd disussç.Thus working tbefr te the, solution of problems for thenieves Anyone wbo lias ever bad the pleasure of hearingNMro. Mclung speak wiil instaütly visualize lier bebind the printed page. At the sarne tirne the style wiil attract and hold those readers wbo bave neyer seen her. The book wiil be eut by the flrst of October. Each cliapter wiII have its Ieading thought concreted in a lins or two of verse at the beginning. This is a little story of a personal expeience whicb Mrs. McClung was kind enougli te give me for readers of the \"Quiet Heur:\" \" Have you any chickens?\" à Daughter I asked oe of the keepers of of The the stails in the North Ed- * mpire menton farmer' market. \"I have plety!\" lis an- swered readiy-\" but aay,\" lie added quickly-\"Il wish you wouid buy frorn the woman over there im that stail at the door. She's corne a long way, and ase i anious to get borne. Sbe's a young English girl--she's outside mow seeiug after ber pigs but l'Il go for ber.\" Wbo'1I say that chivalry is dead? This grizzled old bornesteader ia aurely holding up bis end of it! *He came back witb the yeung English fprI dressed in a reugh serge suit, opossum 8ur, and shoe-packs. \"Is it true that yeu want cbickens?\" asesaid. I dINlared that it wuS quite truc, although from the moment I saw ber 1 Wéüs interested in ber far more than in the finest chicken that was ever turned jute a pOt-pie. \"110\\ far did you corne?\" I asked. 'rî '-five miles,\" she said \"north-i West ù',e It took us three cfays.\" came witb yoti?\" I asked--she sei 4s oung te me. ()i.\u003cF the neighbbr's boys,\" she said, X-,a1lu; f eighteen.\" on Nellie t. WCluns nursing wounuude ieiam ien meu count~ry bouse of a friend of ours.\" \"«How rnany brothers bave you?\" I asked ber. \"I bave three,\" aseaaid \"and they are ail in the army now. My eldest brother la at the front, and of course we have met beard from hlm ainoe. He liad a very 5oodprowt in Brazil, but lie went horne irc ar was declared, and lie was very fortunate in being taken i at once. My other twe brothers, .who were on the farm with me, tried te go with the first contin- ~ent from Edmnonton, but it was se slow ere the eider went borne at once, and was taken in the cavalry too. My young brother just wemt a month ago.\" Then s explained the reason for bis delay. \"lIt was the money for the passage home,\" as said simply. \"We bad te ssII a herse but we managed it ail rigbt, and be flxeâ up the bouse for me-it la quite comfortable now -only of course things freeze wben the fýrei go eut.\"o (Yes-I know that sort of a bouse. 1 can feel its cold draughts blowing over my feet now!) \"lWere you neyer afraid te live alone?\" I asked. \"'There was nothing eL-se for me te do,\" she said after a pause. \"You se we bave put quite a bit of money into stock, and we would have to seil for very littie if we sold now-I have been very glad that I was here te keep things going. A yoting friend of ours just had te leave bis. He Remember that-yo who \u003cjecIdtý Those 'are human: macbie ,yo s Their efficiency dependsoir . od There's an energy food, as you, knov, wbidc 1 V4 one of Nature's marvels. Its viinffl p~w* 's proverbial. To-day, ms for, Is supreme as a source. Of VItaiy fdf growth. There's 'a thoùsand càlortis Of emirei4a a fair-sized dish. That's the matceebreaIWf.t., No outgrows the need for it, and ýnothiing B 4~ place. Our plea is to make thatdish'-invi#.Wl folks to plentiful use of it. 'The way to db, by serving Quaker Oats-and this is why: Quaker .1 ne Enesrdzbi Dalnty at ls BesI Two-thirds of the oats as they way te fully redses what ffltsty core tous are discarded i Quaker lie n ost\u0026.___ Oats: We use just the big, plurnp, Quaker Oats lanatways ce tbb Large Package 30c Centùain pinça of imported china froan a celebrated Eâgli. potterY. Regular Pr i ce 12c super - quality. It bas been no for 2$ yearu. ovesa 'a eas frcsm il tho world over Bnad liem te 't W tliat accotunt. Yet it ots no extra prim ,It -,W worth while -usylpg \"eQuaker Oats\" Il get a foo Me11k.t. richly - flavored grains. The reult is larg and luscieus flakes, delicieus in taste and arema. Chil- dremand grown-ups delight in it. They neyer grew tired of it. They eat an abundanoe of it. Tbat's the only Th e Quaker Qats ompany Peterborough, Ont. Saskatoon, Saslc. The Woman's Quiet Hlour ]By E. Cora Hlnd The -WesteranHomie Monthly 45 .. p. q",
         "reWestern Homo e MonU»n.y \u003e DAS' REETIAL 4mfore, 1 W Wc f 40 ew clî f o OMMisions he «Uif y7ou ~ht through an y« \"o.' lo days fros, If 7011 are flot theol. luda. to decido. F -bie. eut show, coeof ont Cabinet Grand Spedal.A butudwCabinet Grmd Art Piao O*IO «WIunaipeg Colonial,\u003eOur ou n ake, spccially a.- fatu-dfor Manitoba climate and guauatet ora teres of -ton y ears; la genuine nmahoanyr okc with ivory keys, full metal double rqPeating action, height 4 feeo t,? 1neb 'repda $400 for $289, Inmunie ooon ferma as loy as_#Uieuand$8monthly or quarterly, ha* yearly, or yearly paym nts van be arranged. 'This. in positivély the best Piano value voofeed la Canaa Reeerahpe ronooots ranolgtisn O» oet thrstlt$25$7,$5,*5 d p ~~' 1aMt matvsGrladHltmn aonndHnln i~n Gory AnpiabeneisBelHin,,Shrlc-Mnnng Clnil ndImoia Pans n PlyrPaos dsnandCli rpohna ecipieCtlge ihpie n 0F CANADA The Acme of Comfort la assured to every meurer of \"ICHALLIENGE\" COLL.ARS AND CUFFS 1ieyhe m.e dull fnh. tFe arend fi àas ihe t n colffl, and won t w Ut or crack. 'Oiallenve'* 11c\" all~u, b. vlened witha a mb Iroea weî cloth. Alwayam-nrtalwYs \u0026essy If your dealedmt ll'Cshdne\"Brand senj us25cfor c,,lkloit50e fur p. Cu\u0026Es.You'il bc dcigi4 Made in Canada New Style Bookc Sent Froc On Request The Arliagton Co. of Canada, Ltd. 54-56 Fraser Avenue, TORONTO F-16 -oo 46 A Job for Mother \"la il passible \" groaued Mrs. Parkcer, watching, from ýehind her curllufiv ydÜng hopefulsvariouslyrEmployed lu ler backyard, \"that those boy. ever bad maothmr?Y3' are tioy suppm os. 0 edoing?'* \"Piling woad.\"J Tii.y$neghbor luidaalu. \"Not Sreoly\" h.e eXc *d Sh. iad reason 10 doubt it, for eue boy had found su old iron spoon; withitilh. vasviono1l punding thi.resunding aidesofa'metl woelbarro'w,p'rodu tieneby su aimait deafenugnoise.A second Lad haviug stripped Ii. aowberny bush o.f aà its fiue, juicyr crop, wasen gapd in huling tie berrnes a ies com- panions. The . Ibid, seat.d comfortably on tie platform of thé. clothes-reel was bus- ily employed lu reducing a pile ol original- ly perftectly good flowerpots te fine dust, by peunding them with a large stone; au absolulely needless performance, of course. The fourh vas choppmng aimlessly at an old tin coffeepot with Mrs. Parker's freshly sharp.ued axe. Only on. of lhe five ma rakiug any pretense of piing wood, aud lie was mer.ly pretending. \"im supposed te b. down tewn,\"I ex- plained Mirs. Parker. \"I started, but decided 10 telephone instead.\"1 i\"Are tliey working,\" asked the neighber, \"by the. heur or by the job?\" \",By the. day,\" greaned Mns. Parker. \"I wauted liaI wood lu before it namn- the. weatiier man predicts showers. But they do'I know wiat il meaus le work. cn he ertainly have ne notion cf square Ther. must b. a great many mothers with boys cf this fan toococmmen kind- beys who wil shamelessly accept goed meney for work that they have shirked or left undone. Wouldn't it. be a geod ides for mothers te look into this littie matte- this very important 11111e mater-te make sure that the extra quarters and dîmes that their sons gleefully acquire frem time te turne are henestly earned? A- boy sliould certainly be taugit that any work that'is worth doing at ail is werth deung weil. That if he is paid fer an hour's werk, he should gite an hour's werk lu exchange for the perfectly goed coin lie is 10 redeive. 'T s faan idea liat every mether ecn, axd sh ould, instil l to her'son's youthfui1 mid. Tha\" most bôc5vu tadvee iSi0Uy in need of ths particular traici ing, je sornthing that no one viha.h ever furnihe odd jobs to boys viii doubt. It is a rare boy, nowadayas, that realy knows how to vork,-or knowmg bow, .really works vien h. la psid by the day or by the. lour. But, for the boy'.q»w- good for the, msic. of the. fine honesty that IQoldb. bsail tbrougii 1Mf.him rother siould ahow hemti virtue o? givlng su hour's work ffor an hour' e la fot likely 10 ouumt is 0 o r hlmslf. Es rnother or bis father must do it for hlm. And it la just as wel 10 bein early, for the desire 10 earn rnoney dispisys îtsel before the. boy ia fairiy out of the. kndergrten. A Reai Vacation thee day. aftor he knew war wau ,==e b.d enough noney for iei -Pm 0 f oouraej if lie cmes back the. àdixM w give hlm back bis thminga mii odouà't corne baàk, it wMi not matter to \u003enm then. Ail the. young men in Or iie4»hliod bave gone exoept -the lad whoocameminwith maand he i. trying to rais the money for bspaseage. He ia juet eighteen,» ah. went on, \"and hie mother feelsprebadly, but of course ah. i. wing. Ie'l bhave the money before ogre is trapping volves sud Tii. 8.033. Sâ of the Empire ba saurely csrried far, and it bas flot failen on deaf omis! The next dayyhavingdisposed of ali their stuff, ah. sud tie. y tarted back on their seventy-five miles drive. A binding now stürrn overtook them and they got off the trail and were lait al afternoon. At twelve o'clock tiiey carne to a settler's ahsuty and there found a welcome for, the might. The next day they set out *agn sd iu tbree days saeyarrived at orne. And yet our Dominion Govecament, in their kincily fatherly way, refuse te gnt horused to such worn as tbis. They may endure ail the bdhi\"pe, the loueli- nosa, the cold, the privations,, the labor- (apamat whi there in no law ) but they canuot have the, reward; there land is not for tiiem, no matter how bard they workE 80 this bravegir and others like hoe colonisation, but if ah. viise to own land ah. muaet yfor it. Free lsud is only for Men. omen are too weak snd too sweot\u003e sud too Irail to have an even chance wvih imeq. Surely the mm iwiiocmn face justice lu tbis rnuet suffer from moisI strabâmzus. Net Practislng What Ne Preachod 'Then yeu den't lhink I practise vhat I preach, eh?\" queried the minister, lu talk-- ing with oeeof the deacons at a meeting. \"(No, sir, 1 don't,\" replied the deacon. \"You've been preachin' on the subject cf resignation for two years, an' ye haven't resigned yet.\" One itIle wornuwiorn î.know, bad an ideal summer lait year. Hereto- fore her vacations bad been a -mrer,, sometimes spont lu a seasiore cottage with endiese compsuy, sud sornetimes iu a re- sort hotel witi cbildreu sud herseif 10 dress for tbree meals a day, net to mention the. efforts it requlred 10, keep tiose cbfld- ren quiet sud weil-bebaved. Thisawathe, seventh summer of ber married li., sud ah. called il her \"Sab- batical\" smrnmer1 sud resolved 10 have for once a real vacation. On a trolley trip in April she spied a bnaow, set away back from the road ou te e eof ahlttle wood and maked \"For Reut.\" The location was ideal, and twodays later she bad renled il. Her main object was to liv. the. simplest kind of a simple 1f., sud Ibis i. how ash. vent about il: Wiien the. lime came for the summer sewing1 lnstead of the. usuel fancy clothea, six plain, one-piece dresses were mnade for her of percale sud lawu in beautiful pat- tomse, fot toc light. Eiglit gingham dresses lu kimono style, guimpes sud bloomers to match, were made for each of the thre. littie girls. Hlot mornings no guimpes were needed, while cool morninis the gmngam one wcre tobe used. Six white guimpes eacli were also made, and the. extra summner sewiug vas doue. Barefoot sandale vere provided for eacii cbild, sud tan stockings f or emergeucies. Her one failiful servant vas 10 saae Ibis vacation, as far as ossible, so plans were made to minimize 1h. work. Tii. food was viiolesome, but paï-nly cooked. Fruit, cold cereal sud m*l were the nul. for breakfast. Appetizlug sand- wiches with baked beans or eggs consti- tuted luncheon (always eaten picnic style in the. woodls when Ithe veather pritted). A heartydneva senved at five o'clock, but al pies and fancy puddings were tabooed. On wash days the. sheets, towels, gauze shirts sud ulght gowns were taken from the. line, smoothed with the bauds sud put away uniroued. Bedtime wss seven o'clock for the. child. ren, mune o' dock for mother, sud lier ne- freshiug aleeps were indescribable. No books were taken along, but extra magazines subscrib.d for, which provided reading matter for lie entire family. No letters were written; post carda, il vas understood, were te b. the order of the. aummrer. Fridlhy father came, and on Sunday al walked a bal mile to chuncli, each child reserviug lier favorite giugham dressud best wite guimpe for the occasion, wiile mother wore a summer silk from the year before. Was she lonely? Neyer! There vene long heurs cf rest aud quiet betweeu breakfast sud bedtime, with sometimes a waJk aithougli more often neading sud mendiug on lhe perch; but neyer a strain te get three children aud herseif dressed for a hotel table, aud ne veary, aching body from a sudden influx cf company. In the fail she returned rested sud re- juvenated, te enjey doubly the luxuries she had denied herself during the summer. 1Iý leu",
         "The Weetern 41 ore . Moothly About the Farm IADE NADA LIAPANTEED OB. MDFi, F1OM INGIREDiENTS SHcIWN ON THE LABEL. AND NONE OTJ-EP. CONTAINS 540 ALUM NADE IN CAiIA~ ENGlUENT 0.111. wm @N~ ~s am~ A Chapter on Doge A boy and a dog often become such friends 'that theirattacliment toech other le noticeable. This in most often. the case vhen the.boy lias. te work alon\u0026' and to play alone a good shiare of the time, and su naturally gete more pleas- lire than usual from the, comapanioàship and\"real coniradeehip of his dog fricnd. The ordinary boy cares but littie for the dog's pedigree, but is more «inter- ested in the vay' h. playe and the number of clever tricks hoie an be tauglit. The boys who are living on unr large dairy farina here arc proud to own smart sheep doge which eau te 50 easily trainedi te drive and herd sheep, and cattie asj w'eIi. These are flot only valuable as1 herd doge and watch doge, but are fine field friends as weII. How Doge Wère Named The collias a Celtie naine that bias1 no special rncanlng ecept that given to any bright young puppy as a sort of s,1 niekuame. The test of these ear1ly sheepa doge vers trained i Scotland te helpz the shepherds lu their work.t sharp budMr.gwry fames, d ho large ntcal uf fln araround their neoks. These doga are very sensitive in nature and are easily spoiled for usefuinese by the harthnesa of an ignorant or careles trainer who attempte to teach by rougli words or blowe6 A shrinking colle pup cannot be trained. by -this method. if asiy of Brother BIll's boys try to- train young doge of -this breed they-must re- mnember to b. very patient and careful with them or nmre of the valuable ani- male may be. spoiled iii- the making* Many have muàde\u003ethus mitake. About theConly tinte when thqre la any excuse for cuffing a fine3 col. pup is when. he la caught in the act of sucking an egg which ho lha broken himeif.'The, treatment a yeung, êog gets hise ' mucli te. do with its disposition. When.onehan-a puppy of this breed he wifl find that, with proper teaching the dog iii Bot likely to beéome miachevous orAte leami bad tricks or habite. A puppy is naturally quite fugfl -of lif. and play, and viii hunt. Up orne sort of misehief unisse.\u0026Lmuoed and; romped with andi mades mucli of. te the fun ho will probab!y lie ,dowa uai coud aoem WP.L The HaiYins Soson la th GlaWOWo Dkiit, Mantoba -Rpaniela were so-called because the original breed of this typ corne frein bSpain. The Blenheim spaniel vas named f rom the Blcnhcim Palace, where this dog firet gained popularity in the time of the great Duke of Marlborough. Iu the S samte way the Kinig Chare spanici oves its name to that merry monarch. Fox ~'I terriers did not gain their naine from the W\u0026 t likeness to the fox, but from the fact that formerly they ver. used in hunting rfoxes. Many years ago thcy were sent by teirmasers ownthefoxburrows Ibm draw and kiU their quarry. It vas in those days a saying that a goodi fox terrier neyer came out of a bùrrow with- o ut the fox. Ile either brought out hie \"in IS prey dead or neyer came out alive him- Iuê self. ~U-~ The bulldog used te drive cattie and -waea lined to meet the rushes of his enormous charges by gripping them in their tendereet spot-the nose. Thus in turne ho became known as the bulldog. Thc dachehund le a Cerman dog, andi as SES bisname indicates when transiatcd, vas ed usedi for hnnting badgcrs. Hence his name--badger dog. Among huntere in Rs V.S. the fatherland this breed is stili popular, rUA aithough as a rule they are now too deli- - cate to face sucli a ferocious figlter as - the badger. ISpitz doge are so named owing to th their sharp noses. This je aiso a German y name; spitz meaning sharp pointed. Another name for thie breed is Dalmatian Idog, hecause hie native home vas lu IDalmatia. The Cornie and Hia Training The Scotch collice now known aimost ail over the world. This is oie of the most beautiful and intelligent of the w-Joie family of doge. Coles have been trained for hundreds of years among the Scottish sheep herders, and tliousands of stories mighlt be told of the wonderful work that bas been donc by these splen- did doge with tihe haggy outer coats, soft thick under coats, bright keen eves. emall cars dropping at the tips, long behave himmeif. Moys are emetlzne the i ane, aren't they ? Remember, thec, 1that goodi times, kind usage, ané.plenty te eat are necessary in the bot trainng' of the young collic. Doge that are hall ifed on pour food do not devslop 1ite the best sort of helpers. Sonie men have told us that a dafry farm la no plice for a dog, becaue' the cows should\u003c neyer be vorniecl b\u003e any- thing, and the dog wouki on7 h1p t eut dowv their yield of milk. Sucli a complaint le nover heard vhere the riglit klnd, of a dog, weil trainedinl used to help drive the cows. W. have scen a good col, sent to get cowe that were away out of sight. After a few minutes vo wouldi sec them ceoming along over the bl\u003e, vithout hurry, the- good dog alwaye behind tliem andi starting thoaL. along that etopped to graze. A snapping, vicions dog la no animal to keep ou a farin, or. anywhere cime. The puppye education, if veli begun while hie lu a puppy, viii make hlm as valuable and, affectionste as a collic ouglit te ho. It le better. if ho has but one maeter and teacher, and that this teacher knows how a dog of this sort ough.t to be traincd. It le rather a hard matter to tell juet how te train a cole to herd and drive sheep or cattie. A few of the miles given. us by those who know viii, bow- ever, bie good for us to learn. Neyer throw anything at a collic, nor kick nor etrike. hlm. Ail young doge are sensitive, and the colic particuiarly se. They cannot be taught to do thinge by commnand. If you vant to teach the coulic pup to do eomething, do it your- self wlicn the dog le with yon. If an animal le to bc stfirted in any direction start toward it, and the dog wiii 4oon etthe trick. If lie je too rough or fast, show him by cailing him back \u0026~ntly or stop hîm by a i\"\"ig cord . If hie feei\" the puli on the cord at the sanie timne you speak to him lie wii soon icarai to lîeed when voit tell hiru to come baek or to hokti steadày. I - I 1 n When wrrting advertimerg please mention The WeegtenKonie monthly. .5'- .4.4 $0 '-1 47 * r- I~tv - Ixu-mo'u5.II.,odw 1' - 4 ro# 1 e \"0k on 00e DISEM MatS Ias and How to fi ioayadr,,H. CLAY GLOVES 18 W. 3.Sit. , X.1 The Western Home Moi Winnipeg. Canada Enclosed find $......... for.... Year's subscription to The Western Inouthly. « a n . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . Town. Provinc, iHome",
         "Tfewestern 'Home Monehly 'i7 PreePress Â\u0026fter, once being taught, the colle will work houd to pleaae you, and you may then begin to tell hlm to do the. thinge which you have taught hlm. 'H. will do anything for you that ho knows how to do. The.. best place, to keep the. dog is in the. barn. That should b. hua home.\"\" A chained 'doig is not contented, and is Iikely toobecomè; cross and anappish. Kýeep the farm dog in good spirits, and give hlm as good, care as you do your bicycle, or thie farm inschinery, or the other liv. stock, and it will ho a deliglit and a moet profitable thing to have a 9ooa dog. The. Cow le .@t always at Fault When the returns from tthe daihy huai- neu ame not satisfactory it is not at al unusuai for the. owner to niake the cern- laint that hie cows are poor sud for hua friends te advisa. him.te obtain botter ones. Tiie explanation is plausible and the. remedy is -easy. te supgest, but it often occurs that the. explanation la not correct and i. rémedy- is impracticable. It la mucii easier to blime the co'ws tiian it ia to cauugy investigate the, cause of* their aiiort 'comingusud it la plessant te do this -tian iV la to-admit that the. owner znay ho more deserving-of. blame than are blamne for tii. -.hortoàng, CE which lho hae Oomplaîned Ïbou* lpaoed on the owner rather thai on CM There aie varicus ways in whicii conditions my fall below a poe standard. There are farina on Pi ch the cows siiould b. botter protected againat sadden changes of temperature from extremes of heat and cold, and lrom exposur to storna. During warm weather if tiere are no trem inth otr on kind of artificial sdesouldb. provided so that the. cows cap get away f=oethe direct raye of thilot sun during the, rniddle of the. day.1 Hot weather hma more or leu depremsng influence on stock of all kinds and when cows must stand it witiiout protection and ho tor- mented by fies there ia always a decrease in the. mùlk yield. In the. winter time good warm wel vntilated borna are of courue very esentiaL Al causes of dis- comfort siiould ho removed as fully as pcuelble. It la uselees to expect that.a cow will do ber beet if she is not satisfied and contented. On imany farros the principal efforts for improving the conditions and thus increas- ing the. productivenesa of the. cows should bç directed toward the feeding.- Changes, along this line may ho made with -great advantage. Tiiey rmay involve the vgi of larger quantities o food or the. use o more expeinsve materWian i the ration. THIS OFFER IS GOOD ONLY IN CANADA HOW TO GET THEM: These six spoons will be mailed, postage prepaid, to both old and new subscribers sending in club subscriptions to the Weekly Free Press and Prairie Farmer and The Western Home Monthly. You have heard about these spoons, now is your ôpp6rtunity of possessing the complete set of six. :Each one is guaranteed. SEND US $2.LOO and we will forward the Weekly Free. Press and Prairie Fariner for 12 months, the Western Home Monthly for 12 months and the SIX BRITISH HERO SPOONS. COUFDON FREE PRESS, Wiznipeg. Enclosed find $2.O, for whieh pe ase send nie the Weekly Free Press and Prairie Fariner for one year, The W'e'stvrn Home -Monthly for one year, and the six British Flero Spoons, postage iruîiaid. NAME................................................... ADDRESS............................................... MAL ALL ORDES T)TRECT TO TUFFlT17FEPESS, WIZNNTPEG Right Hon. David Iloyd George at landudno, Walcq, binpeting Welahà Recruita bis cows. But easy and pleasanter ways arc not always the riý:ht ways. Tii.y sometimes lead tiiose who foLiow them farastray. Comparatively few cows bave ever reaced te liitcf tiiir possible pro- ductiveness. Tii. great majority bave an actuai and a potential accomplishment, what tiiey did sud wiiat tiicy have the. capacity for doing. Tii. quantity cf nulk wlicii tiey yield la below, and in inany cases it i. far below wiiat it migiit and ougiit to ho. If the. animaIs are judged by tiieir present productiveness tiiey must be ranked as poor cows. But if posbleY*Id la nmade the. basis' cf judUient eI arni perfectly satisfied tiiat many.of tiiem will go into a Meger class. It la perfectly natural that the. owner cf a row that neyer yields more tiisu a ver moderate quantity of milk sbould ho is satisfied witiilher. But in a great many probably in thie majority cf cases, mucii can be said in behaif of the. cow. Siie bas neyer been given any special care sud attention. Sbe has never been placed under conditions which would enable bier capacity for milk production to be deter- mined. No intelligent and consistent efforts to find,.whether shle can do bet- ter than she bas don. bas ever heen made. It is true tbat she mnay net be a valuable miIk producer, but it is net fair to the. owners to condemn bier as inferior until sbe bas had a fair and adequate test. Sbe should net be put in the class cf poor cows until well directcd efforts for bier improv- inents bave been made. Miienever conditions are at fault, they shoiild bc correct cd, and the cow should then bc gi,,en a fair period cf probation. If this is dont, it is net at all improbable tbat a good part of the. iOr they may require the use cf the sam*e ,materials ln difýcrent proportions or somJe ic!iange cf food stuiFs whicii wiil net ln- crease tiie cost cf keepmng-. 1 On'some fanms wiiere the. eonvenienoe cf the. owners la regarded as cf greater iimportance tiisu the welfare cf the. cows greater regularity lintth. thues cf feeding would hcocf marked honefit. Tii. water supply, toc, la sometimes at fault. Wiiere tins la deficient or tiie quality cf the. water is pcor the. yield of milk wlll ho only mod- ierato sud the. character cf wiiat la produced iwil probably ho bad. In cases 1b.ik, tiese oail adverse criticism should ho withheld from the, cows sud ho bestowed upcn the. owners. The. only profitable course to tae.wiiere the. daury does net yield a fair profit, is te find out wiietiier the, cows are mnherently sud consequently iicpelessly inférior or whetiier tiieir low rate cf pro- duction às due to tiie conditions under wiic they are kept. If the. conditions are not favorable the. first thing te do is te improve tiiem. Iien if thie cows seem te ho weil and are contented witii tieir sur- roundings but still fail te b. productive, careful experiments in changing their food sbould ho made. Tii. present rations may keep tbema in good iiealtii, yet may not enable tiiemnte produoe large quanti- tics of milk. Or thekind of feed may be sufficient te inaintain the cow and leave a surplus from wbicb milk can ho made. Wbile the cows are on thie pasture littie attention is paid te their feeding so long as the grass is abundant, but in additioa te, the grass other feed cau b. given witii honefit. I have for years practised giving my cows some ground grain in addition te pasturage and I arn sure I bave been well repaid in the in- creased quality, and quantity cf the. milk. I -' 48 w wfth cim in bc abY. - ai ,ouk ditia.",
         "The western Home Monthly It je from liberal feeding Ibat a large part d the profitof the diiy comes. If one hau cows that are only paying their way, eperbaps notque doig tbat, it wil j\u003ee ,,e te try alraoale means to ineuas their production. If this la done 1 \u0026Mn confident it'wiil be-found that in rng Cem the capacity for production is rnUbh greater than bas been suppoeed. (Jows that have been regarded as hâe yUp to the average may develop inao superior animai and the appretl pocmMs on e may prove to bewelworth ,sigTbis,î however, will flot be the universel experience. Borne cows cannet feq\u003eond to even the best directed efforts tô make them more productive. They \u0026MWing in capacity to such an extent tb t;hey are hopeleu subjects for a profi- tbedairy and the sooner they are made rdyfor the butcher the better the in- teruat of their owners will be served.- J\"h Underwood. Pasture Seue aand Meadow Ray on the farin, more than, the constiluents of the hay itself la respouxible for lhe prevalence of digestive troubles and roen-wind. Hfay Qualty 7 he quality of hay depends to no small extent on the soit on ichi it la grown, and laiso\" affected by the maturing. The general conclusions arrived at are that as the plant matures the proportion of water nitrg. ou matter, fat, and .ish decreases, .bl the proportion of cadbo..hydrates in- creases. As aibuininoids are much more valuable than carbo-biydrates, and the greter the percentage of albumlnoids in a gie anle the more easily and per- ftectlIy il wil bedigested, il fc''ows, as the plant grows older, that not only ils nutri-~ tive value, but its digeSlibility asela dimlnished. Ray that ia=ma m a suffered much from rein and exposure and bas under\u0026one fermentation contains much lm olulematter than that wbich is well made, and bey Ibat bas beceme un- duly fermented or \"mow-burnt\" nctt only loses in feedlng value, but may, in ad- dition, cause derangement of the digestive and urinary organe. With reference le th. feediag value of HwbRcgieGo a bey vhereinalue cfdiergen ep .inh O t RcgieGoRa ,Ihere a fa wie iergenmm la lb Good ha y should b.cof a bright greenisb- .jauol aaye of the *l con- tint, if weil saved, and of apleasanî are- Mte tl1h. ai noids a vr clever matie odeur; have a bard, flrm, crisp feel, bey ia given as 7 per cent., as against 5.4 stems tough, flexible, and of medium ezcent. l* veee edow yaZbu,\u003eýlength; beadas howing inflorescence, and Loee.wsrswho want bard work, fasu-,anY seeda sent firmly adherent te the woê, and bard condition, buy meedow sie and free from dust or mildew. tî»inpreferen!ce. HunIers, racers, haeka Hardby la especlalyesteemed for herses, aift carrnage herses are rarey fed since il ladicates that1he beel grasses wlth\"sees' by. The quality ef \"seeds\" predominale and that they have bben weli be l, on the average, net se goed as thal harvested. ' Blancbed britîle,. mouldy, of ùsedow hay.Il la made earlier in the bed-smelling; or biÎtIly ferrnenied hay cms ci the \"'fmt cu,\" and later in the sbould h. rejecled by the purchàser, a- e of tlb.l\"second cu,\" and the weather lheugh herses like overheated bey *al mu botb instances oflen proves unfevor- enough, and we have seen tbem eest uf able. Il culs a heavier crop te the se black that il resembled cbarcoal. groUnd, and la, fer Ibis reason, as well as Slightly heated il dees no barm, but badly bwaus. of the nature ef the stems and mow-burnt bay acts as a diurelie, pro- luae of lb. clover plant and rye-grass, ducing excessive Ibiret and a -general mor diffleut te manage and catch just felllng-off la condition. Overheated hay È@ighbas mcadow hay. W. certairla isargely emnpleyed te give e \"«noée\" te sesaree del mre ledbady sv ,cheff cul from laferior fodde.. Clover oulderoverea1?\u003c~seed\" by I aby sbould bc bright, clean, flrm and xiudowbey su, prbea, b. ed on-flexible, free from mustinesa mould or ditii fl.smlslf o oamto dust, and have moat of the \"eve adherenl 1te the aem.c Musty hey is very evident i0 tob. senhe% ni ladue to sta«king while use la not .ly dangerous, but represenits a serious lcm of nourisbment. It la often gought to il by salting or spicing, but Ibis, ai=hughil may make il more palatable, does fot meke il more nutri- lieus. Buat Ray The feeding of old 'and new hay is an imjpertant malter, and particularly et Qbi season. Véry oflen old bay la sold off and new mêlca are oommenced pre- maturely for home. consumptien, because the old bey la the most valuai,1e and genereily 1h. moat aleable. Ini the trede bay la condlered new up le th. end eJ ?ePtember, but others consider it new untiitilaa yen okLd. There isno,ýdoubt that bey la best when about a yew pld, but it la obvious that it cannoe b. kept et that, and la many cas e . eaon'astslcks imust b.e ommenced before. No new hay, how.ver, should be uaed befoe November. Prior te that it bas net th. feod nud oondilioning qualilies of old huya new halike new oata, la apt teo oasion detvederangeet. New hay causso me ormeste \"scouxr badly. Nw bey contains more- moisture than o14z, but tibl la diffleuit te detect byrany.odnr methodof examlaation. Il là usuel reard new hay as groS irthan oldbut Ibis dependi, on- circumî4slancos, and may be very im *e*din ath. corscf a .Wel - saved àomnPle. e look for perfeclion in bey when il la about twelve mont.bs old, re i lst colour and arome. The legho ime that bey retainq its nutritive properties la about lwo years from tb. time cf cutting. Aller Ibet il deteriorates. tIbaU i housewives used te make. They alwya had barrels *haf-full cf lys mnto which tbqy threw th. refume fat from the lritcen. Te orinvy soa p, both for tb. Iaundry mand fothr lb ib, !Bmade front soda, and ils iZiating quaflilie de- pedonIe enount cf free soda il ccii- tains on the kind of fat that in used, anid on w;Îis lauod leadulteste it, It ougbîte contain nlo free aikali aI ail, but even if tbere la none, sorne cf the soda is set free when thesoap isput intowater. Soaps la wbicb Iherel13a acetinaoe\" of free fat la addition te that combi witb lb. soda have boss re ring]dnol the -theory thet whem 1h.eso\"alà Ihuasnet free, il comblais with 1he frmsfat difthe soap bier. it bas lime to, attack lb. at cif 1he s\"i. Whelher tiht aeluslly hopbews or sot la usoertarn. The fat Ihal la Usod ahould as e .roweld andithould beSabhcftor oil are clpartiu i as'rnh Olve.où foruaa «r éould fora, lié cf-Castile uoap, but upfoeptunslol soap in often adulterated with otsir, fab, Wbachmr more handnuL. =àbtla raiithrr ' and cotton- apin mid tobe EehsI;n -ad paraffin doevtvu .dd.a te 'wasbtng soapo lueromu. thuehaIi propwLîties\u003ebut unlmies by aru umd =, g¶eàt Car; a re Jlk* .ly e rutemeh.t skinet hi aunrem Enum sid othe skia tmleomb ce cten h. twaoed le lb. use cf chuan d disbonestly made sopo. Be vu caafIdImtfost mso y onemade by * ruspoMuNs Msu=fatir ia lathost abl, frail and xo .j timiid ladies, husiýting te MOI% psd b. Soplal, et ensc rroving dirt n5OOfliUI qstoe b L~* from men and Ibinga; but ulsi i ilia d. \"«And are you sfetru an J. of th. pures erial, mMDj andcons- eeSbenlest hr? t\u003e umad seientnously cmpuned, m a ni \"No, m ,\" rspfli the moderation, i ike te IrritaIs the akin\"No ose ai tnover bss ls' w and meketil suseeptbl te diseuse.Muas Jake BrWm, wdosie , pl Sop la 1h. chenica copound of a s rwe et~ek u s aikli-odeorpotash-.-wilh th.e cid agalu nez' ay. -W. rnhil ae0 part cf fat. Po\" maisap la . amop bodécb , m'aý r",
         "ThWete,'n Hone Monthly wW ualb ueea eW neti W Doar. amer flv e, theb Tm eaa't tbave i it it sic aiuykitinop Il IMM. a IbyPism teleXa,. q . ' MANITOA HJ~~ fIU2, 291%4Portage M'., tes,. I. Wr- 'a ck Ml Correspond ence Ibis.t columia, aBd an effort vill bu made tojbliéh an in- àmbuât ef corremodeno vwhich in ment ta bit, hitherto, ideit i npomalbe for .výry Imter te -îppnr inprint, aid, in futuâ*, Itera reoiveti from subecribors vWB rifé *ut-ebaslderation. Kindly notm *0 caunot md ay orrespondmntm the marne. adMd ssOf the. vrilora Ofe ltte lrspubliahed. Poruna Wiait ihg t.eorompond withhothoru mioulti mound latterm la st.arnpdplain envulajp.m und.e cover 4le i- Crrspndenco me- putnt andthhey *vi mmedistely ho Cm Tou E.l? Deu\" Edtor-I have been a. reador of yervaluablefp fr a og ime, and alway loo =' o Ibeo * gof th. mut Isue, 1 arn afamser'a son, a\" muin* em amn s god anu pation asay. I ,m a poctea i niae at@Mlu an\u0026M voe~d 11k. tetake oùe up- là, the neur future. Kow eoux mre of 7oe ruadera kbxU ll .1 me wliore smre eg. Would r~r~aetvi AUi nforumîlon wviii hUankfully re- celiotd. Zy addreas isnviththlie ditor. .îdnyu in anticipation. 1 viii Parmer'a Son. lie Nov Tarif HOdrrk, Alta., Mer 14, 1915. Dci? BIt-I have bwei a roider of yow \"dvaluble çpo orqut a number o: ~~~~% o qer, a av out ometiin u aci Isu t liahben orti to me as mueai animore, Ibm -bit. subsoription price per yoar. '1 ie Ptdbomdher\" laeertanly anmdrmcingasmnytbing oie cii ge hofi~ n\"y pa\u003e~rY i. hYoug i: and RisProblcrn» la vort l ite yea . fifty 'limes lte' muhcription prie, aid tiilere are alme othor pigea mae very .. .auhe epeiaily 'ta lte hadielor; o n10 mon of thitapecies, but wornem ISJISaima, s. there are a few of te latter aroun th e ocatry. Thte correspondenco dopartment la Very bteresting to meuetlleist. 1 notice a lew letters on \"Hail InAurancin luMarc number, ane I concur vwih \"Alberta Farmer\" lu vtat ho maya, anti atit me- tbing a 11111e stronger. lIn place. o eue tapeI voulti Bay 4\"\u003craf t,» for hier. -0cr. =alny looke ,10 .me it e o ouïe.of ltai, aroumd iitmeornany Seeking the office 0f colleotor, etcý Wity shoulti I vitho bas neyer 10012 hefflet'have te pay insurante on anaLter Mano crops. Miglit ae voil pae a law muang everyone pay ineuranco on stock. I 'haîe forty heà.d of horaes; wity n'ot Imake te grain farmer itelp.pay lthe ln. rsurance on my stallions anti mares. 1 e oie writer '\"scout\" saya ho ho, lieves hoie au \u003cet, aflong al' rigl ih- out tite fair mex. I de nat kîow about the \"ail riglit» but I beliove h. couiti erist. Il sure in not living ta go out anti de a daysa work anti have la corno lu andi do lte cooJcing. We hear of a feu' hacit- elore going \"Ibatty\", now andti lin, an\" lt le a 'Wonder 10 me there are nol more, 'tte waYnmre of lbem live ln certainly beY'onti humai expression. I have been juta SeVeral ShaCks lunttis district Ihst J, for one, woulti lite le have 10 live in. 31 have aim een inta morne viiere lter. were women, andti hey vere ne botter. 1 miglit aima say 1I-have been inta a feu' inhabited hy bacitelore kept as cloun as anv ornan coulti do. f woulti like tc, eny saniething on the uow tariff changes. Tbey are nal going te do lte goverrnent very rnuch gooti anti agriculture a great deal of harrn. The manufacturera are thte ones who wil benefit by the change. There is net a min I have talkedti t hat would net irîther pay. a bu lax of as .high as ten dollars'rathcrr titan have the duty on irn- îlects anti foadstuifs raised. We have to 'pay il any way, anti î would rather hiave te goverrnent \u003cet il direct than. pay te goverumeulttrough the tariff say, one dollar, anti lite manufacturera t w-o t'allîre, viticit is about what vo vill have i,ý do if these lave paso. 1 guoma I botter quit for tbis lime. Wiag i tis piper evory success, viticit 1$ erair)ydoserves. l1iii aigu myseif Doe-, Eng. Pffluctia ant »etructiou Vmncouver, B.C., Feb. 2ff, 1915. Doar Editor-BUavlng beon a asuent reador of your mont vorthy piper for about 4 yoars I tike tii opporlunity tè e~rsa ny appreciation for tie kood aî pleasur I have deriveti frorn il, It la essentially a home piper, andi as suob performa its duty vi'ti a vider and louner soope titan any other it bas been, my privilege 1 o a\u0026 -May \u003cccd luck attend you iu ail your efforts. As I have 9mre spire tirne ont my hands, 1 f.bink 1 miy me wdil make my debut iu yuur correspondence columu, 'laianl, if Ibis epistle pisses lte wV4.b. 1 w«s very muci t mruek by tite bIter by 'lTlstle» on \"Pi-triotisrn,\"as it se happons I have been thiineing. siongthe ame. Uies for amre lim. To hoa Irue pibriot, iu my vay ci roaeoring, a per- son muet b. reparied b live for hie eocmryý s weas\u0026àta die fer lt, just as a true Chbrieliau doos for hie faith. Thinking of te noldier as the only true ipatriot le juel as croneous mas tiiirrng of the. iart tyrs as lte only Irue Olristisus. Witat of lte noble men andi vornen who have lived i Ives of service andtiat4he. mre time lad cvery '.hancs. 10 sufer aisa? But te lIe of lteir cause dernantieti they ahoulti lire. If therefore al lt.e youmg or rather eligible mcn idt become oldiera, produc- lion would amnt cease, andthe caun- trYs trade* h. ruined. Therefore by boooming Patriote hhese men vaulti ruin their oeun.*.ry inu-a.way un vitich any eu.my cauld oerely hope to. 0f Course, mu*h -a etite of affaire is only anu eu- 'tration, as no governumont voulti albow sncb ta exiet. *PrOduotiog ila even a greater factor in wr than destruction, @Md as var exista botit are necssarY. Morally, production in eievaiting, while destruction degridos 008se Participiting. But ta corne back le te point\u003e evorY citizen or subjeet of a Country la Capible ef being a patriot ho ho moldier or boutbackr. Thte definition of a patriot may differ vitit different people, but 10, me it le tbis: (Oie Who loves bis country anti lives for ils volfare, and aiso for lte velfare of hurnanity in \u003cencrai. WeUl, 1Iguearrn getting a Irifie long, so rd gbtter dose witit sincercat visites anti best regards to al lte readers anti correspontieûts. Yours truly- Right Hoi Thietle. rWilIAlwaya h. a Subacriber Saskcatchevan, Mar. 9, 1915. Deur Edtor andi Friends-.I have beon a subacriber ta lte W.H.M. for puet four yema anti hope to bc for as long as I cun raiseste prioe of subscription. Would hiko very much to heur from. any of lte readers, vii lry ta make rny lbters inter- 1eating andtifi ansver ail prornpty. If any reidera would put me ini tauch viit any one desiring board in country, vith ail privileges cf a homne ether a con- valescent or any other I'd ho vor tfl Wil close wi0hln the ediloranath many reatiors of titis mail valuable maga- smo succesanad more prosperity ini 1915 Ihan previous year. %,cerelrBel. à Challenge Sask., April 18, 1915. I)ear Editor-1 amn writing a few linos andi hope you wil ho able te give me a amail spaoe in your paper. Weil firat I miglit say, I had an- answer torny blut loUter, but the reader toek it the wrong wae nd I get a good lotter, also a good takn o. Now I hope the other readers Baw it as I meant it. I must say \"True Blu's\" ltter of \" Goed Sound Advico\" was a good oue. I arn 21 years of age, and I had travelled about 4,000 miles whon I vas 19 years, and I have g-one another 6,000 mniles in the last txo years. 1Ican say I have knowu people of ail kinds, and I say you have te live with a person before you can say vou know them. Now \"Freaa\" say-s \"Dido\" writes and says ho is rnaking a cushion, and a hearth I..!t 1II.w Tour Ihwels Te lem@ .Co.stipated. Iff the trutit vas oly Iknown yIr *ould Sud thatover ome haif of t.he lUof ii e are oemsed by aliowing thie bowels to gel into a coesitpated condition. When the bowels becorne constipateil the. stpmach gets out of oeder. the liver doca not work propertrv an\u0026i then foilows the violent sick heaaces the sourne. of. the stomsch, belclîing of 'wlnd, heart- buru, vater brasit bilousness, andi a general feeling that you do not care tu do anything. Kreep yoiar bowels regular by using Milburn's Laxa-Liver Mu. They viii doitr away ail the offehe matter vbich colleets imthe s\"stemnandi nike you hbink tbat \"Iie is vortitliving.\" Mrs. H[ans McKitrick, Wakefield. Que., writes: .\"Por seveial years I1vas troubleti with sour stomach anti biflous-' ness anti diti not get relief unhil 1 used MilburnIs Laxa-Livor PMI. 1 hationly haken thenm two wêeks vhen rny trouble vas quite gone, anti 1 viii recomrnend thern b aan suffering as I diti.» Milburn's Laxa-Liver Pilla are 25c per vial, 5 vials for $1.00, ah man drug stores or dealers, br vwill be mailei on recoipt of Price by TChe Tr. Milburn Co., Limite\u0026, Troronto, ont. àA Wn's ympathy Are you diecouraged? la your doctor's bfl a heavy financWa load? -le your pain a heavy physical burden? 1 know what theae âmean to delicate womn-I have been discouraged. too; but learncd how to cure myseif. I vant to relieve your burdens. Why nlot end the pain and stop the doctor's bM? 1I ca do thia fo youand î ouif Wilsiat me. AUl you need do Toto writedfsor a frce box of the remedy which has been placed in my hands to be given away. Perliapa thia one box will cure you-It bas donc so for othera. If 80,,1Isaal be happy and you wiil be cured for 2c. (the cost of a postag stamp\u003e. Your letters held confidentially. Write t-a o fre tratmntMRS. F. ILE. RJ GET YOU R FARM HOME From the CANADIAN PACIFIC An immense arna of the most fertile land la Western Canada for sae at low pris anaid es terme, ranging from Si11.00 to 830.00 for faim landa with ample rainfall--irrgated lande from 8W5.00. Terna-0ne-Twen~ti down, balance vithin tvmn 7«\"ar. lu irrigfation disirko, loin fer cent. Here le your opportunity to inerease yo'ii farm holdinge by ptting adjoinmg land, or seurs your.friends -aefghboiu. For literature and particularui apply to IF. W. RUBSSELL, Land Agmnt Demk le, Depurtrnt ort]Raturail Eceua, 0.P.R., Wlnnipeg PATENTS Write for bookiet and circular, terme, etc. Featherstonhaugb \u0026 Co. Fred. B. Featheretonhaughi,]LC, M.G. Gerald S. Roxburgh ,B-A Se. 209- 10 Bank of Nova Scotia. Portage Ave. (Corner of Gary) WINNIPEG THE LABEL on your paper will tell yon when your subs-cription expires. Send in our renewal NOW 80 Wl li d. gis teo sd OPI il 818 ii ma: CO. !0 mloney Cure c( butof of doli, SISlodi hs trç",
         "The WOstern- Homo ýMonthlY :ed. ) gel ateti liver Iowa mness id a » do Iîdng1 rhicla îeld. Oaus- uSed table ,end SINYMENT ssnd PLUS. whlch la a certain *\"r for Bad Legs, Poisoned Hands. tjlcerated oits. Housemaids Line.. Carbunelet Snake luIsect Bites. \u0026a., \u00260. English Prices.1lui and $o «aeh. Sec Trade Mark of a Grasshopper on a Grme Label. Prepared by ALBERT. Albert \u0026luse. 73 Faujngdon Street. London. Enland- RIDER AGENTS WANTE B - Bicycle, with anl latest Improveanents. Wo ahipen pprmvsl ta in du.al Canada. wthout any âpoatadsfloWlDAYS'TDIfJ, it uS not cost y0u one Gant if nos sathfied aher uslng bicycle xo days. Do MoTr BU Or sund,*es ofa w\u003ericeuntil yoen ge outesi îustrated catalogue sition.Tbo lowpdocss asontsymu ONE E! rt u otl lreturuniail. Do not w5I*. HYULOp uMSTun@*,Uimited Duti 21 MOMOT, Cam\u0026d SONO N MS, fr publica- SnONG P E toD. Big nfey ss*r,. song poemas. Past experience un- le cEa, 1Propositionl positively unequaled. WoCfacce .iable work for publication and se- to 1n Yur nme.Ourcoznposing staff b- f a ý!\"nYoaitis kind. Have paid hundreds rf alai ers. Senti us your CoDE poeDi5 or UISloi~ - r Write for instructive booklet- 1t's fre .rEGoldsoltb Go., Dept. 84, Wash., D. C. rug. Good for him, I arn glad I ar n ot lie ouly one that ean do girl' wark.I miglit Bay I eau do moat aihe kidaof 'work thius: faney work, crazy work, crochet lace, etc. I gueca I arn a lueky one. Now for a bit of sport, I wiII challenge \"Dido\" ta ee which eau do the most kinds, and neatest work, and get, one of the faisex to judge.Now \"Dido\" will yau acoept the challnge? I would 1ke to cay that the one that doca flot win shahl make the winner \"a cushon. Now \"Dido\" do you agree? Iguess I must close as I do not want ta te up too much of your correspondence page. I arn always eager for the W.H.M. ta came. 1 wish it was a weekly paper myself. Now readers I would like ta knaw what you think of my challenge. My address la with the editor. I amn yaurs truly \"#Scout.\"1 As Tlb, Resuit Of a NqitftI ,CON Me Contruicted KUVRE IRONCHfIAL TROUBLE. Mr. W. T. Allen, Halifax, N.S., writes: tel feel that I would be doing you and Coa great remedy, Dr. Woad's Norway ple SruP. a grass injustice if I did flot WrIte nd let yau kiaaw the wanderful IMabJt that I have obtained from its \"Last spring I happened to contract a -OiW0f course, this is a common oc- catence, and I did flot take any particu-. haW ûotice of il at the tiane. However, it dld -not break up as quickly as colds éîmrally did with me, so after two weeks, Wi noa sigu of improvement, I began to set alarmed, and went ta my local physician who informed me that I had oogtraced severe branchial trouble as a resat af neglecting my cold. He pre- o\u0026gxbd some medicine for me, which 1 *àok for about two weeks wthaut any gu of improvernent. I was getting ýretty much discauraged by dieu, but iu. day a friend happenedta be in ta whoin I was relating MY trouble, and he e4visedi me ta try Dr. Wood's Norway Pin. Syrup, saying that he had obtained YM be eficial resuits from its use in a iiacase. 1 took his advice alad *pràcured several botties front my drug- MuI Af 1er taking it, according ta direc- tions, for about two days, I noticed a -demded improvement, and fromn that day on I began ta get better, and in ten day 9 1was in myusual health. 1Icon- ider Ibis an excellent showing for your remedy, and can highly recarnmend it to anyone afliicted as Irwas. 1 shall always put iu a gaod word for it whenever the opportuinity offers itself.\" You can procure Dr. Wood's Norway Pin. Syrup from any druggist or dealer. Prie., 25c and 50c. The genuine i9 rnaafacure only by The T. Milbura Co., Limited, Toronto, Ont. IA'V\u0026e YOUI A BAD LEG muroundad wth Ilammation m that hou OD press your on the in. \u0026ed pre At timprea. sMo 1 f50 ndrhuluYOD bave poison. 1 irId.isaul the. remedies YOD bavtrlad. perliaps Our kmess are woJdlmoathe Joints inguCeraedthe 1 mevtheti. anles.roundwblch tkW àLbe dis. coloured.. or thora mondes the disesa.. il ÏMÔI t ti-ndoe. wtfldeprive r.0 Ioyav ttendd tovarous .ýMtaI\u0026andbeen told your cSée poles, oradvased tu aubnit go amputation, but do flot, for 1 tu = IrLon.1Idont u»Y perhapa. but 1 wilL .nto the Drud Stores for a Boz c À Reply to tbe Two Broncho Busters Creston, B.C., March 28, 1915. Dear Sir-As I have ual naticed anv- thing fromn Creston for a lonç lime val write a few liues. Creston 's situated. half way between Cranbrook aud Nelcan or about 68 miles from eaeh of the above thrlfty cities. W. are in a lovely timbcrec valley at au altitude of 1900 feet. We are served by tva railroads, lie C.P.R. and Great Northera. W. have au ideal climat. and almoat evcry oue is raising the big red apple. W. also grow strav- berries and al kinds of fruit excepin tropical fruit. We have pleuty of =oo wateâr tic Xootenay and Goal Rivera rua trugh lie valley. Tiere s a a ig river bottom along lie river compruaig some 40 or 50 tiousaud acres whieh over- flova most sumxners and which there la corne talk of tie Government reclaiming. I arn enclosing a few verses lu answer ta came writleu by two girls from Idlewid and published in the Western Home Monthiy. If you think theyar ood enoughi for publication alrigit. If ual you know where to put them Up among the B.C. mountaina Close beside a lovely lake, Live two husky hearty laddies One la Bill and one ia Jake, They're the pride of al the valley And the girls aJil 1k. their style, Round their strawberries girls ail rally Sure and all the lassies arnile. For they grow the big red apple And tomatoes ail grow fine, With the pluma they also grapple And tie cherries iaw they shne Sa if the two Prairie Chickene Who ride ponies Star and Pride Would write us as sure as Dickens W. would soon b. by tieir ide. Now if you two Broncha Busters Will just write us mountain boys We would fil your hearts witb lustre Which would b. one round of joys. Bill and Jake. A Sure Corrective of Fatulency.-Wben the undigested food lies in the stomacli it throws off gases causing pains and oppression in the stomachie region. The belching or eructation of these gases is offensive and the only way to prevent tliem is ta restore the stomach to proper action. Parmelee's Vegetable PilAs will do this. Simple directions go with each packet and- course of thcm taken system- atically is certain t0 effect a cure. I I i I I \"Bo.kworm\"t .Man., 11. 4, 15. Deax. Editor-I bave been a silent reades' of the Western Home Monthly for, came tirne; 10W Iam to try ta make mySeffhar.If-I d'on't cucoeed Ibis liepohas muay tapgin teeilo he jettera m 1 h. April nurn- ber.itesd me vey much. 1 should like to heor from \"Bookworrn\" as I arn a bookworm myceif and arnderataxd the feeling. I amn a farrne's daugliter. One of th. ]and *ho takes ail th. fun that cornes ther way and looks for mare. Like Esrlas.I am fond of akating, but do notl dac.For an~oewoçs t think il m;ut begrad k 18c , Im music. I must close Dow and eave roor for came one else. Yours sincerely A\"nua TMdvlce for Nue Bachelor\" Elkhorn Man,, M\"rc 21, 1915. Dear Editor-I have býoea a\"t ha es of the Wstern Home Montbly fotcae lime, but I féal:Içaùnot be oileûtaÎse lange. I live on a farm and ffind t1h evnnB-verlngp*\u0026à I have nt acquinte yet WeJived en a f- fore though- and 1 m y-fqud cf ikn 1Im grlaMdvm'yfàd \u003clof3. \"Mere B=he:r Ci I ho\" h. fuds the kInd of a girl h. 1fr.. but h. botter b.e ca du or h. is ông10affle ail tbosrl\u0026. Mont girls 1ke lo be dreow adfl ne mmlter what other gooci or b.4 d itq s tboy have. I do not are fer a vrl whow$oo fond of dreca. Neither -do I çone $or- ça. who is aalisfied with anylhing for therlai nothing thatl obs vorce Ibmannl young voman. Weil 1 will aigu ANeTOw Axrval Bank., Maroh 21), 49185. Dear Edto-I have eflen beenauÉpe o wmite la th. oorrespondmS ---------- but until Iow have noer y*xed 0 atar n tustthal my flIal lutter wIll1 escape .waate Cse. Atog I aetaken theý ruZ Homne but a f ew iliontha, I mut mcy il I. afià paper and I enjoy the jettera immouly. Ia nol Ibis var terribfle and 1he .wfÎ4 uiaugliter of niankind thatis hs n aad by it ail? It reaIy Makesoncm d 1 look aI th. papers. uckily, I Wl 1h.e ,shores of dear aid England juil beoare It atarted; but a arrmy yt'jzo 10y, I have relatives aud friend who are 1Ww fghmg m1h. midat' of ilaU. How \"ou~a rn a waillngfor 1he day whm pencetu proclairned. Innot much god ith tbhPl but would ilce 10 oxcangel with anyone who ceeslawrte, sud answerail lelters la 1h. bel of MY Wiahing th. W.H.M. every aucoi aigu mnyseif, fml .\" Girl fr ngldw\"p A Cure fteio IÙM À sensible girl who ini June Ivo years aga married the mani of ber choice, and with him love in a cottage, bas diucov- ered a patent remedy for thes ittie dis- appointments and blue fils vbieh seem the inevitable portion 2of bumanity ber. bclow. \"Wbenever thingagodesd vrang or we are disappointerd Luaything ta wbleh we bave been loaking forward..' abés ayas, 'I try ta bave thinga espeolally nice bath sasta my awu person and about the bouse until lie mood passes. It is vwonderful what a good feeling il gives onc! \"LaBt veek, for instance, when a, sud. den but imperative visit frosa the plumber absorbed the -pennies we had been saving for a little theatre treat, I couldn't belp a feeling of rebellion against paverty. The night we were to have gone ta the play, however, I had the hous. apandy dlean and orderly, with flowers on the table, sud wore my prettiest houa. frock, vith my baîr dressed in a new way, \"You wouldn't believe how the con- sciousness cf having isen auperior to circumastances and of baving conquered fate helped me over the dhapponlment, and I think Jack experiencided b a thing.'* d= \"5$tuk4vms US' ~ WMITK, EI~ Sa Wirj.mca Â~u., TomoiiG~ nec, mande '~a ~'\u0026vIag b.à s p.t.u#m**~ AmIbes fer anoeIod.fIft.*y.àws I~ bàgmw.*. 141.1. rellev.d me cf ~4g~e~ s.~ Iboeqb lb. ~st1au.4 nul o! usm~1 ans mo 'hqg dI.trmulhd wtUL h* d~ A*bm~ 1h.ki~. ;~~b~: I d .'I*oe44buartlly wboomu.~ W~~fererS fies Aa1ha~4~ by Iud~g~tIOW~ o1x, 6 fo *.Ïo, t Ated niertos'fa- s *m wi ldwm stswa\" FW1Tobu lb W. Have it. Wrte ue and »Metios ý .ur wafts. vu~ e\" ,~ j'; v v-J *--a;s'~-- .s'~* - The Western Home Montbly a Welcorne Guest Daysville, Sask. Mardi 16, 1915. Dear Editor-I enclose herewith my renewal subseription for 1he Western Home Monthly, which la a eleome guest every month. I enjoy the, correspondeace columu sud tura over t ta sP' fi.at.* This is lhe fiat lime I have Pi edrap eaough courage ta write, but if y u do ual 1k. me put me iu th. waste bas t. I arn at .sen .e h tceountry firct clama. erm. bas eemSntquit. a lot of parties Ibis winter, ich I suppose wil soan comhe ta au end now thaI th. busy days are here. I hope the people will gel a pod crop Ibis year, as last year vas quit. a failure. Weil I will ring off naw, wiahing your paper every succeus. Would any of yau members cars la write? I vil ag MYS\u0026 The Wild Blue Eyes.",
         "fié esten HorneJIntily Tofee-lngneientm:Two lbe.sugar, oe- fourth IL butter, ona ti Swisa milk, one teaupfl ril, anifla.Method: Put erq U»%,Maihlf '\"\"oe easpoon coentarch la k Î' ' * tg~il k boils, then idd the Àwims 9rpe fpjpea dÏeJ-.ed î Gramam or white mllk, anq jet the whole boil for haif au '= il14 bue' ocra-.heur, not toc quickl Stir oontinually as ýmpbolier. îaand Ïà until it nlaPt te burai d. vnlab etmk- vo cups,0\u003c VIïn- moti \u0026a 1auae-ng ndtû im.ing frun fire.It should be sugary when m-aBion mime h L uulppes. hn edready. If put in a cool place when poured Il 5 Upfs4 tliinbutteredalices of eut, it shouMd ha ready for cutting in ten Nui~s cloves br md. aient for 25 sandwiches. Mdàutea. i JRItes, re- Lasn\"t OatM-mo DrapCale-Two me teup \" m\u0026 i uteedBead ---am uq -oe Gauti\u003e er, one of the foremout dietitians ki~ \"the n ePCu='fte'- bd asdeçcribed a bai of ideal mrsdi words:, \"Good bread ought an to b. lighrmtmigadwellraimed. IR ua~arummjwatt the ahould give a mrnium of twenty-two per MÎ1 the the Weil bete cent off a golden crust, brittie and difficuit teidisov«mt detach from the crurnb. The latter it anid. eoaaand'flavorng Stir inought t e etiand ihelarge cav- M ur enbugh -to nake* a battr that wities\"-im-it- if, mter the bread je cool it ia ~~~~dop from -a M)om e Drop, on. a but*ered, moderateÏy compremsdUbtween theiumÏb aàd ookm a mrte vn u- and index ine,,the crumb ahould net -laalirI ul\u003cnd rmoins, or zoùràt àd oeauostick 1together bs hould slowly return to Make a change. *I'orten make -puPat a orignina oume. it Should not clung to ~ and then add a littie fruit and soea uts te the lfingers which kaea it. Good bread ~~ th tii. ftt the batteri--Mw4. riscol, should abeob a great demi of iquid with- ~ Wab.,U B.out being diuolved whien it la moistened. -Uatll oft ,Sîvouryýi-nt a fryin»g-pan IaY. It ought not to tub away under the ingeai de, tbe two or three.slioes f hait pork, fry untal The celer of the crtunib ought to be very a, 1tjthe a and1brw ;'on, the top Jay twoup clear, reJlwih-white and mlightly trans- etisuar, one fuisof oidboiled pot*tees chopped 5a.lucid; atm aweet odor of wheat ahould re- OWc1 o ne of\u003e Sprinkie over 'a little Pexpa. When caUl neither sourness, mouldiness nor fer- md wo ed brwnd o te ude siafo d in baif ms mentation. Dried i the oven without be- egy flne. Stir you would an omebat. Sev hot. mng bmked, good wheat bread qhould not Rocaful of sait- Lemon Cream Tart--Cream well a cup- 1o98 more than tharty-uax per cent of ita e over thefira fu f sugar and half atablespconfùl ofbut-. wdet!' des while hot; ter- beatli the yolks of two eg and 'u*ce After standing twelve. to fifteen hours b., about a anc1 rated rinc of alemon. Netda the breadbecemes \"atale Ila condition due iat It will Wu tcupfulof bot rnilk and a littieovrme to chernical changes withhi the boaf. Sinoe aide to cool. Lightly stfr i the well-beaten about two per cent of the water witlin e-Twotable- (mtiff) white\u0026 . Fihto nmre flaky pie- the bread han eecaped, itla not leme whole- sait, one cup crust, and bake from haifto t ire-quarter. nmre, wbile et the arne time, it la more imnatoes, one- of an hour i a moderato oven. accessible te the digestive juices. HiousehldSuggest-Ions Varicua kids cf bread, havlug aneal 40 their basis, are the corn feeds meat gener. ally in use.. 0f these \"ohnnycake\" and \"hoacake\" are perhaps e eMost pepular. Botb are easi1 digested. Butter, or semi other tormc atoo dh ctnwith both kinds cf cak~e for two reme: be- cause, as in the case cf rice, it prevents, the cern trom formlag fite a stickyrnass in the stomach; and because the butter Supplies an abundance cf fats and a aligbt ameunt cf proteins, la which, psrticularly the fats, corumeal la aemewbat Iacklag. On this account cane and corn syrup s and molasses should net be eaten as a \"apread\" with these corn breads, since the Mêlas- ses, like the meal, la compoaed chiefly cf carbohydrates, and oversupplies the body with this clament. Stuffai Tornatoos Peel rnedium-sized tomatoes. Remove thin slices frem tep of each and scoop eut the center. Sprinle inside with amitlun- vert, and let stand for hait an heur. 'F111 with pineapple and celery eut i n al pieces, and English walnut meata, brokcn in smail pieces. Granish wîth parsley, and serve with mayonnaise dressing. Inspiration [n Entre.. Those who are abroad this sumirmer wl1 return with many ncw ideas. Especially suggestive are . many cf the entrees. Translucent strips et cucumber, scrvcd with a spoonful cf Ro11andai~ ac as an accompaniment te a bit cf Iil prob- ably bc a novelty to the averagNiousewife. If she dines at the sameplace a few weeks. later she may be served with diced cucum- bers, beiled with cream sauce, or again, the may bc quartered, diped *la butter and fried la a littie cil or Uutter. These al taste goodd are easyte prepare. They are worth remembermg, particularly if one cf the home group la convlaced that cucumbers in their maturai state are in- digestible. What has the appearance cf delicate leaves of lettuce served with a suice cf boilcd tongue is in ail probability the out leaves cf the sala(1 cut into ribbons and cooked ike spinach, always with the ubi- quitous onion in the water for flavoring. Small carrots scraped, parboiled and roaBt- cd arouzcO. meat are a favorite vegetabis q, I Many Cepe do not likce the crutedçe Of' tha bred as miso the I\"heel,\"1 yet la diambrdi they throw awy. the inSct valuable poo f the bread for ità more nourishig tiamu the cruan»\u003e; la moe soluble i water and richer i nitrogenoua rnatteasinh the proportion of two to one; and la also more digestible. Graham Bread For graamm bremd, talce oe pint of bu t- terrnik or sour milk and add one teapoon of soda, oue-hait cup augar, oea cup fiou~ oe-balf cup cornmeal, two cupo grM=a fleur, eue-bauf cup mol ansd eue tee- SPOOn SaIt. Bake oeeand Ze-hall heurg. A soft graham bread may ba made as ioilows: Mix the mnr Mneh'th re gieadding sufficieut warm water te maea soft dough--one and eue-hall quarts grabam fleur, oe n t white foôur two teaspoona sait, one cake compreset yeast, oe-half cup molassea, two table- spona butter (melted), Îaboujt tree cupm wmrmn water. Beat thoroughl rad mt0 a warm place until it la uite igt hn beat d suainad liibra 7,etnahf fui. Whenlit ampm put te ael moderate oven su ae three..qureio an heur te an heur. uresc Arizona Brown Bread The materiala required for thia. bro'w bread are: ene cupful of baking molaaaea oneeupfleofgraîamflour; onec=fuilof white lour- ena cu fui of sweet mik;ne teapcfu cJakang powdea.; one temepeonful of .khgsoda; oua-halt eu- ful of chopped English walnuts. To make: Put the bakingrpwder i the white flour; sift it i a bow . almo the gfthém fleur; add the milk stir well then add the nmolasses in wbich le soda ha's been niixed; atir thorough]y, then sdd the nuts. Put the mixture mto a wefl greased oblong baklag pan, about four by ten inches; bake in a moderate ove n twenty te twenty-five minutes; try with a broom spliht temeag if cooked sufllciently- if thes splint cores eut dry, it la donc; iV wet or sticky, halte a few minutes longer, being careful net to let it hurn. This is good bot or cold. lt amn a La %mi fvngr iai ds. MA t tsap me tih \" fomn the bottis !MaeaiRmOmeaSadwWcb -w butter, -am teaspoo id m omme êaniia muPL om Pm CI tics hta fLe ijito end hitn hea roUr ba tue Sem ate heade mri pu t hent utSt Garni Exter- it dt..",
         "The Wester'n Home, Mwonthlv t edpo yet in rit à penoua, )\u003e cie; éf but. Le tea.. Lde as order ter to le-hall fleur table- ScUp8 set m lien ,0 hall brc'wn ,fui -o1 c; one e-hall white Id the put bake l. tà MIl40 r er- and some with vents lutter ilarWy aiWd lias- îiefly Sthe WU IJ feignera. TheOsifota are bssted rùoq0sitly and coked in all tspas àm cooka rosat poate und hu, If the carrota are large the process j sme, except that they are ether ore ý quoâtered according to their A mould of bodled rice seasoned wugh and topped with a aponful of cf~ped uabromabrowned m butter la oaeti f a novelty in rice serving and n bied rie asfoadAor hall a itomato la another vegetable ar- rsaimeiit whieh the observingwornan will do el to duplicate as an accompaninent to gtuk or rosat beef. Potato that stand- by oi-ailAmericaii householda la practical- go I oly vegetable not encountered i Yrech d italian restaurants. Rice ami \u0026begmslin unhxited variety are used ~siPea-P]?es, if reAil young and frw.pi cked, should neyer b rumned by klngo,* . If you rnse thernin cold qoeafter sheUmig you will îeed nlot mm laa upful of water to a pint of po. over them tightly aid watch te PMI-be they are staneLhrcugh. You be amazed at the short time it takes. ;Lwiil be ne water te drain off. Just adbutter, pepper aid sait, tos ightly, ÈVUorVO at once. Stuffed cucurbers-Â perplexing que@- -jtoStthe house wife with agarden ofber oinhow te, use up large cucumbera. lueyare delicieus when stuffed and are a N oete dish of vegetariana. Mix togeth- oee.ha of flnely chopped nuts, a gcod- onia on aredded, oie tablespoonflof dffliedparley aid another of chutne if W»y.Besnwith none abfcle ponu u*aid a dash of pepper. Remove the m~afrein four good-sized cucuxnbers and taeks out the Seeds. Fi11 the sections with tbi above force and fasten tegether with dÀitil Heat six tablespoonfuls of olive oil aid brown the sections of cucumber i it »M ail ides. Pour over them a haif cur fui cf water aid alow them te bake slowry foi ai hour and ahaif, basting frequently. F-ried Cauliflower-Parboil in Sait and water a good-sized cauliflower. When diethrough,' though still firrn,' drain, eut ito àma leces and la y out tecool. Dip brscrumbs and fryon both ides i- bell- igbutter. Sprinkle with grated cheese mdserve very hot. Cream cf Pea Soup--SheHl the peua oe'er a pit cf thein with water, cook unti tânder aid season with oie tespoonful cf sàtand a sprig cf reit. Remove oie- haN cf the pes anad press through a sieve. Cock thorougbly two tablespoonfuls of fWr and two tablespoonfuls cf butter 'wiiih have been bleided in oie quart cf 4~tjnilk. Then add the pressed peasanad théewater i which the pesa were cooked. lust before serving add oie cupful cf1 iffipped cream aid the whole pesa. îLettue asa a vegtable-Put a good-1 si head in boiling water for five minutes. ge i cold water, remeive quickly aid dry ini a napki. Put some thin slices of bacon in the bettom, cf a pan, put the let- tuce-head on top, cever with soup stock and bake for about an heur in a slo'W even. Wheix the liquid has cooked down almost te a jeily, Iift out the lettuoe, season with MaU and ppper aid pour ever it a white1 sauce as f or \u0026aàliflwer. Z ba wth Creani Sauce-Neyer Éoecabbage long. Al aheuld always re- fllfin crisp as it la xnuch more digestible se. 'With a Sharp thi kife shave a nice, smal hesd cf young cabbage fine. Peur ever it a it cf boilmng water aid ]et it bell geîtly orten minutes. Then pour eff the water, . a nng it in a colander. Add te, the cab- bage half a pint cf rich milk or eîough jus\u003et te cever Wheî the milk cornes te the L add a heaping teaspoonfuil cf fleur Ritendt a paste with a littie reilk. SesoZt t.te with sait aid pepper.. Add a teasoonful cf butter aid turninito a heate dish aid serve. Minced Oabbage.-Parboil tender white cabbage aid put inte a chopping bewl aid cliop fine. Te a quart cf chepped cabbage Put two tablespoonfuls cf butter and ene Of fleur in a saucepan aid stir smoothly. Then put in the cabbage and Sait aid per- per te t-iste. Add twe tablespoonfuls cft vinegar and stir ceîstantly fer five mrn- ut-YS. Ile.p up in a heated covered dish. Oarnish %?ýith hard-boiled eggs. Sw'e,'* -11 )-tatable, Mother Graves' Wormi it d.. \\. ik surely and prornptly. P Glnigerbread 1 conaider the most economical and in- expenive cake tebe gingerbread. Itlas se substaitial aid satlsfying for the childrei. Oiepouid of fleur., Four ounces of dripping. Oie or two eusB. Milk aid water (about hall a plat\u003e., Foiir onricos cf cheap brewn sugar. Two teapoonfuls cf ginger (freahly grated). Haif a teaspoon- ful cf carbonate of soda. Rub drlpping inte the flour. Mix la ginger aid sugar. Warm tegether the treacle aid milk (take a littie for reixing with carbonate of soda). Beat up theg. Mix carbonate cf soda wihail milk aid treacle, add te the egg. Peur into the fleur, slowly. beating ail the turne until bubbles cerne on the tep. Peur intc a Yorkshire pudding ti, aid bake fer oie heur. Te CleanGlomo Procure a wide-mcuthed bottle (a fruit botleie ith acrew top aid rubber ring la excellent fer the purpose), roll up each gleve, but net tightly,.lay the gloves in the bottie, asa may pairs as will hallfilR the bottie reay be put i for cleaniig. Fi11 uP the bottie with petrolSerew on the hid aid p ut away froin open firè. Leave tiil the following day, then. squeeze eut oie glove at a tune, replacine' the lid securelY... n ; Lay the gleve ci a tewel on a table, aid rub quickly with anether cleai cleth cr tewel. The glove may be put on the haid for cleaning te get at the fingers better. Rub linger ti, paires, writs-all the dirtiest parts--lardad as quickly as possible, as the petrol evaporates quickly. Take oe at a tiine from the bottie and dlean in this way till ail are dene. Haig in the epen air te get free froin rneil. A littie French chalk rubbed over them is an imprevement. Den't threw away the petrel. T he dirt falis te the bottcm alter a timne, aid the petrol can be peured off and used several times. Always keep the lid tightly s crewed dow-n te prevent petrel evaporating. Th\u003ee mst delicate kid, suede, or. any. kind of gloves may be cleaned successfully in this way, indeed ahnoet any article cf wearing apparel may be cleaned wfih 1etrol. = Summertimel Su-ggestio.n S. On the Use of Food .conftion When berrnes corne, mix thji with Puffed Wheat or: Rice. Blend, the fruit\u003e with the-se flaky mQrs els which taste like toasted nuts. Puffed Grains,, youl the cream and susar. 1.Sour Murk Cakes Dark- Raisin Cake-One cup brown sugar, one-haif cup butter, two eWg, oie cup seur milk, oie teaspoon soda, oie cUj chopped raisins, two cupo fleur, oie-h$ teaspoon cinnamen, eîe-fourth tçaspoon cloves, oie-hall iutmeg Mix sugar and fleur. Add eggs and :-M. Add flour soda aid spices, aid fleured fruit. Bake âow1y; for oie heur. Crearn Cake-Two eggs (broken fione. hall plat cup), fil1 with thick sour cream. one cup sugar, oie aid oie-haE mcup fleur, oie teaspoon soda, ene-haif teaspoon bak- ng powder. Mix and bake in two layem. Raspberry Cake-Twô eggs, oie cup brown sugar, oie-hall cup butter, oie cup raspherries, twe cups flour, oie tablespoon seur milk, oie teaspoon soda. Mix as for the other cakes. Qiocolate Cake Three ounces of butter and lard (reixed). Three-quarters cf a breakfastoupfut ef sugar. Oie aid a haif breakfssteupfuls cf fleur. Two teaspoofls of cream ef tartar. Two eggs. Half a cupful of mlil. oie teasponful of carbonate.cf soda. Beat butter and sugar wefl together. Add eggs oie by oie, beating weJL. Mix the dry fleur with the carbenate of soda and crearn ef tartar, aid add gradually, te, the mixture. Loat of a1l the mill Weil grease two sandwich-tins aid put hall the mixtur inte each. Bake li a quick oven. Whien cold, ice them by putting a quarter cf a pound of iclng sugar aid oie aid a half tespoonfula of any good checclate powder into a basii. Mix weil together, aid make ite a paste with a littie boiing water. Spread the paste over the cakes with a broad-bladed kmife. Flavouring reay be added. as' do 1 Fo6r a dairy dish,at sup- per or bedtime, 9s t~s t o a sted wholt-grain bubbles, delightful to thte. taste. And nothing Wheat or Rice bas every food granule means easy, comnplte digestion. crisp and else made .explodçd. airy,, fromn Trhat Garimh c* crç=r with these P u ffe d Grains. It is like ad-' ding nut meats to it. P-se Puffed' Rice in -dandy making. It taÉtes like nuts but is far more flaky. The candy -crurflbles .easily. \"Pqc çet;fr-puffed7 O sait, thern like peanuts, or : -butt er - lUce popcorn. In .Puffed Grains, every, ta feeâs. And they do flot tax., the stomach. 117 uùffecRicelsc Puffed' Grains with creamn and sugar reveal \u003eVt onled- light. Millions of pounds are being sérved at oithçr times than breakfast. Bear this in mind. The more you serve these graing il,. puffed form the better for ail concerned.' Prof. Andé,- son's process best fits them for food. It makes- coife- tions of them. It does in a thorough way what cooking does in a haî1f way. it breaks up the nutriment celis. The handiest foods in your house this summer.will be your Puff ed Wheat and Puffed Rice. [ TheQa.Ous.s Sole make ra .PETER.BOROUGMf,. nt, eIIc*ATaON fin4, 'yl",
         "rarWester'n HomeHMônthfy nh e Dtr. Rot *mer ohould b. the.-a~iy 'co li the home, both for obidren an auts and should be wellreoommended as such for ho chaxe no exorbitant fee and if called inxi w y enough it li prevent diseases as weklas cure themn. Try hM. Clean Manda Moet persona who take any pride et anl i the presorvation of habite of ordinary oleanlinesa take if for graated that their handa are cean, for titis wo.uld aeem to lbe the very foundation of personal deoency. I ail cities the large departmexit-ores, as weil as the drug-stores, are fitted with a vast assortmnent of thinga that are aolely for the care of the hands,-.tnanicuring tools, files, pollahers anid witeners,- leading one te suppose that much thought and cars are directed te the beautification ôf the banda, and as a natural deduction, that here, at least, éleauiness might corne even before godlixiess. It la aad to, b. obliged te suggest, never- theless, that inoot persona have banda that are not washed often enougit and not wàshed thoroughlly enough. The bacteriologista tel us that if baif a dozen people simply dip their'banda into a basin of water, and then remove thcm without any effort at cleansing, the water will ho fouxid te swarm with bacilli. One shudders te think what would bappen te that water if a1.ew of the average cooka or bakers or handlera of fruit should dip their banda iit. It U the food question that makes this mattr of clean banda so vital. Ail the food we eat muet firat pass through human banda, and sometimes throughmayo thora. It bas been proved tat typhoid fever çan ho transmitted te othera by a person who bas long ago recovered frora the attack and that it may ho and la donc tbrough tue agcncy of dirty Ixanca. A case bas been reported where a cook in- fected member alter member of the fami- lies she workcd for, although site had been a well woman herself for years. As to fclod, vo e phamore at the rnercy of! our cooka than01fany one cisc. The food ray be, and roalys, flot really dcoean whçei it la delvered at the. kitchexi door axid it resta vitit the cook horsiffBo te lixidi it axid ean it that it sha be free from germa whexi aorved to the family. Some dirty hands are harmIess, and nmre appsrexitlean banda, are danger- oua. A hand ,covered with the soil of gardening may bc a terrible sight, anid yet there may not be a dangorous germ on it, wheroas the pretty haid of the gifr1 who goos out without gloves and holda a car strap or touches a railing May be inviaibly soxled with teeming multitudes of germs, smre of which site will convey to her moutit with the xiext piece of candy she eats. Handa should always be most carefully waahed before food la touched, nover mind how harmiesa the previous occupa- tion may seem; and gloires should alwaya be worn when one la outdooro. Facts About Vourseif nhe average nuxnber of teeth'is 32. The weight of the circulating blood is 29 pounda. The average weight of an aduit is 150 pounda 6 ounces. The brain of a mani exceeds twioe that of any animal. A mani breathes about 20 timea a minute or 1,200 timea in an hour. The average weight of the brain of a man i la 3j pounds; of a woman, 2 pounda Il ouncea. Pive hundred and forty pounds, or one hogshead and one and a quarter pinta of blood pass tbrough the heart in one hour. The average of the pulse in infancy la 120 per minute; in manhood, 80; at sixty years, 60. The pulse of females la more rapid than that of maies. There may be other corn cures, but HoUo- way's Corn Cure stands at the head of the Iist so far as results arc coflcerned. - , k UST A. RAE 0F Thoulght ho would dise--Stili more proof of the amazing powers of Dr. Cassell'a Tablts th AII-British remedy of world-wlde popularity \"Had it not been for Dr. Caseell's Tablets I believe I should neyer have worked again; I hardly think I could have lived.\" These are the words of Mr. Ernest W. Barrett, of 32, Cecil Road, Gloucester, England, a young man now in the -perfection of health and vigor. And he goes on: \"The Tablets cured me of a long and serious illness when ail methods I tried had failed, and now I arn as weil and fit as anyone could wish to be.\" '¶t in ight years ince the trouble camie on. 1 caughit a cold, which turncd to pleurisy and rheumatic fever, and for nine-weeks Ila between life and deatb. When at length I could ho taken downstairs 1 was a wreck of my former ..... self, wasted to a frame and weak as a baby. One aide was ail drawn up, and if I tried to straighten myseif the pain was intense. I used to hobble about on sticks, or get my father to take me out just * _a littie way leaning on him ail the time. But instead of getting 'better I got ~IJ 0nt~*worse, afl the medicine 1 took proved quite useless. It was thought I was going cent**in a rapid decline, and that nothing could save me. I M'as just a frame of bones by this time, and 1 can't tell you how weak and miserable 1 feit. \"«However, my father chanced to read about Dr. Cassell's Tabets, and got me .... .. smre. I shall never cease to ho grateful for the resuit. 1 hegan to meiid almost at once. Slowly my strength returned, I brigh tened up, got au appetite, and it d i î- -was just wonderful how 1 buit Up flesh. At the proeut time 1 amn a littie over the weight for my beight, and in the very pink of condition. I have never had r a day's illnese ince Dr. Cassell's Tablets cured me.\" U~aItay.bIct bWlts luth hhaw..y b, suaUfi~S ~ssuiucu le H*IUFApUfl(O Pv CB.ITêWAu I ri %colier Mhalt a Young ho.., a,. Adultiu. ltme Tabwhta lem\"s dam11belere The tablette Mar k with a wia..dlasa. Jeter. or niuoed te and tabien Witte AYI liqui as prdlinai. »Mdicin At o No. 2M0. muurâcIaBt* av Tihis is a recovery complete and genuine, and the aecount related, truc heyond ail question, is gi 'en out of sheer gratitude for new health, strength, and vitality brought about by Dr. Cassell's Tablets. Thjis reliable and thoroughly tested reniedy is 110W in wvorld-wide repute for Nervous Breakdown, Neurasthenia, Kidney Trouble, Malnutrition, Norve Failure, Sleeplessness, Dyspepsia, Wasting, Infantile Weakness, Anacrnia, Stomach Disorder, Palpitation, and they are speially valuahie for nursing nhothers ani Young il approach- ing womanhood. Ail Druggists and storekeepers thtrougliotit the Dominion seli Dr. Cassel's Tahibet's at ;-) cents. Peoffle !in outlying dittr;cts -shou1.keep Dr. Cassell's Tableis by tliteiii.ini case of energeucev. SEND FOR A FREE BOX A free sanmple box wilho sent yoii on rveeipt of 6 cents for mailing and packing, by the sole agents for Canada, }Iarold,F. Riteliie and Co., Ltd., 10, MleCauil-street, Toronto, Ont.I Dr. Cassell's Tabets are inaufatued oieyhy Dr.j Cassell's Co., Ltil., Mlanchiester, England. tHT E g BONES",
         "The Western I\"\"OMO, Mont hi\u003e' t the else. flot the. cook At it d to and iger- al Of 1 yet mn it, who hcar îibly ýrms, outh muîy ever Lipa- raya The TwiliIjt Wtch Thei twilight iitcli cornes witli lier stars And trews tihem tbrougli the blue; Pim- breathes belowthe suniset bars Abreath ef Meadow rue; 8 traili er veil srastle skies Âhd mutters in the trees AM in the wood, with firây eyes, Lb. W kthe mysteries. -Ii twIIight witcli, with elf and fay, , mooing down the alumber way. le.p, my dean., alcep. à$e-wmeglt witch with windlike tread Mu ntered ini the room; %Ir alarounid your trundie bcd À, ýWh isersmnthe gloom. LçiýtîÈ:I brouglit my steed along 3y i steed of gleama, To) jpw you,Ilik a breathýf song, mb t, he land of dreains. i aintle witch who takes your hand À]d lead you off te fairylartd, lb. far off land of sleep.\" Al In the Famlly Phbaps Jonta i did net know h.v va a ard mnwitli bis-f.riy t is paisblete look at tings fromn a seifiali aIsos long that yeu grow blind te every- Uigexcept your own wants. One day ïWsin spingi, when Jonathan was. ready toirv nto town, his wife gave him thirty- fiv. dollars tbat she had been saving for moaths from hler butter and egM money. «Goe te the furniture store,' she sad, \u003c'sud get the new parlor carpet.. They kaow the ene, for Iad them lay it away for me a month ago.' .,l day Mrs. Higgs went about lier work dùgmg But when Jonathan carne there was no roll of carpet ini the wagon; instead, hit.ched te the back of the wagon, was a uew cultivator. .I¶ found just the cultivator 1 necdcd,\" he explained, glibly. \"I dn't think 1 enuld afford tegt it until you gave me that thirty-five dollars?\" \"But my carpet?\" Ris wife's eyes werc w*t, sad she bit lier lip te keep it fromn trembling. \"Oh, the old one'll dol\" hie said, with lght. contempt. \"What's thie use of epcnding money for a carpet? It ain't ggod toecat, and it don't make you any money. Now that cultivator wdll make me a hude bushels more cern.\" \"But it was my money.\" Tears at hier dsPpointmnent and lier huéband's in- Mistice could not bie kept back longer. \"O) psliaw,\" said Jonathan, lighlty, \"it's àhin the familyl\" The oid carpet was ful of holes, se Mrs. Riggs tore it up, and lef t the floor bare al Mimmer. But Jonathan did net mind at aU. The crops were good, and one day i tlie fal Mrs. Higgs and one of the girls went te town te buy the week's supplies. ARl the men were busy sowing wheat. The farmer wrote a check for a liundred snd sixty dollars, and gave it te has wife. \"Maria,\" lie said \"Iget this cashed at the bank; then go to le hardware store, pay themn a hundred dollars, and tell tliem te ffld out that gaseline engine they were Ehowing me. It is toe hard work for me snd thie boys te pump water for ail the stok this winter. And step at the cloth- ing store and tell Mr. Jones te send me that suit 1 tried on. Gct him te take off t»ô dollars if you can. And you can pay that thirtHr.ollar account at the grocery store, too.J It was dark when Mrs. Higgs and Mary dreve up that evening, and when Jonatlian went out he was astonished to sec a new buggy trailing along behind the wagon. And there were other things in the wagon that gave him a further shock. * \"Maria \" lie asked, shiarply, \"did you oer thal engine?\" '«il7uget My suit?' «'o'She handed the Unes te one of the boys. \"Nor I didn't pay the grocery Sccunt,\" she said, coolly.' 'You can't cat FREEFI OM1E A Bottie, of, Bksh. o6Ronom. a suit non a gasoline engin. uer asreoeipted bil414, and tly don't make you any money. \"i-Lgt a ew buggy te save Wear on the wagon, a new paror carpet that will save ceai by keepi the fler warrner, and a ne ag ha'lco fo ih.AndI1 get a new churn and a lot of kitchen thinga t e lep me- and tlie girls do tlie wrk- they will keep us from wcaring eut\u003e and s9,ve funeral expenses.\"1 \"Btty a m mn, and I toid you -\"gasped -the amazd onathan. \"O9h, Y)s, said Maria, liglitly \"but it's aillth e faiiy. Take liold Lierc, and ou anç~t the beys get these things un- There was something se nesolute in lier tene that lie took hold, snd lield bis Are You Sufferlng From Poison Soundsrathera strange question, doffl't And very likeiy you tbink it doemn't'm. Yl te You. But consider a mmn. erliapa it does. 1 xetyou've often licard 4h. exprepr, Sio tatSo-and-Sesmnd hi-, POISNEDagainst semebody es.' W. ail know what that means. It means that evil thouglits bave been put in- te, So-and-So's mind. And wlien w.. hear of it we déplore it. But I Wonder if it ever occurs te us to speculate as te the numnber oftUies we poison. our own minda. We do, you know. W. cultivate thouglits whicli wonk the deadliet barm on«our characters, just as a slow poison would work bavoc on our bodies. Take for example the babit of jealouay. Some o1 us shlow jesieus thouglits te creep inte our minda until tliey become se jaun- diced that tliey are aImait. past praying for. It fa just as thougli we allowed a desdly eosn te creep i and work destruction on alOur fluer instincts. For jeaiousy can become a habit. Its influence creepa on like a corrosive poison, aud before wc know wliere we are t lias gained a tenacious liold. But the tbing te, do is te prSi t thi 1 suppose there is hardly a woman among us wliolias net at some time or other felt lieracif iil-uscd by Fate. And usually, Wua at the moment when we are feeling particularly sorry for our- selves, we can cail te mind orne acquain- tance wlio seem a speciaily blcused by Fate. IT'S NATURÀAL tht we ohould feel a littie envieus. But we must take car. net te let this littie germ et cnvy grow sud ferment until it becomes an active poison. I ihink there la ne more Unhappy neýo i ail the world tlian the woman wolt lierself become a p rey te jealousy. She cuts lierself off rem ail joy. For alie can extract ne truc plesure eut ef anytliing ah. osse or anythin ah. dees. \"Cern amions are odieous,\" iced when tliey e thrtbrmsîd jealousyl Whnent cultivate the habit of CON- TENT? O r if we can't b. completely contented witli our own conditions, wc can at least refrain from jealeusy ef others. Life is a building. It nuses slowly day by day, throughi the years. Every ex. perience, every touch of another life on ours, every influence that impresses us, every conversation we have, every act of our commonest days, adds something te the invisible building.-J. R. Miller. A Ready Weapon Againot Pain.-TIere is nothing equal to Dr. Thomas' Eclectric .Oil when well rubbed in. It per.etrates the tissues and pain disappears before it. There is no known preparation that will reach the spot quieker than this magic Oil. In consequence nt ranks first among liniments now offered ta the public and is accorded first place aniong all itS competitors. L little psinlesvlng nosear. 1bve sud with Bfteeu ywnem aoe1 t' t dleteimin*tion t. mk My wo k sa*m Write for anokssd turbhw parble Mrs.E, COAMT 224 SMITH 8 !iiq flL.ý\" ualftMIA and - *\u003c.* - f rutju mVa5iVV- ff SUPERFLUOýS -HMA Moles and Warta uucoeuinr*fuflyv.mve. oaze,~ d acne trested., Fach iaeatioit. catreamei Soft waterSapoig aiiùig Nus. lwcOoe6hcy1s S5, or\"t Fouclr ,124. o, lýUa LRSED Rosi \"s Tf A Isgoodted' .Woman and the Home u~MWiteFh Blusw et Roi\"sil Te EATONICO.,,'LU\u003e. Mp- 1",
         "~epa Iuiu. ont hi' y * - ,'*.~\"~**-t SdIOwdsgI.~'auses ~~0~s~4osIIeeàt*, WInnmpo~ îwlthout a touch of m~uch in\" vogue for of t1à clam jes mde bgueevm sud body ijaty and beeom- tilshows, sad are nWen cf conservative b roue te follow ex- Keflecta, sti\u0026p- ho sd.pouvert- * sre oturt wlth hip Om#w$cecftions. so SIçfrto: b= % etiey bsth4.gsut. blouse are abown, Wear. A chic model euh Mdtwith mauox- 'A V 1MIý 1219? r Tafeéta promniseo te bcsa style leader in dresa inaterials for the eoming moxths, and 14 certaily la'serviceable* sud Attysetive. A charming gown is ah\u003cyw o f lowered taifeta, made with a âurpece. blouse in -kimono style. The. wasieout low at the neek, and finish- ed iqith a flst coilar, in fichu style, cf shadpw lace. The. skirt has three flouxrMs, beaded-with corded shirring. Exrpire coats\u003e are new and.. suitable for lwear as part cf a suit, or as separ- ste çýoats. Tl#e new one pieco tallored frocks s\u0026p- peal especîally'to the home dresmiaker, on account of their simplicit7. These dresses are mnade without lmnings and with 'waists that close in front osa, fit rather snug. The skirt may be joined to the waist at the regulation waistline, or a few, inelies above. A very sinart walking costume com- prises a skirt of voile, eut in seven gores, a blouse of line Brussels met ovel1' :sqf4- silk, and a sinifle holero, siceveéas *Éiti jow -neek and wide armsyes. tension at the aide seam, that overlagps the front, and ia caught there with sash ends that tic at th. centre front. The collar is notched over the fronts in deep points, sud cut round ia shawl style at tho baek. In ilour style it would be more youthfui sand jaunty. The aleeve lu elbow length Js cool anmd comfortable. Charming dance froeks may be devel- oped for young girls, after the quaint anmd popular styles cf the, moment. Taifeta in a pretty apricot shade 'would he lovai made with beaded ruffles on the full shirt, finishied at the edges with velvet ribbon. A short girdle, simple shirred waist anmd sleeve edges, the waist eut round in \"baby\" style, would b. charmingly pretty. Suspender dresses are ncw sand most popîîlar for young girls. With a blouse of -white or ecru wash silk or erepe a two-piece or fourpiece circular skirt of sétid Iolor or blue gabardine, or voile ,wnfl1 he excellent. The belt arranged at uifuoral waistline, and to it the sus- pen, -tripîs would be fastened. A slusple dehign cf bre.dU»g orsa trimrning o ri'would b. aultable. Daity frocka for big sud l1541. siaters, ln Empire, suxplie snd long waisted style, are nice i organdie, lawn, challie or dimity.jfr115 sud rufies cf the material are in good style, \u0026nd quaintly pretty. I»ng uisted dresses with tunia or double skirts are niée f or embroideries, for Voiles and bordered mnaterials. 122-122.-Lady'a Coat Suit--Jacket, loe5-.C'ut in 6 aizes: 34, .36, 38, 40, 42 sud 44 luches but measure. Skirt, 1M -Cut ini 6 aises: S, 24, 26. 28, 30 sud 32 luches waist measuro. It requires 6% yards of 44-inéh materisà for the, suit for a 38-inéh aise. This calîs for two separate patternîs which will b. Mailed to any ýddesa on reeeipt of loc. for each. 1209.-Lady'm Bousm Dres-Cut in 6 sime: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches but meauwe. 14 requires 6, yards of 44.1 neh materlal for a 36-lnelU size. 1he skirt measures 28/4 yards aIt its lower edge. Price 10c. 12M0-Boy's Blouse Suit with Knicker- bockers-Cut in 4 sizes: 3, 4, 5 and 6 yvars. It requires 41/ yaras of 27-incli material for a 6 year size. Price 10e. 1207.-Girl's Dress--Ou.t in 4 sizes: 8, 10, 12 and 14 years. It requires 43/4 yards of 40-inch material for a 12 year aise. Price 10c. 1208-Lady's Combination Drawers and Camisole --ut i n 3 sizes: Sînaîl, mcediunim and large. It requires 23/ yards of 3(1- inelh niaterial for a mediumn size. Price 10c. 1220.-Lady's Dressing Sack-nut in 3 sizes: sinaîl, neiiijiin a rge. It :e- quires 2% ýYards of 36-. ic lp a riaI for a niedismni size. Prie li'î-. 1231--Gir1's Dress with Guimpe--'t inm 4 s*.ýs: (k6, and10 \\ ar tre- quirs 3 sid cf 64ib material for a 1233.-Oi'a Drema-Outla 44%lies: 60 8, 10 and 12 years. It requrèï 3 yards of 4û-inch ipaterial 'for a 6 year aise. Price 100. 1226-Lady'. Wal.t--Ctti 6 SE 34, 36, 3% 403, 42 anld 44 lcheu buat meas. ure. It requires 2y4 yards of 40.ineh mIaterial for a 36-inch*,Iize. Price 10C. 1223.-Geirles ]Dres\u0026-Cut i4 aizes: 8, 10, 12 and, 14 years. It requires 3 a/ yards cf 36-inch material for an 8-year size. Price 10c. 1219.-Lady'. lion»e freu-Cuti a aises: 34,, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inchçs -but measure. 14 requirea 6C% yards cf 44-inch material for a 36-inch aise, The akirt mensures 2%s yards at the lower edge. Price 10c. 1221.-Set of Lady'. Over Waiste, Vete.aud Coiar-.C.t in 3 iS smaUl, medium and large. Tt require for No. 1, 3% yards; for No. '2, 1% yards; for No. 3, 1 yard, and for No. 4, % yard of ZÎ.-inch material for a medium size. Price 10c. 1203-1191.--Lady's Costume-Waist, 1203-,Cut in 6 sizes: .34, 36, 38, 40, 4r2 amnd 44 incIses bust measure. Skirt, 1191 -Cut in 6 sizes: 222, 24, 26, 28 30 and 32 inches waist measure. It requires 51/ yards of 44-incli material for the skirt, and 21/1 yards of 27-ineh material for the over-blouse. The tucker requires 23,1 yards, and the sash 21/2 yards of rihbon, for a mnedium size. This caîls for two separate patterns whieh will be maîled to any address on receipt cf 10e. for each. 1230.-Costume for Misses' and Sm'ill Women-('ut in 4 sizes: 14, 16, 17 and 18 vear1S. It requires 5 yards of 44-inch material for a 16 v'ear sizé. The skirt ineasures about 3 1-3 yards in the 111 year size at its lower edge. Price 10e. yo ral ski Mie",
         "we most famous silkia treatment sizest mneas. m-nc1i !oc. es: 8, s 33/ lyear in nchçs de of 7%6e lower Everv day it frees yotîr Of thuo'4 tiny, old, dead ticles. Then, it cleanses sian par- t he ever fiormulated First the kdthcr, then the ice, then-gradually, but surely-the charm of \"ýa skcin You love bo touch.» I there some condition of your skin that is keeping it from being the attractive one you want it to be? Is it sallow, colorless, coarse- textured or excessively oil-,?« Perliaps your complexion is being marred by that disfigur- ing trouble-conspicuous nose pores. Whatcver Cie condition that is keeping your skin from being beautiftl- -it can be changed! The Woodbury treatment described here was first formu- iated and publishied four years ago. Since that time it has brouglit to thousands of people the lovelier complexions they have Ionged to possess. They have read it, tried it, felt such a difference the first time they used it that they adoptçd it as their daily method of cleansing. IJere it is: First the lai her -then the ice Use this treatment once a 'day-preferably just before re- tiring. Lather your washicloth well with warm water and Woodbuiry's F ac ialI Soap. APPly it to your face and dis- tribute the lather thoroughly. Now, with the tips of your ifingers, work this cleansingZ-,y antiseptic lather into your skin, alhvays with an upward and outward motion. Rinse with warmn water, thien with cold-thie colder the better. Then-fini'sî by rubbing your face for a few minutes with a piece of ice. Always be par- ticular to dry the skin well. This is what happens- Yolir skin, like the rest of Your body, is continuaîly and rapid]Iv changing. As tlî- l skin dies, new forms. This is Just tie opportunityr tlis treat- mnent \"auits. loveliness for whiichi yoti have longed. The first time y'ou use this treatnment yotu will l)egin to realize t hi e change it is going to make in your skin. You will feel the difference at once 1 Use pers stentlyo-.- you can't keep the charm away!1 Use this treatrnent persis- tent!y, and in ten days or two weeks your skin should show a marked improvement-a -prom- ise of that greater clearness, freshness and çharmn which the daily use of WToodbxiry's al- ways brings. A 25c. cake of Woodbury's Facial Soap is sufficient for a month or six weeks of this famous skin treatnient. Tear out the illustration of the cake shown here and put it.in your purse as a reminder to stop at your druggist's or toilet coun- ter and get a cake to-day. Rçmember, for every day you fail to start this treatment you put off- for another day the satisfying of that longing that is bound to corne to you again and again. W rite to-day for a week's-slze cake'* For 4c. we will send you a cake of Woodbury's Facial Soap large enough for a week of this famous skin treatrnent. For 10c. the week's-size cake of Woodbury's Facial Soap and samples of Woodbury's Facial Cream and Facial Powder. For 50c., copy of the Woodbury B3ook, \"A Skin' You Love to Touch,\" and samples of the Woodbury preparations. Write or mail coupon to-day and begin to get the benefits of this famous skin treatment for your skin. Address, The Andrew Jergens Co., Ltd., 653 Sher- brooke St., Perth, Ontario. Il4, FACIAL SOAP 1l T'ealr OU ts cake and put il jfl your \"',r\" as a rei' nder Io asic for Wood- 2Iry'.ý la1 (IlYouir dr-uggisi'sg. for pos age on. oo b 653cialrSoqp_ b Faboveaccording to the offer Fr sale by Canadin dr igi.q fror oast to A0I\u003cI r ne -pu-d , t J uui i e f I'.. for a porcs, briiigs the bluud to the surface and stimulates the small miuscular fibres. This keeps your skin so active that the new deli- cate skin ivhich furms every day cannot belp) taking on that greater MADE IN CANADA 9 1 ýýIv à- 1",
         "- ~ 'J'f liq WESTERN CANADA FLOUR MIu.s CO,, LIMITED Millers to the People ~. N"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Western home monthly. : Vol. XVI. No. 6. (June, 1915)"
      ],
      "type" : "document"
   },
   "version" : "0.4"
}
{
   "version" : "0.4",
   "doc" : {
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06912_185",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06912",
      "source" : [
         "Scanned from a microfilm held by Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "label" : "Vol. XVI. No. 5. (May, 1915)",
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_185",
      "title" : [
         "The Western home monthly. : Vol. XVI. No. 5. (May, 1915)"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "lang" : [
         "eng"
      ],
      "published" : [
         "Winnipeg, Canada : Home Publishing Co., [1915]"
      ],
      "note" : [
         "Monthly"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "PAGES MISSING",
         "MAY, 1915 WINNIPEG, CANADA i. ~ au i - E THE",
         "Il T'est You wili find that -f ive spoonfuls of Blue Ribbon Tea will1 go farther than eight of the lower-priced tea, conscquently Blue Ribbon is the cheapest in the end. It is also a mistake to think that by paying more for tea you can obtain a b etter article than Bluze Ribbon. A Teapot Test will satisfy you BLUE RIR BON, Linlted ý,OýýurDu tke\"%*ý-qq Zarnada ,.fiaepnFnpipn H AVE o reaized the great respoilâity that rests uo da, \u0026 us MinCanaclaattdis trying penad in thehistory of the Empire? As Canadians, living at home i-. ece and tranqwhlty, aur duty is quite as important as that ofaur sans wiio have gone to the front. Mmatduty 18 to PRODUCE-ancl i order ta ovide for the ehlormaus increase in prodluctian it is necesar upon the farmto pty?utbarnisbp ta accoamaclte yaur imcrasic duc tion. and for US%, here i the fa tost tur oit m\"ta bildngmaterialsfor the ithe Empire, namch as we, The Pda Il Péople; have nat discharged a workinan for reduced ane man7s s\u00261a7y sice dhe War started. Our factaries are stili rnmngwi tte same complement of men as employed ane year ago, before the wa.r was thought af. Our warehouses arejpiled to the roof with raw mateials-aour stockrooms are ffled wit an abundance of mnfcue articles. Are you doing YOUR share? Write us for quotations on Oshawa Galvanized Steel Shin- ales, Corrugated Iron Roofing and Sicling, Brick and Stone- faced Sidins, Carra Crimp Roafmg\u0026 Silo Covers, Culverts, Eaves Trough and Conductor Pipe, Finials and Omaments- anytin and everything in Sheet MetaL Write To-Day for flookiet W-.. ddr@ m.at h liNert Y.u. The PEDLAR PEOPLE, Limited ESTABUSHED 186 80 LOMBARD STREECT WINNIG, MAN. ExecutiveOffice a.nd Factories: Oshawa, ont. MOIiTEEAL TORONTO OTTAWA LONf)ON I w on these points, 'I",
         "VL xvil Myth Dos iegcpe\u0026 tbelr former .as wofl a$ ne- ls addreusmgç h. recelv*d by m ou .uammb. en he sbaof your p.pe m receutly ebarigs-d you ddreUg t, let lus knoweh.address.o1 A Chat wxi-Our Rpàdm bave allen etdWS YOUR BOYý. or YOUR GI RL iseed teh . bigh t tbigs of lfé to keepi mugies above ailuii, MWIlI them luat the chance they are ioke for. A pho-lograph supplies the. brlght catcby dance music and your children, and their friends, enhoy thi.even' g at home. Te have the gaieties of ehM nt but In e.pesn arouig ofte ho. W have -built up ïivery wide snd t ron eputation by our splendid tarrn i are full of real value. A card addressed to our Mail Order Department wiil bring you a verco- ~ list of ont unprecdete A few of ont offérings are listed beiow: BELL OROAN-Chapel style; wainut case; in good condition. Prie.................5.2500 DOHRTY ORGAN-Case ia waluut -fait condition, cost $150. kpàdL .........-1.,$40.00 \u0026VORM WITB PIANO-Mahot. any case; le uew Very' special at ..........s$225o0 DISC PHONOGRAPRS of several makes, all thoroughly overhauled snd in fine shape. To clear at each $10.% f 15.%4 *1T.50, $20.0t. Thesean u oeil Orde ir .nf Dohurl Piano Col UImlted 328 ei no. i UNim Wwm deailo ud hap* Wàteilnusometionst tl eders ba en ay ofs.h M-I ibts ueplyage. The dre wl. e b.u iedn hii. écf\u0026à f eyS wienfud hmi abundaucen.lee bigistrtiowns ot eaentd u CIiainthtw i\u003ewamCa~* its n p tue aley cessefIl b oio tiv ga e hm M\"lut hPp », selert np frid bthusanda91girs Il wMi, sudI.a setion ci h.mgmul liath bast mpl etifeita isteuc:r. * stainy u\"\u0026t buth 9uvn eoeledes criptvemattrLad c Hidi. wWidareillusta1914sand .4IUu ttthe ed Amon th may sccesfulou \u003ef l -jMaM in t» '- b. thecl o comple. ispatdmm h an stuat\"Md ylIt mtet wihmber suwo d. rradier lon ave tew. e j idL JIa coendatne us lirat $ve aeaheous re musud enssb\u0026gT'as *u th c lahiaimes abotftheamomenast i. e temu Home oUtù) buti.y4esppyW Weare iluaios wihmth agcfdesithive mt r sd fada le-tra \" pb.Wdu dorerslof th waublouetfon.m at cle Bck. fthe Jany*one dbut a lth- act quicly. blason \u0026Rlsch Ltd., Tâtouto. Gentlemen,1 The War Book which you have issued ban come 10 baud, sud la very msetm indeed. You have certainly uhown a 9»nt demi cf enterprise lu getting out Màc book. Msuy thanks for copy seut. Youra truly, (Sffned) Henry' H. Mason. .Yf~, iV t0-70q0 1mon When writing advertisers please meèntion The Western Home MonthiY. the nom",
         "The Westerpn Home Meonthly You wIII have only yourself to blame If you are \"ltalked into\"l buylng an \"«unsuitable\", or a \"ltheoretical\"' car The two cominonest nistakes made in buying an automnobile are-First, Buying a car not suited to your îeeds.-Second, Buy- in- a. car tlîat lias liot passed the theory stage. The flrst miistake-buving an \"untsiiitable\" car-is perhaps mîade even less often than the second. The secondnitk-bvg a \"tiieoreti- cal\" car-is perlials the sadder inistaîke of the two-because whlen yoit have muade tlîis utistake you have on your lîandb soinu' engineer's, or designer's untried theory, in- stead of a tried, known, suieressfli car. Study your needs scnsibly, just as you study your househiold needs, aind buy a car you can afford to (1110v. 38,000 happy, satisfied Nf'axwell owners are driviing 38.000 liands(ie streainline Maxwell cars to-da -at au Ilpkv cost that any mnan of aiîy standing clin affîrd, anîd at an orig-inal cost that is ýsiniply a practical iflvestment. The Maxwell Company's Guarantee of Service to Maxwell Owners No other automobile is h u led by ai îmore A nd tins splendid deale r servic e o i ,îois reliahle se rvice thaîî that gîriranxîti I very Nilaix perfected and coîiî,Jltuxd ysxlI ldt\\\\Ol sweli one ~r. More th,în 2,000 Mîwh dealers~- Service Stations wlîicil are soloatd liolîîî located ibi every part of tiîs countriy anxd Canada the country that a Maxwell dealer Can get, ivithii -are always ready to give expert advice, îîike a few hours, any part tbat lie lias îlot ini st 1k. adjustmens, and supply or secuire new parts at Order a Maxwell frorn our nearest dealer i i , reasonable price.5. and Meieun you %want it delivercd, y oiih get ý,wi] car-not ain excuse on delivery day. (The 72'% increase in Canadian duty will not increase the price of the Maxwell Car in Canada) Maxwell Five-Passenger Touring Car .................................. $ 925 Maxwell Roadster ................................................... 900 Maxwell Cabriolet....................~......... 1,105 Anymnodel equipped with electric, self-itar e, $0eta Write for beautiful 1915 Maxwell Catalogue. AddreSs DePartment AV. MAXWELL MOTOR COMPANY 0F CANADA, LIMITED, WIndSor, Ont. P. À r D",
         "The Western Home Mon thly Sowing the 'Seeds Written for The Western Home Monthly by W. A. McIntyre, LL.D. [Instead of the Editorial this rnonth we are pleased to publish an. article written for this Magazine by Dr. W. A. Mclntyre, who bas just been elect\u003c President of the Manitoba Educational Association. The article shows how teachers are thinking, and places a responsibility on parents everywher\u003c Once again 'tis seeding tirne. On every lîil and valley darkened ridges show whiere heavy drills have passed, and tired rnen and horses by their labored gait give proof of ceaseless toil. The preejous grain is planted firm and sure beneath the soul; the sweiiing kerneis feel the life within them stirring, striving, struggling toward the iight. The suni looks down and srniles, the ramn cornes with hier gentie wooing. Soon the fields will wear their robes of green; then wiil corne the shot-blade and the fill- ing grain; next the heads of golden brown. Then thie end-the noise of binder and the drone of threslher, and at last the exehiange of goid for goid. Tiîink you that is ail? Is farrning but a souilless process of increasing one to ffty? Surely not. Into those furrows, withi the golden globules, goes the farmer 's heart with ail its hopes and fears. What if the suni should cease to shine? What if the skies should deny the needed showers? Xhat if the rust should biight, the hail destroy, the frosts cut down? Surely if the tilling of the soul requires labor of the hand, the casting into earth of precious grain re- quires labor of the lîeart. Frorn spring to fail 'tis faitli and hiope, and then more faith and hope. Wiîat wonîder if a man should love the fields ini whichi lie works ! His very life i5 in the clods. 0f the fariner, trulv na), it be said that \"WTbere a mnan's treasurée is, tliere shall lus heart be also.\" HIe, of al men, rnust know whiat tlîis means, \"Thecre is tlîat scatterethi and yet increasetlî\"; lie, too, recalling life in other lands and in other dayý nitust bc able to accept ini faith the exhortation, \"Cast thy bread uipon the waters and it shall returii to thee after many days.\" Mit there is in a fariner'-, lîeart stili sorie- tlinig more than hope and faith. Through- out the long aiid glorious montlis of sunii- mer, wlen the grass is growing and the grain is ripening, hie must have a joy that cornes to fev-tlie joy of possession and the riclier joy of anticipated return. Hie who overcomes, even if it be only the srnallest obstacle; lie wl'ho produces, even if it be only the rnost insignificant article of valuie, nîuist of necessity kinow sometliing of joy. XVlat tlîeî must be tlhe joy of him wlîo teases the old carth uintil it sniles, anîd who transforins a wilderness into a garden of delight? Faitlî, hope and joy! To these let uis add thiaiiksgi\\-iing. When tlhe last slîeaf lias been gathered ini, when tlîe last bulshel of grain lias been safely stored away, wlîen tlîe owner of tlîe field lias reckonied up thie cost and tlîe probable retuirni, lien lie tlîinks of the purchases tlîat are possible, the joys to wife and fanîily, tlîe îecessities and luixuries fortlîconîing, suirely lus heart nîust go out nii gratitude to Iliim ivlo crowneth the year with His Ioviîîg kindness. Nor isthie fariner the oîlv one who can rejodcc and be glad. I )irectlv or indirectly the whlole world is concerncd ýyitl i ls suic- cesses and his failuires. Thecre is îîot a stormi \\Vliicl does not bring anxietv to the dwellers in the town, there is not a frost tlîat dnes îlot send theni fearful to their beds, tiiere s liot a drouight wlîich does îlot influence t lieir maniner anîd tileir- speech anîd whîiclî does not stop the course of trade. For the whole world is bound together by the law of interdependence-with the farmer ini the centre. lie is the one link in the fabric of society to which ail other links are joined. Should lie fail, then ail fail. Should'he suc- ceed, tlien alrnust prosper. Iîîdeed, in a facetious way it bas been rernarked, \"He tilis the soul and every rnan tilîs hlm.\" And ail this is but a parable. The soul is the lîeart of a little chiid. The seed consists of the truths and ideas which are given hirn and wlîich in his little soul rnay ripen into aspirations and action. The sun is the atmosphere of kindliness by which he should be surrounded; the frost is but the killing rebuke without cause; the blight is the curse of rnateriaiismn and corruption which from time to time sweeps over the land. And so the figure might be extended. There is no crop like that which grows arotind the rnother's knee - none so precious, none so loveiy. There 'tis always springtirne. There the seeds are ever being planted. There, too, 'tis always surnrer, for the havest is ever being gathered, aye, and will be gathered tili the end of life. Men and women! What of the sowing? In selecting seeds for your fields, lîow care- fui you are to obtain the best! How yon sift out the weeds! How you study the wind and thes.louds! How you study soul! and lîow careful you are to deposit the seed in right amount and to proper depth! What of the sowing? What of the companions, the books, the language of ,horne and street ? Above ail, what of fhe moral and social ideais that are continually placed before the children? Wiîat of the wveeds - tlîe prejudices, the untruths, the bitternesses that sornetirnes in some lanîds are fouîîd? Once again, what of the sowing? You do not treat ail soils alike. How can you expect ail your chul- dren to make the same progress in the same wvay? Is thiere not as niuch individuality in clîildlîood as in the souls on the farrn? Anîd as to the faith anîd hope and joy-are not these to bereckoned with? Don't you knowv the long restiess nights, the anxious v earnings of joy of seeing young life shape îîîto nioble rnanlîood and lovely wornan- lîood? And have you not alrnost as great an interest in your neighbor's children as vour own? For by children, a s by prayers, the xvlole round earth is knàt by golden chains about the feet of God.\" Let ils make it plain. Here are the littie ones entrustcd to your care. At first ),ou are in sole charge of tlîem. You are their nîurse, tlîeir governess, tlîeir everytlîing. Tiiese first six years are the formative years. Everytiiing beautiful -in thiouglît and speech and action; everything holy in action' and conîversation; evervtliing lofty in senti- ument anîd ideal; evcrythîing Godlike in example anîd precept should be placed before thiem. Loving conîpanionshîip, kindly coun- sel, tiiese are asked for, thiese should not be denied. If thiese little ones could speak tiiey would say, \"I arn ignorant, make me \\VisC ; I am iiepless, give nie strengtlî; I arn I~,show nieefthe wa ; I arn crude, give me iniîsh ; MNYv ieart is yearning, give me love.\" And I know wvell there are few parents wh lîearing the cry of the children, will n respond, but oh! wlîen the cry of the worl is s0 loud anîd so persistent that the cry the children is iîot heard-what then? le me what then? There cornes a time when the eidre can be sent to school. Are you not proud the school to which they are going? ýYo have tried to get the best teacher! Yo have sacrificed to get the best-y«es, real sacrificed. Then you have made the bull ing a home, equipped it with curtains an blinds and a library. Everytbing is as spo lessly clean as your own parlors-and wh not? These are your chiidren, your dea est possession, and there is nothing too-goo for them. Yes, and you rightiy dernand th they study at their school ail that makes fo sweetness and light. They will be able t take your place on the farrn, of course; yo will see to it that tbey know how to do a that a good wife or a kind husband shoul perforrn. You wiil see to that, but th school wiil assist you un your attempt t broaden their intelligence, to strengthe their wills, to cultivate their tastes, to for their habits and to ennoble tiîeir disposi tions. Yes, I know you will work wit your teacher. How can co-workers acco plish anything uniess they corne to a understanding and unless they are i friendly relation ? As for others, thei school rnay be a failure, but as for you an your school, arn I not right in saying i shahl be equal to you and to your children But there is rnore thian school. Th greatest force ini education acts through th social milieu. The character of the ýsocia political and reiigious life of each commun ity is impressed upon chiidren. Industria and economic conditions affect every las soul in the country-sornetirnes one -is in clined to say that the best way in whic any mani can help to educate his children i not by getting a better school for them, bu by entering into the life of bis communit to cleanse, to purify, to ennoble, so tha everything sordid and mean and unjust i politics, industry and religion wiil disappea Down in Panama the people used to di ini thousands becauise of the yeliow feve The rnosquito carried the disease frorn ma to man. Then began an attack on the mos quitoes. It was swatting here, and swattin there. At last one reformer arose and pro posed tlîat they attack the breeding place of the rnosquitoes. This done, the swattin was not necessary, and the yellow fever a an epidemic was at an end. Even so, witl aIl our sclîools and homes in operation, w but reach the evils to which children ar prone, one by one. By perfecting social an mioral conditions, tliese evils need not arise Hlave we not reached the tirne when ever man slîould throw hirnself into public life Righteousness, lionor and justice must pre i-ail, or our future is even more hopeles than if we were the prey of German militar ism. \"Better not be at ahl, than not b noble.\" POOR coPY 1 ý",
         "a bOtiOdsmtai g elbnaticving in 'n~1wewr lose to th er hty wiguo ~~~~ faunwtue ie psh he-boP (ashor atn oet fa atht'ner dee .* d e h4 psmed luthrough te u- aB Mn.a ete alb isaai 'Me bt fr Om h!e nyer a find oalied Mountain \"iten t'wety, thirties\" yop the ýDtire thLing euat, mir 1, pwiJ-. imd shlow you one hupim çQý» and he pursed bls li iand iia just as Marcus Lo oiuld4 hg 1ORé with such a Chance star.i ~J -instead we once more pdàýU-cetoii and lsnding goodly nmémofS4guf, throat\" trout. As we paend a £ ' i ' at the end of a ittie caint*s'td,' ' 1 was waving My hand to the lwely ~uaw- man at the far off opendoor-Fite bbbIy emptied a landing net fuli cf trbut fntà.tii. littie log camoe moored at the- end of -the wharf. et\"Now, we eau ,get busy aànd catch some for Our own supper,\" 91*hd the lad as the current Sweptnsndwf streai. For several days our long log cause headed on down the \"eCanal\" tiowardu thé Ocean-at one spot we had aù itemetîng wekmo th\"tdi the\"~ up thei thte itti their 1bc raised 1 iiual o0 bave n f eit, rai behind i he rose riei fat che",
         "()flId s rup aw\u0026ase thé mod 4p atbinthe. dà ettea h soethn --Wh'en ty, in r,) no Ivsw l~ to the buratlng lhe was the Most rr' 0 0 OR CO0P that d , the'trsù ad4 the klitt1i their homei raised lier 1 iiual or WC have never f eit, rath« behind me'% he rose bh rspeciiet 1:, fat oheeka",
         "lup a* , ueWÇ 1% ltl b.e said.curtiy. M11 Oh, what \u003e0br proud sen- Sto follow the ert, - atead of ý'«rwor¶d at pare ie l't I'niever tee, n.O w sàw, whenï ter4 ithanair wbich imade his vife end eugs t bim. 'Wbat's happened. to, you, JackT\" said Milo. IW't addenly, aùdyhr.son ex- elaimei imultaneouslyp, ' lahap- pened, father?\" 6a êlePed t\" echoed Mr. Ea.t, vLth thing bappen l\"» \"Wh are nu so différeut ?\" returned bis wie,still ataring at him, while ber usually reslgned voice toc'k a note of cxci ted expeetancy. \"When you went t The Young feflov, broad shouldered \"~d rsolute looking ae he was, entered rttb.r nervOusly. \"AU that money\"I had never oonferred on the son of the meif-mde man, that assurance it la sup-' - to givê Young 1Meuaenper in the presence of hie fiance.'. fanàly, neyer seemed able lu forget that h. vas \"Msrrying above him.» R. vas never quit. at cee ith these people. Even as he came in ho Lremlized that there vas something more than usually superior about his future Lmotber-in-law's \"Good evening.\", \"h«I cnly looked iu to tell Moules why toe budesmaida' presents badn't turned iUp before,\" be explaiincd in bis shy, but not unpleaaant voice. \"Arn I interrupt- iug Yeu?\"' \"çOh, no'\"» hesitated Mrs. East, with e look at ber husband, which being inter- preted meant, \"Tell birn now.\" And, by degrees, with many interrup- tions, repetitions aud haif apologies, the man thus suddenly restored t. fortune, býroke -the tidings to the man to whom he owed more than be cared t. *think about. \"'You know I. shall neyer forgek your kindnesig, Measenger, I arn only too thankful to b. able to pay ît back sooner than I hoped.\"l euiqî,k*I a ton effI Abat~Ie be4 tter lut t lo $e0 o» ret e ÂuAd-w*k hier. OUili w.arng cst p1mk trousseau froclEOo \"Rer. ,ah. i., 1',. told her,»med.Mms Bu Ema laitearfuily. -1 don't. know wIhàt Moules aun say to ydu, Mr. Mes- senger. But I eau 'onassure you tia.t we are al Most terribly son.\"2 \"And I ami mqat awfufly glad 1 \" broke in monica's e l *sHh toues. It wua $0h=mEspok,. \"Yea, I amn glad father isn't apue after aIL. Decsus. now I u,,,l Ctb.- lieved when Iaay exactly what I mean.!' *Don't. It'sailU rigbt,\" put In yonng Meseenger, with a mouruful but hurt look. 'l quit. underétand, Monica.\" '«Understandi You nev r did. Woue of you under.tsnd!\" announced the girl' auddenly. \"«Everybody from father dovu t. Frances, took it for grauted I was b.ing' forced înto my engagement. The talked, and hinted, and tried th coý1nole m»e about marryiug for mouey until- until I was too fturious to contradiot 'them. They vent on cliuging to that stupid old delusion about my being fond of Dick. And for 1veeka l'y. been 8o mad that I'd have dieci, sooner than tefl you the truthl Even--even Billy. seemed too, blind to se lt!\" \"To see vhat, Moules ?\" her Woeer broke in with an excited littie catch iu bis voice. \"What do, you.mean b7-'the. truth ?\" No. longer could Monies have been compared to a shut white rosebud. Glowing as one of those full biown da-' mask roses iu her mother'. baud, vas the face she rai4ed to that of her lover, as she held out her baude. \"The truth is,\" ah. oonfessed ahyly but distinctly, \"that PS going to marry BilIy Mesacuger on Thursday because I love hlm, and for no other reason.\"1 PO R cOpy",
         "j *4 01*.i, b. a089 \" aaof tl. e,-* ia dt tél3of*b \"GidyJohn\"Ilah. auwered a li\" st he 1littbe àwulfpzt he did not notice th. toue bl Clir race lerseton ah..fo opened 'the UtIle parelwitbin iay a thlfnk ci l. a purse ci aolii be'and mu h. cpened it cioh. shefound a rog o f bank noe-\"ýOh n. Lad tre bi~*mb~at John,\" ahe whisperëd as swift tbars walked to th. wwud* *U 1bck sprang tb her eyes. asUn turnetid m $,: You nedlhave no As th. train apeci on, ber thoughts flew auxiety Ca Ibal ste.\", back over the year of thefr xnarred lhfé. Th. next 'eW6d h The fireI few months ILat ver. a80' pya cheque vhl*=\u0026 P J -for lt.eg80*-u thon 1h. audden change that came over thalt even heropu=@M W oud do. John.,,8h. ee could find the causR of But as ech one came home and'WMa u it. Over and over againsÉhe hadthonghtmis P lace lm th. trunk ber ho*t aa of every minute before that day wheMnMhi grovuheavier for not once did h. ask b manner changeti. It vas the monn Bee 1hem or lake any intereat beyond a*-. aller the. uttle bridge party of Mms ing if sh. Lad euoug money. Carson'. The niglit before lieLad be And now ah. vau on her way to the iso care-free and happt he next morning gaieties that no longer held any attraction lie Lad aemed so cold'and srne Hia for her. WLat a farce life vas aller ail Manner Lad lacked nothing of bis former She Lad thought he cared so much for lber care and tliot*btfùInees l fact Le was at first but it must ae albee ehfidj\u003c\u003e eve mrecoaperteif tiaerposbe Nov h. waa tired of ber and %ad to »end but the old tendernesa vas gone. Often ber away. Then ber eye c aught the after that she found him looking at lier purs. again and abe wondered how h. had Pr- ~. Eu,",
         "I s ÇÂNADIAN. KODAK 00CO., LIMITED 7 110 KING STREET W., TORONTO the low flue. Hn re u\u003cbas e msit 0*18 \"4Claire,\" Lhe uid oddly, \"Claire, ià 6.hafroeeto hWs eet dahcolse ,ýandj tiat his face was very white. In an ilnatn \"won byi.sie. Ï13 ý ldww \"Oh why did't you let me ' 19%it reu1y you?\"L e adalowy not ~er~ heccllng Ii.I question. '\"Ihavehadsuch you came but when I tried to* touch you you always vanished.\" \"'John, you are lM.\" She pushed hlm idak ~ getly back into the easy chair. 'Tour Yeain burnlng hot. Oh why didn't you your send for me?\"- \"Nol amn aih ight,\" he insisted,\"It is only this beastly cold and -my head .bas ached some these last days. 1leame home early to-day to have a rest. ll be al- right.- Why did you corne home?\" \"Didn't you want me% then?\" she answered, ber voice breaking. \"Want you, Claire,\" hia voice was alinoot abrupt. \"But how did you know _________ \"I feit it and I could flot rest. Oh, .John, how log have y ou been siok?\" \"Feltit 1W' e mid lowly, \"and y ou ieft al 'that ý,Ieaïure to corne home becaue y. you thought 1 wanted you?\" Pnogffl e hmp ïf Food Inteal of It ta\u0026u uo\"ederahle eourage for a doe- tor * o .lnft4ly prescribe ouly fod for à-,,depairlig patient, instead of re- sorting %o the usual lst of medicine. 'Some truly scieutifle PhysieiaAns recog- nize and treat conditions as they are an\u0026d shoul\u003c ho1-'eated. Here's an instance: .FOur ýYpas go I was taken withi evre gastritis :na nothing would sta.y on my aetomaeh, so that I was oW the verge of atarvation. \"I heardof a doctor who hLaéa sum- mner ctaenear me-a epeeiit--and, as a I hope, sent for hlm. \"After he examinei me carefully he advised mne to tq a* amall quantity of Gra\u003ci-Nute at llret, then as my stomach- became stronger to eat more. ««I kept at it -and gradually began to 'have coler in, my face, memory beeame clear, w'here before everything seemed a bl ank. My limba 'got atronger: and I could walk. go I eteadily recovered; «Now after a year on Grape-Nîità 1 weigh 153 Ibs. My people were sur- prised at the way I grew Ilesby and etrong on this foed.\" Name given by Canadian Postum Co., Windsor, Ont. Resd \"The Rjoad te Wellville,\" in pkge.. \"'Thereim a Reamon.\", .Ever read the above letter? à nov one appears fren i Ure te, tue. Th.y are genuine, truc, and funl of bumin.l terest. Dei UNyon \u003cater oMd lafeet ai -Purely teru ed than I mi, friend of R, Purely busi brother Wi Xou get L\u003c ~hut made bfen too filerate! You paidk which 1 col t!$ S mtion The Western Home uMouthb AL - imj",
         "*aOumdmet ~M\u003eso1veu ~ léj he.' iii \"I nver ýisoê te.tyou bougu b fL ýY« «Purely ii *he,,s cd pjeul \" t**4. tfrupted the man» «U ~sm 90 than I might, haveds o 17o? frieud of adue.\" \"In'ee! »aherep~4 Au4wasuit: purely businesa that #A4e you meoure my ~rother Wilubisap 1 ý 1 1Itht ad Xou get Iion, out of .h1Ieol l erpel ~hut made you-o'h, yr fvr have1 been too m\"any sud lo lais)' 40 - filerate! They were part of the re 3YotuPaidfeor me, cal%\u0026 upon Sy gratitude wich I1could not 3gnere. weU ILfA aurwdhe« k . *zin. a rl to e e t\u003c*, *y -.ea i dq ia appoinémnt h. e ux Dm Iffle~wbat wia due blt r it ho white nrb- bons, Lied by' ra* rim o hi lu~wa, Iwu the 4ifr»W eState t theYorld, =q oe d not lnve her te s»eM Wbm wgWu *~",
         "I'eBlackwoodsLiie lue 1rh. \u003eer,3 ,u ~*tits ItwPvien maI M ir4 a4 lor, .h0 vas.tin Stund- iug o.Mg bh\u0026Iyoutof the window. 110 r~ve4ber bat nor bher don,~AoosiItyane te ¶ier reMce. $he too\u0026 .painis, fer the Smaid's benefitM te'o obervbe dainty littings oIf tie auite, the - oierà tlia4 le bsd Ordèred, the eboerfulopen 'LM ire ' had been buit1 ffpinaL Eâ cornlng. Books and 'maga. zies hua beUiPri\u003evded, even to a Pretty. di rWb!\u0026i vas S reproach to ber now,1 sud atstiOnnrY IaY invitingly arrauged upon the prety deek. The flowers and1 the lire aud the -books and ail were1 th\u003eught'ful 01 him-but-they only went1 to show whWt rnoey eould -buy. It had1 even-ohe thought with bitte~r seif-scoru -bouglrt tber. T!here -followedt a tastefully ordered - dinner. There followed gorgeous roses1 for the theatre4box, the play Ïtsel'fa' supper whose sofit musice and tinted Iig'hLs :as 0jth 48. n ahe libegait to mreb. Wth ýwhich h.Mtook iM was SIay trie to. keep, bar I.ily a\" *qohm ii wt ridebe si n 4i premumed Won lù couvmUâêà1 The làst d\u00267 be\u003core 1tb*os t wm the ordy one m which he'1.ft ber alasé lutAlyto lier o0.\"de\u0026iem \"ihaRlb e gaged su dày,\" he e]g plained. 'lTerë'are buàineas ùmlm7 taat \"mt tra*hme pbefmréI - away, and 1 bavembdno=tImfor thegei as yet. You wiIl Iind the *.ri¶ , rie foT you, and I amn qufl e sure * t you can make your wamy aibout now te cleali upthe litti,. ehoppng that Yeu hal Slewas surpriaed to anid herse If oe. ly. 0f course, tho'ugh, btuine ould Mwtmruplaesmention The Weserum . m'»etwI. or! w bobtahasi Iasealeê* IRNG~ B. 1WhmIp.~ When wr The Weator,",
         "Th Western I Iim -usas iOn stop? bTIB, U a",
         "-M2it tha,» h.weIeu ' 4bnkthat o 0 e utt, tg toyènrmo your - Snt reotu, f reiy ithaf ul d4you aire a.-ver \"Indeed,\" hIiiewered4 eziling. «Whe maico 721 amurelin.t I y th\" I bayer Bavôry eocd repntaion:- that wuy:*muntOng'Lpeople Who kno me.» \"lW.!,\" lobe riebtoted, atd now 4bat t!i isupreme Joke wUU Comi-ig to its poil $ho coulak.\"fly keeP down that foolis flutter dn ber voice, \"thêt may be, but, amn quite certain *t any =ian who buy expeive thiffl and d\"eanot take 'ther muet have flaws ini bis business x.eà Oda.» Re tuned in ber direction With Pe plexity, but in the diux liglit thst cam through fromn the Streets he could net 5\u003c weig _-a ey.,m\u0026i Syear., gaine eguoa~ey d~l À DU saine gvaby ~.IL? vW _Welvill» i pkgs. . ?kstum cornes l-t'wo fo-rms: -, * ie Regular Poatqz\u003epiu_Ïn weI odwd nt 15e0aMd 25e paekagegý, ffi Instant ePo.tcrn is . tlulepwd IAteasponfu1 adisolvreýs 'qiüdlyri a,\" Ys cup 1 of water, end wit ex«nfl. Iend fl sugar, mnakes a, deliclous b~vrg m ~-ata A 0.ad 0.#g floth kinds are 1qually.4qrUo.us oe r- ost per cen u *esne eW0 a~lèr' Reason\" foqr Pou, ---oIdbyG9e. OI 0'be' Ongan r bousel3 Villes as: UJ th re ad pr koee on te rainbow en NVe1, wl and the lx semrper, axi Work at ti",
         "hpg, as: n un d b ït dueand prepr houaewifly - jq. I--but thon the t 'a7 grandiïuWJeim,,Md *oê 3Ive ifuurteeni W .* iniles from towxi, on a Iiitmtêd, 'lii i ni the~ Imostly bis. ý \" trem's ibir ne*gbor- that lie wr4 the grefttest exe*teseat. 6 bunoh of buffa,.- rivpor to the CC I ee on the* pai BIB, eP.*, or a oc\" iedow rainbow endilag up où h te Dmaide of rsop fe1 0111 Ba1dy. toégA, down t~ N ehl, while the hubd d, bis 'fo.her q*njo 'the fUS and the boys were Iomdg Up glovels, whielh ere biOý semrper, axe, etc., i the wagon, for their the croB8s l Work at the river, and sadding up the ces t!lat -hO bS eu-«,yéar-oili am ,2le £âdd tOU« \u003e11 bodled : powder. ~ly loi s irlige '~-~ - Gr9cers.",
         "The Western Home mfonthly Builng a Piano or a PIayu Pino Ma an pctant transaction. Dcm't bgy hastily. D=ntbu onmpressio. Rey un tat%\u003e-4he facato 0p 1 - ea ediior latest boit ~idSiuomation\" and \"ii«laoeNnotwoboit W\"io you ahouid resd. It tU O ao \u0026 Riach Instruments are built, HOW they have won prestige and respect, and HOW vo - iii undertake to, SHIyon one with muoh mMatimo and ecoum\u003cmy. to ydurWef. W rite for the bookiets TO-DAY! liAOil\u0026 RISCH LIMITE liii thema with. We four get in the boat, and tmy drnbandpaddles, dowki stream. The rapide gre ro;arîng and singing ainongat tha -rock» and atones. Presentl.y wilth a littie turili we shoot through the rcar- ing iwirl, the boat going buxipetty burAp çver the1 waters ite a wagon over a r9ugh road. - The. river la very deep just below the rapida, but 2resently -it is 1ow enough ,bo wade. It does niot meet possible that tuLle le theo mre stream, that, a0 short a tirne \u0026go, vas \"1running white,\" swilt and deep, and utterly impassable. Tliere in bere a littie island of abouti an ace's extent, and on it, at the -boys?' importunity, we decide to camp, and they1 wade and tow the supplies in the boat1 frum tue wagon to the island. The mwn work for.a while wituh shovelst and axes at the iilli approaehing the cross-à ing while the boys play gaily around the island, trousers Toliled up as high as they1 will go, om~aionally bringing treasures-4 bits of coal or clam sheila for inother to mes.4 a bit m»re, vii!).the. rest of the tiwngsb wer. apread. The air wasa bit chili7 and the fire feit good. Jiverything tas-ted âine, the. boys espectail?.oormendi~g' \"1that littie wmokyr t«\u0026te.' As w. ste a playful wind'-would throw a bit cf feathery white ash on us from t\"e are, -but ithat wae partof thbe pieni. \"I suppose,\" said one boy, \"thamt if the Mounties se. this sinuke mng up front the island they'll think we're a par.ty ,of Germansl goig tb attack Wain-. wrIgbt.» Presently the operations of the fore. noon were begn again, the boys their tireles nimic varfare, thie men and 'horwes their lierculean job of scraping down the his o n e'i.her aide the river e, that a conveyance couid go up and down. 1 wSbed my dishes ini the river and had packed them away. After smre time ithe men announced -the crossing passable, te sbouting and work etopped, and, with our inilch éows, we etarted home agairi in the gorgeous autumu *veniAg. UNION BANK' Wlth Cash Un the Bnk You Cmn hay t. Avnt.ge BveIyung onamore when hv bbcm Bank of \u003c5aadaand the moneyn han by ai «Mii price.. ho saving will help you aa tb 8mw. M-B\u0026anehe. tu Canada. Ovor 110 la lb Wut iai t f àbrta Branahu ;Airdri lê. Aux. BarnBaahaw Ba=:n Bel1l,.)B e, l mrowden, BowIaad Broos, rdonieimC CariIston, Caritadi, Carstiua, Cermal, CII lreiolCochrane, Consort, Cowley. Dideburyedonton, Emprfas, Foremosni, *Fort 0\"acii (;, rand Prairie, \u003cirsay Lk anHgiBlgHilozreotInnis feu Irin, inncLccmbe,.ndom, lethbridge, Maclsod Me dncal.Okot4c re, s wug iaer vihreHiDs, Wamnwtgi THE RT OF DRESSING WELL A» ]OW MAYPOLE 80\" Furnia he i eanafor all. 'rTo buy new things for every change in color is extravagant, and for most peop1e imprac- ticable. It la also unnecessary whàen by the use cf MAYPOLE SOÂP you can DYE AT HOME in fifteen minutes, te the incet delicate shade or color your Blouses, Laces, Silks, Satins, Gloves, Ribbons, Scarve, Feathers, Lingerie, \u0026c. NO mEus, N\"0 OUL WNT WABH 24 Colmx, 100 Cake. Mack lie cake. DO vrwh.re -or potaad with f ree Bookiet Frank L. Beaedict \u0026Co., Montreal *g.uauum~ .ai mam J A mrendtothe houseold and a foe topainfor over 60yemr. For rheumatism, sprams, burna* neuralgia, cramps, atomach anâ - bowel troubles, there is nothing HAMLINS VIZARD OIL CO. TORONTO \"Bucklt theBlanket\" lin theBritish Camp , 'RIjdlngthe. Qoat,\" lihat mysterfous proces of initiating a ncwiy eiected member of a \"secret\" sclety, ha nothing on the proomsaof înitiatmng a new arrivai in the mailitary camp. \"Buoking thieBlanet\" in airant on a par witii \"rlding the goat.\" The photo shows a new arrivai Iin the British camp (a brawny son of Scotland) who is baing tooeed up in a camp blanket. It musterà up Robinson Crusoe, Swiss Family Rubinson and ail the etonies of the kind that they have ever read or heard, to have a littie, wooded, abso- lutely uninfiabited island, te play on and about. Such mimic warfare es goes on --one would 4àîink there were et least two tribes of ferocicus, painrted Indians at -their deadly work-and two -boys and a lot ef echoes. doing it ail. Of course heir inother sat by -like a proud tabby watching -ber kittens dàsport téeniselves. But there began te \u003che inquiries, mfter the manner of CIloomiy Gus-\"ýwheni do we eat \" So a spot was cleared, about iliecentre of the isiand, a few dry sticks lighted, and the ch icken oovere.d down te, fi-y in 'the frying pan. Mhen it had cooked pretty weli, it was put /to one side in the pan, and the cold potatoes eliced in. Preséntly that was taken off, and 'well eovered dn the lee of the fi re, a green willow s8tuck one end in the ground, the other over a crotched upright in the earth, the free end projecting over the fine. Over this the pet of water was hung to boil, which itpresently did.' The tea was put ite steep by the fire, the chicken and petatoco put on te brownà The nert niorning, Sunday, vas a bit chillier, but, after -the separating, we went again, ths time, lt being Sunday without the appurbenanicesof 'oil, but, inetead, a quantity cf newspapers and magazines that an obiiging incighbor bad brought from tue post the day before. I had brouglit for my own deleetabion \"A Girl of the Limbenloeet.\" It being Sun- day I proposed te do\u003e ne unneccssary cooking, se I just took aesesories for having hot tea, salmon sandwiches, a cake and some fruit. We crossed the river in the buggy by our ne-w cnossing leaving the vall1cy, ciimbed the his ,to camp in the -top stony, as 1 eal.1 Vie hilly part, of our river quarter-Imagine a farm with a river running tiliougli it, with \"1our own rapids,\"Il \"our own island ' I lovely river flats for grain raising, green tow'ering bis for the cattie te feed upon, and wooded ,coulecs with enranberries, saskatoons, eirnants and- cool tniekling springs! \"H'mIl \" eysMr. Practical, \"the bit cffIat for grain is aiH 'tia.t's cf any account ini thie Whol quarter.\"1 We climbed the Iilis, I vas sayiiig, and, as w\"e did sol we' looked down over s s, e, il c- v -~,. 9",
         "The Western Home MWonthly ngsb illy 1-ted [jig , , ate of Ire, brown plateaus 9.nd gorgeons bluffs, at the silver links of, river appearing and p-appeariflg ai it wound amongst its billo. -We chose a aheltered place, as, if the 1 wy as sunny, the wind vas chlii. The urond in the coulee was golden with poplar leaves. We lit a bit of a lire. Around stood the trees in gorgeous, tints, above vas the tender blue sky. Red 01maberries lingered on the bushes, and tiiese were sought by pretty partridges, @as tame and fearless as domestic hiens. The papers and books vere brought out, and we arranged ourselves comfort- ably in our cosy grove and prepared for a peaceful, restful Sabbath. No chnrch beilleounded within miles, but the tingle »f the cow-bcll in the valley was not discordant. To one whose mind would dwell on holy things, there was nothing of jar or discord in this natural cathe- dral, any rnorq'than in the grandest of nds imaking. Perbaps not as much. The sky vas the most lofty dome of bIne, the huIs were lun-fired altars, the river,*a very Riverf Life, the air, the aweetest incense.- No distractions. of dreas, or caste, no beggar at the gate. lhe text would suggest itself-tbe great- iie of the Creator, the littleness of Fancy reading \"A Girl of the Limber- losel\"-in sucli a place as I have tried to describe !-meurely a proper place for the perusal of such a nature loving book. But preaently my alternate medita- tions and reading were broken in upon by cals for luncheon,- the kettle vas boiled, our lunch eaten, and I washed my dishes in water f rom the spring, put them away, and v. returned to our reading. - Then a grand tramp over the his before t.he trip home in the peace- fui Sabbath evening. Thus do we pass our days \"far front the madding crowd'a inglorionss trife.\" Marketing a New Product Mrs. Dexter, from somewhere \"down- state,\" vas enjoying hier first ride in. a crowded street car in Chicago. It hap- pened ýthat a health officer, ini the per- formance of bis regular duties, vas tak- ing a sample .of the air in the car. Mrs. Dexter'saw bhis manipulations, but could not understand them, se, she turned te a policeman who was sitting next to bier. \"I beg, your pardon,\" she said, \"but uan you tell me what that man is doingl,' \"'Yes, ma'am,\" answered the officer. \"He's bottling the atmosphere.\" \"For mercy's sake!\" exclaimed Mrs. Dexter. \"What won't they do next! Do they can the air and sell it nowadays V', A Modern Torture-Music I live in a fiat, on the second storey of a large building in E-, and above and below and beside me every neighbor aeems to own a piano or a harmonium, vîolin, or gramophone. The emaîl room which bas been allot- ted to me for work-quiet, thinking work-is directly below one in which a piano and a child bave painful struggles daily. There is a simple littie tune in \"Hamailton's Instruction Book,\" called \"Lilian's a Lady.\" It is perfectly harm- leas; a genteel-little air--quite tuneful, but to me, alas, Lilian is ail that is un- ladylike and intolerable, and she is responsible for the state of frenzy to which 1 am now reduced. Just imagine a simple littie tune with a \"one, two, three\" bass causing se muec Miserv! But what about the performera of this \"lady\"-piece? ean it bc a barm- less , innocent little cbild? If a child,t how unchiîdlike in its persistency-thec sanie tune over and over again for three-e quarters of an bour by my watch! 1 Now fast, with wrong bars-now slow, 'Wth both hands, one sounding after the1 other, nlow jerky with faulty bass, nowc aIl over again, and so on-but always1 'Lilian's a Lady\"!r Istart humming as I work, trying to top tlue sounds from above. No use' Whieni pause for breath the torture isa stilI proceeding. I put may fingers to miv ears, and, oh, borrors, the tune is crawl-t ing through my brain! The churchy dlock strikes, one, two, three, \"Lilian's a ad I seize my bat and rush wýv1d1vy Along the pretty country road a quav- ering old flute makes a running accorn- paniment, .and I work on with bot bead and clarnmy fingers, xixing tears and ink-blots in sheer desperation. The days creeps on, and now my tor- ture is vanied by a piano-org-an-diaboli- cal invention-mingling \"The Maiden's Frayer,\" ruined with endless liquid runs. From another quarter the bagpipes advance, and here I fling from me paper and pen, and rush to the woods for soli- tude. I throw inyself down on a bed of daznp leaves and sleep cornes to my rescue. Awakening to the light of a tender moon, I rise and wander back in searcli of bed and food. AIl is still Oh, blessed silence! Music, where are thy charms!1 M.M. Comnades To complain is not a- fanît of igr alone; it is a favorite pastime of youith also. A writer in the Argonaut 'tel\u0026 the following story of an incîdeàf'lia Western university. The dean. of the institution was told by the 'atudtà% that tbe cook vas turning out food ibt. \"fit to cat.\"i The dean smimoned the delinqlent, Iectured him on his shoriteominga, %#d threatened him with dismissal uniless conditions were bettered. \"Wby, sir,\" exclaimed the cook, \"yýou oughtn't to place no much importance on what the, young men tell you about my mesis! They come to me ini just the same way about your lectur. s.\" t. h out of the fiat, downstairs, and away anywhere! With nerves quite shattered, I take the advice oif my doctor and leave the city for a time, hoping in the peace of a country village to finish that braîn work before alluded to. Alas, the village is here, but not the peace! From a ncighiboring cottage corne forth the strains of an unmusical box plaving two tunes which bid fair to rival \"Lilian's a Lady\" in their cruel monotonous repetition - \"Home, Sweet Home\" and \"Abide with M.%e.\" Lively and pathetic airs! Stili, after several hours I find myself nervously handling the paper-knife and muttering, \"Abide with v'ou,\" indeed! There is no \"home, no home, no home, sweet home,\" and other imbecilities! The New. Waltkam M ilitary Watch u- sign Reg'd\" The. regular Waltxamn Mlitaryr Watch, aaeacy ouppl in great numbm to Cansidlan oolren, ;aa aplenclict eturcty tmenkecper. WCe now offer an *pro1ement tihe aivantage of wiiiciiwmllbc noted from the. above flluatratkxL. T6 watcli las its own armor plate wlucliproitect a r t;anyý cover e icryetal. T\" ;o's the.moot eubtantal wrest «ratchi m-Aclfor mitary men. It lias a oolid bacwk cs.wmi two 6zek-o renclcrin\u003c ;t w.atiicr proof. WC venture to oay t6it t6i. engtii anc1 r.liaIbaâ of thieu watciiCB wM lwell cormoepond w;th -th~.eam« f;gitn'g quait;ce of the. Canacliean ooeoJ*cwlio V~i the.1. Aïk to sce the. new watcii at your J.wclere. Itw oephecl n, 7 Jewel graci at $12, andi 15 -Jewel grade at $5 Waltkam Watck Company Canad L.sBtI . \u0026Jamoe Stret, Montro",
         "4 orns Are Fd Fl.whoLaée, corpsa ae »» - «6wLe old-inu è\u0026eutent jMont Wk. dout Ieep corna' hunuuuud.in 48 bour. S A fmua.. ceniq fouad La Wàr to. end cornuwidsout pain or Sremeu\u0026 Nov md6m u.nue k. Futir hafthe corne du* grow are endiesmaso n\u003cLy appoor. Thereinnoe«'Mm Efocorn. Yiu can't Prevui iL. naybe 1«ye YOUmrenove\" QLe . qik T6 w eno aleg corna on ~I lasters U am132 ee.0m tDuuau leo .In aimpd mw k L~e\u0026NoL WaA.NvMB GETYOUR FARM HOME !rm the CANADIAN PACIFIC 'sen aa for saeat low prices and ~u~trmar~ngng fom411.00 t. 830.00 for \"uwi:\".aqpleera\u0026WaU--irrimated landea from. 835.0\u0026.Toa-n-wutabdown lfr~sypu4a~mHoedhila rour opportUnity t by. ettng djôLln aMr.Ure your friewds au sghou - Ptliteaturo aid partiouhiru apply ta 7. W. RUS8ZL, Land Agent, M\" lit .DÉpm~mntof Naturel Eaourbu C.P.R., Wnnipeg Artificial Limibs BUEA. 3 W mNNPeG W. can fit you at short notice with the bet that mnoney eu buy. Write us for f ullinformation. J. H9. M. Carson M5 Notre Dme Ave. Winnipeg When wrltlng advertisers plea..e mention Ils Western Home Monthly. .WMHN, Thompson, the. businea maar ~of the Montres ete Perthlot the. sle aplica for the idfrumiad Vacsney oof 01le. bo come in, lis did.so sbstrsetedly. T] position difofiS boy en the- \"Dispatc] wsBot thesort- of pont te Warren much disimination or aixious thougi on the pat of the ma who had it t \u003civ. away1. Moreover, George Thompsci 'as Botîlke some mon wbo inis a ohoosing an office boy ia juat as impert MMauas liooing an advortising manage Bt ton or flfteea times th,~ boy's salary à nov boy lisd te comein, end hisese leotion vas not as matter for very cam fui forethought. The. boy came in. Ho vasa acurly Iwsded youngs±er of about tveive yean vdth drk eye. aivays twinkling, andî noee that bift no doubob as te hie n\u0026 tionalityt -hInone band lho held hie cap vhile the other grssped the lapel of i bornewhat anient coât, about'e threE aires too large for him. Thompson raiaed hi eoyes, lookod at the boy fura moment; and sid, \"Ah, a Jeu', eh ?\" b\"Yen,\" replied the boy, \"a Jeu',» and eh.iurried oni, \"if that menus I ain't -good eneugh, vhy I'1l1g right avay.\"y Ho stopped aarôly. New George Thompen business men- fgr of the 'Dipatch\"dl, not lovethe sous of Jlerel. Why, hoe dldn't kies. Net many of us do know why vo dia- dain the Jeu'. go much. \"Did yen say I vas te got\" said the ladL Thompeon loced up. \"No, I don't remembor saying go. Corne in. Close the door?' The, boy diii no. \"WVhat's your name ?\" asked Thompeon. \"Levy,\" was the reply \"Levy whati or perhaps I shouid say, what LevyI\" 1\"«arry Lovy,» said the boy. «\"You had ai ad in the papier for an office boy. didn't yen? Well, I think 1 could do the work. Pm quick, and F'm careful. Look at this suit, Misteri Rad it four yesrs, and he o oke good even nov,\" hie ended. Thompson eyed the. lad qteruly. \u0026I do' remember that vo vere discussing suite,\" lie said, dry-Ry., \"Ever been in au office before t \"«Oncet.\"1 «W~here I\" \"Dovi in Wellingten Street. 1 was in a ceai man's office.\" \"«Hou' long wore yen there T\" \"Two weeks.\" \"Why did yen beave ?\" asked Thomp. son. \"'Didn't like it,\" came the answer. \"The boss didn't like me anyway. Said a Jew nover did turn eut any good te anybody but himaeof.\" \"I suppose yen took good care te get your money bofore yen quit,\" said Tiiompson6 Somehow, it diifn't seem ge f unny after hoe had saia it. «'.kep,\" returned the lad, lacouically. \"Well, I suppose a Jew le as geod as a Gentile after ail. Ne reason why hie shouldn't be. What meney do yen want t\" \"Five dollars,\" came the qnick reply, \"and I vante it rogular.\"1 \"Ail riglit. Rang up.your cap, and corne with me.\" And five minutes sifterwards, the \"Dispstch\" had a new office boy. Tii. experiences of that boy lu the newspaper office weuld make a bookful of good reading. On the Friday after lie started, hoe went te, Thompson and said, twirliug the inevitable cap the whube, \"I wou't be lu to-merrow, Mr. Thompson.\" \"Why not t\" \"To-rnorrow's our Sabbath. I go0ta gro te the Synagogue.\" \"Je1 this going to ho a rogular thing, Harry T\"1 \"Yep, but l'Il corne down at eight in the. morning ail the ethor daye te make up, if yen like. Yeu're net going te fire me, Mr, Thoempson T\" he o eluded, anx- iously. c«Well, 1 don't know. W. must have a boy hore Saturday inorninge, ta take copy up te the printers yeu tow.\"1 \"Loave it te me, Mr. Thompson. l'Il get someone te take my place. It'II mneau Ifty cents though,,' h. added irue- fully. A feu' days later ho vas at Thomp- son's elbow again. \"I've been figurlng, Mr. Thompeen. fthat it would pay the. 'ispatch', te get a. vheei for me,\" ho advised with the utmost sangfroid. \"ýOh indeed. And why, my financier friend?\"ý-this vitii elaborate sarcasrn. \"Well; every time I go te, the printers, it' oste me a dimo. If yen got me a wheel, it vould soon psy f'r iteof. Be- aides, a whei's quicker'n a street-car.\" Harry vas duly accommodated with a wheeL Ho *as a queor* yôunig'mertal, but everybody in the office greu' te like him, for lie vas willing sud energetie, and Putting up Telophoe sPales in Rural Manitoba ltad a fund of quaint sayings. One day, 1 vas waiting for the elevator te comne down, and 1 heard a husky voice that 1 kneu' could bolong te naot. but Harry say, \"You're stuck on yourself because yen make six dollars a week working for a butcher, but 1 work on a noe paper. Fi'm a sregular business.\" I didn't hoar the. butcher boy's reply. Bye and bye we noticed that Harry lengthened hie lunch hour. It was usu- aly about tweîîty past eue instead cf eue o'clock when ho get back now. Someone muet have mentioned it to Thompson, for I heard him hauling Harry over the ceals. \"I1t's enly a few minutes, each day, sir, sud I need theni, Mr. Thompon '\"I said the. boy lu his usuai eld-fashioned way. \"iWhy do yen need 'them. What mul- tifarius interets have yen got, Mr. Levy t\" asked George Tltompsout, with more cf his sareasm. \"'Yoit are flot at- tending tee many board meetings, I hope.\" Harry didn't answer at firet. Then, ''1 try sud le back ait oee 'clock. But lt makes lA so long for me Ite be sway from them,\" he said, and witheut any explanation as te vito \"tieni\" mnight belite marched eut ef the office. \"Thompeon ain't sueli a bad head,\" lie confided te me aftcrwvards. lit was about Éthssrhime that Harry vas trausferrod te the editorial depart- ment sîtogether. Rie duties consisted lu being at the editor's bock and cal. The enly thing ho did new was te run mes- sages for -the chief, and thon present himself at hie post again. It teck sorne getting used tn. Thie first day he was sent te the printers. WVhen lite came 1'bO Western Hobm Monthly The Man in the Home Wrftten for-the. Western Home Monthly. by lugh S. Eayra Harry le no finaneial editor on the \"Dispatch.\" But every Saturday and Sunday and Most every evening in the week, yen may soe him with a little dark-haired sister by hiesaide, gravolv taking his walks ahroad. And semetirnos lie talks te lber of tIie days ln the littie garret, aîtd bo lite -was flred hecause ho lîad te be \"thte man in the lieuse.\" The subject of conversation vas canine intelligence, and the American was speak- ing. \"I oncé toek a dog of mine te a station platform, when it suddenl stopped and pointed at a man by thebeeketal.- Struck by this curions action 1 approached the man, and found that Le. naine vaà Partridge?\" * ., 4, ', 'r baol, ho man pell-mel l ite Cooper'm ofie hie cap stili on bis head, and bIs breath eoming ini gams.i \"Mr. Robinson aaid it was 'Rlush,' h whispered, handing a proof to'the chief. Cooper looked round. \"'How dare you disturb mýe When I amn Writing ?\" h. asked majestically. Thon, \"Take that cap off peur head wNhen you \u0026Peak te me. boy. Very soen, hewever, Harry got to un. derstand the chief, and found as we ail had found that there was nothing of the bear about hlm oxcept the manners. Cooper was the surliest of men to get on with, and the most inconsi4tent. But Ilarry- learned~ how 'to haudie him. Whether ho was smiled at or 5worn at, ho gravely twiried hie cap, and said nothing, as if to intimate that he simply could not think of quarreiing. He etili took hie extra twenty min-, utes at lunch timne, and it gradually lengthened 'into haif an hour. Cooper ca'ught him one day. \"'You're supposed to b. back f romt lunch at one o'clock,\" ho snapped. ««Now 1 won't have you walking into my office haîf an hour late. If it happons again, you're fired. Understand t\" For a week or so sfter this, Harry was back punctually at one o'clock. But two or three days laiter ho stoRe into the chief's office at two»ty te two. Cooper looked up. (\u0026Go and get your meney, Harry,\" h. \"aid,. Harry went pale. 'T'm netfilred, Mr. Cooper?\" ho queried, and the tears came into hie eyes. - \"You quit this staff at ene minute past one to-day,\" said Cooper. \"Go and get your meoney.\" Harry weut. Abourt a month Inter 1 was at work upon an article dealing with the slum preblem in Montreal. 1 went im-to the dewn-town section and saw the condi- tions. 1 was lucky eneughi to etrike a yeung minister who was engaged upon settiement work, and 1 asked him te put me on the track of what I wanted. \"I'vo been called te a bouse in that littie court over there, \" ho said. \"One of our workers told me there were two kiddies in a room there, and ne father and mother te -look after them. You'd better cerne along'\" At the top of an old, ramshackied, bouse, we founid the room which w. sought. The whole atmosphere wasl sor- did. The bouse was filthy, and the people in it degrees more se. \"Rush,\" said the minister, holding up hie hand, \"I can hear a kiddie crying.\" We opened the door, and went in. niiere in the corner of a bare, bare room, with a baby in his arme and cry- ng bitterly, was-Harry. \"Why, Ilarry T\" 1 said, touching him on the shoulder. «Wbat is titis. Mhose s the baby, and why are you here ail alone ?\" Hoe dried hie eyês, and told me hie etory. The reason why ho had had that xtra ton or twenty minutes. at lunch tino came out thon. Ris inother was Ill-dying. Ilarry's five per week was he only xnoney they had. Harry, that yotngster of twelve, had been the only upport. As ho said, he was the \"man in the house.\" Every day at noon ho iad hurried home, and looked after hie nother anîd washed tIhe baby, and tidied the house. \"And the day after 1 was fired, my mether died,\" ho said, and- cried bitterly. \"And how have yen existed since hon t\" \"The Rabbi was kind. Ho helpod me. But it has been so hard,\" ho said.",
         "The -Western -Hem# Mý jont hi W7here'-Silence Reigns Supreme or, tMe Trapplts at St. Norbert Speelafly written for The Western Home Monthly by J. D. A.. Evans Doper'g ad Ia chief. re yau \u003ethat eak ta to un- we ail zig of .flfers. bo get But hum. mn at, said imply Min-, lually f rom «Now offie Igain, larry But othe coper ,\"he Mr. came inute \u003eand lu latter decades of the. uixeenth cen- tury, La Trappe, an Englishman, viiose 9*urame is indicative of a French an- cestry, founderL an Order in wbich as with other communistie bodies of the Roman Church, apecified teneta of observance merited maembership. To-day the follow- crs of the devout La Trappe from the (ommunitY beneath the most austere and rigid discipline of the many, very many religions bodies cnumerated within the realms of tii. Roman \u003catholie Hierarchy. I Canada two Houses only of this The Home of the Father SuPerior trotl1rio0d aie conducted; the major of thseis located at Oka, near Montreal, that at St Norbert was instituted in 1892. The parent home cf the Trappfist is itp at e-iteaux in France; a fcw 1-Ouses for feinale adiierents of the Order are 0xf-Ht, and une of such is conducteà inl tlu \"-tatc, of PennysIvania, U.S.. At X thie very outset of «Where Silence reiçna supreme\" the. witer wiii net be intruduzg upon the intereat of the reader ta r.- mnark tiait they who belengt t theSient Entrano Tmaputa' Grou sds\u0026 t., Noerboe Communmty» are men of whom it can be said with tense veracity, 'q haye over- came the world. The affairs of su ex- terior ephere'concern the Trappist lu no possible manner; from th. grounde of th. oaonaetery the whirl of atreet' cars at St. Norbert is diatinctly audible; h. can gaze upon the tail buildings of Winnipeg, witness t'bo amoke of its industries, but withiu the domain of the. Trappist there isas peace, an atmosphere of eerenity. Re. bas forgostten the world, ta hum even its memory is unknown. A knock at the door of, the lodge at the iron gatea. [n response, an elderly man, who for twenty-two yesrs has dwelt in the monastery, appears. He is garbed in the. rough and simple dresa cf his Order; cowl, brown robe, girdie, moccasins. In English aomewbat broken in expression, ho bids the visitor enter. A auperb collection cf plants, several in bloom greets the eye; the Friar brings out chairs front the aitting room. \"You've come to look through the monastery,\" h. remarks. \"Yes, I wil take you across ta th. office.\" This visit did not constitute the. writer's introduction ta the \"Abode cf Silence.\" Upon two previous occasions ho bas walked through the scenes where- in sanctitude and labour play the promi- nent caste in the drama. There were, however, distinct alterations in thie sur- roundings of the monaMtica1 environ- ments. \"ICorne this way, please,\" remarked tîh. lodge keeper as he opened the gate. \"Lots of mud to-day, looke like spring time.\" A flight of atone steps leads ta the monastery entrance; the guide opens a door into oa amail reception roorn, then excuses himself momentarily. He re- turns followed in a few minutes by a- mnonk dlean shaven, the Friars are per- mitted to wear whiskers, dressed in robe of white material. This priest ia Father Josephi, Secretary-trcasurpr of the Corn- Inunity; ho is Âkewise one of the quiztet The 'iext shavwiflb. jsMe1k the luat with Willame - Hokde. TpSI*ving Stick. Tii. mam clean, pefectly kept.stac;\u00261'. »am cozivenient, firm grip, when applying the. sap; -the . m aimdant, crcamy latierquickly worked up. From sh\"ve to shave dti11.1111 enjoys the comfort. conviimS and economy ci NmaW i IIi te.Mme cgood Stick, Powdoe, Cr.aài S..d 4 Senmiamp. for oc àni. enrouwa acaeof mayof the aboé ror 10 cuità«, fat «AuSirtme No. 1, containing mà\u0026 to. rticlms AUr... mlicJ. E r. lhaaIs Company DepI. Â lAu itoubumcomla. THIE LABEL on your paper wiIl tell you when yot.r subseription expires. SEND lx TOUR RENEWAL WRENI DUE i Làs -the wrlter walked through the vil- bge of St. Norbert, a bell ws ond irom th~e buildingsin a wood seras. the I\u0026usalle river. Jts ding was solemu in the stilly air of a beautiful morning, Ifareh 21. 'Yet for iu excess of twenty years the huhabitants of St. Norber-t and its countryoide on Red River have listen- ed te th. echo of the befl front its turret amidt the trees. ý1hia bell in symüboical that The. Houge of the Silent Community is here located., ,M the. western extremity of the trestie btidge crossing La. Sale river lu close adjacence to the railway station at St. Norbert, s gate opens into a wood of où.m and poplars. We walk along the pathway; in the ininediate distance are observable varions large buildings. A lootbridge of primitive construction ia .ng from tehe igh banks of the stream; the path continues up a steep banir; at the aummit massive iran gates are iiotieeabbe. lu proximity ta thia entrance stands a white. frame bouse; we msend the. steps ta its dloorway, ring *9heàL- 1 work Blum \u003e the nndi- ke a tpon aite rited. that \"One tva Lther 'ou'd kled W. sor- the AN ABSOLUTrE NECESS1ITY te eay fàamla HAIL INSURANCE It is too late to think of proeoad blame yourief for bàen careless siter your crop has beendetodsu your seaa=' work d revenue Rlot NOW IS THE'TIME ta take out the protection that wll offset any.Jo.. from hal. The Canada Hall Insuranco Company has earned, a very wide and high reputation for fair dealing, Jow rates, positive protection, prompt settlements sud f ul payment of basses. Full Informatlon \u0026w.n sur @ranch RedIgO ., P.O. Box 86 BEOINA F.O. Box 232 CALGARYf or sur Local Agents. Carson Wllllams Brothers Llmkod,, UNION BANK BUILDING, WINNIPEG Canerai Agents for Manltaba, Saskatchewan and Albert",
         "The Western Homte monthly g m~*. f~ C~amds - - _____ of men who lu 1892 iultisted iu a mont mupreteuticusol manner the. work of MeS Order in Manitob. It la at once obser- vant time à\u0026a\u0026 des\u003el kiudfly witii the revereud fatiier, the, pleasure cf whoae m.enan~tanceaip the. writer fgrmed sev- eral years M.o, \u0026ud by whom he wau lu- medistely reoognisedl upon this visit. A T'he amrand voeU kopi taL few quiestions cf general iuterest; the. belligerent attitude lu Europe formed a aubjeet lu which Fatiier Joseph la appa- reutly mmchi iterested. But tiie deep toues cf the. bell rang out iuterrupting the conversation; h. muet attend the. ciiurcii, aud wonld Tequet the. Gucat- master to form the. escort tiirough the. monastery. Be entera, a tallmnuof most pleasing couutexusuee; a Iiearty bandsibke, sudunuder his guidance in- spection commeuced\u0026 alight différence iu the. menu,4 not mauch, ho ever, froma the commencement of April until the Pirt -of October. At the outrance to the. Refectory la the wvash room, its flttings of the plain'est order, a. remark ini entire accotdance with the. dining room of the «ailent commu- nity.-\" A long des! table stands at the 'western aide of the. roomn for the. use of the. Friars; anotiier table is toward the sothtern eztremity; tliis in occupied' bythe Fat ir S terirand the Pries-ta. Standig out from the centre of the. east- eru wall ln a desk front which during the. meal a priest delivers e, theological reading. Upon the t\u0026bles are noticed a china bowl, mug, wooden plate, spoon, fork The. simple bull of fare consista of ,aeven ounces of bread, two apples, two ounces of oheese, milk and certain vege- tables. lu suimmer mouths the Commu- nity mnenu in augmeuted by the. addition oif coE.., and ea light repast kuown as collation is served at five o'clock. Wiien overtaken with sickuesa, thie Order pro. vides the. patient a dietary of eggs, :fiah or meat should the.-prescription of the medimaA attendant require snob. «W. have a\u0026:âne new guestiiouse now,\" reanarked the, guide pointing througii the wiudow te ea handaome brick building et the, end of the. vegetable garden. «J -muet show you tiirougii that, we're very prend of our work.\"1 At the, time of the writer's Isat viait Sveral years ago, a two-storied house on 6R AND COLORED PATRIOTIC PICTURES Notre-Dame la Trappe' 1BOYS A Fulthful Faiend bt a lFarf.I F... A Regular GoId Mine for Agents!1 HERE IS A CHANCE TO FILL TOUR POCHETS WITH MONEY. MHEE1AGNIPUOENT PIOTURES UN URILLIANT COLONS JUST OUTI 11 A atthful Frlend but a Fearful Foe,\" the great patrlotic picture, bizo 14 x 19 inches; The Fate of the German Raider, IlEmaden,\" the femous sea fight, 16 x 20 lnches, and An~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~ ~~~~~~~0 Unyn tr !BithVlr hll nieti h atec os16 x 20 Inches. Eve~yoe ent tea.apendd ictre tecoxneorte hehericdeeda four gallantaoldlems Thee reapiturs-tOU PICE 1e. AC-Br CING LIKE WILDFIRE* liktot' armuthNothN.Says,\"I .l ai lu46mintes Pease end 40 more. 1 would y 10.\" .B. Noth eyOnt, laa 'soltheoinhousand could have sold as many mor. Peas aed m 40môr.' J.B, Otaw, Ot.,may \"Iuathsdyour pictures 2 hours when I ha thm al sod. wold hve o toubl lugeting 5c.eac. . TRussell, Man., aya 111 ao!dthe3.Oworh l 8 our. Sudmeanoher3.Oworh.\"O. ., logliam, Ont., Baya Ilsoli yourplctuave at lht and hae loed sthe il.to-and e 20 mnd oe\" .$.3., rl Gmrer.o oeildfoBya \"It too eI ony2 or e el our p!tue \"F. ., EEt MeaLTHE On., Bya, eIf Whedonou ihavoell or than irtheotsS.nd us th 3.00end us2il andou 83.00 othemre1to0 Here is the chance af a lfetime te meke moue y fat. The firat agent ln every neighborhood will reapa harvest of dollars-ORDER TO-DAY and DON'T FORGET TO PUT TH E lo. WAR TAX STAMP ON YOUR CARD OR LETTER. OR UT WILL NEVER BEACH US. THE GOLD MEDAL CO.. Picture Dept., WH TORONTO» ONT. 1~. THE LABEL on your peper wili tel! you when your subscription expires. Send in your renewal NOW BUY YOUR HARNESS BY MAIL AND SAVE MONEY COMPLETE SADDLERY CATALOGUE FREE WinniPeg Saddlery Co. : Winnlpeg, Man. Upoii the first floor is located the chapel,.its interior cf extreme eimplicity is oharacteristic; a Friar was busily dusting the wells, he nodded, rules pre- vent the Brotherhood front conversation. Down the corridor is the reading room; plain deal tables, chairs. Its rows cf bookshelves would rejoice the beart cf the student keenupon research cf ancient theological history. The many volumes constitute the writings cf men lu long remote century, the learned ecribes, and amongst these bocks are masterpieces cf literary work. Up a flight cf wide stairs at the foot of which stands a loud tick- ing Teminder of fleetingtime in the shape of a dlock, to the second floor; herein are located the dormitory, infirmary and library cf the priests. The sleeping quar. ters are conducted upon the cubicular plan, each apartment of wlrich is 8 feet iu length, 4 feet wide. A narrow Iran bedstead forms the sole furniture, walls entirely devoid cf decoration, ivith the exception cf a crucifix. Above the en- trance to each eubicle is printed the name of its occupant; adjacent ta the doarway is that cf the \"Pere -Superieur.\" Father Superiar or Hlead cf the Coammunity. 'Not much elaborate furnishing in tlhe manastery, is 'thiere ?\" said he. 'You are doubtlessamaare Chat the Order of La Trappe is the commnmity af our ehurcît mast rigid ia discipline; aur inotta is plainnesa in everything.\" This is -visibly appM.rent inasnu.ch as the nianastcry prol)er is concerrutd; the rule, however, is niot applicaýble ta the large biuildin~g knawn as the (iuest Hlouse. \"I must take voi ta the RefectoirN, now, that's down in the hasenient. it is just a few minutes after clivndi- -ier takes place at twelve o'clIoek.\" The Community iindulge iii onle imcc only per diemi iii'the x% inter-; there is a the river !jank constituted ii feature of the Trappist's abode. In the winter of 1011, ihis pioneer building which con- tained a factory for the manufacture and repair of dlocks and wutches was en- tirely devastated by lire, a calamity which likewise destroyed the entire colo- The Altar in the Chape! nIes of lices then stored in the basement. il, eXcess of two hundred hives were bure ed. But the cornmunity were not dis- inayed hy visitation of the fire fiend; to- daN-, an immense three-storied structure is rea red above the ashes of the building 18 i SWrlhesPrfomaneComfort ÎMU~NS three things it theBp mobile particulrly wel fr the. farm- A ai ekowledge that Hup qusl.ty le tthe best that eau b. built fut au automobile. You bave heard, no doubt, tiiat breakage and erious reçiirs to Hupmdbilesa re remrkably few; that the. Hup lsaslways ready for aerivee. L'lu bave heard, toc, cf Hiup ullng power sud Hup economy-hiow the, car bakuai\u003e no rm rg anduiow lt conts les.sud ru aisfr- ther on a gallon of gasolineoaud cil, sud on a set cf tires. ThBnpRetainsalal the. good features that have made earlier Hupe famus mI ell-liked among farmers sud merchants everyviiere. A five-pasenger car witii so mnch rocm lu the back tiist two extra amt% optional at amail coat, eau b. added witiiout crowding. ,vi rite for the uew catalog and otiier literature, sud the usme of the eaetÉdernier, so that yon eamse. the car. PACTORY DEPUESECNTATIVES Jseph Maw \u0026 Co ., Limited lit King *St.,. cor. \u003e ntyeWinnipeg ~- -- -- --- -- -- -- -^0 ý",
         "The Western, nome iMonthbly erected at the era of the Trappist's opera- tiens. Upon the ground floor is the large and lo~fty reception mont replete in furniture of solidity yet, plain. A guest bookc lies upon the centre table; a perusal of its pages is indicative that t.he Commu- nity of Sulent Tongues is occasionally enlivenedby the visiter frorn an exterior world. Adjacent to the reception cham- ber is an apartment wherein the guet la permitted to smoke, a privilege the Trap- pist is barred against by discipline in- stiLuted within a. reent year. At the western extremity of this the main cor- ridor je the dining room equipped in use- f ul furniahings; a kitchen cemplete in every detail is here located.- The first upetairs fleor contains Borne twenty rooms fitted with handseme iron bcd- steads and other adjunets. These cham- bers are utlised by periosneclerical and lay visiting the 'Monatery to enter into \"tRetreat\" of a few days' duration. At the hcad of the staircase are hose with other appur'tenances, a system of water- works ia inaugurated at the 'Monastery iu case of lire. The stairway te floor nuinber 3 je in unfinisbed condition; the rooms similar lu quantity te the lower fioor are complete in structure, and will be fttted as soon aa the Order are enabledl te finance the cosa. Wit.h an air of pride the (iue8tmaster unlocked a door at the western end of th-ineory; herein are located the suite of rooms assigneci Hair ý Goods Salon the F.,36jlo- sMHawAc- oem1o.uofthe jhw\" qurky .nîed b the exetg an Senld us YOut ombigs--we can unake erPrety Swikhes, Cornets, Trans- fýLatin. UIFChignons., uncler rui at maoderato oat. Write us to-day for partculars. We can Save yoa meney. European Ilairdresls- ing Parlors M1~m 102 Carfton Buildng. mr u 352% Portage Ave. WN IE SILK ro r nvging Bedspreads. Oush- isCrazy QuIts. Best 0 Qulty. Large package oh~ 3 for 25,_- a250. pkgs.Sl.00. Post Pld. LMsa re. Sat.isfie\u003ci Customers Coast to Coast. The John Hopkins Sales Co. 721 ÂAi[BMM q T. WROW\u003eEG for »inga 20 pcturm, or pku. s t or, o'cloek. Ife et once entera the ehurch, remains la-. devotional attitude unti three, at which hour the Friare leave the building te commence work, the presta remaining for private Mass. Laou cf various kinds is continucd with certain intermissions for etudy un- tiI noon when dinner je servedé This in followed by a rest of ene heur, aftcr Which the Commilbity are engmged lu \"work -or etudy until five o'cloék. De- votions foliow; et seven the Community retire te their cubicles. The day's pro- gramme is divisible into the following: Six hours devotions; aleep, seven heurs; five heurs of work; six heurs to the reading of good books and cultivation of the mlud. The applicant for admis- sien lan et accepted without strenuous investigation into bis antecedents. It is imperaUtve ha b. free fron any font- ure iu which the law criminel or civil may follow hie entrance. Admission in stràctly refnsod if lie la the support of hie parents; lie i» enabled \u0026t any time until. under full membership in the Order te beave thle Menatery; -his os- state, persenal and realty is retained by hum until the 'laivews are taken. At hie entrance into the Cernmunity, ho fer four doys romains in retreat at -the. Guesthofuse; he meals are, however, par- taken of lu the Refeetory. SIwuld the aspirant at th. terminatien of hie re- tirement etU évince desire for admit- ta.nce, ho la fouihed the garb and for FrenchSoldie,, krmWdahlglu the fldoded secton ci northwest Frano, «atday mhorod mamc of the hundreds of rain-filled pools te Ris Grace the Archbishop ef St. Boni- face lu readinees for any occasion the Ilead cd the Roman Communien in West- cru Qinada mnay pay the Trappiats a visit. Ç7he entire work of erecting this large bilding has been accompiished by tIhe (ommunity with the sole exception of plastering the roome. A wailk around tie grounds atteste thc busy attitude of the leuse of Silence during its working heurs. Ani area ef several hundred acres is devoted te the cî:ltivation of cerealcrop; additional te tl:c acreage surrounding the Monastery, the Order have a large farm some few miles distant. An array of giganitie barns fitted with every available equip- nicnt may be lne-pected; one stable of re- cent erection centaine possibly -the largeet interior dimensions of such build- ings in any rural district of the province. The live stock consists of forty-five work borses; one hundred head of cows; sheep do not figure amnongst the Community's assets; few swine only are fed. The fowl bouses contain about twe hundred hiens; despite loss by lire, thec aparian indus- try is to-day representcd by forty-six hives of bees. If may be rcmarked that in 1910, in excess of feu fhouffand pounds of honey was marketed, the annual out- put of cheese xanufatured front a recipe in possession of tlic Father lieuse in France, is of large financial 'value. The public are cognisant of littie per- taining te fheinnmer workings of the Order of La Trappe, wbich bouse at St. Norbert in -March, 1015, cousists of 'forty- four adhereuts (fifteen Fathers or Priest.s, twenty-nine Brothers or Friars). The stîingent Iaws of the Cornmuniity conîpel the Tiappist be lie 1riest or Friar to arise every morning at two two years la entered amongwt the pestu- lant iembers; at the termination of this 'Period, 'lie enterathei four years of novitiate. This terni accomplished and aptitude fer monastical life apparent, the final vows and ebligatiens of the Order are given him; he is then \"dead» te everything in connection iith fe world Md hie birth. At the western front of the Mouastery isa aemail cerne- tcry in which live members of the Cein- munity including thc late Father Supe. iior, are laid at i-est. This littie area with its quintet of simple white wooden crosses, was opened 'thrce years age. The churci centains various features of eclesiasticai interet and pipe organ of supcrb workmanship. The Father SuPerior, Rev. Paul, ie a nman Mf striking personality; ho is assieted in the goveru- ance of affaira by a Pricsthood of men of higily adv'anced educational caïlibre. And es the writer was walking away from. the Monastery, the clang of flic bell announced devot ions. Along the sidewalk te the cburcli, Priests and Friars were walking with bowed head and claspcd hande. From fhe interior of the building a fcw minutes after- ward came the music of tbe organ played by the baud of' a master music- ian. The writer wended bis way acrose the rustie bridge, and tbe voices of flhe Community were indicativç of the fuet they wcre engaged in singing the praises of Him wbo, ii. accor(lance .vith perhaps. a strauge procedure upon thc part of thc cowl garbed men, is tlic one and sole goal to which the days, mioths, ycars 6d the Trappist's life is pointed toward. O\"HERqCULES\"9 FOOT.SOAlE Do Pmu koW tu.~tht oaow. sro m aorwoek*9 an ha aow A\"dbs WeMstSlio .. lii ohalàm r. mwood WImlIio Swoinhg; Stops L an d allis pain. HeaiaSors., C94uls, . LOt CL.I.\u0026 It la an AREUEIE400 EICII ENON-PoahoNousj Domi not blister or remvo th. hait and boît oumIll. woîked. Pieàuant ta use. $200 a borde, delilerod. De- scribe your case for specli Instructions and 1101à 8K fto. W. F. Y.m. P-01.138 hua.W\u0026\u0026o. M.kmau. FAT FOLKS 1Iwiflsend you atrial treatmont absolutly FRmR If yeu are tired of being unsightly, uncomfortale and unheaity, I cmn help you regin your former gu ealthmac! vig wi'thoLGut dicting, or exer- cing If wil pay you te coMsL ta spedialit. U\u003e troatmont bam oftsn talken off fat at tbe rats of oe pound i day. A safe and sae mcthod that has many en- dereements. Send postal for descriptive book of valuable advice on Obesity and rny \"Pay-when-redued plan.\"1 Dr. B. NEWMIEi, Licensed' Plysician, State New York, 58 Second Ave, New York C4ty# Deek 214. r.",
         "Maringthe InternationalBoundary 1 TiiMM Woi of 100 Tr Wiittmn fer Thi e ster om e wmont*l By Mam Mol. numive appem arac t a mucii lover oMM Ii Odtimtote ii ufyabove, wvo tre nunyattxwtive W.v.n end Fl.id-buIfIt Fonoes #~.OSIEEU.BED ORDESCRIPTIVEMATTER. gamito ~ WR~FENCE CO. ,Lirnited No hinike it for BARNS; guaranteed to preserve the wood, B~t for yemrsandi s FPLEPROOF, easy to mix and apply. By.s4mply. adding water, it makes a perfect paint. S In- order to place itin the hands of as many Fariners es possible, we offer for the month of May a 25 lb Box which is equal to six gallorns of any Barn Paint, dellvered to your nearest Railway Station, freight paid for eu.h wmh Ordor -Six gWons -cover .White, Brown,ý. 18,000 square feet. Colons: Green, Red, Samples and full particulars on request. Home Comforts Co. 33GamryStreet Winnipeg, Manitoba Whon You Docido to BuIId --wbetber it in a ho\"~,barn, implement shed or other farm structure, wrte us your requirements. we willdrtyo sketches, and subritan estimate for tho material. Order from The GG.G. Co., Ltd., in car- OUR AICHITECTS WILL FURNISH THE PLANS FREE wihinstructions coveriuz every deuil of the actual work. We are prepared to supply you at wholowdei prins.- 0.0.0. Blue Bell Lumber Paper Nails Hardware Ceonent SEnior Twine Plaster C.mapgted Iron Metlhngles, O)rder NOW - ft- etc., etr. cp hpct oniy ,fpiesatisfie8 8G!oa Growers aul R LO INA .SASK.A CALGARY.ALTA Winnipeg -Manitob PirRT the numüber \"025\" siiould b. JL stcapedontibe lait monument cf th iteniatcialboundwaY la the. voe motlila iiik ti..two nt\" not Mioâtiià, ceéb'thed. i Yom e ., i.t àan event oft.aioa icAnd ,vt bocaus no accout the lumot avars of the fact that l1o1s ts \u003cmk thé, boundaxy survey. 130TMty G v as sÏgn ainthe. tGiient,Begu on ec Mber 814.It vas rtfe « Prthiegovrniment ofthie United States on W.buary 17ti,- 1815. Tii. Britiahirpe Imitatives ver.Admirai LordGaMb ien, I~ur~~ubuiand William. Adains. lupesncmivs ere John, Jdn% J. A. Bayard, Henry (IIayy Rseand Aibent Gallatin. At a banquet tendemsd ho tbi. toie afte thet uty, Mn.1Jh Quie Adan ii ade useet it1yS ess - 1M y thes tiih.Tmp c f Janus, oentury.\"P Four yaater the. Treaty cf Giient, la 1818, vientii quesio of boundary Was apreéd upon, an Internaoncnaonvention detsuiied the. lns betv;eén canada and the. United States. -Soon atter a Joint Commb*dm vu. sent to mark Sct this bouadar9' but tir vork wu not flniaiied, t lu%826 an even tiien tiiey bad only. = Ibd teïrtaàk as far *veatvad as = of. e0the Woods. Tii. portion of tiio.boundary between the. mummit of thme Iloekienand the. Pacifie Ocean wuaacom- plisiid dunîng tii. yçara1858 to 1802 Tii.Tr.ay cfWashngton la 1871, set- tled many mattma la dispute b.ten Canada and the. United States.- Canada wus represented on thie joint Euei Com- mission b yTheii.Rgiit ouorab-,%irJohn MaoOSd,z Premier of the. newly formed -dominion. Tii. bounday lUn,- on tbe vas said rgrdn tmun romhL=e In the. hart year 1872,the. tr-ansfer of the Nortii-Wist YFenrtonieafroni the Hudaons Bay ompanyte .Dominion ci aaamd necssry the. appoint- meht of a International Boundary Coni- mission te de\u0026ie the. lin.e o deManctio)n frtween the.,nonth West angle of tii. Lake ofe i.Wo\" and the suramit Of tthe Rocies. - The. British and Canadian Commission- en ruade their start firoru Pembina, Dakota, in the. autumrn of 1872. In' the British-C adian part of the commission then. vers 18 officers, 44 non-commissioned officers of the. Royal EnIgineers, and 26 employees The Amenican purty tanted fromi Fort Stevenson, Dakota, about the saine hume, under command of Major Reno and an escort of 30 tr et ofthe Seventh Cavalny. TeCaamparty had no escort, becaus. there was ne Sitting Bull or hostile Sioux north of the 49th pa=alel to contend with. The work went àteadily on during 1873 and by July 1874, the omrnissioners had reached Milk River in Southern Alberta. From there they pushed On Past Sweet Graus Hilla and = came in sight of the . kes.It was on the 27th day of August la 1874 that the Commissioners came te the last poet of the boundary at the sumit of the Rock- jes. Their work was completed, and the united parties, numbering some 500 men, over 1,000 horses and penies, and several hundred wagons, cants, etc., turned their faces one more to the east. After a junyOf 8W0 miles covered la 43 days th\"e British-Canadian party arrived at Dufferin, Manitoba. The Ainerican party delayed for extra work on the way and did net reach Fort Totten till November. The year 1874, then, saw the actual placing of the. pickets that marked the international boundary from Atlantic to 1 Pacifie-a thousand miles up the xnighty 'q St. Lawrence, a thousnd miles a.long the Great Lakes, a thousand miles aero-s the ranges ef the West, and a thousafl( miles ~over a sea ef mountains. st But the work was fot lçii .Tlie1)\u003c)sfS wbich the commission e .'(q, wi~ood heud in a moumd of stes and earffi, and were but temnpS.y. _qTihe Wyv\"igton Treaty had decdêd- that the. lino betwveen the.,aummit of the. Rooies and tii.Pacifie Coest siould b. matked by permanent monuments, the. construction of wiiich wàa left te ho decided lite. This work wau dons between the y.aa1M0 and 1907. Because ntiigwuaa angecfor the. fil d actinbetweeiithe lalce of tfii Woodaand the moumtains anotlwr treaty was mmade in 1W% ,which Ïiolow.dthe.de- cision of tiie Waahiinton Treaty exoept tht it sa pulated the. mateaof manu- factur. is portion of the. boundary had monuments set between 19 and 1913. Ail tiie way from the. Lake of the. Woods to the. Pacifie Coast the. posta oae înterviaible and set at distances varying from a quarter of a mile to two Miles apart. Between Milk River on the Mon- tana-Aiberta Uine and the. veut coat, the materns! used vas aluminum bronze; froni MilkRiUverto Lake of the. Woods, out bron Monumekt msing the International Boundary ai the summit of the Bookies The two faces shovu show the in- scriptions '«Canada\" and *Convon- tion Of 1818.\" The other faces have \"United States\" and \"Treaty of 1008\"insoribed upon thora. The work of numboring the j\u003eoetm between Lake of the Woods an\u0026 làt Pacifie Coasi lass justbeen oomnplted. The. aluminuin bronze pesta vere built in three sections te facilitate transporta- tion la the. mountains. Each section weighs 65 pounds and the. thre. are held together by a rod screwed lato thnead at the. tep, and a lightning rod at the. bottem. A akeleton freine was set la the. ground or rock and this fllled with a mixture of 150 peunds of oement, 300 poumds et sand 450 peunds ef rock, and 5225 pounds 01 water. In' some cases ail but the rock had te be carried te the tops of the. mountains. Otten the engineers with the. monument sections had te b. lowened down over cliffs with ropes. Semetimes heles had te be blasted la solid rock to make the. feunda- tion for the post. The. monument at the continental divide is 5600 feet above sea level, and another is 8100 feet above sea. Even setting ail the monuments on the international boundary did not cemplete the surv.y. They had te b. nuxnbered; not that the commission was afraid that anyon. would carry a post away without their missing it, but as a matter cf con- venience to surveyors and traveilers. It will bcecasier te designat. positions in the motintains and on the plains by proximitY to a boundary monument cf a certainL number. This work was completed in' February of this yean (1915), and was ini charge of E. R. Martin, engineer for the",
         "International Poundary Comission.Th jugaunça d.wua \u003e power baud in rated nme ~ijwbbohthepost. Ou oMr. uthig hmn, umbersplaced i ruokmm ThT\u003c eS. plates tJe the Place of th. Dùnhercar*andare of xa. Monument Number 1i w on an fisand lthePacifin Oceau- Number 272 marks the cntinetal divide and the boundary Ietween Alberta and British Columbia- *bile, Number 925 i. on the 14Je of the Woods. The monument ahown in the ac- photo le Number 276 and :One shore of the Upper Wâterton làke belveen Glacer National Pk im MUontana, and Waterton Làake Park* Aiea.\u0026 Launches on the lakemake '0c qpot a plabe ofc ei and touiste a l walk around the pool. On the aide sho? la the illustrtion in ecrged min * jetteua and Eiures, \"Convention of 181\" The north aide bas \"Canada\" and the ,outh, «UTnited States,\" while the west f e uls \"Tra-of 1908.\"1 * f United States and Can- adaý 100 yearsto complete the woik made moieouy by the Treaty of Ghent.. ehristieGrant CO. Ltd,9 Reswgmlzod 7he catalogue bouse ci Christie Grant Cb, imitedb, IaJuatbeen .meraio À large -amount -cf mR a p \" bas beeninveted, a»tit t \" womnp a Dow ene of the strongest, fineiaiy, lma Western Ca-adae The.Western Hoqmo Mionthly Then, a ,there l tcadvantage of gtIyiieeed ueaig poer, and the ve r ent advantsge of hvih the resourcee of a weilel-kdwIiolesale te draw upon. flie advertising department of Christie Grant \u003coD., limited, le now 'bueily en- gaged on ils Pll and Winter Catalogue, which wilI be mailed in Augusl next. This catalogue vil be considerably ' / larger tihan previeus one, and wvilI cou- tain quite a numnber of new lines. The Edfitor Western Home Monthly. Deai Sir,-la look-mg Over Mrci pricea, as quoled.in to-day's paper, I notie liàat October. vicat la quoted aI, $1.24, 9M iOcober Sax $.7~ zpread of more tbna M per buab- cand thie ia face of the qfact that the coneumption cof fi4x seed \"hi year le net muci more ta balf of normal. This vould indicate that farm- ers throughout Canada and tée United Slatom are putting everything into vicat and almost entirely eliminating flax. Wietlier the var ends Ibis year or net, business men are preparing for a great revival cf trade i1910. Thie yl create a large demand for all building mateuim4il M aeially for de made frein western fax aeed, and if tiere in no faxaeed growa bhere, vhere 'wl lthe supplies coins frein? Iânseed oil to-day le Worth e.lmost double the average price, and -the tendeney la stili upvardà. A New and QaulUu.\"M kBg -A HAND\u003c.E OF WQVf leN ~A 1~ -A FRAME ROUNDED'ANE\u003e FINELY ENRAVE -A SCAUJWWDFEUGEOF 1*INW* - II -MADE suDBTANnALLY AND ýee- --SENTr PREPAIDlx)\u003e mIYADCrgS FM Jewdwmasd P.RDINGWALLI flni1 IThisGr The aIditoial capital vas neeessary On seount of the enermnous amount of business thst flowcd Ümb li-e Company front ils very bcginning. 1The volume cf business was sometimes 6e great that though every effort was mnade te keep up with the orders it was impossible te do se0, and as a result thc Ceustomers did net always reccive the ser- vice they had every reasen toe xpeet. Bowever for the future things vill be dufferont. With ample Capital, with 50 per cent more warehouse space and with greater experience, there is evcry reason te believe that -a congestion such as vas experienced some monthe ago vili neyer Occur again. One great element of strength is the lose association 'cof Stobart a Limitcd, 'With (Jhristie Grant Co. The Stobart Ce. i. very widely and favorably knewn iu Western Canada. More than forty years ago Stebarts had trading 'posta in various sections of the cuntry. Thon they opened a large Whlsale and retail establishment in Winnip)eg, and later on conflned their Ofergies te the wholesale trade exclu- sively. For over forty yoars the Stobart Cern- pan'v lias been se closely identified with the gîowmth and development of the West that it is intricately woven into thle 'COUtry'ý-s history. WIthe benefit cf the Stobart Cern- paiiv*ý weath, its wide reputation and' TiP e x-ýperience Christie Grant Ce, Linitc2 is sure teo show rapid growth. I think if the stite of- thinge vere plainly put before our farmere,, many of 9~em would switch some land i- tended ifor wheat ile l\u0026x, vhieh ca be safely sown up te June lst-a in leal- waya wiedom for a an to sow flax vben everybody is putting ini vheat and te keep eut of flax vboen everybody else is putting it in.-Yours vcry truly, G. F. Stephens. A Frenchman, near the Canada fUe in Vermont, sold a herse te bis Yankee ighbour, which he rccemmended as be- inq a very seund, serviceable animal- in spite of hie unpre smg appearance. T ecvery quiry of the buycr respecting the =ua-tics of the herse the Frenchmsn gave a faveurable rcply, but always cern- menced hie commendatien vili7 the de- precatory rcmark, \"lHc'e net look ver rood .\" The Yankee, carig little fer the lookseof the herse, of which hec culd judge fer iimself, vitheul the seller'. assistance, and bcing fully pcrsuaded, after minute examinatien, that the bcast wss worli the moderato sulm asked for hlm, moide bis purchase, and took him. A few days after- vards ho returned to the seller i high dudgeon, and declared that be fiad been chatd the quality ef the herse. \"Val is de maltaire?\" said the Frenchinan. \"«Matter!\" said tie Yankee,' \"mâttor enough-thc herse ean't sec! He is as blind as a bat\"\"Ah,\" said tic French- man, \"Vat I w;as toll yeu? I vas toel QU he vas net look ver good-be gar, 1 don'l know if he look at aUl!\" No Veney Down Wn Gonola iii Neyer have we made it, easier for every home te, possesa one of these su- .prbColumbia inistruments. With «ch Grafonola we ,Be~l 12 double'die rec- 0 (21 elections). You simply pay for the records, and the outflt in deliveredl te you at once. $25,0uc m E\" $5t' 0«J Ew L- $8\u002620 lathe otal I h 0 it 1 ode1 orthsw selectiona. aelections. 'Pa trie* 14 Pay 84.25 for your Pay 83-10 for your tione. Puy bd*10.2 f records - then $1.00 recorda - then 81.10 o u reodhe weekly.I weekly. 81.75 weely. Other Outfits $72, $110, $145, $210, $200M WRITIC IOR CATALOGUE AND VUTMMDICTA= (WOU OUR DIFFERENM AIL ODER WpoDP OUIIN WINNIPEG 'PIANO CO* 333 Portage Avenue Winnipeg, Man. 21. iiith mor, int.rmn lu ld. baki. b knitting Pm thletu",
         "Thse Western Homte I Pont hry Irwe tons ForA NouTIidI5hipnuni9 fRequire\u003c The Island 'of Relentment Wriîtten for The Western Home Monthly -by PLosé Seelye-Miller «Before yc\u003eu preose to lier ask ber if she knows how to eook,\" M~r. James advised drily. - \"But 1 am flot proposinik for the pur- pose of gettmg a cook,\" Harold James responded hotly. \" You seem to overlook one very im- portant fact. What means of support can ou offer this girl wbom you would wed? You have neyer done a stroke of work in your life.\" \"But we are rich,\" young Harold de-. elared with egotism. ' « e!' \" the aarcasmn expressed i that syllable was augmented a hundred fold by Mr. James' interrogative eyebrows. \"Oh rot?\" exploded Harold, following bis fatber n*to the ball, \"I'm going down town and hure out.\" \"Good!\" approved Mr. James, drawing on bis gloves, \"Don't look for a white-. handed job, wade in anywhere, and al- ways put in a littie extra time.\" will be doming back one of these days\"' Mr. James wau politely cordial, and held out his hand i parting. Bu t the father watched the son pride.. fuily as bis six feet two swung down the street. \"IBy the sweat of his heart 1\" Mr. James said, \"«by the sweat of bis heartl\" Some weeks later Mr James landed upon an island it was a beautiful piece of Nature, and belonged to hlm from the very centre of the earth to the very centre of the sky above it. It was an isolated island, and Mr. James was having a bungalow built upon it. Hie expected to find a hurry of workmen, a thunder of hammers, and a raspmng chorus of saws, but instead he found an absolute silence. Hie inspected the work accomplished with entbusiasm, he overlooked the piles of building material with delight. Tbere was somethig magnetic about the con- istruction of a building, bis fingers always Write for Free Illustrated Booket- \"lDAIRYING FOR DOLLARS\" Crescent Creamery Co. WNNIPEG Brandon Carman Yorkton SHIP to the POINT 'NEAREST YOUI a nd get Money Order by Retura MailJ Asic your neighbor tc Monthly. $1.00 for otake The Western Home one year, $2.00 for three years. Thafine shield ia to be competed for AnnuaUly by the 1Uth Royal Grenadiers of Toronto and the 1Oth Grenadiers of Wi .ipg-both reginients are now on active service. The shield is the gif t of the Prince of Wales CLese Reixnent (Royal Canadians) and is given in recognition of the Thsmut.ual alliance existing between this fine English regiment and the Canadian Grenadiers. Mr. James stepped into bis waiting motor, but Hlarold swung aggressively down the street, ignoring bis father's invitation to ride. For many days Mr. James noticed that bis son's face wore the same, gloomy, defiant scowl; this was succeeded by a look of great concern. The deflance had died away leaving the young man very humble and anxious, stili dogged in his pursuit of work. At the end of the fourth week, however, Mr. James noted a flying step, a hurried dinner and a dash for the open. \"lBy the sweat of bis bair, be's got a job,\" the father chuckled '\" 11e is his motber's son after ail,\" a look of tender solicitude came into the fat ber's eves, quickly 9upplanted by one of vigorous firmness. \"'By the sweat of bis heart he's got to w-in out!\" Six weeks passed, and at their end, Hlarold handed bis father t hirty dollars. Mr. James looked at it inquiringly. \"lTo settie my board bill,\" Harold ex- plained Iaconicaily. Mr. James wrotc out a receipt, which Hlarold examined carefully, then thrust into bis pocket. IlMy work makes it necessary for me to change my boarding place,\" Hlarold vouchsafed crushing bis hat in bis hands. \"I hope you have found our table satis- factory?\" Mr. James was solicitous. \"'Quite so, I assure vou.\". \"lRun-up when you can, your mother itched for the touch of a hammer or a saw, and he bad planned a long day on the island, tc; consult and advise with the workmen, and also to gratify bis own desire to handle tools and use them ia rather silful way himself. At night le expected to go to the city with the chief architeet in his launch. The workmen had flot come, some accident or sometbing had delayed themi, for tbis was Monday and ail hands went to the niainland on Saturday night. The tools were ail put away under lock and key, still Mr. James efljoye(l bimself in bis own wvay for some hours. 11e could bave managed to keep happy thougb alone, if it had not. been for a cer- tain habit of his. This was bis habit of eating, and habit i a man of bis years is strong. The consciousness that no dinner was possible, augmented by the passing bourm gave him an undue sense of bunger. The worm of bunger gnawed but feebly at first, but it grew rapidly until it bit into bis vitals. Neitber lumber nor cernent, brown stone nor bronze offered any solution of the problem, and then too, he l)egafi to wonder bow be sbould spend the niglit. The more le thought about these tbings the worse they seemed. He lad lboped to rougb it a little, but le bad also hoped to bave companionsbip, and to get back borne at nigbt. At last le arose and began a tour of in- vestigat ion; hidden behind a clUMp Of trees be found a littie shanty which Iooked hopefni. 11e knocked upon the rough I f t c f t 'A~.-~ t 22, BARIPAINT 'Guaratocd' Pure Green, Brown or Red Colors . 5 Gals. for $5nOO Mifl your cash order to-day Sold and Guaranteed by WINIIE'S RELIABLE DEPARIMENT STORE ROBINSON \u0026 Co. LiqvIted, 384=1 Main Street, WINNIPEG, Man. - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - -",
         "The Western Home Afonthly door, propardi to make hie moat ingrati. ating speech when it should be opened tc hlm but it did not open. Ho knockeda mocn'd and \u0026a third- Urnebut -théeoni' answer vouchaafed hin wa the gliStly echo of, hie knock. Hie somewhat pom- poile, conventional menner sfid from liir, and lie becme st a hungrymai,. search of food. Ie lifted thelatchwit'! smre heitation and went i. He sawa meaure of potatoes upon a long table, and afterr mre rummaging he*found a slab of bacon% and 1morne tea and coffee. He ar- ranged hie booty beside the potatoes, but no gustatoi'Y consolation could ensue with- out a liro. Quite lated ho gathered dry sticks and litter and made an admirable heap ready for ignition bj meane of a match. Mr. James dre*ortli hie silvermatch cae with dignity, only to find it empty. H\u003ce began a sercli in his pockets, lu dignity etill intact, but beforo the hunt ended, his dignity was somewhat diehevelled. As lie turned hie lest pocket ineide out, and found not even the stub of a match but E lenty of loose coin, ho flung the latter :rm hitn with something that in a less dignified man miglit have been termed petulance. Mr. James began a methodical searcli in the ehanty for matches, but found nono. Ho discoveredd mre tin cane as empty, as wae lie hirneoif these suggested that smi- ller cane fulli;oÏ substance miglit ho forth- coming. With hie dignity somewhat re- adjusted ho began searching for the life- savn tin can. Having l9oked overy- wlirgsv in a dark cupboard that oeemed filled with blackened. pots and Paho finelly got down on hie hande and knwto peer into the most remote recesses of the cuphoard. A row of Canm rewarded thie effort. He took a can and alit mnto it with hie knife, but the blade sank into a corrosive white duet that rose and smote hlm in the ey os and nostrile and wlierever a particle lodged it burned liko fire. Ho feit the ne of air, and sought the open. After hie eyee had partially cesed smarting lio again von- tured into the shanty. Vory gingerly ho liftod the cmn of corrosive dust, and looked at tho label. \"Concentratod lye,\" was the legend ho road, and with due respect and much care lie put tho can back in the cupboard. a ýy ýy 1' a Lt kI Pr r Several round, short cane appealed to hmthey looked as thougli they miglit hold devilled meat of smre kind, but upon opening one the odor that ruehed out soomd the acme of ail mal-odons. Ho looked at the label. \"Chlonido of Lime,\" ho reed, and with no abatement o! caro ho placed thie can hack in ite place. Mr. James left the shanty with one lest, longing look at the potatoes and bacon. For a time the gentlemen chewed the bitter quid of reflection, as ho sat diecon- solately upon a nougli brown atone. This yielding no great satisfaction ho rose and began a tour o! investigation. Ho had nover seen very much o! hie island, but Mn. James wes no great lover o! beauty and ho foît a certain msense o! aggrievement that Harold wes not with him. Ho romembened the enthusiesmn with which that young man lied advocated the purchase o! thie identical pioce o! property. Ho foît rather bitter that a frivobous girl should bave brought about the present stateofo somi-alienation fnom hie on, hie on who adbeen as whoily hie own as any other k!ece o! hie property lied been. Hie clignty and pompousness dropped from hiin like a cloak, and ho was nothing but a Ionely old man at the mercy o! a cruel Fate. Ho was walking napidly to keep Up with the pace o! hie thouglits when hie foot caught in a trailig vine and the inevitable thing happened, hie foot went up and hie head went down, and hie whole rotund body feil epraddling to the ground. As lie sat ùp to iavestigate, ho discovered a trailing vine attachd to t ho toe of one of bis patent leathens, and the vine was thickly spread wiith smail red bernies. The siglit of those bennies had a wonder- fulY modifying effect upon hie irritation, they took him back to hie boyhood days, when he had tramped the woods for just such edibles as these. \")giSomne people are born with cheeker berrnes, sorne achieve checker bernies, and 0Some, have checker bernies thrùst upon thlern !' Mr. James w#a becoming faceti-. 'Dus with the Drospect of a checker berrÈy festiv'i beforehim. W j'h no undue haste ho began pîickrng the, dAectable hernies, and when ho had gatiwered a reasonable quantity lie sat down in a dignifid and oederly mannor and began eatîng the fruit of hie labors Anticipation1 liowever, had proved greater than reaization. \"«Mumm!\" ho grurnbled, hie placidity very much rurnpled,\"«Mum! tI'd as moon eat the pith of an elderberry stàlk!\" with thie ho threw hie hoard of bernies awa ', but they lied carried hirnback to bozood. 'I wondor if there-are not smre-ground nute to bo found, thoy used to teste goo4 when 1 was a boy,\" and Mr. James began eearchinýg for the smalfl edible nut-that growe in the ground like- à dimiitive potato. Ho had forgotten ho6w the leavos lookod mo ho began puUbng up the greon- grwig thinge and finelly brouglit forth a buncli no! roots from whichlie extracted a smallbulb. He peeld itand put itin hie mouth!-. It was not satisfactory as a gutatoiy deiglit, and ho ýptui!pn the ground but ho could not rid himeelfof that abhorrent teste upon hie tonT e. ý \"It must have beon a wi~onon!\" ho averred as thougli holied been analyzing a botanical epecirnen. Mr. James being a man not easily deviated from hie purpose continuod his seercli for the edible nut, whicli slould satisfy hie craving for Îfood. Aftor mucli1 devastation of vioode vegetation ho at lest brouglit up 'xhat ho l ie b aeeking. Ho knew at once that at lest ho lied found the jj~Ehave recently h ::pwith us and we ever betore; in country We are there business that cornes t\u003c Our buyers are at presen of the great volume of busines and also selecting the merchai logue. This Catalogue, whiel a good deal more. complet. tIý ada is now very closely identi and at the same time have al any time. This means that when an: always enjoy ail the advantagi If you have already deali may show you how we do bus And if you have neyer de. opportunity of demonstrating 0Ôf course to buy from us Catalogue, and if you havelt't by return post. And ýwhen you receive it in early choice there is nothi. CHRISTIE WINNIPEG CANADAi reaiground nut. Yes, by the very way theaî - peeled off lie recognized the edible of hie boyhood. But again disappoint- ment ohilled hie joy. \"Gritty as a send bed and tastelese as a raw potato\" cerne the verdict, as Mn. James wiped hie mouth, with hie hand- kerchief. Hoe tood in deep thouglit for a !ew'moments rackin hie mind for some forgotton tig Ciid e ot\"h ejaculatedwithi'delgi,\"That OIknow lies a taste, a1 veny decided, but very pungenttee. A very pleasant ex- presondipnd iteelf over Mr. James' round fand hoe nubbed hie head where a few han wero cornbed over a shining haro surface \"Crinkie noot,\" ho muftered medita- tively, \"cninkie noot, big leaves etraggling along-\" hoiedescriled, \"Ah!\" lie pulled up'a handful of leaves, ehiny and waxen and certainly not large, their moots were as yeflow as gold, and veny bitter. Mr. James mado no remark, but the corners of hie mouth were drawin down as thoughj the bitternom lied touchod a spring andi lot looso a spiit of. Mr. James continued -hie a, but, however, 'ihhis thouglitiiay have been, hie eyesj oe bent upon thegomd searching forj th i,\"naging eaves of the desiredi objoot. Hoedid not pull heterogenousi végetation.1 \"Ah!\" oxclaimed the millionaire withj satisfaction, \" Thbis e more like it,\" and ho bent 'and pulled carefully upon a clump of deeply notched leaves, and lie held within- hie grasp hie heart' esoino, \"'This is eomothing like,\" lie approvod. Mr. James gathçned a lapful of roota, seated himseof most comfonteble and ho.' gan feasting upon the pungent edible. Ho lied eaten a handf ni of the noots befone ho realized how very pungent they were Ho stopped chewing a moment. How hot hie mouth waa! \"Damnation!\" lie whispered, for evea in thie wildwood Mn. James wouid main- tain a semblenco of himself and hie dignïty. Ho pushed- the rernainder of the roots away, eand liko one heaten in a race ho accepted his defeat, and sat quiescent. A bail of fine hegan tô hurm la hie in- teznon; the bail seeied to omit Hladeietie flames that bored through hie digeStive appanatii like hot gimiets. Mn. James wa in agony. Ho held hie somewhat adipoediaphragm with hotliarme, but lie found no relief. Ho rose and paced the sward but StI the gniping burning, twisting ache withmn. M.tm swaa wholly unaccustomed to pain, lielied lied no Sperten trainin, and mny jpeople spent a good ahane of their timeo odrnarily in eeeking to make hirn comfortable, but la hie extremity when ho nceded a littie cane ho wes alone and unaidod. I* sweat of dietrese etood upon hi e ehod à\"d a large amonmt of addtioýWa capital Invested iare now In a stronger position financiaf thaui Ltact we are now one of the, strongest in this etore botter prepared than tormnerly to handle aU o us by mai. rit in the East purchasing large quantities of goods to take care -s iýe are receiving from our Spring and Summer Catalogue, andise that -wiil be described in our next Fali and Winter Cata- h will be mailed early in August, will be considerably larger and. han any we have heretofore issued. lrgest and oldest wholesale Dry Goods house in Western' Can- tified with us and as a resuit we can buy to better advantage, 1the resources of their immense establishment to draw upon at L1y of our lines happen to be temporarily out of stock we can ges of the enormous' purchasing power of Stobarts Limited. Iwith us, we want you to, send us another order so that we inesa under new and favorable conditions. ealt with us we would b. very pleased indeed to, have the Kto you the kind of values and the sort of service we give. it will be necessary to have a copy of our Spring and Summer talready had a copy let us know so that we may send you one torder at once because while th ere are a good many advantages ing to be gained by delay. GRANT CO. LimiTEro AT YOUR SERVICEI Bigeî nd Botter 8nd Stronger than Befoîs' \"ýe",
         "The Western Home monthly he could bear no more. Hie sank down s l aUlnl uiiupon the softly pde odadwy wadded Up bis coat for a pillow and stretched himself-out. For atime nothing qu Of -.y but the sensé of pain assailed his con- sciousness then he remembered that lie l ew leue Away ii. hiad beeh lungry, but now, the lesser evil was lStin a much greater. He thouglit he must have poisoned himself, but littie dilburns Laza-Liver Pills gently b y little a quietness crept over hlm, the ock the sécrtins, clear away an gentle woocdland noises feil upo n bis ear ite and effete matter from the system, sootbingly and at last e lept Sud- give tone and vtality to the whole denly Mr. James kumpedup ike S l etinal tract. vanized crs. metigililegitimate bhey do this by acting directly on tne bad scurrie acrosa bis face, something r, and making the bile pass through was crawling over bis band, and some- bowels instead of allowing it to get thing else witb a thousand legs was touring the blood, and tlius causing consti- bis neck. Brishing and scrubbing bis ion, jaundioe,'catarrh of the stoinacl anatomy Mr. James stood shuddering. similar troubles. . He could feel sundry soft and squasby [ms L. m. Ratcbford, Peterboro, Ont. things mash under bis vigorous onslaught. b\": \"«Having been troubled for He did noit pick up either bis coat or bis rs with constipation, and trying many silk bat but lie left the place. lHe fet Crent remedies which did me no good very much better for bis nap and even Lever,, I was asked to try Milburn's quite optimistie. a-IAver Pills. I have f ound thent A friendly log invited bim and be sat tbeueficial, for they are indeed down upon it for some time. There was a ndid pis, and 1 can gadly recom- large cavity in the log big enougli for a man Ld them to al people Who sufer f rom to sleep in, i fact lie thought rather tipation.\"1 pleasurably of spçnding a niglit i that ilbnrn's Laxa-Liver Puis ame 25c selfsame log. Having decided this weighty AI i l fo Soof.. . I 00. at,~, e.,it point lie rose and walked again, for almoat or dealers, or mailed direct on receipt of rice by The T. Milburn Co., Limited. ootOUt. Prove it Yourself 1 1900\"11 G RAVITY WASIIE R FREE TRIAL «Tou dont psy a ot.-I Ovm * Everybeo Who hm. h sin the beet evo.\" Write me to-day persoally for bookiet and priculama TORONTO. CANADA PACTOT79T-01 POUT16AND STREEr \"PERFECTION\" WATERPROOF APRON SAVES YOUR DRESSES * By keeping thein dry and spot- * les. Absolutely waterproof and acidproof, and guarantecd not to crack or peel. Pays for jtself at once as dress i nsurance. Il Senti for one to-day, $100 post paid. Money returneti if not satisfactory on receipt of apron. 0. L. ROYD, 312 Eoyd Mdg., Wnnipeg LADY AGENTS wanted to handie this and other attractive gooda. Write to-day. AGENTS-Salary or commission. Greatest seller yet. Every user pen anti ink buys on sight.* 200 to 500 per cent profit. One agent's f-ales $620 in six days; another $32 in two hours. Monroe Mfg. -Co., X 534, La Crosse, Wis. 5 FR. ~ ~« zi,,cwree o fflE\u003cMer veur .,t ed. ATES MFO. CO. P.pt 741 Chieffl Completing the bath operationa anytbing was better than sitting quiet in that wilderncss. Wltl a bcnign look and a big insect bite upon bis brow lie ambled back to tIc piles of building material. H1e lad walked aimlcssly and almost witbout noticing, and lie stumblcd against a big brown atone and would lave fallen lad not a strong young arm sustained hlm. \"Well!\" lie cried amazed. \"It is well,\" tIc young girl answercd \"you would bave fallen had I not caugbt you, an ugly place to fail amongst these building atones.\" \" Thank you very mucl,\" Mr. James said, \"Are you the cook?\" \"The cook?\" the girl's fine eychrows as weil as bier words and voice were interroga- tive. \"Why, I bave virt.ually spent the day hunting food, and nearly poisoned my- self eating green stuff-and--well 1 cx- pected to find workmen and a cook and evcrything licre and I have found notbing, nothing but a wild and barren waste,\" Mr. James cxplained. \"4My story is ahnost the saine as yours,\" the girl dcclared, \"a party of us startetl to hunt a camping place, we thougît we bad cvcrything witb us,1 but wben abreast of this island wc discovered we bati left our provisions. I was not enjoying tbe boat- ing, the water was a little rougli, so I thought I would stay bere wbile the men went back aftcr the necded supplies. I baven't had a good time, it's been awfully lonesome, and somcthing must have bnp- pened, or the boat m-ould bave coine hack long ago.\" Therc was a note of anxiety ini the softly modulated voice, andI a roublcd look in lier fine cyca. \"This must lie mid-summer's day, but it s bountl to corne rigbt some way,\" Mr. Jaune \u003cs orforted chivalrously. \"Yes, but l'mi bungry, and I neyer feel real theerful when I'm hungry,\" the girl wast and intes Ti liver tht into wrlte ei what Most splen min aMV admitted frankiy. \"'There are thing to eat li the cook shantyi and now youve corne we cam a tie and cook thi men always carry matches',\" she rose ana wIlked towards the cook sbanty with great alacrity.4 1 «Trul,1 have not a match,\" Mr. James explodedanldhe feit like a crimiflal. 1 We shail have to.do soniething else then. le there any lime bere? I oaw them siake lime last summer and it boiled Up\u003et seemBa$a if things could be cooked tuat way. There's moat always lime where folks are building.\" 1 111 fouud somne lime ini the shanty,\" Mr. James was- rather dubious about its utility, but lie was. bent on pleasing so icharmmng a girl as this seemed to be. \"Thr1l' and the gentleman bent to the cupboard and handed out the littie can. '£Chioride of Lime,\" the girl read, \"'I'm afraid that won't do, that's just for dlean- ir and dlsinfecting things. MÉ. James smiled. The girl's very quickness and brightness were enougli to enliven evenL starvation, and someway lie ibad sucli confidence i her, lie feit sure she would flnd a way out of their dilemma. The gil'a face flusbed rosy red under he steady look of admiration. \"Pardon me an old man,\" lie begged «'I was only tbiklg what a wonderful girl you are, and bow you rise àbove cir- curnstance. If my son-\"-2 he added musingly. The girl understood and cauglit the cue instantly, \"But sons neyer do,. nor daugliter either. Would you believe it? Somebody's son thinks me quite wonder- fui too, but Somebody thinka I1arn too frivolous to be considercd.\" This she said with sucli naive simplicity that Mr. James felt like championing her against the unappreciative Somebody. «\"Somebody's son must -be a rare pieve 'if he istoo good-\"ý \"He is rather wonderful \" the girl in- terrupted, \"H1e is earning iis own living now, axid he looks just splendid in bis over- aIIS.Y \" Work is the stuif that makes anything worth wbile,\" Mr. James agreed. \"I sup pose you'll cook his meals, that's really the only way to begin,\" Mr. James was finding a chance to air his own views of life an itwasgrateful to his harassed mmdto lndone young person who \"I culd ook is meals, if bis father--\" \"lis father must bce a fool,\"' Mr. James exploded. \"But he is not,\"I dissented the girl, \"lie is one of the self-made sort, I have never seen him only at a distance, and lie bas neyer seen me at ail, but-\" the girl stopped, lost in ber dream. \"He's an old fool just the same,\" Mr. James persisted, for he feit unusually irascible, from ail the rasping irritations of the day,\"l'in used to seeing wel-dressed women, but, confidentially, I have neyer seen any woman even in the highest ranks, look bet ter than you do in that littie white frock, no frills or furbelows, looks built just for use, and--oh, well, pardon an old man, but you look fine enougli for a quecn, but useful enoug-\" Mr. James paused. The girl laugled and finished bis sen- tence for him: \"Useful enougli for a kitchen girl. I'm flot living up to your good opinion. 1 have just thouglit of flint. We might find some arrow hcads or something, you know what flint is when you sec i? Mr. James longed to rise to, the occasion, but the hampering truth prevented. \"I'm afraid 1 don't know flint, but of course fire can be made with flint.\" \"Flint,\" recited the girl, rising and moving forward, \"is grey or brown or ali- most black, opaquely clear, and breaks with a conchoitial fracture.\" Mr. James' jaw dropped in arnazernent, at this glili definition of flint. \"Don't let that frigliten you, I learned that fact by pure accident. I found it in the dictionary, andi thouglit it soundeti rather irnîressive. l'ilt-l'in learning tbings to impress lis father,\" the girl made naive confession. \"I1 wish my son-\" The girl quickened lier pace, ,Ind begajn bunting for that )ecllitr IiIId of quartz known as flint, whiich is grey or brow-n Or ahinost black, andi which b*reaýks v\u003c iia conchoidal fracture. ''Iow is this?\" M\\r. Jnnws l)ent labor- iously and picked iil) a sliinfg eh. ''Týhat is nothing b uta aierp1l, ,stone. Ail the routi n ,\u003c ,~2\u003e~% a~sJse-e.. .,' z ~ v. - -, flnd, are relies of bygone ages when they belonged to a sea--beach or something and were worn smootb by the continuai wash- ing of the wavcs.\" Mr. James looked at the girl in appre- ciative admiration. He felt that lie was getting mudli valuable geological knowl- edge and in a most fascinating way. \"4This,\" the girl said presently, \"must be flint, for it is a clearish grey color. Let's sec if it will break with a conchoidal fracture.\" She lifted a larger stone and struck the bit of quartz vigorously, \"It is flint, sce it lias broken witl a sharp edge and hollows out something like a sheli. Now for your pocket knife, we n'ust strike-fire with flint and steel.\" With placid dignity Mr. James reacbed for bis pocket knife. It was not found in the expected place. From one pocket to another lie searched carefully, then frantieally, finally with a flustered out turning of eaeh, but no k-nife appeared. \"I must have lost it,\" lie declarcd de- jectedly. \" We've simpl1 got to have something to cat,\" the girl averred, anti she pulld open a little handbag that hung on ber arm. \"My manicure scissors!\" and she held up the scissors joyfully. Like a magician wth the flint and steel, shc pro- duced a shawer of stars that fel W notb- ingness. Mr. James led the way back to the hcap of kindling hee lad prepared carlier in the day. 11e tore to bits an important hu.ai- ness letter, and the girl hoarded tFe scraps. The gentleman now proceedcd to invoke the god of fire by means of flint and steel, and the girl lcld the bits of paper where the fiery stars could fall upon them, but no ignition resulted. \"I guess we'll have to give it up,\" Mr. James concludcd after ail efforts had proved futile. \"Not yet,\" the girl contradicted, \"there's punk!\" diWhat's punk?\" Mr. James asked dazedly. This young woman always held out some new hope and neyer seemed to get to the cetd of hier resources. ',WMhy punk i9 punk!\" she explained lucidly. \"I don't know it very well My- self, but it's decayed wood, and tley cal it'touchwood.' \"If it's decayed wood, you want, 1 know wliere there's a big rotten log,\" and Mr. James started for the log le had found earlier in the day. The girl waiked firmly beside him. \"There!\" Mr. James exclaimed with a dignified flourish towards the log, and hie felt prouder of that decomposedi mon- ardli of the forcst, than lie ever lad felt of bis solid bank account. \"It's a fortune!\" thc girl applauded, picking bits of thc wood off ready for the, fiat fire. But after many trials they found that the wootl was not in the rigit, stage of decomiposition or else it was not dry enougli. The man and the girl faced ecdl other in consternation. Weare not very bungry anyway,\" as- serteti the girl cheerfully, and sIc smiled up into the oltI man's face. MNr. James returned the look fully con- svious that lie hatl soniething 'ey oot to look at. Shec was sirnply rssed, and wliolesornely gootl looking. Mr. James could not understand why the father of a wurking son should objeet to bier for a dauitghter-ini-law. He wished that bis son hiat chosen a girl from the worldul- classes instead of th~e class of fashion lie Lid selected. Siffdenly the girl began puiling the bait pis froin lier hair. One Dollar pays for THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY for Twelve Months. The Bcst Magazine Value imiiIalle. Send it to your friend at a distance.",
         "Tbe 1Westef\"n Home MWon thly 1 26 \",Celulodi\" éh. ejaculated tersely, stit catches ire sometimos from just being near a fire. Sometimos oven the sun- shine wiH set celluloid te sxnouldering.'1 She.began breaking the hairpins into tinybitauntil she had alittle heap of ahinîni kindlings. Mr. James tore up a ;àalie contract to add te the store, and he made ready a heap of dry sticks. The flit andit=élshed its shower of sparks upon the celuloid, and soo a littie O\u0026ouldering rodneos showed, a breme swopt up and fanned the dullnois into Rais thé paper blazed, the wood cauglit \u0026ie. Thebreoze became a sudden gust ci wind'and scattered the littie heap of i e Tii grl sheltered the blazing remnnts wth ber skirta. Mr. James made a q*ick dash for some larger sticks caught theburning fagots up and stoed them lu the hollow log, thus sheltered a Steady blaze ensued. The girl scraped the skins fromn some potatoes with ber scissors, and cut theni up with the saine. In the shortest pos- sflespace cf tino she had thon ceoking over the ire. Mr. James was industriously cutting bits of bacon with the sharp edge of a piece of flint. While the potatoes cooked they toasted the bacon over the fire, and finally made smn tea in a tin can. \"If we have any thing to eat when we oet to heaven,\" Mr. James eulogised, hpighinself for the third turne to the tasty potatoes, \"I think it will taste like \"lLife in a cottage wouldn't be so bad,\" dreamed the girl. \"Don't y ou worry about that pig- hesded-\" Mer. James began. \"Well weIJ, weH, \" -ried a hearty voice behind l~em, \"you'twopicnicý*ing here!\" the girl exclained rising and standing be-. fore a blue-overalled young mn. Thon auddenly remembering the partner of ber sorrows of the day, she turned to Mr. James, \"This is--the young in sh. introduced with great lucidnoss, for te her at that tino there was but one young is in the world. \"We've met before,\" Harold said cheer- Mufy. \"Father this is Edith, her brother. brought ber down this mornmng. We are g oint camp here, after-we're married. Ahe's gomng to cook rny neals.\" ' The two men were wringing each othor's hands an only two who have misundor stood, and missed each other can. \"I'm working under the architect on your cottage, I couldn't find work any- wheroe eue, and I guess if I badn't been the son of the chief boss, ho. would have turned me down toc, 1 hope you don't dispprve athr?\"There wan a note of wtflafecin nthe young man's voice. \"I was just about te remark to Edith an you came up that her pig-headed father- iin-law-to-be would relent if h. only knew her, and 1 do not retract one whitaI 1flud 1 have been just the kInd o a pig-head most pig-bead are, snd the. worst pig- heads are the blind ones who won't seS. Lot me tell you son, that this girl han Ihore sonne than nature ever packed in skuil. I'rn going te soettie a million-r \"Ni««ot rnuch,\" ycimg Harold parried \"w're both lanig the jôy of work Pnn cf common tbiugs sud we'ro going to win Our own way thersarne as you sud nother did. We're going to camp right bore on this islsud. I've always Ïtched for bam- mer sud nails but they were n'tl my curriculum.\" \"And I've always wsuted to putter with cooking, but my mother wouldn't let me spoil my bauds,\" Edith explained, rosy with joy sud exctent. \"Fate han relented generally,\" Mr. James wiped his eyes \" Fate is a LIoslmot cf the lime not te rlent but luincanem Fate looks a little likeSomo. A WEE BIT 0F AN EDEN Written for Te Western Home Montbly by M. E. Ryman Jo. looked at Della, sud Della looked ah oec; but the, bailpaid ne attention te either. Il pounided sud beat sud Ihreshed and arnaahed every thing li its path. Chieki a pane of glass cracked The. windows rattled, sud the lithoe houa sivered inthe gras of the storm. Sud- denly there wan a7Pull. The bail cesed but the rain stil poured down, an if, having been held lu aýbeyance during the on- elaught of the bail, it was now having 1h. opportunity. Gradualiy it, tee, cessed sud tbe drenchcd beaten world presonted a dixmal Thp ren which a short half hour b.- fore had been the pride cf DoUa' heart wan lu ruins. Nol a stalk was left stand- ing. The vines at the deor sud windows were switched sud tom te tatters. \"O, Jo.!\" moaned Della, \"just look, after ail the pains l'y. takon!\" But Jo. wan gazing moodily at bis ruined grain fields. 1h wus a terrible disappoinlment. The first seson, the early, front had eaughh their gardon and feed oats; the second year's crop had beon nearly ied by the. drouth; sud this, their third Sson on the homestead wan à total failure. Things lookcd black indeed. Let's sell out sud go back omit, Jo.,\" said Della. \"I'm tired of this constant failure. Wasting our lives this way is al nonsense; besides we have Jo.y t~o th4nk cf now.\"1 \"Nobody\u003ed buy. You couldn't sefl a farrn bore for baif wbat we've put inte it. But where the interest monoy ih te corne from this Ealli beyend me,'\" replied Jo.. \"«Jo., I've su ides,\" persistod Della. Les plant trees sud vines sud bushesi aroimd tho yard sud make it look as if it aimounted te aomothing\u0026 sud perhape soie aOne wiil hppen -ansd buy it for its good looks if it won't grow a crop.\"1 \" Net muchý will people buy a farm out bore for its looks! Foik are getting wise te tbis country, sud they're net te be takon in as ewniy as tho fret settiers\"I grumbled Jo.; but nfter a glance at Doua who wna gama sdlyathber ruined flower beds, ho =dd e lthre'lllbe ne crop te barvest thia season. 50 there'l be plenty cf time and we'il try 1h.\" For a day or two the ground wan tee wot te begin o ations, se they spent thoir eveningsp g. One thing was certain, there wasno money te spend on tho scheme. They must do what they could with the means at hsud. Fortuniate- ly they had chosen a od spot for their buildings, sud lu their liraI enthusisn over their homestead, had laid eut the gQunds carefully leaving ample room for Iwnsu ado While J o.wus preparing lm iruined grain fields for nexh roars erop, Della kept the weeds dow inthe flowé es and garden,ayi f she couldn'î raiae flowers and veetales she wouldn't raie weeds. During tho autumu wbile Jo. was away helping othors harvest sud tbresh beyond the path cf thé hall storm Della sud wee Jèeydid the chores sud transplauted the. wl lwers into thé empty flower bodi. One long bcd wan fihled with violets, the larger blue cnes lu the centre sud a widi border cf white cnes on either aide. A bed cf ye=o violets occupied a smaIl triangle re the path from the door forked. Other beds were flled witk uld. larkspur, prairie MIes, duck'u biR sud wild roses. Occsonay Jo. sud Della woeild. take a day off sud go to th. river for bushes or trees or vines, or take turne when drawang water te. take Up a plant or bush. Sooin tbiî-r\u003cws cf Saskatooni buahes formed. the nucléus of a wmnd break, sud ground back cf them was prepared for thb- governinent trees be had aigned for th. winter before. Two long rows cf gooseberries, lwo of wild currants and oeeof wild raspberries besides a long bcd cf wild striwborrls. gradually teck their places lu thMl part of the gardon devoted te their use. Wild clematis teck kindly te its new home by ho porch sud sbowed ithappre- ciation ýy climbing up the rude wall sud peeping lu Ihrough lb. Windows.. The lawn was sown te brome graussud a hedge of thorn bushes ws set out, with many ningivingB by Jo., completed the frst chapter cf the sobene. AUl this teck time sud hard. work but tbey had a great incontivo, weren't the striving te make their place col1eablo i that theyrnighh \"go baec eomt sud buy a place sud live like folks?\" Every ipare moment was utilisedlunimprovmng lbe gardens the -buildings, the fields. Soon beverything ehowed. the same untiring zeal yand perseverence. At firat, tbey feit that- they ecould not paethe tim to jo n i the social life that was growing up around them, but, lest they should appear awkward and be- hind the timon when they \"got back east,\"0 ethy adualyentered \"the swim,\" asB JO ~~'ustreeyears more. paased,-three Yefrs filled to the limit ith that tirelesa energythat imderlies aiu great under- takinga and overcomes ail obstacles; though a cloue observer might have noticed that the stock Phrases, I\"back east\", and \"back home\" were flot uttered as oftenly ns formerly. One morning iust before harvest, Joe came into the kitchen where Della was miigbread, and said, \"lWell,Doou àcne has corne at lait. Mi:. Murdoc wanta to buy thil. place, Wante it bad, too. Ue'Il give thirty dollars au acrs straight for te whole half section, and we keeP the crop, or forty just nsià stands. \"tThe stock Wiil Pay ail outatanding billeansd more. What do you na\u003e'?\" \"We'll have thirteoii thousand cleur at least,- neat littie amm for six yeara' wOrk. W.oCn go back ont aud get a pod lace and live like follk\u0026\" D abad straigeued Up and s*\u003cod before hor tlu brea.d ahould.red buubad with wide opened eyes., Through the open window owhue the merryprattie of boey and littie Dorris; be- yond iu the Pasture six fine looldng cows were conteutedly cropplug the ri\u0026li pai; a littie farther on some colts were haViug a frolie. A iy rewa scoldingad w5O reeà t he porcli For a minute mmand, wMm faced each other, thon Della exclid Wh Jo., we can't you know. W. a tgv up after all the pains we've tales to mak \"Saeabe~\"Put lu Jo. n Della 'ui- tated. \"To make it the nIcest colist iaceifti the world,\" went on Doua. Whist dld yen @ay to hlm? You didn't tell hlm h. coul hâve it, did you, Jo.?\", \"NOt xactlY,\" replied Jo. ,I d' talk àt over with .you. ,Yon me, be\"d heard how badly we wauled to go back eut and h. thought-\u003eJ' .\"Ô boffthe enti\" broke lu DegaM. l more emphaisthan sog.,I dgYom 1. him we've made this wee bit ma Eden for ourSelve.sud we're goeto ivlu il.\"P \"Thsnk lhe Lord,\"relied Jes*ia sud- den burst of fevorZ \"lil .11hlmt\" and ho strode c'ut through the vlne-tovered pS\"h, a.broe.d milermkliag,ùp hie 'PURI'TY FLOUIR igue »«d a\" 3~ »M\u0026 Recruits to Kitchener's New Army take up Iparrng ns a part Of the soldire'straning",
         "Thbe western nforne Mont hly- The Younig Man and His Problem aff010E 0r À PROFESSION OR BUSINESS If a man la to get ulong i the world ho must choose the woek for which ho is intended. Naturat aptitude ehould probabty be the main element in choice, but as thins are to-day natural aptitude is flot very much eneouraged. Boys go where thoy find an open door; giltake to the shop and the offices. Now sud thon a frboy robels, and trikes for the city. If he ismis- taken in judgment ho at least 's right m decidmg to follow the line of bis inclination. As a matter of fact boys wbo foiow their real inclinations rarely fait. Those who leave the f arm because of laziness or because they tbink manual labor la Iméan and lowty are sure to fail. But wbether one gets into the business ho liaturaliT preors, or whether ho is at one that ho grows to like,'\"theesecrotaof sucess depends ultimately upon five essential quaities-s-trength, ingenuity, good addrose, trong nervous power sud onterprise.\" It would not bo a bad tbing f or yong mon ta road over and over qamnthe words of B. T. Froode. 0f coureathse qîlalitie must be backod up by in- telligenegeean sd spocial. For this reason every Young man should get as good a scbooling as p Nsbe, and should ferra the habit of private study sud off con-ý eulting others wbo have succeeded in business. More than this every inan should go into work decidod to make gocd'n the Uine chosen'sud in no other. \"A rolling étone gathers no moss.\" \"Theres the màrble, tber's the chisl, Take it, work Ît at thy wiil Thou alone must shape thy future, Heaven eend thee ïtrength sud ekiLi\" PERIEVERANCEC A business is not built up in a year, often not i Several years. The primary work is the most laborious at the same time it la the p art wbich gives stability ta the whole. The story of Bruce sud the Spider la for almenhi*i agos Audubon el this story of bimseof: \"An accident happened ta two hundred of rny original drawings. 1 beft the village of Hendorson in Kentucky, situated on the banke of the Ohio, wbere I resided for several years, ta proceed ta Phiadoîphia on business. 1 looked ta my drawings before my departure, placed them.care- fuly in a wooden box, sud gave tbema in charge of a relative. My absence was of several montha' duration. When 1 returned after severat nionths I enquired after my treasure. The box was brougbt and opened; but -reader, fetl for me :-a pair of Norway rata bad taken possession of the whote, and reared a young family among the pawed bits of paper which but a few months previously had represented noarly a thousand iinhabitants of the air. The burning heat which in- e tantty rushed tbrough my brai was too great to ho endured without affecting my whole nervous systera. I étept for severat nigbts, sud the days passed like days of oblivion. Thon I took up my gun, my note-book sud ray pencil sud went forth into the woods as gaïly as if notbing had happened. I feit pleasod that 1 now might make btter drawings than before, and ero a period not exceeding tbree years had elapeed my portfolio was agam fLihed.\" Did you ever know anY n to pursue any kind of business for ten Yeas honeety and faith- ful'y who did not succeod? lPrseverance wiilconquer aU tbings. * * ECONOMY Richard Cobden onoe said to a gathering of work- mon: \"The world bas alwaYs been divided into two classes-these Who have saved and thoee who have sent-tho thrifty and the extravapnt. The building of ail the bouses, the mils, the bridges and the sbips, and the accompbsbmont of ail other great works wbich have rendered man civilized an d happy b as been done by the savers, the tbrilty; and those wboý have wasted their resources have always beon thoir slaves. It bas been the law of Natreadc Providence that this should be so; and 1 were an impostor if I promised any las that they would advance tbemselves if th ewre un- povien,thoughtles and idie.\" . he L orest bole as if in bis power by soif-donial and oconomy, and yet witbout meanness, to raiso hiniseif from the condition in wbich ho is placed. Such a man mnay walk wben others ride, may take such recreations as cost notbing, may take plain rather than cotly food, may ini short, byve the simple life. Economizing for the sake of becoming independent is an indication of a manly character. Burns bas it in this wieo: \"Not for to bide it in a hedge Nor for a train attendant, But for the glorious privilege 0f being independent.\" Did you evor stop to tbink that 5j/ cents saved each day moans 820 a year and that this with interest means $260 in 10 years, or $308 in forty years or $580 i fity years? There is of course a false economy, which ends in miserliness. It is a peculiar thing that those wbo bave been noted for their oconomy in small things bave beon known for their generosity in large matters. INDUSTRY No man can bc prosperous wbo is not industrious. Nor can ho be happy. IdI.eness is the bane of life. \"Dream not, but work! Be botd, be brave; Let not a coward spirit crave Escape from tasks allotted! Tbankful for toil and danger be, Duty's high calwillmake thee flee The vicious, the besotted.\". One day when Benjamin Franklin was preparing for press, a tounger stoppod into bis store and spent an hour looking over te boks. Finaly taking one in bis band be asked the clerk the price. The boy said: \"tOne dollar.\" \"'Can't you take tess?\" said the lounger. '«No,\" said the boy. \"one dollar ie the price.\" Some time after the lounger asked for Mr. Franklin, who left bis work at the preesta wait on him. \"What is the lowest you wiil take for the book?\" Asked tbe visitor. \"One dollar and a quarter,\" said Franklin. \",Wby, your Young man told me it was a dollar.\", \"So, it was, at that time, but I would rather bave sold iï thon for a dollar than to bave my work for a quarter extra.\"\"Well, wo. , site loungor, a your really lowest price now?\" \" One dollar and a hall),\" said Franklin, and that r'ight off!1\" And. liq got it. There was an'old copy bookhoadline that cohtains a geat truth. \"Industry is the mother Of good luck.\") Micawber waiting for something to turn up le nota good type of the successf ut man of affaire. BUSINESS MORALITY Henry Ward Beecher once said: \"«In tbe long run, a tried and proved character for bonor and honesty le the best capital and gives the largest intereet. To ho sure those things wiil not atone push a man forward. Ho must bave good sense, enterpriso, skill, persevor- ance sud stoadiness. But more Mon stumble fromn want of moral qualities than from want of business capacity,\" 0f course tLiere are many mon lacking in business morality wbo seem to have wonderful suc.ce. These, howevor, are not true mon of business; they are pirates. A iman may make mono y at public oxpense, may defraud bla workmen, may do many illegitimate tbings sud not get caugbt. Ho may amass a fortune and, indeed have honore beaped upon hinm when ho shoutd be in prison-yet, we cail this not succese. it isn't the kind of success any of our roaders wish. The crook succeeds only for a tune. No one wiil say that A. T. Stewart the first great store-kooper of Now York, made aliiis wealth in a way that could be commended, but ho stood for some things that are praisewortby. One day an old lady aproached one of tho clerks and askod regarding some cafco: \"Will it wash?\"' \"Oh, yes!\" said the clerk. \"Thon, l'Il take some and try it,\" said tho old lady \"Wby take the trouble?\" said the clerk. di 1bave aeaytriod it.\" And Bo the sale was made. Mr. Stewart who overbeard the conversation called the Young man aside and said: \"Wby did you tel such an untruth about that calico?\"y \"Oh,~ it's the way of business,\" said the Young man. \"But,\" said Mr. Stewart, \"Id t seems a poor way of doing business. She wilt try thegoods. She will accuse us of misrepre- sentation, and wiil demsud lber money back, sud she will be right.\" \"Oh!\"l said the Young man, d1'il telt bier she didn't get the goods bere.\" \"No\" aid the great merchant, 'i don't want goods representod ta be what they are not. I want the confidence of My customers. Tbey will buy as soon knowine the truth, as any other way.\" The sequel to this is that the Young man told Mr. Stewart he was a fool as a business man. But tho Young man was nover heard of again. It cannot be repeated too of ton that honeety ie the corner atone of succos. Canadian Cavafry cheering King George and Lord Kitchener as the ROyal Train passes",
         "The Western Home Afonthly 19C ta 42o- Por Rod F.O.B. G uauanteod Santisfnctory B3uy the Gonuine \"Ajax\" Fenoe, If you want tbe boit. We save you 25 pe r cent or enore and guaranteo t. pIue. you. SaId only ln full bales of 20, 30, and 40 rods each and on 30 days' trial. Money back If unsatlsfled. WAX TAX NEANS GmouM NEGESON VINEAr= 01MOU SUIaT I EISTED We offer you whai thousauds of Wetern fermera con.lder the higheat grade Smicing procurable. Ai prices tha\" vu save you 25% and more Our \"Aux'\" Fence is heavily galvanised to preveut rust, doms uot »ag, bulge oui, or buakie, siway. ,tretche. evenly, and .tays .tretcbcd. h Order your quant1ty' by 1ocaI fr.lht l a car lots or club togther with your nelghbors and rnske up a oailcad ahi mant or 4,OW lbo..and obtain the carload rate vblch I mre esviii amount to: ce per 100 lbn. lu Manitoba to 88 cents per 100 Ibn. a Calgazy, Aibrta. W. viii quote Fou dJeled prunoul l ot\u0026 0WAnd guarateeFou a uavlug eof$on to 0100.00 par car. Every rod of wire USE»MIlPML GOVEENEENT GAUGE, flot the light vire ued by other merehant\u0026. il sas bard propoSition f0 tell the difference between No. 0 snd 91 vire but we stand bhbndeveryrod we sel! with t ibfllohwnrue UBEfll V' i»O D EATMXPNI NT »M'r OE»DTE 07AXPEOURnCIR WE GIYAP.AEETO MEMMfE TEOUGEROUT OP M MM MA N0M'UYàà MIGMT TOP A\"D BOTTOX VINESAM E ULL NUEBEN NMMEGAUlGE VITE NUMBEN TWELVE M EEEIAEAi» STT VIENS. WB VILLTA=N»CM AYTwV IE OU» TO BE U»= BIf. L PEPUN» PMMUEGT CE IEBOTE VATAI VUW L DONATE W0.00 TO A\"T CEAMIABUE INTITMTON MCMEN MAT NAM-. We make thi. guarantes bccau.e a number of other wire manufacturer.aenga lighteri gaugs vire and quoiing almB pr pneu te ours but vhen you buy a lighter grade feucig you gre not savingmouey as you will have to replace in haîf the trne to, wbat you viii aur MAX BEAU». We make promptshipment, lu the MsJorltY of casas ahipuient goiug forward smedasa received; lu addition you' racelve brand new fenciug beavlly galvauised ln every style desired and full 6136 roUa. T the e ove intc, coniderstion when purcha.lng fencig and you vil Sud MUAXwlll cet you 3 te 7 oeuf. per rod lem ihau ihat offered by other. ________________ \"«AJAX\" HBeavy Fence. No. 9 Top snd Boitom wire.. Intermediate line aud .tay vires No. 12. Cat. Style ORDER BY RETURN Pricewat ai nnipeg ____ spaee beiveen lino wires Welght per rod 726 Hog Fence ...... 7 wire 26-im. high, stays 13-lu, spart.................... 3, 3,4 5 5,6............... 6 lbn.. 19 0726 Hog Feuco............ 7 wire 26-in. high. tays 6-in spart..................... 3, 34, 5,5, 6.....................b.. 250 748 Stock Feces........... 7 vire 48-n. igh, stays 13-u, spart................ ... 5, 6, 7, 9, 10, Il.................. 6 lb.. 23o 83M *Hogand Sheep ......... 8wire 30-u. high, aya 13-lu, spart.................... 3,3, 4,5, 5,6, 6.................6 Ib.. 22o 080Hogasd Shep....8wr3-. high, sasys 6-in. spart.................... 3, 3, 4, 5, 5, 6. 6...... .......... 6 b1 . 28 936 Sp. Hog aud See. 9 vire 36-lu. high, stays 13-lu. spart.................... 3,3, 3, 45, 5.6,7............... 7ý lb.. 26o 0936 Sp. Ho g sud Sheep ...9 vire 36-lu. high, says 6-lu, spart.................... 3, 3, 3, 4. 5. 5, 6, 7............... 9 lbo. 3 942 Stock Fence........... 9 vire 42-lu. high, sisys 13-lu, spart.................... 3, 3, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9...............7% Ibn. 2634 1050, Stock Fence.....10 wire 50-u. high, tay 13-u. part .................... 3, 3 3, 4, 5, 7 8, 8, 9 maea*qvea*ami10 b.., 28c \"«AJAX\" EXTRA HEAVY FENCE. Made of ail No. 9 wfre throughout. Piices ai Winnlieg 4334 Field Feuees........... 5404 Field Feuce........... 6404 Field Feuce ........... 7484 Fld Feuce ........... 10504 Stock Feuoe .......... 7264 Sheep sud Hog. 9424 Stock Fene ......... 4 vire 33-mn. igh, taya 22-n. spart.................... 5 ire 40-lu. bigh ty 2-.sart .................... 6 vire 40-lu. hgh stas 22-lu. spart.................... 7 vire 48-lu. b!lh, taya 22-lu, spart.................... 10 vire 50i. bà tya2-n. spart .................... 7 vire 26-lu. hihssys 11.iu. spart.................... 9 vire 42-n. hi h, stas 22-lu, spart.................... 10, 11, 12 .................... 9, 10, 10, il.................. 6,6, 8.10, 10................. 6, 6, 8, 8, 10, 10............... 3,3, 3, 4, 578, 8.,9.......... 3,3,4, 5, 5, 6................. 3 ,3,3,4, 5, 7, 8.9............ 5%lb.17o 7 lb.. 20o 8 lb.. 24o \u0026u OU lb. 28c It 13 lbo. 390 il lb. 310 12 lbo. 35e 8 \"MAAX\" HEAVY SPECIAL HOG, STOCK AMDPOULTIT PENCE. no. 9_Topaud Bottom, No. IX Intermediate and Umnevr. go ln. bigle,1lioevres, stgsa. \u0026part, pacing ,, 3,3,,,,8444,,,,eht 13Ibn. Prceperod ......................42o \"MAuX\" GATE 4 PEET IGE W idth . . . . . .. . . . . . W eght.. . . . . . . . . . . Prlr. .. . . . . . . . . . . -i% ft. 35 lb,. $1.90 8 f t. 50 lbo.. 83.45 10 f t. 62lbs.. $3.70 12 ft. 70 lbo. $4.00 14 Il. 10 Il. 78 lbo.. $4.50 82 lb.. $4.75 BARBED WIRE 225 Por 80rod ispool 2 Point W. offeron foU wlbbre l m re t loaft iwbole. ule prires lwer tbsnimoabfrn iler ilealer t ~a.eBt. Evry roa miade of hlgh grade rtii t rcrbis. oS the cbeap grade that wili mueeil re. \u003eclgln a courle cf eaïu. r\"larefulem5re = of tii. l fou en O$Is8l1., 4ta SpewndabeavWe latha firelz Mw Wf1E1.advanclng unjdiy ad wben aur stock 1..ex. iausteilwe cannai. w t. lb.advamw w riUe. ORDER N0W FOR YOUIt P TUIlE WANTS, 700 wtin \u0026oneu i guamBtemiawBnstay advauce. EB\" Io I lI fu%1 gateed. you do mot bave to keep$lf you tiink you avenotUreedIYOuI rbetteralne thanm i0EiO cre elsewbere.NOT'E THERSELOW PIWUEU. 4 point0 alvanissil Eabed Wr ln 80 rail Jpoohp3f weg uIt 86 IcuSbs. 1'rIe. Spool.............0 pont GWvaulsed Earbed Wire lu 90 toilSpoals $2.25 vlbt aboutit lb\u0026i i. pr ..er .... -le4ianil Gatemli t SoS clam la redai WIre 4n1 CI\"\u0026i GET OUR ~~~U A PRCSONd BIDRTWN9CEA Srand SALIT Ou.' Vehiole DebP£Ltment 091e .y@La Ouaremtedl517 5 for ibis Iligh Grade Rond Wag- on.Ra comfortable Stick Seat upholsiered lu high grade imitation leather. Shaf is are lied aud corner braced. Whfelo are 406 front, 44\",rear, Sarvin patent 1\" ful hickory, have 1\"I round cedges teel tires.. Screwed rima. Body measures 24\" vida and 56\" long, uicely fini.bedd sud tronglY built lu every respect Gear b as arched 15-16 l ong distance aIle. full clipped. Ful ize apriugs, double reacli, haif-circle fifth wheel. Equal te, gears ou vehicles aellug ai double our price. Order our M I 7 5 no. 77, complets with shah.t at %0a Complote 9-Piece DININ GAD5 ROOM SETat- Big Saving'qm 5 nomma 49150 M This beautiful set ja made cf hardwood, finiahed surface oak golden or sarly Eugish finish. Buffet ha 46 mche. vide sud bas ibrea amal drawer., oue large drawer sud double cupboard, leüded glass doors. China closet is 30 luche. vide, 58 luche. higli. Tablle bas 45-iuch top, and extends to 6 feet. Dinar set consiste of five amall sud orle arm chair, upholstered lu imitation leather, strougly con- structed, brace arma on smaîl chairs. Don'i hesitats f0 order this set on account of its low price, vs have sold hundreds of them sud guarsutea you a firt-class value. Ordr he etfrom flusad\u0026vsrtisemaut or seud495 No. 30-Pries, Complets 9pieces ....... Wheu n i.vInnipeg visit our B*IjîowoOnls. We show every linoetofFiinhEture Oua *I Ulm U LEADER Our Big KITCHEN CABINET Offer te W.H.M. Rendors. Base la 48 2 U. EtraBic. has one large drawer, three amaîl drawer., Large Cuphoard sud Choppiug board snd large flour bin. Top la welI propor- tioued bau ibree China Cuphoards, Bevel Plate glas. in one, amaîl cutlery drawer sud iwo Sugar Binea ako long ahelf loug top for China. We are offeriug 20 of these Kitchen Cabinets at 19.76 if ordsred only * Direct f rom ibis advertisemneut. Attsch this clipping to your order together with mouey or express order sud you wilI Bave $3.10 over our regular price, oly 20 aud ai ter these are sold our regu- lar prices822.85 vil prevail. Our Speclal Wes- tern'H.mneMefthlY Price 7 Oin er oy re o eîl 87 0 f hi.eonuucion.Ha.uTriple Haye Spring ln front sud Elhlp 8rin in rear. Douible reaeh g. 1 Double Coller Steel AxIe. 30bi. 33\" wide sud 86\", long, .ubstantiafybrcd12\" vaod dlash. Wlusels extra large, 1%~ riveted rima, 4Y' front, 44\" rear: MSeam rere- unovable faste box with ateut fa.t- encre Aprig cuaion., Vit la uphol- stcred lu good grade imitation leaiher. Çrder No. M8. Our SpecisiLeader, complete vith Pois sud Evensuw .................. 687,00 Mîz- Get this Blg Catalog Free by Return Mil mwM IlMMl It will show you how to save 50%7 on your purchases of Furniture,Stoves Binder Twine, Har- ness, Vehicles Wonian d Barbed Wire, l G'rooeries, L 7 Ois, Belting, Hard- ware, Pumpe, and practical everything for the f arm and home. Its yours free f or the aaling, a postal card wilI bring it by return mail. We guarantee satisfaction or money refunded, you talcs no risk. 5,nd To-Day. The Farmers' Supply Go, Ltd. Dept. W. H. 173-179 Bannatyn eî~Ave., Winnipeg, Canada 190 ta 42o per Ro i ý F.O.B. Winnieg' Yranklin, \"What gked tbe i)rankfin. esold it quarter tla your a halfl\" L got it. tains a d luck.\" i8 flot a ong rum, Dnesty is .To be forward. :)ersever- ble from business icking in 1 success. they are expense, \u003egtimate i. fortune when he cSw. It sh. The rst great tlth i a for some old lady ing some he clerk. old lady i have de. Mr. illed the 1 auch an Sway of said Mr. iesa. She tisrepre- and she \"cl'il teil said the ted to be e of my he truth, that the k. business Of agin ty 1 h thfb 34at Mt RL mwonW ov z- 20 * 57 P. AI R, -IN 1",
         "The Westeefl Heme monthi\u003e What. the World: is.,Saying illui 1li.l1orM uS o t Wzuadp Duties Ronéest leetois are a ppdderating majority in Canada, but the. vice of 'indifférence is deplorably prevabcat-OXtwa Citizen. Cemia Iiltur bus the courage of its convictions bnd cery few days it ôoovicta itself anew.-New Sok un. one Of the Forma of Kultur \"'Tc 'Valour of Ignorance\" in a bock wbich the Germana might rcad with great advantage Just now. --Ottawa jFree Prea. a a Out-NerodIag Horoi la heti massacre cf innocents the ncwcst variation «f the -Germnan plan c f submarine warfare on mer- ébant ahipa -1Hifax Hérand ThoeBrtish Buldog's Rold fIh. British bulldog do.su't return Gerinany's ehaût of bate. Re ha. taken hie bite and he won't let go, in order to bark.-Buffalo Express. ThImmoa afrein Grmaay The. experlence of Oermany dhould b. a lesson to thc e rd. Neyer give auiy man toc much power. Uit invariably creates tyranny or insanity.-New Denvar \u003cB.C.) Ledge. à Crim in lHumai Progresa Neyer at' any proviens time in the whole course ,of human bistory have se maay. questions affecting the future ef the race corne into amdon and simul- taneous signifLcancc-Glafflw Horakd. Gerrmanys Partner jTurkcy seeka peace, and emphaslses its necessity by cutting the throats ef Christian women and chul- dren. As well make poace with an untamed tiger. -London Nation. Slow te Accept the Ligt of Kultur To cause the drowning of W) noncombatants on s'passengr'ship and call it war in anether formn of reaaoning that the Germans will flnd foreigners slow te folow.-Manchenter Guardiami. Au te Who WIU Lay Dw the Ternis The tçrms cf peae Oermany la prcparcd te, offer aenet interesting. W. await rather tbe terms bti.heAlles wlll impose.-New York Herald. The. Sultan a Fit Associato for theo Kaiser Tii. Great Assassin must b. pleased et the pro- gens made by Germany ln imitating on the ecean îs eploita in Armenia and elsewhere.-I»ndon (Ont.) Advertiser. A New Ligt on Dozuestic Science New Haven, Conu, edaims te have discoveredaa young lady whe, wheu asked by ber graudmother what needles are fer, answered that t'hey are te inake the phenograpli play.-St. John (NJ3) Tele- graph Carthage and Germany \"Send it reverberating 1k. langing belse froni tewer te tewer throughout the ceuntryside: 'Rate,! Rate the accursed English! Hate! \"'-Frorn the Ger- man War Gazette. The boyis.t Hannibal cherisbed a like hatred for Rome! but net, as events proved, with great benefit te Cartliage-London Mornlng Peut. la tic Tume te Coe The \u003c'Rymn et Rate\" la te b. taught lu tie Pub- lic Scheols of Germany. That will make fine train- ing for the yeung fellows wbo, a few years hence, will be trying te de business with John Bull the. world over.-Torouto Mail and Empire. Navl, Military aid Finaucial l3roadly speaking, there arc thrce definite apheres of ation-naval, nilitary and finanial-of our share inl the military aphere not'hing bere nee4. be said. It hias beeu great and will be greater. But lu tbe other two fields of action tbe influene et Great Britain lias been the dominant factor et the war.- iiàLoiunStatist. Tii. Murderer-Burglar Peint of Vhew A CGerînan writer sayq flermany cannot give back Belgitim bevaseit lias cost se DlUCIL h.lood te occupy it. This is as if a thiet slîould refuse te give up bis booty because he hiad killed the nman f rom whoin he gtol. it, and got a blow that mnade biis nose bleed.- Victoria (B.C.\u003e Coloniat. Wilm to Nolwid The Kaier bas conferred the Trop Cross upon thc Sultan for \"the part you have taken in the defonbo of the Dardaneles\" The Kaiser sbould have shoiva more consideration, and given theWutan somnething ho oould pawn.-New lork Tribune. Wholoaalo Murder on the High Sou One reads cf merchant ships, torpedoed witbout warning and of crews and passengers sent te their accounts with ail their imperfections on thètr bonds, and then one recalis that a. few montha ago a great to-do was made by the (lermans about dum-dum bullets! Much ado about notbing it turned eut te be.-Loui»ville (Ky.) (leurier Journal Krupp Patriotiam Net Soriously Straud The. Krupp family and firm have subscribed $7,50004 te the new German War loan. That is they have lent the money for big guns and are to receive it baek with profit and interest added. The strain\u003e on patriotism is bardly perceptible under the circwnatanoes.--Springfield Republican. Somethig th World ia SickO0f «Germany alone possseses the secret of eulture and the genius for organization,\" aàys a German professor. One is moved te exclaim with the late Mr. Bildad, the Shuhite, \"How long wilt tbou speakr these things and how long shall the words of thy mouth b. like a strong wind? ?\"-New York Times. German i8ing and Frothing It will yet cone, as Treitaehke said, that not a Germau dog will take a piece of bread from the band of an Englishman. We go further than Treitschke, and declare that ne self.respecting Ger- man dog would feel honored at being raised to man's dignity if it were an Englishman wbom ho hail to aceçpt as a prototype.-Ilamburger Nachrichten. Thc Nelson Spirit General Maunoury, of the army of. France, joked after a býllet destroyed one of his eyes. In thus malaing light of bis pligbt b. shows be bas the spirit tbat cause1 Nelson to jest at times concerning bis ownabsattered bod.-Chicago Tribune. A Truc Saymng by a Germau Professor -A saying by Professor Telbruck, the successor ef Treitschke in the chair ef Berlin University, as late as 1914, is queted: \"Anyene wbo bas any familiarity at ail with our officers and generals knows that it 'wvill take another Sedan, infficted on us instead of'by us, before tbey will acquiesce in the control of the army by the. German parliament.\"-Toronto Globe. The Spirit of the West \u003c'We've got the. country, and it's the greatest un- developed country suitable for the white people under the sun, \" says Mr. James K. Cornwall of the famous Peace River District. A welcome reminder that the natural resources of Canada have not grewn les because ef ruineus war, and aise that the true West- erner is by no mens even-temporarily downcast.-. Montreal Gazette. Education Let educators, instead of proclafming the failure of democratic education, work at the Èreblem ef mak- ing tbat education deeper and broader, ef reacbing the imner man and exeroising meanness, greed, cruel- ty, lust, and wantom aggrossivcncss. Education that dees not beget rigbt thinking and right feeling i8 net education. Not why educate, but how to educate, is thie queation.--Quebec Chronicle. N ew Let Uncle Samn Shuddert The London papers would have the world believe thiat England bas done ber best to render ber war- faro as merciful as possible. Doubtiess it was with such admirable intention that se far back as the last week la July when there was nowhere any talk of war, the British caught sucli defencoless Germans as ivere within ber grasp, incar- cerated thein behind barbed wire, or shipped theni to the tropies, te bastexi their death by means of star- vation, pneumonia and similar manly weapons. Sbeecau expeet neoxnercy, nor America cither. As -for tbat wicaî the Americans are pleased te eall neu- trality, their attitude -is such that it would b. sheer -waste of ink and paper to revert to it. Such so-called neutrality as that of America is tbe neutrality of a Judas, nothing more or less, and now'that at length the Cerman govçrnment lias decided te start on a real filht for right and justice., ne threat, ne making of grinning faces, no puflng pleas from Aniericans, can restrain the Gernian tl(eet from carrying eut to the full the task it lias been given to render British waters unnaviga1i., Cologne Zeitung. Patriotism Tt isnet a virtue- to tbink your country right, if it happens te be wrong, or te barber any delusions about it whatever. It is a virtue only to love your country for what it la and in gratitude for what you owe -to it, and te do your duty by it as yen would by your parents, with love, but flot withâ egotistic pride.-Loiidei.. Times.» Kultur Repudiates Civiiiztion War ba horora enough at best. Men mwayed by. passion will do many thinga from which they would sbrlnk in their saner moments. But clvilization im- poses some restrainta upon brute force even in war time. Does Germany wish the world to believe that she no. longer recognizes tbese restraints, that she repudiates civiization itself ?-Pbiiadolphia Public Ledger. As te thc Food Supply in Germany Now, whether Germany insbsort cf food or not, it la quite plainly the desire of ber government that the woend should thinc ah. la. Ail this apparatus of bread tictrets and kriegsbrod may or may flot b., really rcquired, but at any rate the pubiicity which Germany givea te it outaide ber own, bordera shows tint ah. wishea neutrals te believe it.-Ediuburgh Scotamen. Thc Farmcr's Work If tic fariner in not turning nature's powers intc, friends be hinenverting tbem into enemies; if hoi net making tbem belp hlm h. 18 allowing them te binder hum, for tbey are incessantly active; if they, are not made te ce-operate for seme useful end they. go on quit. as actively in preducing some injurions resuit; if the fields are net inade te preduce graina they wil produce weed.-Edinburgh Revie'w. Tie Iron Duhe and Soldier's Boots Just* now wben tic subject cf military boots la engrosslng the. public mind ef Canada it is interesting te refleet that the Duke ef Wellintgen censidere geod -boots as an item of the first importance lu thé soldier'a outfit. When aaked what h. tbeught camne next in importance ho replied: '«A apare pair.\" \"But wbat atter that?\" be was asked. \"A spare pair of sioles,\" replied the Duke.-Regina Leader, Suspicions A big thirty-six inch water main, on whieh tbd, Bethlehem Steel cempany's plant depended, burst. mysteriously on Thursday and work came te a stand- stili. The company, as everybody knows, is rushed with ordera for war material. Tbere bave been two \"£accidentai\" fires at the cartridge works at Bridge- port. The big fire lu Tr\"nton destroyed a factory that was runn:ng ou fereign orders, \"Accidents will happen.\"-Cleveland Plain Dealer. Net Sufficicntly Appreciative «.A great nation et culture like tbe German,\" de. clares Professer Rudoîf Eucken, philosopher, \"must net fail te realize that it can net rise te its pro. destined pinnacle without censidering ail mankind, 'without devoting its efforts te ail mankind.\" The trouble is that mankînd is net sufficieutly appre- ciative of Germany's noble aima. We are tee med- est, shy and intractablc. Germany would be gla4 te treat al ef us as sbe treated Belgium if w, would only hold stili like good children.-New York Evening Post. Increase cf Dry Territery in the States In the United States tbe enactinenta against the sale of alcobol are such that when ail the probibit- ory laws passed by legislatures and approved by the people are effective it will be possible te go from the Atlantic te the Pacific seaboard and from the ]Rie Grande te tth, Canadian border without enteriuig a state iu wbich the sale O'f liquer isa'permitted by law. Prohibition bas eut a path across and ui and dowu this country. Liquor men may see thai the cage against their trade la serioua.-Minneapolis Journal. Our Problem cf Assimilation The preblem of making a united Canadian peeple eut Of the cosmepolitan population et the West la a big and pressing one, but leaders for the g900\u0026 ,work will be found ameng the men aud women train- ed in western educatiional institutions. The. studeuits of the University of Alberta during the preseut term, are represeutative et eighteeu nationalities. There are 265 native-born Canadians. Other lanids are represeiited as follows: England, 66; Scotlands 19; Ireland, 5; Wales, 2; Australla, 2; India, 1; New- foundland, 1; United States, 55; ýChina, 3; Austris,. »-- Rllssia, '2; Sweden, 2; France, 1; Germany, 1; Mexico, 1; Norway 1; Iceland l.-4Iondon Spectatof. 3.3",
         "the. Weatern 1Ho ioa, In thi One Touch of Nature Written for The Western Home Monthly By Ida m. lburton ISHOULD tbink, JO%~\" sid Mu.. MaMta Tla.lor to the subdued-look.. ing mdibefore ber, \"that you needed airnost anythlng wo'ge than you needed that.\"$ SA se spoke, ber glance swept the bars zoom sud re.ted At the somewhat con-. femptuons «tilat,\" on the Occupant Of a red iwooden cradme. \"1Well, 1 s'pose it does look that way to you,\" said Jo., apologeticaily \"but, you om, ev mustn't let the race Ui, out - and MJary and Il I cal'clate, axe. dom iour shgre to keep if Up.\" f\"What the race needs I\" nid Martila anrlysd somewhat ttfuily, \"la flotj iries, but besuer one.\" \"So I've alwaya told Mary,\" nid Joe, briztenizup. \"Nov, look at ont cej' re.They are ail healthy and th.y'Irei gwood; and tlils littie un,\" he said, g ' 1 Proudly at the latest addition, \"is til wixtil that we'li rock iu tila rade. AMore1 .ile fust one came Mary vas fusain' withi elothes and such, and I feit like domn'\u0026 gomethin' so I up aud made the cradi,. And that petticoat,\" he added, pohritin 0 to a gray woolen homespun, \"bas wrapped them ail when they vwas littie.\" H. reached over as hespoke, grasped the qray1 petticoat, and deftly turned the hittle uleener on its ide. Voices Should fil the quiet houma As the yeata pasaed, they had gradually c.ased Wo speak of tileir hopes as their dreamas fade.Tbey b.d never openly expressed regrets Wo one suotiler. David became a littie more silent, more observing of other people's cbildren, more open-hearted W ail. The tiny glcs t at W. peopled bis fancy had departed and left a place there for ail cihidren. Maitha became a litti. les. responsive W thi.ehidrn of otiiers, somevilat more conservative in ber associations sud embittered in ber speech. The waters of love reserved for ber own, sud refused Wo othei' ebildren, bail turned bitter at thier source. It meema strange tJhat the. disappo'nt- ment wbich meflows one character should harden suother; yet the i.sne sun vbich enhaxices the. beauty cf the rose, sbrivels the violet. David sud Martil bd neyer discussed fb. qetion of aoptlnga ehild, but had r.fsetodo wena good chance pre- sented tself. David'. young cousin with lii. vif. and child, resided lu a nearby city. Re vas a comparative stranger t t est of the. Taylors. When the. Taylor ptoperty b.d been divided among thé. fot brother., til young man's fatier preferred môney Wo acres, snd on being grauted bls request Freh Colonial Troopa camping amana Uthesand duns in northwst Franc \"They alluà sleep better if they're turned over once in awhile,\" he pxplained. \"I,'. ileard Mary say, wilen tbey were teethin', that ah. wshed tiley had six or seven ides to turn tiem on Wo. Not that they were very cross,\" be added hastly.\"Aswas inst sayin' ont babies al oduns. Just feel Iiow strong hei, h. urged, as he paused for breatil. As'M'artila reached forward gingerly Wo touch the pink littie bsud, the. tmy fingers clung to bers when ah. tried wtidraw it. What a strange feeling the. touch gave ber; so soft and tender sud yet so strong to dling.' Thle sensation was not un- pleasant, but it was W b er, unendurable; no ahe looaened thei.lte fingers sud after tepping til te bedroom Wto bid Mrs. J9. good-bye, she Wook ber departure. Mrs. Taylor iiastened home Wo prepare lier husband an app.tizing lunch W v el- corne bis retumù from tovu. As aile went, aile pondered the. question, Iwily vas it Joe Barton witii bis five. acres of atony ground had a bouseful of babies, ile sh. and David Taylor witii their broad acres of fertile land had neyer been blessed with one?\" 'Twas not often that Martila pondered thus. iler heart bad graduallybhardened to such thoughta. But the. little fingers had don. their work sud thle door of mem- ory swung open tilte ghoats of past hopes and longings. She' recalled the time when David had brought her, asu a bride, to the little cot- tage whieh now did service asu a harneas t0Omn. She had met thle joy of married1 life wîith a quick appreciation and is trials with a brave acceptance. She andi navidl had shyly spoken of the tixne when the patter of children'a feet should echo throýijgh the littie rooms and ciildren's1 bad moved W Ontario, vile the. brotiiers remained on the, broad Taylor acres in Nova Scotia. Tilougil the \"rolling atone\" ilad not acquired weàlth, il. bad sucoe.ded in giving bis only son a good education. This son, bereft of fariytics, bad mat- ried:young, su ambitions little stenograpii- et, who was aise atone la the world. Th.y were soon blessed vith a little son, who vas as bright, happy sud normal, asua child of aucii a union should b.. But the. young parents vere flot spared Wo se. wee Jack grow up for their lives were suddenly eut off la a train wreck as til.y were returnlng W thier borne from tile city. Jack was taken este of by a kindly old lady from vbhom bis parents had rented roome until a date vas net for bis relatives f0 meet and arrange for bis future among thesu. Martila sud David were the last Wo ar- rive at this meeting, wilerethe otiler re- lations ilad planned tilat the'only cilildless couple among them should adopt Jack. Wilen Martila iad remov.d ber wraps aile joined the rest. Her ileart gave a tbrob as ah. found v.. Jack nestl.d la David's arms, one chubby iiand clasping bis work- bardçned fore-finger and thile curly bead resting vilere she bad boped ber own child's bead ailould be cuddled. David's face ahone with the tenderness of newly \u0026wakened loye, but on tile faces of tzh. relatives there glowed a pity sud tolerance which quickly changed Martha's love to bitter pride sud jealonsy.. David, with the unerring instinct of love, read her ileart, sud the hope of adopting Jack di.d at its birtil. A chili seemed to fail upon thle compsuy. Plans were made Wo leave Jack with the old lady who hal practically been bis nurse, the expenses to b. met by the relatives. OLAIFIED PAGE IFOR THE PEOPLE'S- WANTS If you vant to buy or s el anything in the lin. of Poultry, ?am PropertyFiai Machinery or if you want Help or Empioymmmt, rtmemkbe that the Clasilied advetisement columnis of The Western Home Mfonthly are alwaysray te help you accomplish your object. Coat 3r- word, -mnimum 50e. aa with order. AMUSEMENTS, ETC. JO=KE SNOVELTIRS-Cataiogues and \u0026ample%, 10e. Frank Stone, Fredericton, N.B. NOTION PICIIJRE PLAUS WRITE MNOVINO PICTURE PLATS-. 150 each. AU or spate time. No correspond-. ence courue. Details free. Atlas Publishin Co., 351. Cincinnati, Ohio. e PATENTS AND\u003e LE6AL imTrErit StTONHAUGH \u0026 CO., Patent Solicitors. Tiie old established firma. Read office Royal Bank Building, Toronto, and 53 Qucen St., Otawa, snd other principal cities. T.F. STAMPS FOR SALE STAUP-Package free to coflectora for' 2 cents postage: also offer bundred different foreign stamps, cataîoguehînges. fire cents. We buy atamps. MrsSsp d.,Toronto. T.Y. NIELP WANTED) 'WANTED-Reliable parties to do Machine Knitting for us at home. $7 to $10 per week easily carned. Wool, etc., furnisubed free. Distance no hindrance. For full piticulars address: The Canadian Wholesale Distribut Cà., OrlUia. Ont. FOR SALE BILLIARD TAE LES-For farsa homes, portable and stationary. The game of kings. *30.0 up, easy terma. J. D. Clark Biiard CO.. Winnilpeg. T.F. BABY'S LONG CLOTHES SETS-30 dalnty articles *550 carniage paid return mail. Loyely robes, day and night gowns, ilannels, etc., finest materials. Everything necessary for instant une. Lista free. Mms Franku, 175 Afred St., Nottingham, Englaixd. 9 B3USINESS CHANCES BARGAINSt BARGAINB!--SAJid for free magazine, 1,200 bargains. Faim tends, busi- ness chances, any kId, aiywhere. Our service free to. buyers. western SaleS Ageny Minneapolis, Min.C7 RIANY CANADIAN GOVERNMENT JOBS are open te Canadian cititens. $70 month. Vacations. Pleasant work. Rapid advauce. Examinations everywhere durîng May. Samgi1 qutons free. Write îmi- medately. Tran Institut, Dept. T 177 Rochester, N.Y. CASH-if you want ta sell your reai estate or business or other property, any kind any- where quickly for cash write us. W. brin¶ buyers and sellera together regardîcs distance. Bu y ru located free. Established 1893. Northwestern Business Ageticy Minneapolis, Minn.9 PR££ FOR SIX MONTHS-My specWa offer to introduce in mgazne \"Investlng for Profit.\" It i. worth r$418acopy toa ayone who bas been getting poorer whie the. rich, richer. It demonstrates the Real earning power of money, and shows how anyone, no matter how oor, can acquire riches. ln- vesting for Profit is the only pogressive financial journal published. It shows how $100 grows ta $2,200. Write now. and lIl1 uend I t six months free. H. . Barber, 471, 28 W. Jackson Blvd., Chilcago. 10 MICELLANEOIJS B ROTHER-Accidentally discovered roo t; cures both tohacco habit and indigestion. Gladljr send particulars. P. M. Stoke2, Mobawk, Plorida. î WANTED-Saiesman ta fell Dlrk's Red Mite Killer to general stores, druggists, and rcrS. Also agents for saine in evey town and vrillage. Marshall \u0026 Marshall, Nagara Falla, Canada. . F. SONO POBRIS WANTED for publication. Experience unnecessary. Send us your verses or nielodies to-day or write for instructive booklet-it's free. Marks-Goldsmith Co., Dept. 67, Washington, D.C. T.F. DR. JANET E. FERGUSON, 290 Portage Ave., Winnipeg. Free consultation regarding your ailment. Carrespondence invitel Nervous diseases, Goitre, Rheumatism, Infant- ile Paralysis suPcessfully treated. T.F. BIROADENÂXE HAR F00» Growu hair like miagie. Wiii flot dye but nourishes the color glands to natural action. Directions for use on jar. Mail order price $1 .00, postpald. Broadenaxe Ca., 29 Stobart Block, Winnipeg. (Mrs. M. Ferguson) Established 9 years. T.iF. FRUIT AND FARM LANDS WANTED-To heair from owner of good farm or unimnproved Uand for sale. C. C. Buckinghans, Houston, Texas. WANTED-TO bear from owner of good farm or unimaproved land for saie. R: L. I)oW ing 10 P a aceB ldg., M inneapolis, M mn. PARMS WANTED-We bavedictbys. Don't pay commissions. Write des=ciib groberty, naming, lowest pruce. _W. bel, alocate desirable property re.Amei- gce Investment Association, 26 Palace Bldgà Minneapolis, lMi. PONIES SHE]TLAND PONTES-Write for particwP. kmis.J. Marpies Rartney, Manitoba. S POIJLTRY AND EGOS FOR SALE-, HATCH Rhode Isand Reds for *pInter layeru. Setnu3.. W. A. Chant, N11a Park Avenue, Toronto. MION CLACSSROSER COME Rmobe 18- LAN\u003cD RDS-EM ufions beauties, $LAOpi 15. John Duff. dkin, Man. .3 PRIZEC-WINNING W M 1T E R 0 C ES- Eggs $2.00 per 15. leduction on langue orderu.A. Omyton. Maitou, Man. EXPRES PAID - Barred Rocksé, a1 n straln. Eoe$2.0-persttndle.d\". WRITE WTANDOTTES-Stock or u. pri se 'pinmers, h an md vlgoromI-e- 0M \u0026 W ar V = Ices\" ç Nde. AMERICAN PAWN and White Indien ]Runner duck =$1.23 for eleven. Reduçtlam on larger numbes.W. Da Sutton an~dSos Canfield» Ontario. WxrmTEOMPIMOTON SPECIALIST-- 1 breed winners and start beginners 4 pufleta and cocherel, $0.Egs 3.00 pert5. C. ,Sehelter, Ion£\u0026 Ont. $ EGOS-1from ecs prodvcnt sock. White wyandottesSmg1Cob White L1w born- is.ttngs $1.\u0026Fimee delvery. Kr- Howef.l, AngenburgSaak. WiNNERS ATE£GLATINO CONTEIT- Write to-day for matin g Bat beautiful1l*y ium- trated wlth photos front ife. It la iree. IL.IL Guii4 Box 16, Rockwood. Ont. S ALBERT MIDDLETON, lCeystown, Saab. Breeder of S. C. White Leghorns. Bred te larstrain. F4.Wfor hatchlag\u0026 amy quantity. Ar»a L mocecookerels. Aces tesso. able. 5S BABY CRICES -Prom' Gufd's famoup Iaying strain of Barred Rocks,g record M00 lay 'phen five montha aid. ~ickm 20. each, gge $1.50 per 15. Clintoî, Poultry Yardu . PARTRIDOR ROCKS-Partridge Wyakn- dattes, White Orpingtne, White Langshins, White Rocks, Buif rocks, Black Minorcas. Egg gad pens, three dollars fteen. Fransk Webber, Guelpis, Ont. ALDINO POULTRY PARU-Purebred White Wyandottes. Always prise vinners at local faits. Eus from mature stock, $1.50 9 13 - $6.00 per 100 Miss Ruth Lloyd EGOS FOR HATCHING-Silver Campines. London winners. Silver Wyandottes, laying straîn. Indian Runner ducks, heavy layera. Prices reasonable. Dr. McArthur, Niagara-on- the-Lake, Ont. IPAKENRAW'S SILVER CAMPOINES won at Ontario Winter Fair (Canada's greatest show). Eggs at reasonable prices. Write for circulai. W. E. Pakenham, Box 10 Norwood, Ontario.a PUR-BRED BARRE» ROCXS-My Rock bens made an average of 149 eggs e4eh during 1914. Fine dark well Barred cockerels ftou this choice laying strain oniy $2.50. Satisfac- tion guaranteed. William La Chapelle, Me- Taggart, Sask. 13ABYCHICKS, DUCELINOS and batcb- lng cggs; poultry and fruits'faim payimg combination. Strawberry plants, 100, 70 cents- 1,000, $5; currants, 10 cents; gooseberries, li cents; raspberries, 5 cents; rhubarb, 10 cents. Fruit trees, perennial flowers, roses, dahlias, pansiez etc. Carna prpad. Catao free. hbas. Provan fgey F.;% ner g\u0026e couver, B.C. 10 REGAL W13ITE WYANDOTTES--Amer- icas finest, champions at New York State Fair for ten years; 100 fine vigorous, wefl nhatured cockerels $2, $3 and $5 each; liens and puilets $2 and $3 ,each; egos for hatching f rom record Iaingrpte winning penu $3 and$5 par settng;'send ane dime for Reqal Wte Wyandotte ook telling i about White Wyandottes; catalogue and maýtin list free. John S. artin, Box 146 R, Port Dover, Ont. a j ~.1 usions love what withâ ed by would 'n !m- i war !that t ahe 'ublic that ratua otbl» arhieh hows into h. is m to they, theY, rions raine",
         "Tewestern Home Mfonthly Trhe Philosopher T*ééOluethe o etndofthe second Ondisu ýt IJo eeralSteole, frein is b.d lathe TS.wmw Gemri Hospital, vhere ho vas recovering Srm thé bjury lie suffered viien throvn frein bis ~oxe~delaedthat vitijin a week ho vouid ho pi uâilb it âdàeady to e ioa* for Lhe front at a f sea\u003e.notice. Thnis oemineat-ly characteristie t'-te qan, vho on the Western plains es on tic Couth Atricau vedt las prcved himselt oveny inch a soldier eud a ready, eourageous and able leader of -iox. %0e Omadiau people are proud et hlm -as a mtive Omadian, sud ceaident bliat as the commander 'ci.eeond Oani4ian contingent la the GreatWar bi *il acquit himiolf vith distinction, as hofone, and Eke every otiien man ia the contingent, prove imeit te et be mettie. ACIOSS TIE TEAR latbftU we. vof thte year a middle-agecI man's à\"-cienr apt te etray back oocasionafly te bis étybood days. Strange that la bhila sason more than auY othé ue\u0026 recoiletions ahould atmr. IL must ho 6eoauae\u003e spnln vas tiie tine vhen ms a boy ho toit monalivil. WL. sonnet recali -days ini the month of 'I7. vWhe the eau etf the vîld. te tieyoutbful mind mode sebool wonk a heavy task -pursued under stress etofmind sud amidat many difleuties? WhaL le it tUt âââsa maa:smind auddely leap hackvard acrus heyeas o acha d ,andmae him feei liluaslf a boy again, reinemhonlng vividly that vhen .Ob\"moowvasout sud h. investigated bis pecket, a .'W be alley vas mising. After a second searcli, he à\"o recourue te one et boyhoed\"s means of locating 1tYou ook off your bat, sud put it on the ground, spt la your left palm, sud struck it sviftiy vith the tlghbt Index inger; and vatohing it spiatter, yen wïdked viLli unbroubled faith la the. direction piainiy iudipiated. And what If tbis magie dd net lead te th1 mmeite receveny et the lest eiiey? Something ese more important ciUimed your -attention, smre ther cee oybedaoccuit lre ausuhasoeeoe tu nuerable lafallible vays if curing vante. -w a vndeng -breath et apringtime viilbring 'bock sueh things--Saturday hoiidays frorn scbool, and boylwod duties and pieasures 1 \"BRELP TO END TEE WAR» A fuli-page advcrtisement le appeaning lu mest ef te nevapapers of the United States, calling irpon the, Amerîcan people te «Help te End tic War.\" IL Iosiagned hy hunareds et people vith German naines, vho appeai \"Lie Amenican people, industries and vorkmen net te manufacture, sell or ship povder, shrapnel or shot et sny knd or description Le any «d tue warring nations.\" Or os the New oôrîk Wenid saya: nTu erder te 'Help End thée War,' Ameican manufac- turera ahouid net mli ammunition te the Belgians who are Bighting te recover thein onr from a foretg foe that raviahed the nation it ha= wornt proteet.0 erder to 'Help End the War,' American manufacturers should flot seli rifles and cartridges te the French people who are fighting te drive an invader from thein soil.\" Moreoven, Gerrnany in the pat 'Las been tie greatest of traffiekers iu munitiors ef van. The* gigantie Krupp ai-marnent plants have cnabed Germany te lesd the. vend in that business. Cerman manufac- turers equipped the Turkish anxny with gana and ammunition in Lh. Bakan War. The German dip- iornacy, the argumentations cf the (lerman professons ln attempted justification et German methods, and Lb. pro-German contentions and \"1appesis\" of German- Arnericans are ail of a piece. They viii stand. lu lsatory as breaking ail records for their idiosyncrasies. TLey ari grossi;, contrany not oniy te the considena- tiens et ordinary Louer, but te the plain logicet A FORESEEING FRENCHWOMAN Tiene vas printedl recently la the London Times a letton vnitten ln September 1871, after Gem- many Lad se crusiiingly overvwheimed France, by tb. tarnous Frenchi literary voman, George Sand, vhich bears testimony te ber penetration and fore- sight. In tLb. iit et prosent events it deserves attention: «\"The turne la iooi coming vhen ve shall have as much cause te pity the Germnan people for their victory as our- selves for oui defeat. Thse German triumph is for Germany * the first act of ber moral dissolution. The tragedy of ber faîl has begun, and as she works at it with lier own hands it will proceed apace. All these great material organiza- tions which defy right, justice and the sense of humanity are se many idols of dlay. It is our duty and our interest Io realize this. It is the trutb. But the moral downfall of Germnany is not the future salvation of France, and if we are fated to do to ber what she bas done to us, her muin w\u0026ill not restore us to onr life. It is not in blood that races can rencw rtlitir youth. Streamns of life may yet corne from the corpsc of France; theoic C oI-Sf Cermnany will bc a plague Centre 'or ail 1iXrtîte. ltute is ni oresurrection for a nation which has 1lut iht et le hloan ideal' This prophetic itteranîe forty-three -vears ago by a Frenclîwomaîî of geitinssta-s all that thiere la te ho said philosophlicaelly ofthie resîî1t of the Cerman enqucat of France in 1871, andI its reaetion upon Germany. Out of that Cerinam sueess and the prodigious tnibute inîposed on vîant1 i-lied Frane las geathi Germ1n an machine and the German Idolaýtry e foree. aud the Germen use of th.e methoda ot the volt and the tiger, as evidenced la the treat- ment et Belgilum. As George Saud prophesied, Ger- many has lest sight of the human ideal. The German systein thinks nothing of standing an innocent civil- ia pagainat a vail and shootiag hlm, or eftotr- pedoing9 a neutrai merchant sip and drewning inno- cent mon, vumen sud children. A eat catches and kilse a blrd la the samo spirit. The Germen Bm- pèror epoke in that saine spirit vhcn hoe instructed the Germmn troopsalho vas sending te China that thoy muât make themselves terrible as the Huns of Attila made themselves terrible. No nation in al hiatory bas ever stood in need et such a dire lesson as Germany muet nov ho given, vithout iosing sigbt of the hurnan idea I. tis plain nov that a main objeet ef the present var is the ievying of such lunge ransems on eonquered nations as vould vipe eut Uermany's crushing load of deht due te the cestiiness of tho German rnlitary systein. Civilization muet ho guarded agalnst any sucb rosort in the future by auy nation te the metbods of the voîf And the tiger. The hun -ideal muet ho made secure. à wESTERN SUBJE Thougli mechanleai contrivances have displaced draught animais lu this var te an exteut undreamed of a* genration ago, tho herse stili holds an impor- tant place in multary operations and shares ia the. perlis and the iufforing of the carnpaigningl. Wili the berne hecome extiuc *t in thc future, hofore the advance ci meehanism ? The question used frequent. ly te ho asked la the early years ot the automobile. Undouhtedly tihe rse viii ho more and more dis- placed, and vil tend te disappear from the streots et citie\u0026--which ne true lever of tihe rse viii re- gret. But that the herse viii driven te extinction by mecbanisrn driven by gasoline, or-eiectrieity or any other force is surely-unthidmkahe t# sayone vbo Las even felt ta. vonder oÇ thoïé quivérlag musclese. etraining at the girths. What la âa tiing et holt# and levers, compared to, a thing eof laRsh and blood? Tiie motor Las itis advantagoa, but it l*.sK ite s 61- ings, tee, and they are abominations. 'Thie herse's virtues are like Luman virtues and its falingm'ai% like human tailings. When hoe is a herse of sterling vortlx of characten, ana m' 4uçtop bis, kind, vhat cisc in the vorl\u003ct aeio \"ýonwtfi , hlm? IRe vil have a neigh ef repogn~i ouitfr ypu;\"he vili rub is nose against yours with g..vblinny of delight. Tiere are men and cunnîngÈh\u003crséàs as there aile mean and cunning buman hoinge; eaMi among homes as among humans, there are shinkers. But those are not the qualities that the horqe bringa te mind. Courage, strength, spoed, affection, hcautyr-thme are vLat the heorse stands for. Undoubtedly there viii ho vondorful furtier dcvelopments of gasoline and elcctricity. But the tirne viii nover corne vien the saying ef Lord Herbert ot Cberbury viii net stand truc, that \"thone is ne liner sight than a fine man on a fine horse.\" Certainly that saying viii nover cease te ho truc la the West. SEEING THE WORLD IN A FALSE LIGET Whatevcr the Germa autocrat may say, however ioudly hoe may continue te inake use of the naine ef (led, lie stands pilioried by the neutrai opinion of the venld as the. nesponsibie author et the war, and branded vith the mark of Cain. Infatuated as the Kaiser is vith the hallucination that holie es by Divine right and has been entrusted with the Divine commission te bring Europe and the venld at largo under German domination, lie may bave convinced bimseif that Le could net bave avented the vwan. Delusions of this character are not uncommon ini persons vho are the victimset an obsession in re- gard to their place in the providentiai order of the universe. In the Hospitals for the Insane at Selkirk and at Brandon, as ln every other such institution in tih enrd, there are cases which are of this class. Wilhelm differs tromn the others in being an auto- cratie Emperor 'li actual tact. Such an autocrat, crazed with the delusion that lie is God's viceroy on earth, helieves, of course, that vhatever Le dees must be right, and that ail biame and guilt must rest on others. He blames not himself for the war, but the nations that instead of iooking te him as their Divinely appointed master, and submtting to bim, undertook te figit ln defence of their righits and libonties and the cause of freedom and justice in the venld against despotie xilitary force. That the German Emperor and the men of the ruling caste la Genmany planned te destroy the rights and liberties cf neighboring nations and te make Germany domi- nant in the vend(, is known to every intelligent pe-- son la the venld. Proof of it lias been piled iupon proof of it sinee the war hegan. Nor caît thero lie any enduning.peace. or any hope ef peace unhess anti until the Cerm4n Emperon and the niling (lrmani caste and the mass ofthte tierman people, wlioiillieý and tie ruling caste have inoculated with thteni- riess of the doctrine that inight ean make rigit lia%,( been forced te see this world and buman lite in the true light. TEESIMONT 0P DESTINY Thé Ârehduke Franz F erdinanq, of Austria, whose assassiii\u0026tiofl by a Servian student vas made the occasion of bringing on the Great War, vould have opposed with his utmost determination, had hie been alive' the German design of preipitating the eonflict of th'e nations. There ean lbe no possibility of ques- tion in 'regard to that. For the whole purpose of bis poliey, the work to which hie devoted biis life, vas the consolidation cmn unifying of Austria-Hiin- gary, so that when hie should succeed his father, the Emperor Francis Joseph, bis Emrpire would ho strong enough to hold its own against Germany, the alIy le feared. Ne had already proved himaecf je man of oxtraordinary force of character and ability, and made himself the dominating personality in the In- perlai (loverninent at Vienna. The objeet lhe kept constantly before hlmt was the trans'forming of the Siava in Austria-lHufgary into ardent upholders of the Empire. Not until he Lad welded the Empire inte union and strength vould le have been a con- Senting party to a var. His assassination not only furnisbed the Berlin plotters of the var with pre- cisely such a starting point as they wanted for their machinations, but it removed an. important and povertul personality whose opposition to their design would have heeon a formidable obstacle ln their way. AS ON1E ENGLISHMAN PUTS IT lb vould not ho easy te give in briefer torm the Tessons why the Britishi Empire is at war than they are given :n a letter which the Philosopher bas re- ceived fromn a friend in England. \"The first and. most obvions reason le that vo vere bound ini onor te defcnd the ncutrality of Belgium. The second is that vo could not afford to let France agaiho over- thrown by Germany. These two -reasons, the first of honor, the second of self -intercst, are -both Sound and aufficient, and each xight have a large bèok w$itten te express it fully andl adequ\u0026tely. And there vas a -third reason, and it is the one vhich was at first mont requeoUty givn. ln conversation-that, if vo had net geeive eýuld novei, bave looked a Fremehnian in tbofao ~gin. To Lbe average Englaisma, 1k. myseif, this as,\"d is, overwheé ngycoet. Sir Edvard Greyexpressed it 'wh«L h~.inl te ouae tla (ermany's proposai latà v9shcbul4\u0026 âsid by vile France vas conquered,- ra an i»fàauu pro- poa.'Thero wàs nover an' utterance mô\u0026frlldly ineeedluthe vholebhlsto;ry of the-Heuse eOf(Saunons than Sir Edirard Urey's, statement ef hbow that «Infamous préposa' waa: rejected.\" At first ilanoe ii ýus.y lho thought that the tbree reasona set forth mi 'tila oxtraot front a letter from England do not cover thè vhMel matter. But if you viii think theni ovor, and consider ail that they imply, yen vilagre. that they make an entirely adequate statemont. They include the vhole case for frecdomt and justice against brutal force. THE KULTURAL POINT 0F VIEW The officiai biography of Bismarck written by bis1ý eecrotary, Dr. Moitz Busch, bas been quoted fromn on this page more than once sinco the var began. IL lsaua enlightening book. As the var bas advan- ced, the Philosopher has found it thnow more and more illumination on Kultur. Theno should hoe wîde- spread dissemination givel te the lighit vhlch Bis- marck's deciarations during the siege of Paris throws 'uponi the present German declarations that the bloek- ade of Germany by the British ses, power is a bar- barous outrage on civilization justifying the sinking of neutral sLips by German subinanines, and the dnowning of non-combatants, including vomen and children. The Germans in 18i1 starved Paris inte surrendor; but it vas repeatedly declared frnm Ber- lin after the heginning of the present war that the German Empire could provide its own food supplies front vithin its own bordons. In January, 1871, when the besieged Panisians were reduced to eatiiig rats, Bismarck said they should have a day's supply of food sent in to thern, and toid that they must arcept the terms laid down by himt or stanvo. These are his words, as recondod by Dr. Busch: \"If the Parisians first received a supply of provisionii and then were once more obliged to starve, that ought, think, to work. It is like flogging. When it is administered continuously, it is not feit so much. But when it is sus- 1pended for a tirne and another dose inflicted, then it hurts.\" and here is an entry front Busch's diary, January 28, 1871: 'They have been on very short comsnons in Paris for some time past, and the death rate last week amounted tO about 5,000. The mortality was especally heavy amnont the children up to two years old, and coffins were to be seen in ail directions.\" One of the flîndaniental doctrines of Kultur la that it is luncivilized for other nations to put into opera- tion against Cermany methodis of warfare 'which are liqi(,sioial.,legit iiate, and which Germany bas If(ermany w'ere able to shut off food supi4fronit te British Isles, that is the first thing C\u003cerynanyxwoil bave done. The German atiocities ili Beli 1 tii are, in tiie light of Kultur, entinely rîght '11(i ror~. but liat any nation shouild even think 'blockadiiîg 6erinanyis, when viewed by that saine ý,tra1-o liglit, a crime against ]iigh Heaven. 4 ~\"- ~. ~'",
         "The Western Home iWonthly- one Touch of Nature (Continued f rom Page 35) David and Martha uriderstood cach other 00 well[ that the question of adoption wee neyer mentioned between them. The touoh of the Barton baby, however, had recaled the firet thrill of feeling that bad been arouaed by the sight of Jack ini David'5 arma, and Martha's heart wes verv softened as she took the key from uncr the door mat and let herseif into the suimy, wel-kept kitchen. As she prepared David's lunch, she kept unconscioualy humrning to hierne\u0026 the song she had heard Joe Brtn sin \"iRock-a-bye baby, upon the trec top.\" Her thougets were eo far away that she was quite startled whc!j David cntered a little later, sayin,sslhe laida percel on the table: \"There, Martha,I1stopped at the jenkin'a sale and brought you home a picture.\" Martha undid the wrappings, and re- vealed the picture of a littie child frcah from Ie bath, the tint of health in hie cheeks, the damp hair ln curly disorder over hie hcad; hie body round and dimpled. But it was the expression of the eyes which arrcsted hier attention. Thieyjeld a trusting dcmand for love rather than an uncertaiplea for it. \"Whly, Davy, helooks like Jack. We'll hiang hM ii our bedroom,\" she said. David sighed contentedly. Somehow he felt that he did flot wish others to look or comment upon the picture and lhe was wedll.leeeed to know that Martha shared. As the days slipped by, Mertha found herseif gzn at the\u003e picture frequently. The littiech*ld seemed te have become a real presence in the home. She found h=rellonging to cuddle the littie fellow, to dressMinl and to sit hlm on a rug i the kitchen to:play i the sunshine. Always, when she looked at the picture she thought of Jack, and she wnderc how hie wes thrivin*h the rather clark moons in hie city home. \"Children,\" she commented to heracif, \"are like gerenlum. A few days later, she announced to David that she hsd some shopping to do vhose tthe have been nflict ques- se of if c, Hun. -, the trong ally andc ami kept f the ira cf upire cou- Only pre- their andl es:gu iray. i the they is Te- and ioor na is over- -at cf 1 and itten vas a mont like Sir à by that th in cover over, that They istice y hiýý frot» [Van- and wîde- Bis- ,lock-- bar- uking the and isto Ber- t the )plies 1871, ating Ipply must rhese stered s sus- ýurms. luairy is for Ae tO Lmong to be that pera- î are bas food thing citoes right Lhink sinel in the city, and would take Jack's month- ly alloirance i with hcr. The truth was, she wished tô sece the littile feiloir, who seemed to have become specially her own lu the laet two ireeks. She found Jack getting hie breakfest and moon establîshed herselinl hie favor. H. secmed to feel by a child's true intuition, that the childicas heart yearned for -hlm. He basked i the baptiam of love that the long-tervcd heart showered upon him. The day had been a lonely one te David. He end Martha had become very depend- cnt on one another. He glanccd up at the dlock many times before tired Nature had her way sud he sank into sleep. When he airoke, it ires te find a child in hie arme and a sleepy head on hie shoulder, while Martha whispered the only Px- planation he ever received: \"I've brought cuir baby home.\" Swan Lake H.E. The. Pcbruary meeting cf the H.Ej. iras held on iSaturday, 27th ult. Mra. Gardner again kindly aoted as sccretary during the absence cf Mra. Ilartidil. The president opened -the. meeting by showing the imembers the Certificate of Regfistration 'which lied been received from the Agrieutural Coflege, and wmmch. iA ias decidcd te have framcd. The subject cf the programme was \u003c'Delegates Report\" cf the HIE.S. Con- veution in Winnipeg. Mrs. Gordon gave lier impressions firat, and spoke of the reception given to the delegates at -the Agricultural Coliege, touchedl on'the fric- tion w'hlch has existeol for norne time *etween -those who are in authority and tuos. ubo think they- ought te b. and mmicii as rau\u003ch lesa noticeable this year, and of the nomination cf an Advisory B3oard oontaining thrce presidents of so- cieies:-Mrs. Speechly of Pilot .Mound, Mra. Cooper of Minnedosa and Mra. Hunt cf B3enito, through whom local branéhes can seuil protesta and suggestions and cf which Professer fBlack still remaina hcead. 1 Mira. Moore gave a very interedting -Six British lerô Spoons for Two New S ubscriptions You have heard. about these fainous spoons which are advertised 80 freely in every Canadian newspaper and new have the opportunity of possessing the cemplete set of six at no cost whatever to yourself. EACH SPOON 15 (JUARANTEED BY THE WU. ROGERS CO., whose reputation for silverware is se weil known. The six heroes wvhe comprise the series are : 1. Lord Kitchener 6. General Pau 24 There is a tremendeus demand for these spoons which are at once beth artistic and usef ut and we urge our readers te take advantage of the effer premptly. SenC\u003c us in two new subscriptions te The Western Home Menthly at $1.00 and the six spoons wiil be forwarded you postpaid. Address -9il erders : The'Western Home Monthly, Winnipeg, paper *Mcih cleverly skinimed the éream 4rom the most important speeches given and whieh was brighteid by amusing persoual notes and co m ents. It is im- possib1e,\"i the email space M~ our cern- m'and, 4o give more than a resume of the inoat Important points made. The convenrtion passed the following resolu- tisz lo b. presented to 'the \u0026chool Trust- es' Convention: That, whereas the physieni wclfare of the childxren in the sehools bas au important relation te their mental development, tlMs aocity is desirious of patting itself on record as, ýrging the. extension of medical inspec- tion la shools throughout the province. Alse resolvcd ttt Qs socety places itzelf on -record as being in favor of i- creased attention bedng given to the teachizç of agriculture and domestie science in the sohoole. 3fisa Ycman of the Souris edhool spoke of the good influence the country H.E. Societies eau have on the ethools, ammd of the many ways the twoe-bodies oould work together for the good of the chul- dren, ii. parents, 'thè teachers, and the coinmunity et large. As matters are et present, the. techera bave too mueh rcsponsibility ithe smsl towns; they are made responsible for the mental, moral and spiritual 'welfare of their pupils, uiiereas the parents should, cectainly b. responable, in the last tir. înstances. A enother's influence should be mudh setronger than it is, and a great deal of good would !be done if parents would talke more irâterestin theachools iwhere their childrcn attend a.nd lu the. teachera ubo bave the guidance cf the growing dhild just at Vint period of its 1f. whei it da moat readilj in\" for good or evil. Mirs. Drosdhuret of Wmnipegî iste\u003cl on the iimprtaees of a ireil balaneod- meal and proved that the food for the- body ohould b. m« earefufly ani aclen-, tiflcaily prepared sas that for 'tue brain. ~Mr. Newrton also epoke' emphaticaily. on the value of good meals, and naid tit\u003e h. hoped before long t. see every sehool i the. province equipped with a rural TUE lESTILMEIT 0 mbault's Fer lmtsnb l'a IMM\" à ffl am Imm -t-- 3. General Joffre 4. Laie fanl Robe rts 2. Gen. Sir John French 5. Admirai Beaffy",
         "79\"^ Wàti' oeeMot iMMr hp 8~v e~oee uakythe VOL ~ tIWonkaiv*.upalwl oto 4~~~~~o \u0026mW .~,~do ye, fo It * fnet atm .ibtfitth, I oe .1 I~fe o.gfrom -umead. m- têh *y abox à( Mhburns 1!ewt a aâ fat dobg àao MddiiMy own woek boa, - pu.fer $1.26;at kitehi, no that Mie' country children COUIIIpWpIIS *hamdfrs a go.ml-hot meal, in the mid\u003chh et thîs y, ngtegdl of hav- ig tedbpl c adiwe m oId binebes whicl\u003e wefe ail they could bring., watii theu. 1Miss Mry Ad MeKeuz le, iiead of -the Vietorlan Order of Nurses throughout (Juiad\u0026, apokeo f the - nursing* problem in th Prairie homes and of tii. acre need Of the. country mothera for trained help St a lodèet.tee., and lso spoke of lier h*e that before very long a chais of ,nndrsea would atretoh rlght acros Canada, their stations bping wituhu such distances 16f each ether that ail who needed their help coul! aval! themselves of it.. i Mr. Put.iauk preaident of the H.E S.- claties of Ontario, evb an ondline -of what they were doing'and ackziowledged that the Manitoba eoceties were Îhee.d of -the.@ister provinces; hopointe\u0026 out ho,' aI impüta»;t the women of the. ccefltspjp es are, and how self-reliant they muet neesaarily bo. Mr.- Putmaïn uloo advocated manual training at the. Seb\"o so that both blys a»d girls would have a tride to, turu te, when sehool- dauwere over. Miss Cýawfo6rd, who is very interested iu the. formation cf boys' and girls' clubs in the. coutntry dstrýiet4 spoke of the suceas which ,had followed their or- ganisation i several places. A very laearty vote cf thanks was offered to Mro. Moore, whose paper Showed that ber duties as delegate were taken. ecuainore, and whose careful gleaning of every hi# tOat could ho helpful to our members should resuit in a plentiful harvest of \u003cccd and advanee- ment to ourselves and the community during the. coming montha. The Nation's Cail for Physical Fitness Wrtten for tii Western Home Monthly by Aflan Campbell A noted Bishol? said, \"«War its thousands slay but Pesce its thousanda tan.\"' The e= Ofaeoiipresent stupendous conflict isSI. efflgte contemplate but just as slckening la- the hotrot wrought byr tuber'- culosis and cthe diseases which it is our dutyi each and alte do our part ln cen- batmg. There neyer was a gmeatr need fér healtiiy men and women in this eml?fre than there la to-day, the. genius of bflshan *ven usthe fomotpsio uti the woeld, and to-day we are reilyngon mmn who are a weill ame combination cfgnus and physical ftnem,'te prevent thom înnh coetedlaurels frenïbeing sngahd frein us. History shows un how mmo a nation eoilapses wiien physical education becomes a minor consideration and we cen \u0026dl pay our amail oahmtthis batd ar aa tax, for w isl ever wit U inth ope of diseawhich lurka in the, foui air which is fat toc common in Or living roins and bedrooma. ILet us uphold the poicy cf the. \"open door\" (and window)and help te drive cut the. in- vtdoe *hoe vut colunaare invisible but whose deadlinus cannot be equalled by buIlet or sword. By givmng ourselves an exercis time per day, (choe. and aplitting wood do net figur as the. bet of eecsin spiteof what the common opinimyb) tmresimple y as tis t ~uchwe cam put our who~ m even for a few minutes per day and the. profits wiJl show it as a pretty sound in- vestment. Thi qesftion icnw oo living an atfca xsec n eanti phal abillty to protect car hesitha andhomes in time cf danger? No, we aauredL cannot, as the pmrent war has ahown tat ntelligeât arbitration which hms don. such splendid work prior te Ibis Present war was bot on car fée whoee mental plane appears te ho as brutal as that cf a vivisector. When we have quit. recovered from the. shock cf civi4ied and cultured nations going te war, in this intelectual ea, we wMl se. that il la stili s m erat train our men and women te tthe grue. and athletia beaity cf the. ancient Greelca . nAwar ceaeàto bc, this training wifl be us s vlualetousin the great war agaînst diseuse. It la very evident that whicii ever way we lock at the question, the. angwer is, physical negleet la national suicide, for a puny bodied nation, however brainy, las ever in danger cf invasion b y a superuor nation or cf decimation from disease. We certainly do net intend te force ourselves into a sate of conscipto for physicul trainigfor tei.healthybenefits must comefowihn and cannot ho rubbed in frm ithot, 1k. an embrocation. lus nerves are .xhated while bis mua- cular system la cryin. et for 'more exercise. B y trying. a ittie antidote in tihe shape- of me imple atretching and bencling exercises for a fejw minutes before retiring for t.night- he% wiIl find that hia nerves wiil grdualyb. luUled by the. counteracting influence of hie awalcened muscles, providing of course that the new treatment la takeui on gradually. Out of doora we have the natural brain and body buildera ini the shape cf freab air sa sunahine, though, in the course of the advance of civilisation we have been forced into offices and. workahops, suffiimg to exist on a minimum ainount of thest valuable health preservatives. There je Iota of hope tiiougii, for one and ail, for in spite cf our àtrtificial existence, our physical culture experts, though drawi!ng their raw material from the unpromising environmients of office and worj-shop1 cmn and do succussfuily turn tiiem into gianta cf strength and millionaires cf healtii. Let us cease our vain regrets about physical deterioration for the. splendid physique cf our alnt men now fightin m the cause cffliberty la the. resulticf physical training, and net only the. selection of the. more fit, but the. remodel- Iing of the luss fit. An interesting announcement in thie issue of Tii. Western Home Montbly is that cf POWDRPAINT, which is intend- ed for bars and guaranteed te preserve wood, last for yeara and i8 fire-proof, with the~ additional advantage that it eaiL b. mixed and applied by anyoni by the. simple addition of watcr. The. Home Comfort Co. of 323 Garry St. -are agents for -the distribution of tLus Paint, ad they will have pleasure in Bnp. plying URl information te anyone inter. ested ini painting operations throtighout tii. country. 0",
         "The Westergn Home Mfont hlLv 41 jWHEN YOU WANti A REAL. GOOD ENGINE BUY A 80JUDSON Wire FenRcing Prices Smashed Now la the TUrne und Hem-e la the Plàace to Buy Vour Fevmlna Ri16 R\"o mu Empire Fence ut Faotory rcm iact .t v mr Prices Direct to the Frammer Tb@StR* Breaoi NamiiSoibu Most £Mt Picol lron ruwchw mNoe 1 MU\u0026- more te in an\u0026 dfore that the. ened new It of )Ody ana the rced Sl for oUr smng an mLth. )Oiut the Empire Fonce i. 1 square mesh straight stay fonce made of full gauge wire put up in rolla of 20. 30 and 40 roda 5 Points that *Make it Worth Your While lot-You pay for nothing but qualty by urfato ytofrm ethod 2nd-You do not help to pyte freiht on the fence of yourneighbor, who lives20miebyodou * when yo buy at theserdudprcsaWnne. 3rd-You do0 not have to boter lupbbingyor odper and waitmg, as the prices we quote here on local ahiments are same as quoted by othere ini car lota. 4th- e have stylW nd sz o vr ups o h Western farnier. Fifteen different styles to chrooOe THE XNOT that from. PROMPTB P ETGURNEDYOU ON ÀA]ROLL OR A OAELOAD PROU S o FPAOTORLY AT WINNIPEG. 5th-Every order fa filled with brfght new fencirç fresh from the bornsfnstead of from a stock which bas bain weatherbeaten for months, as ie the case when you are buymg fencing the old-fasbfoned way or when it in shipped froin the head of the lakes. That i. why Empire Fence fa worth 2 to 3 cents per rod more than any other fence uobd in Western Canada, yet our prices are the lowest. 30 Day Trial Monoy Back Quarantee pu .wlth every Rod of t\" Fonce Send us at least a trial order to-day. You wfil surely order more before this gale closes and become a steady user of Empire Fence, the cheapeat but beat wr fencing made in Western Canada for western f armers.Send your hardware and supply orderau along with your fending orders, and you will save stili more money sIl!fl~~Hesvy Pence. No.D9Top and Bottom _______ wirsu. Intermediate lins and utay wlrou -No. 12 W10 * O 8 Asiu.i id» etWn nod us! I aleisp opar Cat. No. Istyle Sp#ao between lino wires Welght per m rodr F2 - H130«FPnce ........ ... 7 wfre 26-in.high, staye 12-n. aport 3, 3,4, 5,5, 6................ 6 lbo. 190. 72B Hog Fronce ...........O ... 7 wire 26-in. high, stays 6-in. apart 3, 3, 4, 5, 5, 6 ................ 73 Ilb. à\"\u0026 F3 Hog and Shoop Fronce R.......R8 wire 30-mn. high, staya 12-fn. apart 3, 3, 4, 5, 5, 6, 6 .............63 Ibo. 22c. F3D Rog and Sbeep Fonce..... D .. 8 wire 30-mn. high, ty -f.aat 3, 3 ,5 ,6 .......... 8 - lb.. p8E Spocial Eg and hOoep Fonce E ... 9 wire 36-mn. high, as1-fn. apart 3, 3, 3,4, 5, 5 6, 7........... 7 I bn. 80.. F4 Stock Fonce................ R ... 9 wire 42-mn. high, atays 13-fn. apart 3, 3,3:,4, 5y ,8,p ......734 lb. RS31. Pô Stock Fonce ......... ... 10 wire 50-fn. bigh, Staye8 13-mn. apart 3,:3,3. 4.'5 7,8, , ......... 10 lbq. 98e. '4EMP Il \"EXTRA HEAVY FENCE. MIwo cf ail No. 9 wlro throuhout No S ai b* of Wh» MM nih Cat. No. style Space between lino wlres Weight per rod yod Fre Fid Fonce .......... .. 4 wire 33-inhgh. ta 22-fn. sport 10, 11, 12 ................. 5% Ibo. 170. F? Fiold Pence - ......... ... 5 wire 40-mn. high, tays 22-n. sport 9,10,10,11il................ 7 Ibbo. M. FIA Field Fonce .......... N - . 6 wire 40-in. bighi, stayo 22-in. apart 6p 6, 8,10,10........8 lb. 2\". F8 Field Fonce ....... .....0 .. 7 wire 48-mn. high, estays 22-mn. apart 6, 6: 8, 8,1,1........9Y4 l)8. 280. F9 Stock Fonce ......... W ... 10 wire 50-in. highi, stays 16-in. aport 3: 3 , 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 8, 9 ......... 13 Ibo, $90. F9A Shoop and Hog Fonce..... ... 7 wire 26-fn. highi, stays 13-in. aport 3, 3, 4,5, 5,6 ...............il ibm. 810. FX90 Stock Fonce ............. 9 wire 42-in. high, !ms 22-in. apart .R,.3, 4. 5. 7,9, 9 .q .. . 12 lbo. 860. \"iEMP I EIZAVY SPECIAL HOG, STOCK AND POULTRY FENCE. No. 9 Top and Bottoin, No,. 12 intermediate and line wire. Cat. No. FlO--O in. high, 15 lime wiree, staye 8 in. spart, spacing 2, 2, 2, 2, 3, 3, 3, 3, 4, 4, 4, 5, 6, 7, weight 13 lbo. Prie per rod-. 42@.. * \"jIMpip\" GATES 4 FMT HIGH 4-PT. GALVANIZED BARBECD WIEE IN 80-ROD SPOOLS, WEIGHT Width......... ** 3 V2 ft. 8 ft. 10 ft. 12 ft. 14 ft. 16 ft. ABOUT 84 LBS. PRICE, PÊlt SPOOL, 02.80. 2-P\u003eT., PER SPOOL, Ç0.28 Weight ............ 35 lbo. 50 Ibo. 62 Ibs. 70 Ibo. 78 lbs. 82 lbs.. Fnigadgtssipda r la rih ae abdWna Price................ $2.00 $3.50 ,$8.75 $4.00 $4.50 $4.75 Fecnangteehpdat3dca fihtre.Bbdwrea4h \"Empire\" Fonce Stretcher, $6.50. Brace Wire No. 9, per coil of 25 ibe. class. The freight amounte to practicably nothing compared to what we $1.00. Fonce Staplea, 4c. per IL.Bave you. C. se UUDSON CO. LIMITED9 WINNIPEGs CANADA MM mm mm - -Umm mm Iwo-- - -M* amau- -- - -- Umm- - - GUÂRANTEE ORDER C0lUP0N.--TEAR GYP HERE AND ENCLOSE IN ENVELOPE ADDRESED TO C. S. JUDSON CO. LIMITED9 WINNIPEG, MAN. IGentlemen :-Pleas-e find enclosed check, draft or money order for $ ................ for which ship me the following order to the a(ldress given beiow. It is distinctby understood that if I (d0 not find the Empire fencirig and gates to be higher in quality and Iower in price than any other fcnce on the market, and to be made of ail hard, tough, open hearth steel wire, full weight and thoroughly galvanjzed, that I have the privilege of returning it to you, and you wil refund me abI moneys whicit I have paid, including freight charges.» No. of Rode Cat. No, style Fric. G ates ... ..... . Barbed Wre ABOVE PRICES ARE AT WINNIPEG. PROMPT SHTPMENT GUARANTEED -f GREATEST 0F ALL OFFE8 The 'EMPIRE\" Fences give you more real value for your dollar than any fence you have ever been offered before. It will be money in your pocket to buy your season's supply of wire fencing now-even though y ou May flot need it for months to corne. These record breaking prices en sure you so great a saving that you cannot alîord to overlook this rare opportunitY-ýwe urge you to order now, using the or\u003c!er coupon. W. use fuil Government Gauge WIre. We sold upwarde of 50 car loads of \"EMPIRE\" Fencing to Western Canada Farmers during season 1914, and not a rod -of it was returned, which proves that our quality and workmanship are the BEST. r .. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .. . . .. . . . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . . . . . . . .. . . . . . . . . ..e. . . P.O. Address ............................................................................ a . R . S tation .............................. ................... Nam. of Railroad. ......... W.H.M. 7-",
         "The, Westelin Hme Mont hiy MIý.P«;bMwua aadngup accounts, mq»tvdoopiaon on a brillilant ~me6~S~usfç\u003eetand wY trous * M mie =-lédone insistity ta *bâi aolm brick. and mortar out 'PO nosand pence, addition ~Iiatthe. thhlghad t10 b. don.. utfer \u0026adio no acounts would have bOr--,kept in that doIigtful houpehold, edýovS. b yyoung-Mrs. Finch, wiio béd ladfieih W Irish forbear. a pissast -happy-go-lueky temperament, whwboefvoite argument was, «Wen mizkey is gone, wiiAt is ti. Use of rting cdown sains about itl'e But fadie, who wua burden.d with a ~ubk.o . coeaeeoeinsisted that \",Me lived witii tii. Plches in the. dual eapaoity of ueo.tary tb Fincb who was a unIe of acine Puiarty, and «OC to hs w e h, was away k-W-ep M L tours Con- eted withh ie wcdrk SIt uma a plea.sit hoaehold and Sadie bad often cosgrtulated herueon baving \" dcure ci a gocdpt 8h. had -a dArgtful borne in the. rmb\u00264kg old houa.. h. had a certain %mouct ci liberty,-aud tb. chance now and thon of *meeting interesting folk. A\" d me was very fond of Biddy, with ber Irishi lovelinesa of face and voie, and bhr hanum-ecarum outlook on 1f.. 0f courue, Sadie ought to have bad a home ocf ber owu ta inanage-Biddy alsuaid liaI. And. \"aiein ber laoi earl echoed tiheiioughl. Ahomeofher ownI ,Such an'alluring pleture wu conjured up by tbe words boés the louely girl'a eyes. For ah. was ly berefl of relative.. But um W mrig had neyer corne hmr way. OBly oce= a ah. met a man who had power to move ber to deeper' feeling than mere casfual friendsbip, and h.-weul away. Si. neyer knewqut wby. He wrote once, mii. replied; tere eisud after tbat--elence. And five years bad slipped away into tiie Duta ine then. It 'was a mere episode in ber 1f.; uothing la dreain about, and yet ah. inoetieslhnofodtes ~he fownedove er task. This would neyer do. Biddy'spsoai expenditure was larger than ber ailowace. 8h. muet pull in. Poor Biddyl It was bard to tel ber that, harder, perhaps, to make bier realia, lthe gravihy of thinga; wben there waa mouey lu her purs. Xe opent it. Il was quit. simple. Ther. was 10 b. a dinuer party thal negt, a sprinkiing of celebrities aud some old frieuds, a celebration of a birth- ~adiebad benlbsydoing fiowersansd other little househodmatters, wbule Biddy hunin eoetasy over a new frock of Oh-pnkstin, a frock that exactly matcedher se-leaf à compleion. It wsstobe a party of twelve, andSadie had begg.d off appearing-they could not ait dowu thirteen 10 dinner. 8h. re- minded tbem of thia, that euded the. argument, and Sadie got ber way. Sh. usually did with Biddy. A falut amile fIickered lu the. gfrl's dark eyes m ah. added up that last column of figures. If Bidd- Tiie door flew oken d the subjeot of her tbougbta came miwith a rush, an open lette li er baud. \"S8adie!\"p \"Well?\" \"You muet dine to-night, otherwise we shaH b. tbhteen.\" \"«Wby, has someone failed you?\" \"No, but Mr. Henderson asks if he may bring a friend, a celebrity of some kind. I can't make out bis naine, because George Henderson's writing is atrocious. Can you make it out?\"1 Sadie took the letter and looked ah the scribbled contents. \"It begins with a P,\" she said doubt- fully, \" or it mighh b. an R. 1 can't get any further than that.\" \"«Ih's a bother, but I don't like te refuse ho have hlm, he might be useful to Jack. Sadie, you'll have to go in to dinner witb the. unknown. You don't minci, do you?\" ««0f course ual, dear, but I tbink it diatintly unfair t10th. unknowu celebriîy to uend'him inwih ia nobody.\" \"gNonsense As if auyone could oeil you anobody. In yourgrey frock with your lovely amethyste you look IIkb a quem.. \"IYou abaurd creaturel Cinderella would be a muci more suitable naine!\" Biddy fiew awa, a ight, graceful creature, ail fire and animation, withhe true Celtic tempemnt-up m the clouds oue day, down nuthe deptbs 1he next. Il was Sadie who m=ngdto keep thi ngao a solid ba\"i, calmed ber lu one moment, raised ber spirita lu another. They could not do withouî Sadie, they bath muid. And ah. fouud plenty ho occupy ber, eveu wbeu the accounts were doue with and put away lu the bureau lu the. delight.. ful untidyr room sacred to Biddy's per- soual affaira. Ih look.d out ou a wide istretch of Iawn, backed by a sbrubbery, beyond wbich rose unduLating meadowland sud belta of Ams Biddy always tried ho conjure up a lin. of fro'wning purple mountains beyoud liat apin - ber beloved Connemara mountains, behind which she had lived for so long, far from the. outer world. Lilacs dreuched the. air with their dlean scent, laburnumn shed a main of gold over paýth and lawn. Sadie gel up with a sig!1. There was no lime for dawdling, for in that bousehold there were many things 10, be seen ho on the rare occasions of dinner parties ho supplement the efforts of the two willing mi ds, bohh of them ipoted from Biddy's' distant Irish hoesd bohh sincerely athached ho their young mitress. Her busband often hwithed ber withhlber reasons for engaging the cook, a good- looking girl wihh the. delicious name of Anastasia. \"She bas snchbheavenly eyes,'* Biddy had sighed. \"My dear, one doesn'h engage a cook on account of ber heavenly eyes! The one question is-can she cook?\" 990f course ahe can! Irish people cook Wohahoes better than anyone in the world!\" Biddyhad flung athihm. \"And we are ho live on potatoes as cooked by the fair Anastasia?\" \"0f course net, goose! There are other things.\" There were. Anastasia of the heavenly eyes cooked really welI, and Biddy always spoke of ber with conscieiîs triumph, as an example of ber immense capability in the mather of engaging servants. ,Sadie, gowned in grev, a string cf amethysts round bier crearny hbroat, a twist cf huile in the same shade in ber bright bronze hair, looked nt herseif ln the glass, and feit a n:t' 1-al 1Àaure in the. realisation that sh. had by no means l her looks thougiithirty years lay beid' ber. kot tbaîgood looks had been- much use to ber. But ail the She wu disturbed in her thoughts by the door fiying open to admit a distracted fi\"ur in shell-pink satin. Il cbotbed Biddy's lithe figure like the. sbeath of a flower out of il rose ber snowy neck and uiioulers. A wild rose flush was in ber nofî cheeka, ber eye hone 1k. stars. «dSadîe~ what shail I do? Anastasia is going; diner ought to b. served in a quarter of an bour, and Mary bas hys.. terie luin thepantryl\"y \"Biddy!\") \"CAnastasia a't bel pit; she's had a telegrain to say ber mother is dying. 8h. eau just catch the mail to Fishguard if ahe goes imxnediahely. Mary does nothin~ but cry anid a trophise the saints; and thougbshe'll ober best, she ca't dish up aliner d wait at'table as we11. Wbh s tob. don.? I so particularly wanted this dinner ho be a success, because Sir Gregory Hazel is inherested m1 Jack's last explring expedition, and may be such a bel p to him in the. future. Suggest something, Sadie, or I sbal go madl\" Tiie two girls looked at one another for a moment ln ailçncel then Sdelaughed. and fiung ber gloves sud fan on hothe. dressing-table. \" Ih's ail right, Biddy; trust te me ho manage hhings.\" \"But how-how?\" \"F'il dish up. Mary wiil b. ail righh once she realizes somebody is there ho direct ber. l'il go down. And for once you must dine thirteen!l I can't be But,' Sadie- The words feU on empty space. Sadie had gene. Down she flew ho the. kitchen, pausing a moment ho look ln at the pantry, where Mary was wiping ber eyes. \"Mary! Corne along; I'm-goingho disbi up the. dinner. I know ail about ih. Give me one cf Anastasia's aprens. Everyhhing la ready, Isuppose?\" \"Yes, miss-barrin' a sauce for the pudding.\" \"Ail r igh; lil do that. I haven't learnt cooking for nothing. Hurry, Mary, and we'll show whah we eau do when we're put ho 1h! Has Anastasia gene?\" \"Yes, miss; sh. went in the cab that brought the master frem the station. She'd just catch the train at IPaddington, the master said.\" \"Thah's good. Nowv we'll get te werk.\" Sadie,.ber pretty grey fewvn shielded by one ef Anashasmat's big wvhite apre, hurried te the range whcre saucepans and pets were ail set in array. Sh. peeped inte each, leek'ed at the list sh. berseif had carefully written eut of the courses, and set te wurk to iake the sweet sauce. She -heard. Mary .hurrMn to the front 1'door as the bell peale loudly tbrough. the bouse.' The l4tohen dock istruck .eit. eliddy ceut an aious glance at the dlock1 The guests had ail sssembled; the. thirteenth proving to, be an interesting- looking man -with a.pleasant, tanned face, and the. look of one who bad spent hm. days -out of doors. Penrose, so0 Henderson.told ber, had just corne back from Canada-but flot to stay; jhq would return ini a montb or two. H. had done great work out there, estab- ishing a colonyr from hie property ini Cornwall, founding a new country for the. working mani, and working with themn himself as bard as anyone. More than that, he was writing a book on the aubject which would prove of great value to the. prospective emigrant. \"'They do their own work out there,\"I Henderson told hlér-\" domestic and every.. tiiing else.\" \"Oh, what w~ solution!\" said Biddy, with another distracted glance at the. dlock. \"Look ber., *wbat is wrong?\" said Henderson's voice in ber ear. \"'Nothing much, only my cook has had, to go off aI a moment's notice to iier horne in Ireland, and that accounts for the. delay. Misa Preston la taking ber place, and dishing up the dinuer.\" idCan't we belp? Old Penrose lsa tophole cook if that's any use ho you.\" ' Oh the Uiner la cooked, practicaily, but__' \"Look here, Penrose, ber. la somethin~ duihe lunyour lin.,\" Henderson cbafed 'Tiie cookas gone-what about lending a hand, eh?\" \"By ail means.\"1 \"Tii. lad y1you were to hake in-lin't that righh, Mrs. Finch? - la disbing up the dinner.\" Penrose Iaugii.d. \"Ih sounds serious. Mrs. Fincb, please let me iielp the new coek. I assure you, Imean 1.\" Biddy booked ath hbesitahingly. \"id don't like ho let yen; it's to bad, really, but- \"Not another word. I shail enjoy 1.\" Just ah hhah moment the door opened, and Mlary aunonced: idDinner is served.\" But Penrose disappeared, went dowu the hall, and tbrough a swing door of green baize whicb booked as if it led ho the kitchen d.partments. A saveury smell floahed ho hlm from an open deerway. He passed throngh it ilite a spehless kitchen. At the centre hable 1 girl was standing with a basin ini one hand, while with the other she stirred and beat som.hhing very carefully. Shc leoked up. A cry escaped ber lips. lie was censcious of softly ruffled bronze hair, hhreaded wihh mauve; cf a gleam of amethysts againsh a creamy hhroat; cf eyes-startled, lovely, wclcoming eyest 42 A, Kitchen' Romance Wilteifr-'lieWestrn em.Monhlyby W. P.- Gilbrt. A portion of Dr.'GrenfellPe Reindeer Herd at St. Anthony, Newfoundland",
         "4\u0026.1% The Western Home .Monthly An incredulous volce. aid! cisadi\" hçstaniiiered; «Oh, don't make me spoil the sauce!\"' she cried, betweeu laughter snd sometbiug perilously near tears. \"What do y\u003c\u003eu \"lTo help youl I've corne to lend a baud. Command me, please!\" Uip went thesoup, to be followed, in due course, by fiali, beautifuliy snd deftly served, wth ita accompaniments of freeli, htobter and a sharp sauce, by entrees snd roast, by gaine, sweet, savoury snd ice. It was a bus hour for Sadie-for penrose, too\"wihb*is many willlng j'ourneys suad forwards with teavily-laden trays. But at lsst it came to an end. Amateur cook and willing lielper faced ose another, flushed with the heat of the kitchen fire and the success of thefr en- deavours, while desnert was set on the table in the dining-room ad Mary with- drew to her pantry and the wsshiug of ilver. They were alone in the cheerful kitchen, with t he remains of the feast before thein. They spoke together. \"I'm starving!' Then they laughed--such happy laugli- ter-sa they sat down at a side table to the hot soup which Sadie, with fore- thouglit, had put by in a fireproof marmite in the oven. \"Starvingl What goo4 soupi We ought to drink the healti' f-what ia the cook's naine?\" \"Anastasia.\" \"Here's to Anastasia, then. This re- minda me of the illicit feasts of my child- hood-the devouring of dainties when they came out from the dining-room. Did you ever sit on the stairs and seize a p asslngFmeingue?\" \"Often. And how good they tasted.\" \"Stolen sweets are always the best. I athey won't want us upstairs, will \"They must do without us. There are things to be done-washing up, you know, putting away china. Our work isn't done yet. But firat we must eat our dinner. It was too bad that you should have been deprived of-\" \"0f what? The party in the dining- room? I'd much rather h hre with you. I was to have taken you ini to dinner, iu any case; so it's ail riglit, Sadie. What brmngs you here? W. have leisure to talk now, and I must know ail about it. 1 tliought you were rried.\" His voice feUl on the word. \" Married? What made you think that?\" she asked lightly. \"A letter told me so. Ransome-you remember him?-wrote snd said that the pretty Miss Preston had married a, fcllow named Allauby. That wasa wly 1 neyer wrote again. \"But it was my cousin Rosie-the pretty Miss Preston who married George Aflanby,\" said Sadie. \"In my eyes the description applied only to you. I had to go away that time- five years ago now-to carry out some work my father entrusted to me iu South Africa. It was while out there I heard of your supposed marriage.\" \"Yes, and since then? Wliat have you been doing?\" asked Sadie hsstily, wisbing the fire snd other things would not make her cheeks burn to ffucli a color, snd feeling a tide of happineos rising about lier as she isat there, with half-empty disheo before her, in the kitchen with Penrose. \"Many thinga. I've acbieved a certain amount of fortune and saine faine. I've made my home in Canada. It's a splen- did country, Sadie- free, open, broad- minded- f ar from conventions snd Mrs. Grundy-where a man ia appreciated for wliat he is, not for what lie makes. A country wbere a man may keep bis individuality and self-respect-where he eau live. Ad we do our own work. 1 assure you my bread is eatable, sud 1 kuow exactly how to cook a joint.\" «I am sure you do. And you are going back there?\" '\u003cNext monti'. But-there are some things I cannot do alone. One of the drawbacks to my home is its loueliness.\" \"You have no neiglibora?\" \"iNeiglibors?\" Yes. But no one of my owu. The. long winter evenings wlien the snow faileaud one is tucked up by a log fire witli a good book--oh, there are worse times and places. But a man longs for some one to talk to-some one with whoin to exchange ideas, thouglits, hopes, even fears. And there is only one person who can do ail that for me. Sadie, it la you I waut. I neyer cared for anyone close. I've dreamed of you when I thouglit I ought to tear your image out of my heart. You are free. I want you to come back with me Wo Canada to lielp me. Sadie drew a long breath. She could hear the cheerful murmurous singing of Mary in the pantry, the rui- ning of water as the silver- was washed:* Froin the dining-room came an occasional burst of voices of laugliter. And there was Penrose,- LM'a arn about 'her, wlio wsnted her. \"Sadie, say something.\" Sadie turned lier glowing face to hlm. III should love to go to Canada,\" ah. breathed. 'IL that ail, swcetheart. Just Wo go Wo Canada?\" '\"With you,\" mli. whispered. She was in bis arma. Tlih nee heard or saw the entrance ofMary, ler mouth open to naît a uestion She gv tliem one glauce 012 fled b k ta lier pantry. Biddy Flucli entered like a whlrlwind fluslied with triumph, for tlie dinner liac been excellet-deliglitfully served,, no delay or ominous pauses between the courses; tlie plates just at the riglit heat, the sauce for the bot pudding a veritablo treat. What on earth would they hâve* doue witliout Sadie? And now- Biddy looked flrst at oue, then nt the other. There was something aimait elea.. trie in the air, some liappinesa radiating from them bath that made itself abso- lutely felt as well as menu. It was Penrose who spoke. \"IWeil did we acquit ourselves weil?\" lie asked. \"IMore than weil; everything was per- ft;but- but-\" »Biddy broke off ; aeized Sadie's arm and shaok it geutly. i\"Sadie, something lias lihappeued. Whafz lit?\" #'I wil explain,\" said Penrose. \"9 lias1 promisedi to corne out Wo Canadh witb me uext monti'. That la L are old friends, y ou ones. Ai this ô!*hb Wo have liappened long avgo oly boreutn went wron. Nov emery hm h 0.c00 right, thanks W the lu7eky*hUothot brouglit me here to.zuigt.\"I \"«You're going W tae her aw.y ta. Canada!\" ecried Biddy. \"But what are we Wo do witliout ber?\" Penrose lauieçi. \"Rate me if you will, Mru. Feh,\" hoe said, \"but, believe me, I wantmy wifs even re ýtlau you can want * 'h\"li aedar\"Mu, I'm no Iad, and go sarbth tégethei. But you -am tg coneup witli me et one-baith eI91YMi Wangup? Nonsensfue ht eu Weis We want you mare'than the pl\"Atn d dihsdo. Oh, how littls 09,on.* what is going Wo happent\" \"O0n. neyer cau tel\" Il.aid Peusngs with twWiniugese. \"hutaiof n. th~Iu I feel quit.eceta_ýU, Mrs. FMn \u0026li, sd î is, I've got the riglt wifs for 5aa. The Gospel et La\"li Hlewlng wood and drawring watét, tplit- ting atones an\u0026. cteavin\u003c o. Ail eb dusty rauka àcf labor la the. regiment 'of Qed Mareh together toward fls trlumaph, do tbe tâsk lits bande prepars: Hionest tbu la holy cervies; tailbful work ia praise and prayer. This ln the gospel of Iabor-dn its y. belle of ts he k1r-ý The Lord of is ecame dova frent *.ie ta live wlth th. mou who wovk. This in the rase that Hoe plant.dhure là the thorn-curued sot- Heaven inbbiset with perfeset zut, lit' th. blosaing aofEBarth in toil. ; -Henry via »yks. B-1 Heculs WvenWire Fencing N0W ai leut ta. Manclotrers, ri# Hercules Woven Wire Fence is the equal of any, regardiesa of trade name or price. Construction, style, quaflty and dlu of wh's determine the value of any fence. COMPARE HERCULES with others for which many extravagant claima are »Ae and b. oonvlnoed. Nerou les ls the-Bout Fermoe Mumde-Thore la Nonoe Metter \"Mercu1e,\" Vouas IF made i nnleg.Ton gea nw; dean product, Free front AT TENUE EEuCeD PluIONSDIN»VI= iom OU »\"~IU. PM.AOU TOU Corroslon. Exposuro to suiphur fumes andthe elements aet .na ports shorten the life of wiroe OnDiE TO-DAT *AM AVOID DI8AàPOIUTXE. fencing very much. Chb satisfled with weather beaten stock when you can ge he best fresho fr.. the gosna ^h . \"Hercules\" Woven Wire Fence haa square mesh, tifi ta vre pecify the quantit and kind you want. Include a mi Lt Les njaîdceZ of k~ttnh eueol ard, tough, spri*gr, open hearth gaivanised wire. Gýuarautoed ake upyur fece n hipto sutorcnvaee.V FuilGoernmeu Blau ardGuge. Our patent \"Pos!tlve Lock Joint\" poswesees immense MT,AN OETPUIL UOS strengtb. Its easy to stretch over uneven ground. Will not bukie or sag. \"HERCULES STANDARD FENCE.\" xo, Top and lotIonvire. Iutermodiste alinsd slip virsNo. l. Babe Cat. ExtraordiDU ary li res style huasboles V tb Prime No. Put Up in 20, 80 sud 40 rod relis »uo vins par rod por rod 13123 ..g.oua ....................... 7vie,6Sins. bltgh, stffl12ilmIn. spart. 3,3,4,oi,8,6.......... 6 lbn. 190 114 Hog]rouces................ ... 7 vire,,2e lus. hlgh, atm 4 lins,\u0026Part. 1,8,4,6,8,6 ........7 lb . sec Els S oce.....vi....8wre, 32 ins. high, atmge12 il». spart.3184.815,6106.......:74 lb.. no ail Hs g s hoop Vese.......vi wre, 32 ina. b!gh, stage O6itu. apart. ,,451,......8 Ibo. 280 Hile ...sud .....u.. à 1.....10a» Hi42 stock FVouas......0.. viwre, 50 ina. Wh stflps a ls. net ,,8487859.. 0l, M \"ECu LU8\" HE WAVT SUCIAL zoo, STOCK AND POULTT u NCH. usNo. S Top sud Bottons, No. 18 intormodste sud lino vire. Catalogue No. 1844. 50 In. blgh, 15 lino vire., atem SaInm. spart, spaciai .1, 3,,41 3,,,r44,,,eTvogtils.Ple,per rot ................................................. . luHERCULES EXTRA HEAVY FENCE.\" Mad cifanl No. 9 vire brogout. Babe Cat. styloepoobloo oeht Prias 128 S iel-Veuco ......................4 viro, 82 lm. hlgh, @a sage m. $nPutr.d prre No.2 Put u» e................à 4 lm.180isdh4atm 22U5 0,1121......... Ibo. 120 E13 ]Fid Voese......................ie, 40lina. hlgh, stage 22 Inn. spart.4 6* 8 0,0........ Ilbo.. ose 1313181IFid Vee..................... .......... l . sflips. flapart. 6, as ,10 .....9Y4lbo.. ne lS l o2Fild ronce ...................... 10lure, 60 f. highstagl elns. \u0026Put. Ui341f,, 9..Il Ibn. 390 E132 Extra Hlgh Stock Vonce ............il1vire, 40 lus. hblghstag l6iums part. U884SY8S91318Ibo. dec .RELISShoop and Eeg Vouces.............7 vire, 24in\u0026. lgh, tu sli s. a sart. 3,8,415,4846........il lbs.. Sic The Wlngold Co. Ltd., Wlnnlpog, Mann W1.gdi's amiant\" d $Smthki 178enTE OUPON; if 1O!UO TO. wbnnlpeg ......................1leu Tm VINGOL 0., LTM. W.BJL Ship me.........rod, Caogue No.,*-**-»-* \"' m -'@dv'aui)(giu4Wiretq erc,ulesyoceaI.........epu rad a .........................................................roda\u0026, Cstalogs MO. or dra tt.......l........ mant for gmm. Il in dlatned noeiofmlat that uhould i beo covlnea am =Cu\"( et zu. Mame la not ail you daimsMd uantMfqIh. pars0eie and 7ualty. 1 eau Mt=r l charges ;L by me\u0026 ~ O .....d..... 6............ ............... ..d........................ p.......",
         "The We8tern I#~PèhO Moathly - A ts wout tpie bsud kW-kig vho b 0 nlt a StIefae t Ue iik- heet4 wudo su miacola se 1h -boim qMolmd\u003e\"g h.ua psd ti.#SUdo h pped Uh ic oo w~dvitsatc nd - gmIion0fUicn-à ~ut ! 1. cildsudthe a uddengua .~,v.hlmbala eams uh.dik elad lbeindhuavte abakyosw movemut 0 bis oot.The, viisarale ne i o a I tevpe sudil h. vas outide aga n Thi ie dic oa bisd. okhe arsd a dM m pecptae whu ianei uoUcdong 1 sudr hophmfIt is suov bcxd e bega tesbrggltuher huldfrengrasp.fue Bbtsu su-d dog romse boçer, thie dog Mo Wig uidahakig hihair m Senoyment ITuO et*r.Bach criinasoWood sud lb.box à\" wds vsfhe ihand vu' et aý jipl.mubsd by an ocfvpl i~m~i lioruntil th. bidy vomanvh vasis ile Ï% xclaimed with aa mila t»Mthe must b reckouinit on being varin bo-igt. nH oted bhW of ome h hcg oh.hsd maccuat h. atrav pile out over on'tb. unfenced field, anid bLIfapa= ith har that they muaI sie pàaI ime, h. got inte his shesî1tn est ndvent ont te the stable te, vae the stock, a business h d put offaü ey hüethestorin vas at its fMt N~1ow owver, ilhad toe.donc, and he týâý to h e vater froin the veil te .\"tale in 1h. banda sinstead of turni7 lthe animais out. Ho vas afraid taifh. turned bas, bis hors. Uiey vould b. hall mad vith froUie sud end by runingavy te thc strav pile te join =b ote ossth.rm flicetable boit vari n d comfortable sud his bain rBhed thmeaces lasity as h. ýbueked on th. coller., but in 1h. gI!I]uItine oubIde Uic stable door they would, hurdly stand whilc he fastened thm *her. The stone-boat sud bar- ros u=outuonsa viud-swept place sud th. teain sled round te avoid the bsI as h. fasteued tbe tuga te chifiietrees, s0 that 'witb 1heïr impatience h. bad just lime te catch hold of 1h. vind-disordcred linos sud step on board s Uey suddenly whbod sud started off at a mmnn trot. As 1h.yplged over thc nov suow-drift, ilvasuail lcoculd do tekeepcontrosand to balancehimcl sd thbarrelon 1h.tilting ebeigli, and ea,1he vei il as nisky 10 leave the team whilchipumpod 1h. vater. Soin. .hovehlig vas necenay aI Uic ump sud lie bad te heave th. bain out o Iereach in order to, do it, sud vith nothing 10 hold them but th.elino fastened together around, a barreL. Handiciapped as ho vas byremiting thc vind sud by being bal elupfieby thesuow winch wirledupe inte bie face, ho vas just too latc,vhen te liorme WVpd, t e sei e Uiclnos again. Th. ba=a blev over sud avay 1h. horsos s'eut, hasenod, rather Uisu recalled b7 Ide. loud-shouted, half-affrighWhdao, Away they vent night acreas tho viud to Uic strav pile, UtehUes blovu trailiug out to oue aide. The apiritod horme, ftetted past endurance vilh discomfort, badl no. plan but just 10 run. The home on the shclbered aide vas Uic faster and aep a tlahead so Ihat as a teain Uicy xud nowheel off dovn-vind, but kept itraight for thc atrav pile, vhère Uic horses bherc, boath 10 rouse thenselves frein Iheir statue-liko immobllity vere avakened to amazed movemout Ly Uic unnatural approach. They had ouly just lime bo scatler ouI as tUic baincame up t10thIrm, and, winded as bbc btain vas, by Ui Dollar DI.ireu's\u003c Aft~ dieStorm ~w~m-fe h-lmm am luidlyB T. k Nuli Troop of Kurd CavalrY which the Turks are hurling againat the Russians in the Passes of thle CaucasILMunan kk » - au~ à bshélter fUi i .:othe.-li.m= atno lmein folilo- ing bt venhe came near the strange hors. oedbuI 10 avoid hum, and the excited teain followmng thqir inovemeiits, starte off again; Ibis time 10 the stable. Thore the mn, angr and exhausted, found them and fortunately h. wua Wise enouhto àcL.e1h latent spirit of tyran- vn hc as rouaed vithin hum, no that instead of bullying the harmiesa depcnd- cnt animnals, he took them for another short run and gathering -up the tumbled barrels, sucoeeddin ha,\u0026inthei ater vithout furthor- mishap. The teain, as heunhamnessed thein were awkward and as if quite mwarceo tic angry, vofcamie ipusewithin hM, secmed to push against hum and resist hum tirough their own supprcsaed bal-fear of whth ould do. Ho vatered Uic cattle and Uic colts with a half-savage but ient impatience which made Uic coits check un- naturally Uic hurried gratification of their tbirat, and lif t Ueir h\" eaarpcatedfly from the pail heheld toceye with distrus the mood in him, wliujh m»aobis sudden and unusual movementa, and when, after vaing , howas giving Uc .es uio grai,he could not resist an iulse which made him xveone of thoiný a blo0 'wth the back of -imitted hand onthe aide of its sensitive, suspicion-feeling nostril. The horse atepped back so auddenly as to break its worn, old balter, snd turned into Uic passage and,raaed up between two cows, who turu affrighted, nî faces, and nosod at the shouldora of the unaccustomed invador. Then theman sobered nov, dllmbod over the stail in thc cows' nger, and Uic horse doubly affrighted, backed suddenly up andvo- cd ron to ilssaail. Freed of bis anger, the mn spoke to brokenbalte aearpi ihapei Outaide the wind va ssilil tearing and the darknems coming on as Uic man crosaedc from the stable to Uic house. Ho passedi the dog, which vas stfi curled up under2 Uic sheltering vail, and onteringthe varin,@ comfgrlable glow of the room inaide, het took off bis coat and jacket, observant ofi the neat fgr of bis wife, and, as she\" lifted two bubbig fried eggs from Uh i pan, he took her in bis armsansd gave hert a pure, sof-huxnblod, love-invitinig Ii. The wind had fallen, the moon shonet upon the glistening plain, the horses fromn the straw pile were following their leader with Plunging stePs across the drifts to pâv for grass beyond the cultivated field,t and ail around thc house was atil when presently the colle dog went lightly o'era the hard-paeked snow down to a neigh-c boras on the creek below.r Recently a Young mawho i. maldng plans to ewae- the farm because ife.- there i. boo slow snd. money-nacing, harder than it in in a Ciy pmstion la callcd by' business te a !city for a day and hie droppd into a dollar-a-day holel for his dmnner. The regular dn ner vas served te *hbim and hoie we outhflgr.nH mit have callcd for exta hlpiguof course, but'when h., sawUic do0f vegetables and the tIbm alivers 0f meat on Uic little plateS he cncluded that a second hcl* vould do hîm* no good. Bo tUic iicxt meal hie entered a restaurant and pro. ceeded te \"eat bis I,» as leh o ld bie mother on bis returu home. Ho selected a plain, satifying meal and vhen ha got- bis slip il vas marked one dollar. And ail hoe had wss a man's portion of rosat bcdf potatoes, beans and pie with mal to «'I tell you, Mother, I found 9cm. Uiing out today',\" hoe said vhen hie home. C\"You vo beensrvgdo meals to us right along and didn't knov il. Heres six of usinthe familyand to I us up as you've been doing would cost exactly six dollars each meal-partiual dinner--in Uic ciby.» The good lady vua akeptical, but hier son soon cnicdher with pencil and \u003ctaper that 1h. good me.b she served would cot that amount inu bbc cilI \"Itell you vhat,\" lho added linon-m clusion, \"the farm IooI\u003cs botter t eebuhà it did beforo 1 vent te the city. .1 couldn't afford to pay oven flfty cents .a meai if I vent te tevu \"te vork-eana at tvn=-lecents, vbich -is -hUýric aL larpefr cheap boarding, Ik~ I'd starve tb death. Ithi1 kI'IlF d« here a vhile longer.\" It seeins very atranqe that yoeg heallhy, hungry -farm loys- an d nover consider the question c, ' d when they vaut tb bave the farin, std\" yét it la one of the most vital tbin* as Uiey flnd out laler. T hey soom.]\" that high rente, expenses for lhght and fue breakages, unpai b ills and.-ictvhe decay of foods in hot -veather force' 1kI restautant keeper and the manager 0f bbc cheap boarding-house 10 serve 1h.epi\"i sud cheapest fare. And Ibis fare almoat uneatable to the young farm boy, or girl. These young vorkers are amaowd 10 know that left-overs are ardiily r 'worked int the next meal' sud thd'- licome-bàcks,\" as the re-eerved dish\u0026, aie called, are maltera of nece\"atyt- the cheap boardinf-house keeper. rs thc \"dollar dinners' of the fari prepared in aclean light lkitchen to the scazity meab - of a city ealing-house la a avilI transtion' bo the healthy young people, and it e quires rosi heroism 10 force down the, un- palatable foods at firaI. 0f course there are hotels aud res-; taurants whero bhc choicest food that earth sud aky and ses can produce is81 served, but the youug person at bhc foot, of the lsdder aem the oulside of these: palaces.",
         "The .western HOMO' Monthly The, Sweetet Sound in the -World W*\" sufor Tii.Wester Home Monthly by Jeaie F. Brown I Once upon a tImp wlien, the world was B gradayounger han it is to-day, in 6aù.ofKin U lvk a great and good B H ed over a vast territory, and devtdly by bimany subjects. Net a n nS ihem but wotld bave gw*,y lid down b i1f. for the King nor B wnman who would flot bave ll vSehahusband, son or lover t g e for NOw, tei.King bad an only daughter Who wu so lovely and charrning that mli. vu. kwn throughout the Kingdom, and *n ole i oms as weil, as the \"Beauti- fulprne.. Indeed she was a very oui\u0026girl, and oI subor sah. had oom ut non. of bbe handsome and d\u0026sblng young princes who bad corne had aJosemuch as houched the the. Prines.. Her father the Kgmid: \"Do not b.i a hurry, rny da.Wait bll one cornes whom you love.\"Bo the. Princes. waited. Thon one day in the. royal foreat mii. mo a vuo woodcutter, bandsoýme, good n\u0026\u003ele. ldest of a largead poor tuiy be that tie world looked diffS o .te iBeautiful Ptince..-Tii. gm ilions more brigitly, the. birds sang MMr blithely, the. flower. bloomed more I - as lie rode down the street. go -the King was very sad, and the Beautiful Princes was sad, too, because her demi, father was enbappt physicians bavine failed on- tirelyto eieethe King of 19s afflition, Mo sMajesty sent for a famoüs soothsayer. Now, smce his hearing had ef t him the King had been forced to wear attached to bis person a siate and a pencil, with which thoee who wished to converse with him wrote down what they had to my. The seothsayer, therefore, took the. pencla and wrote: «\"Yes, I can tell your Majesty what wlU brmngback your hearig \"rWbat is it?\" cried the Ring. \"What la it?\" cried the courtiers, in one voeoe. \"When the sweetest soumd i the world is made li the presence of your Majesy,\" wrote the soothsayer, \"your hearing wiil be restored, and you wifl b. demi no longer.'q \"«The sweetest sound li he world\" .aid the King. \"The. sweetest aound lm the. world\" echoed, the courtier.. Thn they aluunid together: \"What is the aweetest sound i the worldTel us.\" But thie .oothsayer relplied \"Nay, 1 cannot, That i. for you 10 discover. Insure Your Plurs aaiast Moth Theft Fire nwas, Went dI for Bn lie, plates Pro. Id hi lectede Aind ilk te. Toronto m gong tW the F=ot with the Red Urm 1)ge piéonted by ihe i'rocb i rred\". M. Felix.Faure nd to meik Y.I lits.B na tht ce Mi rhes-: beautiful sud frarn. b*loe i wooddiutber. 8h, d inot1ebel herefaler, for good and kind as the, Ring vas, il vas hàrdly te b.expeted that be would vof a w ct ras a son-in-Iaw. migit forbid bis daugiiter to see the. woodcuttor ah ail, so tho Beautiful Princes kept ieènt on the, subjeet of ber love for the young mani. Now, just at hile lime a great misfortune béfel lieM King. And because he was so, beloved by bis subjects a t distrow as fet througiiout the.wviol indom. Mon, meeting one anotier on the street, would say \"(Have you heard about the. King? le tnotdreadful? .Andthiesay nothig cenb. don. for him. The. ourt P hysicians cannot cure hlm. Dear, oh The. vomen li hie market places siiook hher headsansd sigiied. over thie cabbage Rnd onons and said:-. \"What a pityl What WB*pityl And they say xotiing cen b. done for hlm.. Te Court ?iiysicians' Sannot cure him. Wbat a pityl' 1 The. achool .chidrexi paused li thoîr heedless froic long enough tc say, viti long looks on their.lithie faces: \"Tii. poor Rinig! Isn't it toc badi And they say nothmng cen b. done for huma. The Court physiciaxis cannot cure him. Isn't it tooc Lad!\"y 1And th. people offered prayers * ~al bthe churches throughout the extireK'ng- dom, but abililthie misiortune rernaied with the King. jNow, the. misfortune vas thile. The. Ring had become tone deaf. H. could flot hiear a acund. Trwo sôunds were very de-ir to him, sud îhey were the. sound cf is daighter'a voice and the. aiouting of his IPr'ople as ho rode down the street. It grieved the King very deeply that he coni hear neither the voice of the Beauti- fl Princess nor the shouting of his people »97.»ePotg Amu w-c N said one 10 anotier \"Ah, auxr ely King wil hear Ibis vonderful musc.\" But the. King md, ««I ean hm 4~ 1hng. Disappointed, the. yiolinist went away. A nature-lver cme snd »id- f'Tm ea the, sweetest Sound i àhe; the. song of the. running valet and tii. whpngwid fth Mcome rippling ril that play$ anl day long amid sunlight and show, andseurelyho illbear ÎÊ hhmo f the, rippleà = dthe.voice of the. W;= Wmid vbiseRing aogthie grases.\"Bo the. King wnt adthe. courtier.s ad the. nature-loe led tiem t0 a loveay glade in thé. forent viiere, as ho had said, a rillniiymed and np;pled, camesed by thei- warm West Wind. \"It is very sweet, said the. courtiers one te another, \"vili.' hear il?\" But the. King said, more weariy than before \"I can hear notbing at ail.\" A preaciier sougit audience vith the. Mig and said: \"la liot the aweetest Sound ln~ie orld the. bymn of praise sud th î fromn thé hearts f multi- Ring% wlhear the. hymn of praise ofhi people.\" Bo the. Ring wentto the. churcli of the preacher, and when the iiymn of praise went up from the. great company tii. coufiers looked at one another and said: \"Tii. sound la indeed aveet. Surely the, King vil bear it.\" But the. Ring said: \"lTake me borne. I eau bear nothing!\" Carne a miser, vitii bis rnoney-baç., \"Tii. aweetest Sound li the. orld 'à surely tiie clink of gold,\" said-ho. But as the. golden coins cllnked-one against tiie otier, the Ring said: \"Take hum avay. I can hear notiiing. la tier. not some one can discover tuis vonderful Sound? Wiiat is the. mattor vith you ail?\" \"Surely,\" said an old ma-i \"the sweetest sound in ail the vorld is tiié kes cf lover., plightlng troth.\"1 And bye young lover. came before the King and pligiitod thoir love vith a kiss, but the. King sid: \"I can hear xothing.\" So they went te tthe forest, and viien they had srrivodthier. thi.Princes. beard the Sound of the woodcutter's ax, and the rosy color mounted in her ciook. \"Do you not hear 'anythiing, Father?\" ah. bond uady. 'ONothIn the Ring Md w dliiio te sud as h drsW us,, Uu1 baweh a r ar mm loi v t0 me' Thie uliaby . 1Ibo \"ou in ail the. vnd\" 1h. hotur.d o the iqodoltouMd cnied jcouy:\"8m me to tie i.ret dfrom«v.v. bhrougiiout ail the Kindgdo, of the, humble voodoutterW ene end ofthe Khqgodm o 1c , m everyoneumdtath Prinem Bo te oodutier msmqd 14 ponst hffapp1ý year% the sSdKigc vis« a m wieil that hauva. m The cost is very amil for this ab8olue protection. Our expert furriers dlean your furs without extra charge before storing them for the summer months. Don't run aay ric. Foeward your fuis y toy1 the W-nnipeg branch of Canada'. grestest fur bous -seud them byv sxprms at oui oxpeim, and adviue us. Our echargefor etorage mai Ibwumie la ly à paret n of your owa valuation, from $100 upwardu. You have akIse \u0026.aiv\u0026ntage 0 having BEY remaolb or repair work doue durlng tbis leun busy Besson aI mh lower pricea. Fairweather \u0026UV,.Limitdi But il rnaïrb. heard, Sire, in yohir own Kingdom., Then the King said, for se greatly did h. desire tiie rehurn of bis hearing, \"I beg you to bell me bhis secret. If y ou tell me, 1Ishall make you a great lord in my Yingdom.\" But- h tiichbsayer replied, nov simost in tears, \"Sire, I cannot. Indeed, 1 caxi- not. I do not know. I wish i\u0026 i. But 1 do know that il la ho ho found in your ovxi kingdom, sud wben it shail b. made mn your presence, you vil hear il sud your deafness wilbeb cured.\" Nov, the. Beautiful Princes. was stand- ing by, sud she said ho herseif \"Surely tiie Young voodcutter la the. visest sud most clever maxi in the. Kingdom. Surely, ho cen discover tuis secret\"' se ah. took the Mate cfthie King .sad vrotethereon, I'Father, do you believe the Moohar? âmdthe King said \"My dear, 1th kdo!\" olrhn,\" wrote tiihe autiful Prmncess, \"bt us issue a proclamation sud say that viosoover shal discover the. secret cf this swetst sound li the. orld, if ah. ho a woman, ahe shall roeçive castios sud lands; but if h. ho a maxi, ho ahal yod your daugiter, oven mysoif. Thon sûrelY vil ail mon strive to discovor tii, secret2 sud surely thie mani wio discovers it vil ho gcod sud vise onough to ved y'our daughter.\" ,lit shaH hoe done as you say, little vise one,\" said the, King. So the. proclamation vas issued, sud evory day at'noon tiie Ring hold court i the. groat hall cf the, Palace sud tii.re cameo ho him ail the wia. and clever people in the. Kingdom wiio thougitt hhy kncw tiie secret cf the. sweetest aound in the world. First, came a great violinist. \"Surely,\" aaid i. \"the. voiceocf the vioin la the sweetest aound i the world. Surely the. King will hear it.\" And he played the Most enchanting music, till the courticrs PunhSc Moatrnl",
         "The western Homte mont hiy The, Young Womnan and -\"Her Problem ]Pearl Richond Hamilton. luEn oeT m\u0026UTWUL MOIT op ýpmag the vinter Tasked the girls of elub caei tç\u003e wfrite me her most 'A ftu mernory of «Mothere As the -th of' May is ilother's 'Day I foot t4t th. publication of nmre of these em n Ib page will h a mont fit- thtribut, te the day that every man, WbTnm an ad hild wbose life bas been b#lm@ by .1ving motherwng, muet de- te houer. These letters are f rom o wuge-earnîng girls in Winnipeg- ,st orwhom ane alone in the city. lii. roader may judge for herself the v*'e of a mother's influence in the life of th. work--day girl away from home. Tii. letton aae quoted witbout altera- ti.*i-eore are frorn college bred girls -q-thers from girls who bave not had th* advantage of oedacational training- b$ .\u00261 quoted here are from girls who are doing weol. and' uho are superior in vn\"\u0026~my streng*j of character.. Deair Mn. flamilton-I have znany beutful memories of my mother, 'who ia. pUll lving although we are far apart aa4 bave been for a number of years. 1 believe thc most beautiful memory 1 have of mother, although nad, in wbert IfiOnt left home. 1 was only a 11111e over fifteen. My bome la in the eountry and I was coming-away to the city. 1 amn the eldest and. seemed to bi more of a companion to mother. Ail dqzing my preparation to beave abc semred as if she could hardly keep up. We bad so many tbings to talk about. Thon Uic morning arrived and I baed to leave just at day break. Father took me te the depot .apd 1 had to bid hier good-byc at the old faim gate. We both knew it was better for me to go, but it just seemed as if we couldn't part. 1 looked back several times to see ber still standing by the gate, and she bas told mie ince that she just thought she would have to eall me back. I really neyer realized just how much mother ivas to me before as we had neyer been apart. 1 shall always bave that picture of ber at the gate. Sinoerely, Dear Mns. Hamltn-I was present at the Girls' Club last Sunday and beard your request for our moat pleasing re- mem~brance of Mother. 1 have not yet decided what that is as there are s0 many, but 1 thouglit the enclosed poern would be specially appropriate for the occasion. It was written by my father several years ago, in memory of bis mother, and wae written for a song, but vwas never published. I amn, Yours Sin- oerely, D. S. UXothees Rand wiil Lead me ail the . Way». The band tbat rocks the cradle rules the world. A Mother's love je boundiess as the ses. Love is born at birtb, so in trouble and in mirth Mother's hand was ever near to me. Through childhood's days lier guiding land WVas with me nigbt and day, 1 bad no cause to fear, Mother's hand wae ever near, Mother's hand will lead me ail thei way.1 hanhorchdeme ing. 1 think her cheerfuinesa and sing- It was Mother'sbadt iem, ing, together with the beautiful hymns It was Mother's hand to guide me, she sang, helped us more in that time of It is Mother's hand that cannot led trouble than any thing could have done. twa-victtree m, e have often looked back and won~. Motber's hand je ever near me, eight weeks, as we seemed to exist froma It is Mother'a band that leada me al~ day to day, had barely enough money the way. and yet with mothe.'s careful manage. mnent the invalida were 'welI looked after, As Iin earsgre oldrnot too mucli food but neyer short. And As I in year grew bolder, at the end we were not a cent in debt A Mother's place was still to watch to any one. Sincerely, and pray. One of your girls. Wben by every friend deserted, Poor Mother broken hearted, Would keep ber closest vigild day. Wben the Angelsecafled ber Heavd Sbe, with Ioving eyes looked dov Reproving, loving, guiding day I know tbat se e j pleadingr, I know ber hand je leading, Motber's hand will lead me Way. e e * Mrs. Hamilton-The most beautiful day by mlernory of my mother je the clinging to me tbrough the bard times 1 have seen. The clothing and feeding of me when Chorus she would be skimping berseif and the education she bas given me. enward, Yours truly, vnward, M. N. bv day. ail the Chorus Dear Mrs. Hamilton-One of the most beautiful memories of mny mother je a few years ago when we bad deep trouble (sickuess\u003e in our borne. Father was away at the tirne so mother had to bear ail. No money except my very emal wage was to be depended on. But Mother kept cheerful tbrough it ail. When niy eldeet sister was conval- escent and able to once more play ber violin, mother would sit for hours in the eveninge, singing favorite hymne. How welI I remember coming home from work one nigbt and heard her inging as I got near the Louse; and wss just about to enter as one of our nei\"bbore came to ask me which of the girls wae sing- Dear Mrs. Hamilton-It ie bard for me to say which je the most beautiful memory of iny mother for to me every day je a beautiful mem vry. I reinember wben I have been very sick on one or two occasions she bas seemed the best of ail and the very be- of mothers. Yours sincerely, A. A. Dear Mre. Hamilton-The most beau- tiful memory I bave of my mother je bow she loved to study and read the Bible ai.d tried to bring ber cbjîdren up in the rigbt way, and now tbat I arn older I bave tîtat to -- thankful fo-. On Smndaye she would not let us do anything that she thougbt was wrong. MWe a\u0026l ad to geý our ittie Bibles and stiudy a chapter or psalrn tilI we memn- orized it and then repeA. it to ber. In the evenings whien we would all h. gatbered round the table mother would ho reading ber Bible and espocially on Sundays ehe studicd it nearly ahl day. 1 bave other beautiful memnories, one was giving to the. poor. She neyer seemed to tbink of bersef-juet giving and trying to mnake the poor happy. But I tbink the inost beautiful waa i. b 5mpression ehe nmade on ber childreà by studying God's word, for a Christian life is beautiful. Yours, One of the girls. Dear 3!%rs. HaRm1ton - My mother, thougli alixays ini ilI bealth, bas lived and worked liard for ber family. Her good thoughts have saved me f rom many a temptation. She bas given up al pleasures to work'to keep us together and train us to kecp our characters clean, and it niakes us to know the, value of a good miother and a good home. Another thouglit has cone to me, she lias always beciî willing to do good and although she lias lîad to wiork through -nianv difrceulties, she bas helped those poorer tlîan herself. Lovingly, A clase girl. Dear Mrs. Hlamilton-In reply to your rc'quest for the nmost beautiful memory of ny nother-as I thiiik of ber nOW the niost beautifuilnemory je lier un- selflshncss and self sacrifice for the wel- fare of lier clidren. I arn, Very sincerely, P. K. T)ear Mrs. Tarilton-Possibby tbe niest recollections 1 had of Mother ivas t the tine niien aiiv' of us were sick t homne. 1 was one of a fainily of eight, . z.td mother had to be stern, but wiiien we were sick-how different! How she wklstudy somne dainty bite to tenipt the appetite of the itnvalid, and the gen- leness and the tenderness with which she %vould vatelî over us, always leaves a ficiiory wIieh takes aNvay the stingc of a suddcn and ra'1bcr tragic end, ivhich camne to lier at a toue iviien we least expcctcd it. M. B. Dear M.Nrs. Ilainilton-Just a meinory ni% riother v oit would likenie to iicli. The vcry word \"~olc~ * a îail that is iiînstlflsh, sacriiciiig- 1 trie. f renienibrance is of a very Ivra n t, liseflil anîd uioîliîigW n1 iii spite of iunîerous trials and sor- *% S, 1. tlïinîk one of lier p)rinipilal lia ravteristieis was a sense of huîîor- Ni vs beiiîîg able to see the funny side ini ie. This iuay flot be considered a rel wl b",
         "The western Home Mon thly gret virtue but in the upsansd downs af nie, te b. able to bo optimistie aud te bave a. sense of humor makes the suishine !nsids of us, aud this trait of ebaracter is one of mother's strong- ut A woman with the spiritual aide ,trngly developed and a. great believer in justice in every sense of the word, mother seemed se true. How often we do nBot understand a mother's love and beY \u0026 good.mother is a girl's or boy's surongest friendý A true mther drawa one nearer te God. Therefore a mother ]mas an educator, uuceusciously she is \u0026 ebaracter builder. My memory isaa bappy helpful and laeting one te think Of. Hopmng this smail tribute will interest 70%, 1 azn, i.r t3lnvereAz, Ei. T. Doit 1Mr.. Hamiltn-In writing of the gweet.ut memory of my mother, I look Upon it as my duty te, do so, and made \"~ my mind 1 wolld not fail te comply witb your requees, especially as I amn nov two years away f rom ber, she re- si. ii the OId Country. 1 might say thave many aweet memeries of ber. My mother is oue of the fluest Chris, tua womenI v il ever know. She vas \u0026 very dear mother te me, and the longer I am' avay from ber, the more I realie the faci. Since I vas a very littie girl 1 eau remember of the good used te think it was because she was a mother and every oi.e got patient when they were a mother. I have siuce found eut the secret of her patience. It is the Christ life she lives. Very 'truly, One of the girls. Dear Mrs. Hamilton-I amn te-day in receipt of -your: request for 'the most beautiful thought of my mether. I arn very sorry, Mrs. Hamilton, te have to tell you that ail my memeries of my mother are beautiful. 1 canuot pick out oue from them ail because I think every- thing she has doue for me or auyone is just right. I have tried te separate oe memnry from them ail, but it seems I canuet, se I arn sorry 1 canuot comply with youil request, ai you must know I would love to please you. Yours sincerely, M. D. The above letter impressed me ten- derly as the girl feit she was disappoint- ing me in flot fiudiug it possible te separate her beautiful memories. I arn sure our readers will agree that her tribute is sweetly beautiful. Dear Mrs. Hamilton-The tenderest memory of my mother ia that for over fourteen ycars she bas been both father aud mother te ail of us, sud bas kept our horne a home ln ail circumstances. One of your girls. Canadian Ambulance tops to ask directions of a Belgian Officer in the North of Fryance Amter ambulance, donated by the women of Canada, has stopped here to asic a Belgan Officer for directions in reaching a military hospital. Notice the Belgian sentry at the left with his wooden shoes work, she was continualiy doing for others iu ber own quiet way. My father was quite often away f rom home and on these occasions I have sweet memories of boy 'well mother used te take hs place at Family Worship. She wouid have my sister and I kneel by ber side, teateh us the love of Jesus and how He was sent into this world te save us and then abe wouid offer up to Cod. 1 se. often said to, myself wouid I ever e able to speak te God as beautifully as Mother does. lier prayers have im- pressed me even te this day, now far away from ber reach,. and tbey have Made me realize the great need of offer- ing prayer te Our Heaveniy Father. The memory of my mother wili always be a blessing to me and I now quote a verse she tauglit me: \"'Twill save you from a thousand saures To mmnd religion Young. Grace will preserve your following years And mnake your virtue strong.\"' Yours sincereiy, A. M. M. Dear Mrs. Hamilton-Five years ago, I as coring f rom the OId Country te be 'with nmy mother bere. If 1 could just tell you w-at the first siglit of lier face Was to e 1e should be saying a great deal. Biit there are some things which We cannot put into vo ds. 'Sincerely, A class girl. Dcal' )Mrs. flamilton -Tlue dearest 1 lnîu~ i ave of rny nother is lier cala 1;-latiftil patience. As far back, as 1 catiI riember I cari always see that Calnm. patient look under ail circunv Btani.,- When i vas a youiig girl, 1 Dear Mrs. Hamilton-The most beau- tiful memory wbich I have of xny mother, was when my eldeat brother died. There were ten of a family, eiglit girls and two boys. Mother was very proud of the fact that we were ail alive and ail doing well. Poor mother, she had nursed us ail through various ilînesses, sitting often far into the niglit. Making ber old bat and dress do when she badly ueeded new ones; going without a sum- mer vacation, and doing without the little delicacies that she really needed, and I fear, sometimes, without the nec- essaries of 1f e, that the doctor's bis miglit be paid, and -that we miglit ho -warmly lothed, well fed, and educated. Therefore 1 say niother was prôud of the fact that we were ail alive; and if she was, perbaps, just a littie over proud, vue couldMbine ber? Bob, my eldest brother, was about 14 years old îvhen lie died, tall for his age, fond of outdoor sports, a great football player, and a splendid swimmer. Ile appeared to be'in good bealth; went te work as usual (he was learning to be an uphosterer), and attended night school; lie was also a Sergeant in the Boy's BrigadeIlie was a briglit, clever, indus- trious boy, and inother hoped to give hirn a course ini the Business College whien he finishied nigtt chool. Altliough Bob had ciglit sisters, bec ould cheer- fully put on an apron, and polish the steel on the stove, beat the carpets or go errands for imotiier. But now Bob lay dead in 'bis coffin in the parlor; the blinds were (raivn; tlie ebldren's playing ivas hiushed; father's bead was bowed and bis face grave; and a mother's hopes, and pride, and anibi- ]Lci nertir or m t'iscture. which ilutrateuf Wlow prcd lamgo apadtr machin\u0026es.l.bu la ault m- ,vv. aud embodios ail our latent mmpitOU Oi. Twenly-Yar Gumte o e I Tm - *ar geuo~nuoiwuaitohsbYeu. wiae\u00266omyohlqahgoeaido moDMkpt.uf oSfer. OulbyihuatdC-\"1«-g. snffrewt e c*aiWS n vqin tImmt s Md N. edebmk o m Somti» m =»y l -d0Teo\" 'Wrte \"odY for Our catiog a\" j« fer ourser wbga M na i e w v u umke you. Addfeu. AMERICAN SEPÂATOR CO., Bong 1196 DsImbdedg., N. Y. em dockr. bst 1 18 tye; a chome md e thumb addralud heel oUd lmathbr *edon» gIOve; a Jlmdmndyflat bsmam Iiml.md.uev.tJeIhomt9 docker. both thome mite bing momS \u0026Uavoudjum= eo m he ib g longue play\"r. mlng. 1bmyre Meautio. ehn 1ou gel anow 19186mmai caschers, mlac, amr bown f oUmied bomebait.sud tbre a dandy pi flmm bail ahoas for every boy vho ean mn ont . et\" putit, boysanmd yau iUbe the pride of the temm. Justvwrlteto-day for 32 of our magnl1 Reui BenuyPin1 TME REGAL MANUFAGTURING CO. o Dept. B il OOO Ask youri Monthly. neighbor to take The Western Home It pleases every' one-it will delight him or ,her also. MUMM-umqui mmumffl",
         "The western Homne Monthly \"\"TEN GOODRESN I or taking Life InuraS nc i the Great-West LAf99 A pamphlet of condensed inomaton. Sendfor it. ne id mef nof aliis dutThe Great-West Plan COST LEAST and mmm HIGI-EST PROFITS. Reasa Enough for Most Men. The Great-West Life Assurance Co. Head Office Aok for a Creat-.Wut Memo Book. tou, andi love, lay burled la the cofi wlrth ber Onrt-boru mou. My brother took fil ene day andi dieti the next; strieken dovu suddenly and with littie warning. He was a groat favorite wlth bis com- panions, they called him the Christian. They troopeti into the parler one by one silently andi with bowed heade. There vere tears in the eyès of Borne; the\u003e' laid their tribute of flowers on the coffin; looked on the stili, calm, wbite face of the!r playmate, who vould nover again join with thom in thoîr garnes, and boyish sports. \"Rie vas a Chris- tian, \" they murrnured with ehoked Volces. Wrhat a splendid tribute te the dead: «he was a Christian,\" ho was ready te die. SThey carried'him away when' the show vas on the ground and buried bim. 1 den't think mother quite realized that lie was dead until they teok hirn away, an\u0026i she knew ahc would nover sec him in this life again. \"Ho viii be se cold\" she said te me, just as though he vere alive and could feel, \"'it will be se cold below the ground.\" Mother seerned just te double in two, anti te grow very very eld after they toek my brother away and laid hlm in his last'reeting place. Providence bad Winmpeg Free on Request 1111111 iii- A fine type of the good old-faahioned Canadian Mother. A character builder-a mother of men. dealt ber a crushing blow in talÊing away se suddenly her first bora son; and she wondered why (4od had seen fit te take him away. Had she been too proud of the fact that al her family were alive; and bad God intended te make ber more humble. This thought was uppermeet in mether's mind: what lessen did God intend te teach bier? That le the most beautiful memer\u003e' I have of my mother, \"What lesson did Ged in- tend te teachi?\" Whatever it -%vas mother was eager and willing te learn. The day ho died the children had sung, nearly ail day, -the chorus of that beau- tiful hyrnn, \"Yield net te Temptation.\" It is a favorite hymn of xnother's and she says it cornferted and soothed lier that day, as ail unconscioue that the Angel of Death hovered near, the sweet child- ish voices sung, \"Ask the Saviour te hieip you, conîfort, strengthen and keep yen; ho is willing te aid you, ho vil1, carry yeu through.\" 'Yours sincerely, * * * With depp anîd fervent love we coe Dear Mrs. flanilitoii - ears have As tribute offer grateful praise passed silice I last saw niy dear mlother, To Hum who lias eiir inotlier spared and I recaîl se miaiiy nieinories ef ber The burden of the ividew shared that it is difficuit to say w~hich is the Mlhen cloude of darkness dimmed lier hnest beautiful. I like best ef ail, in ways. reeaihing old scenies, Io tiiink of ber last farewell te nie, on nîy leaving the old And well nia\u003e' we lier cliildren riso bomne te corne te far away Canada. It To elieer bier lieart and bright bier daY wvas a glerieus day in the nieiith of Anid Nish lier man\u003e' added years Julie. Mother camie te the garden gate Enriehied with joyq and free from fears te see nW start. And with united veices say: As she wishied nie gond-bye. and gav-e ine lier biessing, staiiditîg tiiere ailloli- \"Our greetings te von Ynother, dear. the flowers (the frulitS of hel, Own lov'ing \\Ve lail tlîee, thiree score years 'aild labor). lier silverv îw'ite hlir 'slUiiiihi ten. thic iîorniiig sunili(ght, suiii aie a pi(.- oullîeal-tiest sleretlo, tore t1lat seems to rernain îtlj 111e Ollrir- es for hiessings from above t1rouý'h ail the years. Beyond îvhat we cati ever pen.\" Whou 1 amrn any trouble or fiult I say to myseif, '\u003cMoti r l apraYingfor me, nov and always.\" when 1 am tempteti to do wrong that thought in the first one that cornes to Me, aud it xnakes me feel strenger te iresist the temptation. Oh! if every girl in this city had the mernory of such a mother. Sincerely, An Old Country girl. To mother Tho following verses, b\u003e' the Rev. D. S. Hamilton, B.A., a frequent and pepu. lar contributor te this magazine, accom- panied a copy of the Life ef Queen Vie. toria sent by hirn te ha mother soe years ago. As token of unswerving love, Accept the volume which 1 Bond; It tells of our beloved Queen, And of a reiga as nover seen Which ail tee soon, alast may end. But thougli ber reign se long and good Shoulti cease and she bo laid te rest, Yet shah shec speak in accents clear, Yet shall ve al l er naine revere And of ail honora this je best, Te live i hearts sincere and true And sway through timo the grateful threng, Though dead yet speaking, on and on Wben generations shall have gene; .'Tis thie true honor doth prolong. The honore which adorn ber life .Are net of transient fleeting breath, ]But rather of immort-l meulti More precieus than the finest gold Untainted by the mista ef death. The glories ef ber reiga shall last fier Empire stand threugh time secure, But brighiter than the brightest ray And stable threugh eternal day Her severeign seul shail still endure. That seul that dignilled ber lif. As mother, wife, and far farnet queen The seul which gave lier word a rnight And pronipted actions wise and riglit Which ail the world bas clearly seen. Wohl ma\u003e' a grateful nation riso T0 crown their matchless Queen agree, Extel her virtues, sing lier praiso, A monument of love upraise, fly brilliant Diarnonti Jubilee. Another queeu te me is dear Unknown te fame yvet true of worth, M'ho gave me Ieve's fidelit\u003e' And nurtured and protected me T0 years ef etrength from early birth. 'Tis net tene mucli te say a queen For qileen is onîe who ries and sways Net always by the rod of state Surrounded by the lerdlings great But uft in gentler, kindlier ways. And the home queen whose praise 1 fIas moved nrue with a tender wand, In disobedience patient stil Loiîg-suffering -%ith my restless will And in ni\u003e' weakness held ni\u003e hand. Alas, that thoughtiess youth -aheuld- wound Or grieve a Tfother's leving hiart, 'Net yet tee late to make amend To say forgive -whlat did offenti And bid al saddening thought depart. - 7» - A - I I I I i 1~ $s$$s$ffeOs$s$$s The Value Sg in Fencing Write for Catalogue and Prices ta The Ideal F'enceCo.Ltd.,Winnipeg Quality Fonce 18c a Rod and up, .pyt.fegt We pay the freighte",
         "The western, Home Mon thly u]ty. Sfor amn it in id it the this ther. face rode forward f romn the group, and approaciied lier wth an iraperious gesture 0f command. \"Open! Open!\" he exclaimed, roughly, and defiantly pomnting te the gate. \"Four bits, p1as\" Tracy replied, ailfing pleantly. ýhi-was but eue- third the regular price, for six homsemen. Her pleasant demaud iiowever, was met with accrn. \"Open! Ôpenl\" he about- ed, angrily this tira.. But fer tuis demen- stration Tracy would wiUlingly eneugii have opened the. gete. As it waa, ah. feit indignant at the, Baunock'a fimperious manner, anddaiiook her iiead decisively. With a fierce F~uut and a geture of digguat, the. Indian turned bis pony's heed acrosa the bridge, sd wti uirt, aud spur, foroed the auortig animal te the very edge. Tii. pony settled te ite haunchea, looking down fearfuily, while the. sevage remoraelessly Iaaiied its flank . \"Stop that, you cruel tbing \" shouted Tracy. \"Here! Here! l'Il let you threugi! 8h. moved te turu the lock, but t4oc liýt Tiie tertured pony, having apperently1 meaaured the, distance thUicl.ap cf twenty feet, and the. Jeep ocurreut cloaed over homse sud rider.1 Tracy apraug te tthe end cf the. teil-gate1 and peered down, te se. botii Indian sud1 rny corne te the srace none the worse1 otheir plung e. heard the other1 Indiuslagi 1peeatly as the man cl«in mo is sadle sud bis pcny saem0 easily eway t e opposite shore, wb.re a gravel barsu a low bank awaited ite Isuding. The. girl waa gled cf the ledge bank on1 ber ide, a bank whicii bad mede thre teil-9 bodge a possible source cf profit. In-1 dignant et the Banuock's bebavior, she1 turn.d away sud teck a pth tte c houae.. As ah. raountedUiche gier ground te the. door ard ah. feltIl only, sud wlshed iieartily t et ah. could bave gene wli hert father sud mother te Bey Hurse, whitii.rt Younig People they lied driven, some miles away, to do neoewary trading. Her riding Ponys la Salle, vas picketed some rodsin the rear cf the houae. She went out to hlm and put her arras round bis neck, talking to him iunlier etlectionate way-e way wbich he aeemed i a measure to under-' stand. 8h, turned lier eyes to the. other side of the river presently, and saw the group of Bannooki halted and engaged in an amimated and, judging f rom their geatures, indignamntcunil. gate at once and let tiier pasa toil-fre.. After ail, ah. reflected, indiana abould have a right to tii. public highways, after baviug given up se mucii te the white people. 8h. waa minded to go down, open the gat. and bail thera, when ah. saw two cf the. men ride alongside, one on eaeh band cf the man who had jumped bis hors. off the. bridge; saw one of thm take a gun frein bis saddle f aatenings, evidently un-. der protest. And then the. two, with their wcraen, rode eway taking a trail dowu the1 river which woufd give thein crosang some way beIcw. The. man they had.deprived of a pin sat leoking after thera m silence for two or tiiree minutuLes.Tacyuea tw ah.ený bdse 1e, eied iia teadily, until1 suddnly . w .d, juraped bis ponyf ecross t he irrigation ditch, rode down into( Bay Hors. Creek, and plunged tbrough. c Wen bis pony lied labored up thie rath- er difficuit bank, the. Bannock rode atraiglit across a saçe-buah flat, toward a bunch of1 horses feedmng near an opposite foot-hilE. Tiiose horses, nine cthem, ere aa band of balf4-red or \"neia oe, as they are called in that country, b.- Ionging te her father. She divined instant-. ly that the. Indian itended running offb one or more of them in a spirit of revenge, i and that bis corapaniona had tried to dissuade him frein doing se. They had taken away is gun, that was one goied thing, =u Tracy's courage, -when ashe v iudny oterilt akn ra[om This Magifcent Combination DINNER and TEA SET FREE to. Our Subscribers The above ilusration amy began toa no justice ta this nandsome combinati6vi Dinnerand Te Set, bich w. have decided ta give away F e D* A ea S tt t ourreaders. The Combination Dinner and Tea Set conaiste of 47 pieces and is made of the best Englis Semi-Porcelain. The design is one of the rnost popular patterna we have ever meen. The floral decoration fa printed under the glaze in a rich flow color, sof t su vlvtym an.A at ebosued design toilowi he.p vu, iss AU haniessudedgs re tracerwih gold., Each net la .medbThWu, HomeMonhlyandby Mear Robinson \u0026 Ca., the weli-knowa PlOMuW iuunlP. m=erha ts. -tdty uhave ta do in arder ta get thia et la t e .sd us mv. eM subucriptions ta The Western Home Masthly et one dollar apises. -Bu*l~ a Magal- ficent reward for such a littie labor. The Western Home Monthly, Winnlpe«, Canetdl 4\u003c saw thé Bannock realiy rid-Ing to stlier the scattered herd, mounted to meet the emergency Seruahed ito the lie, cbangedhber sirt for a diyided orne, slipped a shari- barld\"44,\" whÎoh lier fatiier lied taught her touseinto a pckett got eut lier addl and bridie, and ran for her poy. Bthe tinia ahad mounted La \u0026%tel nock ws pusbing the. whole Gor~don ramgs berd at agalop up toward the. Bay Heim ford. Tracy oashed down to the. bridge, un- locked the toli-gt. without diemountwg, b\" inhler pony away to swing itepn thenclatter.d acra othe, bridge sud Up the road along the. Dura. and irnigatr ditch. As ah. pamd. the.spot wher. ah. hod mem the Indian bunchedý she amez whisky bottie vid.ntly put .mtfd ým*the middle c\u003c tii. road. ShW have takonwmme tibut sure that the Bu no flrSeiM4, excited snd detSerxi.ah. dasiid a. head. Tii. Indian sa'm her and rtmu he ihled into a tampeding rua. H. followed uponther hel%-yelinç fi. cely,, a-\u0026 BwÙmgng bis picket rap. rm wrle àlqs Tracy saw bis inteut wus to rm\u0026 141 fiaet mountain hlopej actas. the. BA7 in advance of puréuit. ThonIl b. between her sud the. lid, frighten or chas. thé wWiie MuW'd Once wellinhto the. mounýtain i outrun tini dark l uisait that p ut Upon bis =udwhinegt lie would oaesr f getting away vii bis booty. Tii. girlset lier toethtpray.U should se hiow ssiy ah v . figteru She saw that h.wuadr th o. a wbfrlwind gut aud whes splashed acroaIL .ford, that best her to theslope ai the hilE and ovg, ite ruse. 8h. lied rescli.d tii. point a .êhg etf the edgecifthe ryWSU- m el \u0026.idouble atrategyin uxt8d, ii u à ToiI-Brldge Incident By Franklin Welles Ceikins Th.y cme periodically eut cf the ini- qefinite mountaina in central Idaho traded a few Akine and Indian wares, auJ fiuedand lofedfor afew dae inthe vic ity c Bay Homee and \u0026ltcn- y liu, ourfeced Bannoeks, inc.r*igibly setant ail the uflssof civiliation. Sinoe the, Indien war whîiih had finaily uubdued thein, tiiey had seldera cemmitted overt acte cf hostility. Nor were tiiey much feared b y even the timid in the mréysettled valleys cf the Snake Bo wh.n tbreeof the wild fellows, wlth their women, came riding eut on the Gardons' tel-bridge, Tracy Gordon, who vas sioe thet forenoon, went indiffer- Stly dowu to mce if ah. might colleet mone bits cf silver; if net, to do as her fatiier lied often do'n., open the. gate and let the. vagabonds go free.. GJordon lied failed te, make a comera\u003e tance et miniug, which wua the chief in- dusty cf the regien; s. hie hed taken up ameranch and had built bis tell-bridge actoa sthe, Snake, et a point which con- siderably siiortened the. freight and stage roads between aeveril m@ning bamiete and the distant railway. Tii. bridge was a center-pier structure, wth atone ebutinente and with top bents bncig ite two spens. Ite upper aide vas r dby a flume, whicii carried water from Bay Herse Creek eut on Gorden's irtigated fields. On the. otiier aide tiiere vws ne railing, except at the top bracinga. Ile toli1ate was framed cf steel .roda, swung on ita iges, and shut with a urng lock. AýTayfaced expectautly its center oping, '\"collection window\". net ..-- ued-an Indien With a flushed good rest, r,",
         "80 - Tho ~rbewesterfln I otll m h. river. lhe Bannock would tima b. Wed 1 beieve tliat ah. wau afraid 10 in- tuere wit hmbischasa, and had ridden away j for help. But ah. lmew an old trail ahead, which led hi aboe theriver and ou pon a to get through the only passable gap on ma\" n l ém mathat' aide of Ba Hors Creek. For a Yt-Tracy, leaning forward, wtha atout quirt handie held before her facee 10 ward off twis of the chaparral, took it fearlesly. She would, umder other cui- Curnstanoes, have enjoyed 1he exciting and perilous ride. 8h. came 10 1h. ridge afely, and ruslied her pony for two hun- dred yards along ils fiât back to an old crossing just as th. Bannock whirled bis stamp.dd herd up on the lope below. With not an ingtant's hesilation, Tracy urged her pony, ini stifflegged lunes down upon the front of the climbingbunch. Whooping sbrifly and whirling lier rope- end as the Indian bad done, ah. aplit the herd f airly as was inevilable, a part * gallping away at angles on each aide of 4~' \u003e~BonLa Salle came t0 a éharpbhalt, m one U.UA~8@ £1I atif-legged jump, as th. lindian's hors. Whetif M ùn MgBS M ge yo upwas thrown squarely i front of him. For Whmtif orn arn Ba Bo wil ge yo \"Pa second 1h. girl confronted 1h. Bannoçk's poilant job OBuS for a mnd out either way you evil face ai five yards. On. hand heId tell him-with aB miaht the coil of hmbiscket-rop e hothera wrench ébs uevered that. WIth a cry ot roy ah. whirled her pony about and fled Swift as a bird, La Salle %ped down th. steepsloïÈ and akirmed acroe.th.einter- venmglittlevale.Yet ah hugieb %peed was god1hta nnoc he1h swifter horse.. [e gained slowly but steadily i a hal-mile-run., On asiope, near th. top of the liii wbich would brn irwli iJtOf home1 raysa t. a. ut ganuse ierpstol; tt brpser waa inle.db- y=n tht reacli of fea or rao in hie drunken rage. H. wus prepering 10 flingbls rop eta lier-clos. upon La ale's heela-wlie ah. turned and lèveled lierpWdstolaIhlm. He lbrew bimself fiat upon bis ponyu neck and came on, eW'igmg bis nooSe. Tracy flred Ibree shots i i e- cession; her hors., toilinguphlae lier soin. steadîneas of alin. At tb he r shot the Bannock's hors. dropped iils tracha; ils rider sprawled upon the edope rolled twice over, and lay face down, with armes outstrelched. With a white facefightened more at whal, ah. bad don.cdanat what ah. had suffered, Tracy fied for home, flot agpin castig a glane. bebind lier. And there, i lier own room, lying upon lier face, lier mother found lier two hours later. it took both lier parents 10 get from hler a disjoied story of wbat lied bappened. Theu the mother gath.redlier hinlier arma, AuutrhianTrooxx. training in Egypt runing noom. With a fierce yell 10 con- fueler and a dexterous whirl of his lariat, lie fung the noose. Trac threw a liand above lier head to fend 0E 1h. rope; but a wide noose, well :flung is a treaclierous weapon. It struck lier lairly on the f orearm, and a loop whipped over lier liand and f .11 about lier waist Savagely the Indian jerked his rope taut, calching lier securely about 1h. miiddle and pinioning one arm, and with another wild y.11 h e put spurs 10 bis hors.. Had lier wit not then ben nimble, Tracy mnust have been hurled out of her saddle. With a sudden sway of lier body to the left, ah. shouted at La Salle 10 go. h.ony seemed to understand bis mistresas need, and sprang instantly afler tle Bannock's hors.. Before that animal could get the lengtli of his picket-rope, La Salle was upon lis heels. Looking back, tle Bamnock souglit by vigorous yanks 10 throw tle girl out of lier seat. Finding that flot feasible, lie turned about, and holding liard upon the rope, to prevent lier from slipping thie noose, lie drove lis horse along'the dsope, spurring and yelling to increase ils speed. Tracy's peril was frightful. One stum- bic from La Salle, and she would b\" dragged to death at the heels of that crazy creature's animal. She realizes now that the Bannock was riotously drunk; that lier only hope lay in the weapon inlier pocket. She drew the 1istol, but hesitated to fire. Then, with sudden inspiration, she made several ' uick efforts, caught its miizzle against te tant rope-and piilled its trigger. The rope parted ail biut a broken strand, and flinging hersedf backward with a and Gordon rode awif tly away 101th. spot where ah. had left th. fallen Bannock. H. was gone but a li111. lime. \"Cheer up, my brave littl, girl,\"lie shout.d, as lie came into l. bouse. \"That rascally Indian, worse luck, wasn't scratclied. He was only possumxing. He's gone, saddle and bridie, and wilh rmy roan geldmg-the only one of thie herd lie could catch, I reckon. Bis tumble no doubt sobered lim a li11e; put a grain of sens. into lis addled pale. You bit bie horse squarely.\" \"Oh, the poor lhing,\" cried Tracy, who loved any horse, and ah. sobbed afreaLi, sbaken bo1h by sorrow and relief. Il was cio sing-lime at lb. town llb- rary. Old Mr. Duke, who had filled 1h. post of librarian for years, took dowfl his coat and hat, and with th. assistance cf his litIle Ilaughter, gaI thera safeiy on* Togethier thiey started for the door. It was raining liard. \"WVait a mioment, chilId,\" said lier father, and went back imb the building. t'he girl remaixîed, obedientiy. Five minutes passed. Then ten. Sh. pushed open lte door and waiked in. Her fathier was bexît over one of 1h. card catalogues. \"Whiat are vou iooking, for, father ?\" ,lie inquired. Ife put the drawer back, suddenly abashed. 'xn get ting oid, MNargaret,\" lie said. \"I coldit fixid 111\\.uubrelia, and I was searchiug for it unider U5 in th. lista.\" Onlv the uninformed endure the agony 01 corri. The lknowing ones apply Holloway's Corn Cure and get relief. alI tif lie us 2ii ln foi te\u0026 l( ta] ai lie] in tel lt ýifi chi Illa fax kir by chi f ro in eti Ulr( enfi in did jus .4..-;",
         "The Western H.ome--Mont hly The Groater Gift 1 wis'h ne wealth or proud estate- No world.acclaimed prize; For simple love bath made me great in a dear woman's eyes. There are no werldly gif ta above T~he beauty of a woman's love. For Fame the glory and the gleam- Friends, and the scorn of foes. Dearer te me the humble dream, Adfrom Love\u0026s hand one rose! -And where my lowlier lot shal libe, Only Love's arma to neekilace me For Love bis 0w» rewarder la, The flowery world along. For Love the thoru is sweet to kias, AMd toil is but a song. Wberefore I seek no proud estate, For simple love bath made me great --Frank L. Stantou. The III-Matched Some time ago I noticed in one of my home papers a pathetie appeal f rom a aister whose husband mentaily her in- ferior, was uncongenial and unsympa.. thetie. She was bound to life upon a farm, instead of town life, which she preferred. The care of several little ones excluded ail social pleasures, and she found herseif very uuhappy, longing for the liberty and privilegea she, as a teacher, enjoyed before her marriage. It was with the deepest intereat I read the several replies which appeared in a later issue, every oeeof which con- tamned -ensure and blame without stint, but hardly a word of that sisterly com- fort and advice for which she asked. 8h. asked for bread and received a atone. Fooliah, indeed, sitelied been to form an alliance witli one whomn she muet have knowÉ to be her inferior; wicked, per. bape, lu ber rebellion at the results of .such an iil-advised step nevértheless, a sister in dire distreas, and as such en- titled to, the bort that could be offered bier. Lnfortunately her case is net an unusual one. Ail over theibaud exist indifferent 'husbands, discontented wives, unwelcome little oses, irksome home duties. Their name, alas, is leglon! In this particular case -the wif e com- plained that ber husband cared nothing for reading, wbile she possessed a de- tided literary taste. Having been a teaeher, she can, no doubt read well aloud, and thie shoixid prove an impor- tant factor in creat.ing a btter literary atmosphere ini the home. Very likely her -husband, ini common with ail men, has a hobby, and I wouid suggest that ini booking over their home papers, she mark such articles as miglit be of in- 'erest to hlm, and draw hie attention to lhem, or read them -te hlm, particularly if they çincide with the opinions lie may chance to hold upon the subject 1 do L.ot conider it a sin for any wo- mnas, especially one isolated upon a bill fer]], to long for the seciety cf ber kind, or te crave the pleasures, of an occasional concert or lecture; and I know by experience whlat it Js to miss the church and social privileges te which, fromI childbood, I had been accustomed iu town. Net ahl women are so con- stituted that tliey find the bighest pleas- ures and ideals in lîfe in flocks of chick- ens and turkeys as one sister suggested fin cennection with this case. I neyer did, and 1 have loeoked upon many a $0eod1y flock of my owvn raising, witli Justifiable pride. The Blessed Little Oses But when t cemes to the little cnes then and there must ail rebellion and dis- cntenttbl crushed eut of our lives for their dear sake. Ail that is sweetest and best in. a met.her's life is their lawful heritage and nething short cf that can aatisf their just dlaim. So 0 et me suggest tu this dear sister (and others, similarly situated) that in eetting about to better lier domestie con- ditions ehe begin firat withi her owfl heart. Look upward with an abiding fs.jth andi trust in God's everruling power andi w sdOlu and sec if you cannot discern in these trials a corrective influence for many a fault in your own eharacter. Open your beart and let ln the sunlight cf Ood's wondrous love, and see how quickly it disperses tlie gloom cf reel- lien and discontent. Then will you look upon your life with a quickened vision, andi cld things will become new. The fact that he is the father of your ebiîdren will clothe that uncouth hus- band with at least respect in your cye, and sec if lie dees net respond te the sweet, wemanly, hebpfulness yeu extcnd te him by an effort to better measure up tc your ideals and standards. No man evcr yet failed te lie preud of bis wife's superiority, sccretly perhaps, but thait chord existe in cvery man's heart and will vibrate if teucbed by the finger of wifely love and sympatliy. Thon, t.-. too, will the* care of the littie ones ho no longer a burdenaome task, but a sacred trust, and ail these other outaide things, good and proper in themselves, will b. no longer essential to your hap. piness. Perhaps, the future years xnay hold in their grasp some of the privileges -you crave. Thçn accept them as God's good gifts, flot as your rightful due. This is no theory I arn advancing, but a know- ledge boni of personal experience. Be- lieve nie, 'tis the only way._ Ti y it and be coiivinced.-Hlelper, New York. Like a Grp at the Throat. For a disease that is flot classed as fatal there is probably none which causes more, terrible muffering than astbma. Sleep is impossible, the sufeérer becomes exhausted and finally,. though the attack passes, is left in unceasing dread of its return. Dr. J. D). Kellogga Asthma Remedy is a wonderful curative agent. It immediately relieves the restrictéd air passages as thousands can testify. hits sold by dealers evMrwhere.1 Where 1 Beiong By dAck Melville Shaw. Maria waa old, and Maria was pooè, aid Maria was a wido.w. Could it have been worse? , Yea, verily, for God waa stillin Ri is heaven, and alought to ha'sj been right with MarWas world, foi, It la God's world, too. When Maria becan*ë se enfeebled by iliness and age tha.t, it was no, longer safe for ber to liveaus a home was opened to ber with a sist and brother-in-law. They were kihdl.I generous people, and their siater ougà,,. to have been happy. But she grew more, wretched everyay, a\"d ber gloomy fa*6 made other members of the- houaeholt. unnappy. Oue dey there e\u0026me etili another -ù aider,\" as -Maria.. called it, to live u tse sunny, eomfortable hénie. She ;was hardly a relation, belng a cousin of Maria's brother-in-law's sister-ln-law.» Her name waa Letitia. - She waa 111cm DUASTER8 TtIAlT TkeBUSfERlBPOWNSTOCKING\u0026 IS A 100N ro I'OTHERSAN@A*.ANAP F~OR SANTA CDLAUS j U~US ~ For Hard Wear Buster Brown Stockings .are made to stand the test of rough and tumble play in which every healthy boy-your boy- spends haif his time. Buster Brown stock- ingu are-- the greatest wear resisters ever made-the atrongest, long fibre cotton, specially twisted and tested for durability, with three-ply heel and toe,.well lcnitted, well finished and fast dyed in Black. and- Leather Shade Tan. No more darning if you buy Buster Brown Stockings. Girl, Toio- Butter Drew.'a Sia~as 8ocMug for thse girls la anaddIol etochier at -a :-wpotlm\", two- -çad Rutiai eh rnad Sâge stocwlg. that la .haped te fita\" weaha \".r watt ade*d. CaOru-D Lac e[ather Shade To.P, %2'; and u. uht. ~tp~ (~U~Îpmuu-?~i Inn ~Kuttttu~ Q.tn., ~tuîÎttk 1~ar~tBt ~iwttq £amfalturtr5 lu Qliwaha lqmmt tonasu MILLS AT HAMILTON AND WELLAND, ONTARIOA Sunday Reading Ma.s makors of thse oIbrat.d ultt. Darling» and \"Uttle D\u00264r\"' Hocdo er foi fuat m CWIâew",
         "The western Home Afonthly l'nteérnational Harvester Ou Ennes--Mogul-Titan 'T'H manwho buys an engine without knowing * 1 niez takes a chance.' A better way would be to take the .I H C oil engine - recognized \"as standard in its construction; study its every feature closely, and use it as a basis of comparison when looking *at other engines. That is the best way to choose the particular engine which will do your work best. 1 H C oil engines-Moul and TItan-are made in ail sizes £rom to 50-hors. rpwer and in every approved style-stationady skidded, portable, tank and hopper-cooled, vertical andhoint. They operate on gasoline, kerosene and even lower grade ails, and on gas or alcohol. Wben you buy an 1 H C engine, the engin. is flot ail you get for yormono y. Our service is worth knowing about. Get aquainted with an I HCenie at the place of business of the nearest agent where they are sold . Ask hm for one of aur interesting catalogues or write ta us for ane. iomol% »ÉS rcom\"\" yof Canada, la Made in Canada SAVE,-T[HE-HORSE \u003cTRADE MARK REGISTERED) Put. Horse to Work, and Cure Him What Other Remedy la There That Will Cure Serious Hip Lameness? Yet Save-The- Hors. la Guaranteed. Robert Wilson, Dundaif, Pa., writes: \"~My lhorse had a lamue hip. Well, he is not lame at aIl now. I used him when needed since 1 started treatment. Previously he was laid up for weeks. I wasted time and moncy using other remedies. You tell thxe truth about your ability to cure horsei.\" Ira J. Ward HoweIl, Mich., writes:, \"I used Save-the-Itorse on a bone-spavirt; had greviously -been doctored for year without enefit. She is workingi hard every day. Many thanks for kind advce and Save-the- Horse remedy.\" J. H. Eldridge, R. 3, Senatobia Miss., writes: \"I purchased a bottle of ýave-the- Hoizse for enlarged tendon and shoe boils, and the results were wonderful.\" Cures Lilce This Always--- Or Money Back. J..McCormack, Souris, P. E. 1., writes: TryCliemical Co., Toronto, Ont.: Enclosed Y\"n un ey order, for which send me without delay one hottle of Save-the-Horse Spaviin Cure (tie best on eartlî). Somne tJtree or four years ago 1 got a hottle tu use on my driving mare fo r hune spavini. It cured hier Coinpletely. Sinice then 1 have recomrnended it to several in this part of the country, and it neyer failed to cure. Chas. S. Van Norman,1 Canadian Standard Copper Co., Hamilton, Ont., writes: \"Troy Chemnical Co., Toronto, Ont.: 1 cured a ring- bone and drove hlim aIl the limie, and lie got better every day.\" C. S. Edwards, Salmon Arni,IR. C. xrites: \"Troy Chiemîcal Co., Toronto, Ont.: 1 have ased your renîedy with success un two oid \u003eone spavinis.\" Every bottle in sold wlth a binding contré.ct ta refund money or cure any case of BONE and BOG SPÂVIN, THOROUGHPIN, RINGEONE (except low) CURL, SPLINT, CAPPED HOCK, WINDPUFF, SHOEBOIL, BROKEN DOWN, INJUBED TENDONS and OTHER LAMENESS. No blistering or loss of hair. Horne worka as usual. Send for our 96-ipage \"Save-the-Horse BOOK.\" Tt explains aIl ahout our system of trcaînieîît-tella exaetly liow bo go about ilt t get the hest resuits it the up-to-date treaiciit of 58 Forma of LAME NESS-Illustrated. But wriite anid w e xvillii nd çour-BOOK-Sample Contract and advice- ALL FREE to Horse Ou ocrs and Managers. AddrouaB: TROY CHEMICAL CO., 148 Van Horne Street, TORONTO, Ont. flruggists everywhere sell Save-The-Horse wth contract, or sont by us Express Prepald Maria in one thfing only, she was POOr. But ber poverty seamed not ta distrees ber st «Il, and site sang eibout the bouse am though sorraw were soinetihing yet imnMown ta the world. Maria used ta -peer over ber glasses at the light-h earted girl, and shake ber head. Ose day, out of the fulness of bier disapprova1, she e'poke: '«I do wonder, Letitia, bow you can go about so unconeerned, and you eating the bread of cbarity.\" Letitia flushed. Then sbe answered quietly: \"Oharity-4btat is love-yes, 1 am eating the bread of love. It is very good bread.\" \"Now, what do yau mean 1\" «Wthat I Bay, ma'em\" \"Well,\" sighed Maria, \"I cannot un- derstand it! I realise that I have no rights in titis house. I don't -belong here, and I hope lh eyer forget it. I do not Freinch Offleer direeting artillery fire by telephone from a tree in the Argonne Forest see wliat 1 bave done titat God should let me endl my days in dependence anid niserv.\" Letitia, was tbouglit.fui. \"I do not pretend ta understamtd God's way -%ith mie,\" slite sai(l at last. \"Dependence mtust 1)0 good for me just now, or Il -%vould itot permit il. A s for 'rnisery,' are youi sut-e ou are not coinmnitting a sin, iaami.\" Letitia was onily twtyî~; Muaria was over seventv; bult thie younger mvoinan stood lier ground. \"W cil, nowv youi've got your sernion lialf preachied, youi'd better go on to 'j'n- al,' hadn't you ?\" \"Yýou are older titan I, but I be1iev e I arn rigltt. 'May 1 tell ),ou hio% I rea- soned it out for urivsef? Maria nodded. Si1e w as hie far gone ini amazernent to spuak. \"lI the firs't plaee, 1 did int ask to be box-n. Cod sent ine into tiewor. and Fin glad 1 helieve t11ipt le u înteîl mie here, and liad IlIs place for iue al litoseni.\" Maria was faix-i.- gaspicit a sucli audacious, far -eaeliinc faithi. \"I ,%-as dependent, accoriîn ttEe0w sof nature, for mary yu.irs. Cod mnuant. that, too. I bad a. right to be, becan te R1e meant it. 1 arn only twenty Yeu îns old, but in that littie time I bave learned ihat Coad loves me and plans for mie; that the plans are (lad-plans, and tt it wo'uld be awtful of me--aw'ful!--to qitarrel with tbem. \"It bringste peace that passeth un- derstanding, malam. Lt surely does! When father died, and then mother, and I had no home, it took a great deal of courage for a while ta trust ]Lm. Then it \u0026Il came over me that Ile knew what He was doing, and it was very littie of my business except ta be happy in it- in wbatever place He put me. Sa when Ile opened your 6ister's and brotâer'a hearts to give me this home, why I came ta it like-likle a queen.ta ber throne! It was my right ta hae here, don't you see? Bécause Coad made it 80. -Ail I have ta do le to be brave and patient, unselfish, cheeriful, and wbether 1 can help Cousin Ella much or little, ta do my beet. It would co'st lier more ta kee'p me if I was sad ahl the tirne, do you not think soi,, \"Well, that is beyond me!\" saiid Marii under lier breath, but after that her smiles were brighter and mare frequent. Manna There is found,,in some portions of thbe peninsula of tSinai, a gum wbieh offers same resembiances ta manna. It is the sweet juice of the tarfa, a species of tamarisk. It exudes fram the trusks and branches in hot weather, and forms small, round, white grains. In cool weather it preserves ils cansistency; in bot weather il melts rapidly. I-t is either ga thered from the twigs of -the tamarisk, or frorn the fallen leaves underneath the tree. The color is a grayish yellow. It -begins ta exude in May, and lasts about six weeks. The Arabs eleanse it from leaves and dirt, bail il down, strain il through coarse stuif, and keep it in leather bags; tbey use it as honey with bread. Its taste is sweet, with a slight aromatic flavor; travellers generally compare it with hboney. The whole quantity now prod'uced in a single year does not exceed six or seven hundred pounds. But the differences are much greater than the resemblance. The natural produot is a drug, ual a food, t is gathered only during some weeks af sunsmer; il is, lisible ta speedy corruption, nor could there be any reason for preserving a specimen of this common product in ithe ark; it could not have sufflced, however, aided by their berds and flocks, ta feed one in a hun- dred of the Hebrew multitudes, aven during the season of its production; nor could il have ceased on the same day when t-bey ate the first ripe corn of Canaan. Professor Macalister, after discussing four kinds of nmodern manna, says, \"None of thiese could be the manna of Exodus, -%ich i vas a miraculous sub- stance.\" And yet Cod alWays, as bere. w'orks Ris miracles along the Unes of nature, regarding nature \"as an elastie band ta streteli, rather than as a chain to break.\" The manna -%vas a type. Paul called it (1 Cor. x. 3) \"spiritual meat,\" and Christ Ilimself (John vi. 32) said, \"It w-as not Moses tal gave you the bread oint of heaven, but my Father giveth you. the true bread ont of heaven.\" Thtis frite bread n'as Christ Himself. Com parnsons A million million mien of greater worth! The universe, the ages! What arn Il Less titan a tiny atotn of the earth; Less titan tho stna.ilest snowflake froin thie sky. To-day; my homte; ainong my blessed fricnds! Wlîat arn I niow- who cal tyseif a man ? Atout tto longer! butt a soul God sends To fui a place none of these millions can. Worins in chiidren work havoc. These peSîs atiack the tender Iiiiing of the intestines and, if left t0 pursîîe their ravages undisturbed, il ultimnately perforate the wall, because these xvorrms are of the hook variety that cling to and feed upon interior surfaces. Milier'S Wormn Powders will flot only exterminate these Nvorma-, of whatever variety, but w111 serve to repair the injury they have donc. * . 4 -",
         "The Western Home Mont hiy How. to Find. Radium S. J. Wigley, Edgerton \u003eecau se leurnetL or Me; d tbat il! -to th un- does! cr, and leal of Then r what ttle of in it- Swhen cothier'a 1 came me! It u secl ave to selfish, Cousin et. It I was k se?\" Marii it her quent. )ns of which 1. It species ltrunks forme rt cool cy; ini either rarisk, ,th the rellow. Slaste me it strain it in F with s3light lemrlly whole e year undred much The food, SoMe dle to be any cf this could y their x hun- ,even n; nor ie day rn of after nanna, manna [s sub- a here. nes of elastie chain called ,and id-It bread giveth This Send' For Free book MU NEAUJC IOOFINC CO., JJaited A I7NotroDamAve.. WHEG JAE-GE FOR COMFORT AND SAFETY Jaeger Undcrwear Is durbe and conifort- i able; it ards reai protection front chili in ail weatbers. '\\ Made front umques- tionab1 pure and undy Jwooi for HealthWs sake. Jaeger Underwear is t he usderwear ai quality at a moderate price. /1A fuUY-iUustratecl cata- logue and Dr.J e ers Health Culture Îlf be sent fiee on appliction to TORON TO MONTRERL WINNIPEG THE LAIBEL ODn your paper will tell when your subscription expires. Sel-d in your renewal NOW Considerable interet was aroused Iast year when substantial rewards were offered for the discovery of radium bear- ing rocks in Canada. Many of the world's greatest and most valuable discoveries have been made by accident and it will be a lucky accident if by chance a radium bearing rock should be found ini Canada. OId methods of pros- etpecting in this case are useless, for radium makes its presence known only in a scientific way and human sesses are un- able to detect its existence. Nineteen yeare ago Professer Rontgen found that certain unseen rays from electricity had an influence on a photo- graphic plate and to-day these X-ray photos are common. This discovery led earnest workers ta experiment with different substances, ta ascertain if any of them would emit radiations of a similar character.. M. Becquerel found that salte of uranium would affect a photo- graphic plate and that these unknown raya couldeven act through aLlier substances. Teating Rocks for Radium Now uranium calta are obtained frem a rock cailed pitch blende, and were used for decorating expensive china and glass. Pitchblende ile obtained in Cornwall parte of Germany and the United âtates. After the uranium was extracted the Tumular Relics of a Prehistorle Mantoba By J. D. A. Evans Prom Great Lakes to Rocky Moun- tains siope, lie of Indian ancestry bas inhabited the plains and forestric areas. Yet in far more remote period than this tenure, a populace armcd with copper implements have dwelt in Manitoba, monumental testimony of %vhom is cvi- denced within certain localities of the Province to-day. To wit, Southern -Manitoba wherein Pembina's lofty ram- parts are located, in one district of which five Lumuli or barrows exist; others may be found in the neighborhood of Sllowflake. Under auspices af the Historical So- ciety of Canada, research bais becs con- ducted by Professor Nicholson of To- ronto. At the apex of Star Mound, a barrow three feet in beigbt, circumfer- eniai measurement of twelve feet, sym- mietrical figure very im.perfect, formcd a iatter of investigation by the eastern archologist. Adjacent ta tIhe surface of tItis tumulus, a skull af Indian maie was exposed; five yards beneath, fiftees skeletons were disinterred, the physia- logical structure of whiehi woîild attrib- utc the remains as aofaLlier than Indian race, rather ta a huinan enancy of fifth century, and possibly anterior ta that date. Anongst the bones lay tools antique in conistruction, from the work- mansliip of wlîicl it can bie assumed wxere utilized in the fasliioning af copper instrumients the mnetal from which these wcre naaîîfactured. The chaîn of bis- tory bas thus becs augmented, the story of a copper mine aboriginal inhabitant is stated te have known as once oper- ated by a people in centuries long, long ago, and supposed ta bave bees located at or in the vieinity of tise Lake of the Woods, is hence given color. Varions tiikets were discovered and strango tlîough it be, a marine shell; its concho- logical formation tending ta the opinion tliat it hiad becs obtained from Pacifie Ocean. Arrowheads of flint, hammers of stone were lkewise fouiîd, andI research is now progressing at other tuniuli in an adjoinin., d\u0026strîct. residue rock was tbrown away. Ose f irm in London had becs selIing its aid p itchblende rock at a dollar a ton for bouse foundations and road ways. Made in England everyI drop, and enjoyed al over the world.j \"ne Quanly ChRé si - A littie glass tube holding 15 graina of Radium would give out light and heat for over a thou- sand years and b. worth U25,000 Then Madam Curie and her huéband feund that thie wasted pitchblende rock contained much more radium than the uranium salts and affected a photographie plate much more strongly. The peculiar properties of radium have been repeatedly published but ta, obtain a very email pinch, worth corne $25,000, many tons of rock are used. Radium la quite the dearest substance knewn ta man and theugh a factory lias becs werklng for corne years in London less than one ounce is the total production. ,Te test rocks for the presence of radium a photographie plate c ould be carefully wrapped ln black paper to exciade ail daylight. The rocks ta be tesed should be placed on the paper and the whole shut up in a box for at leest twenty-four heurs; X-raye act on the plate in a few seconds but radium le mach slewer. If, whcn the plate le developed yeu flnd the1 rock lias made a dark shadow then get busy for fame and fortune await yeu. Grain Growers' Grain Co. Opens Saskatchewan Office Farmers througheut the Canadian West' wlil be interested ta hear that the Grain Grewers' Grain Company of Winnipeg bave epened an office lu Regina, Saakatch- ewan. This marks another step lu ad- vance for this Pioneer farmer'e company. Operations are now carried on with offices in each province from Ontario te the Pacific Coast, with headquarters at Winnipeg, brandi offices at Fort William, Ont.; Regina, Sask.;- and Calgary, Alta ' and an agency at New Westminster, B.d. IL is somewhat remarkable that at imes such as these, when retrenchment is general, this company sheuld find it ab- solutely necessary Le establish new branches in order ta take care of iLs grow- ing business. The main.abject in estab- lishing the Regina branch, is La be able ta give Saskatchewan farmers the best possible service in supplying their needs or in handling their grain. The Regina office and warehouse le la- cated at the corner of Lamne street and llth Avenue, right in the heart of the city, only two blocks west from the Post Office. Ground floor space af 5,000 square feet furnishes ample accommodation for dis- playing a full lise of implements te good advantage. The office is in charge af J. L. Wîlliamson, whe for over six months bias becs connected with the conIpany, looking after their interests in the Regina district. Farmers everywhere and othere who are intcrested in the welfare of the agricultural cla8s throughaut the West, will be given a hearty welcomc at the Grain Cxowers' Grain Company's office in Regina. Implements, engines,' vehice etc., that are kept on display are well worth seeing. The Foe of Indigestion.-Indi gestion is a cornînon ailment and few are fiee fromn it. It is a most distressin;g complaint and often the suffering attending it is înost severe. The very best remedy is Parnielee's Vegetable Pills taken according to directions. They rectify thie irreguîlar action of the stoinach and restore healthy actioin. For many years they have been a stanidard renicdy for dyspepsia and indigestion and are higlily esteemned for their qualities. .c Grocers kt H. P. où t hanidiest aRh Itulaor teep tsefr Reduce Yout Roofing Costs. Protect Your Buildings From Pire, Lightning and Weather You accomnpllsh anl these resuits by usmng aur heavily zinc coated \"Eastlake\" Theygiv logerservice than any other roofing. Cost lese ta lay. Are ruat-proot anid do not require painting. Those laid 28 years ago *are still i gng good service. Send for free book that shows how \"Eastlake\" shingles maire your buildings lightning ire, and weather-proof and why they COSt less per year than any other rooflng. W. Msauatue a*, »Mouls oflaaiShes When writing advertisers please mention The Western Homo Mont#ly. MORE PIANO BARGAINS W. have anme igo eod sal a brglaprices. orar e a iew O.. HEINT1MAN \u0026 CO. P6a» Rqem$»5(0.loS $290 Orne EVANS BROS. P6»a Rea\" $4510, Lor$173 Orne NEWMBE, Ru. Reguias$4Q, he150 One BRYANT of New York P.. Regular$400,ktoi$135 TL.. en a mathoroqhiy oudhahd ai naljgad oêd m . W. ais.hamor»N vy Eue SOosmi haaad Orgas ut seca piss Wri\" e«Lout fl rt\"mat J. J. H. MOLEAN \u0026 CO.9 LTI\u003e. Wnipegs Grotut Musio Houmes The Home of fée Haloizonea \u0026 Co. Plume.'sud là@ Vitho/a DEPT. W., 3» -Portait*Y*v., WINiPEG, CAR. Hè Coind,20 Pundè Sb.'seoa. P.. Ma adM.uig FIUuhM*.r F... Ent Ik InWd FMt Aroai Iosh-maseea stvred. t .lt frb asvomdl. a pad dsco absolu suefor Mas.woumor o~I You eau ovo llt r..Est alt by1out.le ,- cr houldOrs haSad b m torcnrse, ou idwomsla ofai «« ritembow CEg»TONE a muhmsb atrength and boaltb alteroeqlgmifal. 40 help thom. Bore le a 1 ploture of W Ki flr who gained 2 ona throug hCERTONE undl Min .dWynian Who galned 1la The quicireet and bost' way ta sottie ail doubtisla to est CERTONE for a few gaM Bo 1 will send you a en box IJE\u003erou mai, me this Coupon and 10 cents toward our postae eeoea. Or you can buy a Dolar box tbrouh or dr .GeS your R- TOMES once. thon watcbl your mirror. Note yourl' ,daily gain. Foui botter andi look bte.glgo el FRE\" This Coupan witb 10 cents entîties yau ta one W0-Cent box trec of C£11-1 TONE. rovlded you ha\". mot -- aled. p2avd eoru hpower of CErTONE4A.%s7\u003ces. mon t. CIRTWssm. PAN 70 Lombard St.. DeMt.llToronto. . vorth! amn It th; frais )lessed self a sends lions te pesta es and, ed, xvill 2 these Aiing to Miii er's te these erve t'o",
         "Iashions and Patterns MdYnàufimaOdnto lPatera Deatuwu,WutotsmmmSMat*. ,WInnpe 219-41,1V »«uswlth Veut, and wth USUVb tu Bthr of Two Leugt-As but\" UJIoWm wbité batiste, with -em- broierd flouolng süd insertion aLre i.voe c .aned. The style vrould be Pretty fiav1 t iO* dut.4 ehle er a prtty shade t4e %44 » of l\u003ehi.or plak cashmere. It is aise ire a ua\u003cbiI d1O*Or orepe or poplin. iu any of th. in h ,_jjdý »mau new Moort. For every daY or school wr, serge would b. servie- MfN gave- 'able, or if aah fabries ame preferred u~t rmum- tàere ame lovely checked and plaid ging- haméâeatseersuokers and psretty strong ~~Ies Irhe eleeela nico in writ. éIPIIWIIW *êr short length, snd th. vest effet is a ~ ~ p*style feature. The pattern im eut làI~ 4 sinus: 4, 6, 8 and 10 years. Pat- te. 123e-LadiSUi proÀ with Sleeve Pro- tector sd gCap-AS l.ere hown white drill wus usod for this set of ervicoable arots. The modela are smo suitable oCrMZý *nlamambroy, ateon, percale, lawu or eerucicer.- The apron is good on good comfortaâblê linos, and affords ample protection for th. dreum beneath. The aleeve protectors are a popular ac- oeaory,an the cap is good to hold off th. doit; at tho smre time it imparts a. neat trim appearance. The pattern is eut ini 3 ames: amail, medium and large. Pattern 10c. 1016-GSla Droe with-Short or Long Bleeve.-Blue linons with trimming of blue and redi checked gingham in hors. ahown. The model is good for voile, ,uoe .tJie room 1t~ 1,\u003ee fumiture 7dutedand ..Mowm éiaf wtli lt loco SLiquid (Rom in-' \"ted of dry dusting. It keeps.the dust fromi the air, eleanses, pol- §heis, and disinfecta. itimakes old.ifurniture and flôors look' like new, and the whole -bouse mo\u003ere livable. loco Liquid G1oE polieh -any 'high] ished surface. on, your .moto]i 'both *cleans .an stervesthe varn THE IMPER OIL COMPI LimiT1D BRANCHES IN AL ModemW 1244-Over Bglouse Dress for 'Misses 08 wIVM and Smafl Women-For combinations of materials this style is especially desir- [y flfl able. It la lovely for the new Boft cool rry it cotton materials, or for crepe, poplin It challie, cashmere or serge.. As here shown figured crepe in blue and green I. - tones was usedi for the underwaist, with green taffeta for over blouse and skirt. In white ratine, with batiste for the underwaist this style is -very pleasing. kere, The pattern is cut in 4 sizes: 14, 16, 17 and 18 years. The 16-year size will require 3 yards of 27-incli material for the underwaist, and 51/2 yards for the LIAL overdress. Pattern 10,-. 1249-A Simple, Comfortable Dres- NINY As here shown, dotted percale in blue and white, was used with collar, pockets and cufs of blue linene. The waist is made lu blouse style and with coat clos- CITIES ing. The back of the waist is combined -%vwith the sleeve, whbich may be finished in wvrist length with a ban d cuf, or short 'with a neat turn bacl ecuif. Chambrey, ginghiam, ratine, linen or linene, crepe, poplin or cashmere may be used for this style. The pattern la cut ini 6 sizes: 0000- 34, 36, :38, 40, 42, and 44 inches bust Canada measUrc. Pattern 10c. ratine, rice cloth, chambrey, galatea, serge or silk. The closing la ln front. The skirt is a 3-piece model with plaits in front and at the sides. The pattern la cut in 4 sizes: 6, 8, 10 and 12 years. Pattern 10c. 1247-Ladies' Dressing Sack, Boudoir Cap and Slipper-For the sack and cap, lawn, dimity, embroidery or crepe would be pretty. The slipper may be of felt, eider down, flannel, blanketing or silk. The sack would be lovely in dotted Swiss with edging and insertion of \"Val\" lace, and tiny -bows of wash ribbon, or of velvet to hold the parts to- gether. For the slipper light blue or pink quilted satiih would be warm and comfortahle. Any of the pretty flowered crepes or cretonnes wvould also be nice for the slippers with a soft lining of contrasting colon. The pattern is cut in 3 sizes: smali, medium and large.' aattern 10c. 1239-Ladies' Over Jacket-Tbis desic-n would be lovely in chantilly or shiadoW lace, with liiBg of soft cbiffon or silk. It is also nice for moire, taffeta. erepe, poplin, linen or ratine. The p~atternî is cut in 6 sizes: 34, 36. 38N, 40, 42 and 44 inches buat measure. Pattern 10c. Bran« tloes'This itaidsto goa dh, good ifti, clear oomplexiomi, botterda. a Natur's axa\u0026tive\u003e. A bran \"iuhthroe time. -weeldy hielpé keep one at bis but. But foiku dW on ikolear bran,. So in Pettiolis' we bide it ia- luscious fi\"ke of whoat. Not' gitty bran, but tender- Ont eu hardy diceorn it. Yetechds is. one-ourthbran. Thi bran-food is effcint yet inviting. It Wil delight you in taste and effect. If yozurpnaeam't Pettijohn'a, sond uabs nsd 15 cents im stamps for a package by parel post. We'1l thon asic your storo te supply it. Addre.m The Quake Oats Company east of Manitoba, Petororogh, bt.; west of Onte àario, Saskatoon, Baauk Our New AddrossI Ouar Motb à mt \"U th. e MML as \" wehéiv L.à foroed tom\u0026 k ivly ci bea quaNtWL Jargeat b mleu fn à a in Western Canada. Switches, aY mm gl or colo, from ... $1.50 Coinis made up. $ 1.0 W. ony a mpli. mdau hm 9\" an md wesM Ii un m Au wB ci dow =kI Seaman \u0026 Petersen. NEW YORK HAAM STORE !Ienslngton Bmook, IWINNIPEG MADE IN 'CANADA When writing advertisers pleaecmention The Western Home Monthly. !ZN I~VMQ8PIIE~RE i tC~I ~PRESHNESS",
         "The WMstepn HOmM fonthly 1243-Grls' Ove oceisDISI-Blue wenued for lisi.dae fru. fini Bunet deign Lblsjjoutse - Ial.luwliI* leeu,,W-ith emroidered .cailom on theIi. f00dgu would smo be prtt. ,TaM Ïodel! le likewise appro- pO foe lr gingiizi, beemouker, ohamibrey, ,s~o, pros1 U4.14. batiste, crepe or pçlinl. The pste is eut in 4 izes: 8, 10, 12 su 4 yeffl. It requires 41/ 'YSula f O4zuh n4eal for au 8-year sfio Pattera 100. 124-Lalfis'AUl MmiaoOver Dreu iu 8udlittoi Bas qe 1-What oould be mmreeffective, ues4 sud becoming Uan t\" style inuOb cool pretty linen braided or ebroidered, or mde up In a neat pst- tom of eheekod- or etriPed gingham, or rrhape In ftowered Iswu or orgendy. It alnie@, for white or oolored sere, for teffeta, or mdtmng iu wool or 3Ie wvm TUestyle laeoomfortsble, end tbe uudoerw'ist may be as faucy dictates, of Iawii, net batiste or silk, or of self iterial. The patteru in eut in 7 sizes: 14, 16 snd 18 yemr for misses, sud 36, 38, 40 and 42 luches 4bust measure for ladies. Il. will require 2 yards of 36- inch xaterial for the.underwaist, sud 55%f ;s rde for the dres for a 36-ilich sie Iattemn 10t. 1260-1 25 1--A4 Smart Spriug Suit- CemPing Ladies' Coat, Pattern 1260, Mid Ladies' Skirt Pattern. 1251.' As here showu gabardine lune. new sand shlade was used, with ves;t of Oriental eumri\u003cery, sud velvet for tri mg. Thecoat is eut with a pretty flare, aud thuB skirt shows plaited fuluess iu panel effeet at back aud front. The coat eleeve May be mnade with a flare cuf or a iieat tailored facing. The akirt pat- tern is cut lu 6 sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28, 30 andE 32 inches waist neasure. Thle coat inuIl sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches bnst ineasure. It requires 71/ yards 'Of mnaterial 44 inéhes wide for the en- tire suit for a medium size. Two separ- ate PaItterns 10e each. 1258-Girls' Over Blouse Dress with Skirt--White pique is here show\" braile(î ini blue. Ille style lends itself ireadilv to exbroidery, and a very love- !y dr0sS could be made from this mode! iu white linen, witii the free edges of the. overblouse nIshed with em- broïdered scallopa; orý repp or poplin oouid ho used, with pipings or cordings of a contraating color. The cloaing in effected ou th. shoulders, and the Deckfinish May b. hMehor in Duteh. round style. The bit may ho omitted, snd if the Mtorial used for th.e dresa warrants it, rnay ho replacd by asoft ash.or girdle. Thepttern in out -iu 4 size: 8, 10,%n.1and 14 years. Patteru 10%.. 1256-Ladies' Two Nlec. CircuLr Skirt --'Striped browu snd white suiting was used lu ths instance, The. style shows new akirt linos, sud in most comfortable and attractive. 14 la good for broad cloth, cheviot, serge, voile, poplin, gabardine sud. crepe, aud siso desirable for linon snd other wagh fabrica. Th lo oing in under the tuck lsp lu front. The pst- tern in eut iu 6 sizes: 2P, 24, 26, 28, 30) snd 32 luches waiwb measure. Bat- tom 10. 1237 - Ladies' Shirt Waist - This inodel shows a simple attractive style thaît will at once appeal to every woman of conservative taste, who likes oa trim, smart waist. The model la fluishied with coat closing and the new hlgh coller. The fronts may be open at the throat, the collar being Trolled back with thei fronts to, form revers. The eleeve lu wrist length la a popular regulation shirt sleeve, with straight cuIf. Its short length, a neat tiirui4mck eufi', formeaa smart finish. Linen, ratine, madras, erepe, batiste, alhatrose, satin, taffeta and poplin are ahl suitable for this style. The pattern is eut iu 6 aizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 luches bust measure. Pat- tern loc. 9931 - Laaies' Apron - This simple serviceable mcdel may ho used as a dress. It is suitable for seersucker, linene, galatea, gingham, dhambrey, or lawn, and -with--the short sleeves and round neck ig'quite comfortable. The clos- ing is at the side ýfront The fulness at the waistline in back ia beld under the beit, which fastens under the arm. The pattern is eut in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38,40,42 !and 44 inches bust measure. Pattern 10c. m. -q I t/~L~~ IV. AN EAU m,4EW Î, 85 lii la r e b., at. .6 Lufr. ' i.s. mai 1,- t: 4 o",
         "The Western Home P'Oàttbiy fbr vogur 5Df- UkouIiI7«. thlk oftrlmgows milk, y7M would b. id IIehNÉa tball.Y. old to seore l\u0026 ddhsqi 4 mro ,h. ley ohndled fiwith ueu loseeall.emm id d.llveedwhilst quite -rush -h\u003cýïo\u003ctld bav \u003emdlfy and propr.\u003ce nkcrfil modwmmed lgides . .tha t \" sahb. easy te digues mai b.n a,uulhlpg.Cemnyw do \u0026Ui that bas to be do»e? On oltwbomubetif .1ueedow posturtes iold Hnglesd qhld bardeof eowestram aeLd, sd los.by, la ideul eroudl, «orte. Afl ey' model lsboretories. Déieotily the ows havé berna iled te.kmin uprepared, ma eiW hSdwlth soewetlo exactaess, accordint to te. mut je u edluel xpealuae% to produoe te.ideal \"~~'Alu.uss\"Mhlk Food No. 1las just whst you sai fW tii. yo.âgbaby. Rioh, gertm-free, fresh cow'a MUM ,st sd modified that it in pteotically iden- tiesi asothere ilk. Io mont delicate baby cus diget Lt sud h. aurished se that he wili ebrive. AUl ebe y7»..\"d wlsh e»d do hasbhem don.for you- 1.5 sd -ci wtet.1 W~mum cw'smiIk, with lI ts wortles as te purity md pptaelom, le auj jetsd for trialremember Ulik Food No. L Milk Food No. 2. DtdPodN\u0026 The.mn a .iaa-nd. nrfive sysê mvuof Babi Peoding. Have you ever used asoap prepared by a sldn specialist? If net. you do flot know how bene- fiil a a oap ca» ho. For thirty years John H. Wood- burymade a constant study of the skin and its needs. He treated thou- sands of obstinate skin diseases, mnade countless ekin tests, until he evolved the formula for Woodbury's Facial Soap. In the booket wrapped around every cake of this soap, are given the causes for ali common skin troubles -conspicuous nose pores, oily skin and shiny nose, tender skins, etc.,- and the proper trcatments to relieve them. If there is any condition of your akin that you want to improve. get a cake of Wood- Mademin4 burys today and folow carefully the direc- tions given in the booklet. In ten days or two weeks your elin should show a marked I mprovement-a promise of that lovejier complexion which the ateady use of Wood- bury's always brings. A 25c cake of Woodbury's Facial Snap is sufficient for a month or six weeks of this treatment. It i s for sale at dealers every- where throughout the United States and Canada. Write toda» to the Woodi'unj For 4c WB Canadlo.n Factorg for Sam pies wil 1 send o coke large enosgh for a weeks Ireaimens. For zoc, sam ple's of Woodbury's Facial Soap, Facial Creom and Powder. Address The Andreu' Jegexs Co., Lid., «Sherbrooke s., Perth. OnM r jo. Canad When writing adveitisers, piease mention Th-_ Nor'-West Farmer. la\"-Costume for Xissu aMd, 8Ma Womui-GWenadjue iu a Dew Mauve ahade le hero show» with brocaded silk for aleevesansd trlmmlng.- The style in unique l i ItUnes aud shows several new sud pleasing features. The f ull skirt gsther.d aïth*le yoke Une, m\u0026Y be a tChed at this palut lengthwise tucks or plaits or fluished with -but one row of Lathers. The eleeve gives a choie of Finish; either lu pointed wrist length, or a short length, finished with a, shaped cul!. The pattern le \u003cut in 4 aizes: 14, 16, 17.sud18 years It requires e% yards of. 36-inch material for a. 16 year size., Pat- tern 10a. 1254-Ladies' Dressing or Hous Sack with Bell or Bishop Sl«ev-Ootton erepe ini a soft shade of pink or blue or in cream white, with 4. plaiting of self material or wash ribbon, would be very nice for this. A aimpler finish would be to bind the edges with ribbon or satin, or to ornament with feather stitchi-ng. Dimity. lawn, organdfie, batiste, cash- mere, crepe de chine, silk or voile are also suitable for this style of garment. The model is pretty and comfortable and very easy to develop. The bell sleeve is cool and dainty, but for warmth the bishop style may be preferred. The pwt- tern is càt in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 ànches bust measure. Pattern lOC. 1241-1240--'Comnprising Ladies' Waist Pattern 1241, and Ladies' Skirt Pattern 1240--As L.ere shown, figured foulard is combined with grenadine, in harmoniz- ing shades of brown and green. The designs may be used separately; they are splendid models for the new cotton goods, for linen, batiste, chiffon taffeta, ,and other eilt:s. Witlî the under waist of batiste or crepe, and lifien for over- blouse portion -and skirt, a very dressy costume can be made. The waist pat- tern is et in 6 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inehes bust rucasure. The skirt is cut in 6 sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28, 30 and ,2 inches waist measure. The skirt measures about 3 yards at thie lower edge. Two patterns 10c earh. 1261-A Dainty Dress-Do-tted cial i e in pini. and greccn and cream ground wvas used in this instance The model j.e~ lovel for other sàoft fabrica such as aibatroas, orepe, crepe de chine, mesea- ' in, or charmeuse, likowlse for lawna, end orgaudias, \u0026M tissue fébrics. The, waist %Mn skirt are gàthered with a ruffied heading, that %may b. piped or corded, or it m\u0026Y be omitted. liepa-. tern is out in 5 sizeý:6 8, 10, 12 and 14 ~ years. Pattern 10e. 1259-a SiMPIe sud Attractive Tub Dress--Brown and white ohecked ging- ý ham was used for this style, with white corduroy for collar and cufs. The model would b. nice for atriped seersueker, for ehambrey and percale. It in fine for. drill,,line» or linene, and aleo good for.I serge, voile, or poplin. It wiIl make a nice neat bueinesa suit. The akirt is J our gored model, eut on new hunes end with ample fulness. The' pattern ia cut in 6 aizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42, aud 44 inches buat meaeure. It re- quires 61/2 yards of 36-inck material for a 36-inch size. Pattern 10c. 9882 - Ladies' Apron-This simple easily made style, is good for ging- hain, chambrey, percale, lawn, denim, sateen and brilliantine. It affords case to the wearer and protection foi the dress beneath. The waist is eut in low' square outie, and gathered to a belt that holds the skirt, which has service- able pockets. Percale is a pretty pattern with binding of braid or tape in a con. trasting color would also be nice. The pattern is eut in 3 sizes: amail, medium and large. Pattern 10e. 1080-Girls' Dres with Raglan Sleeve -This style is eaey to develop, is grace- ful and attractive, although simple, and is good for an-y of the season's dres materials. The raglan portion of' the sleeve is lengthened by a bisbop portion, joined to a band ctiff. The -ç%aist fronts and the three piee «kirt is finished with a box plait, under w'hich the dreas is closed. As here sliown bine woolen, wth trimming of red serge, - as used. Gala- tea. gingham, chambrey. seersucker, corduroy or velvet are equally good. The pattern is eut in 5 sizes- 4, 6, 8, 10 and 12 years. Pattern Nec. -'Y- r. -I I Iý Muffle",
         "The Western Home MointhIy But look out for the child with whom 'Mlbains is an every-winter condition in ite of ail your care. There certainly la ame f ault in his general health. He Iould be carefully attended, given lots of ~t, sleep in the open air if practicable, ourishing food in abundance, nioderate xercise and possibly tonic medicines.. In Isuch cases the general circulation is eble so be very careful that it is not re- tricted by tight garters, tight hose or ight shoes'. Woolen hose, a roomy omfortable shoe and no garters whatever hould be the rule. For local treatment of chilblain go eits are obtained by batbing the af eted arts with peroxide of hydrogen diluted th an equal amount of hot water and pplied hot, then dusting over a bland owder, such as talcum. Ingrowing toe-nail is a close second to ~hilblains for foot agony. 0f course this aUfl for a sensible shoe, but it aso cla.mors lery loudly for some way to keep that harp sword of a nail from driving into the ensitive toe. Ocasionally a nail is se perverted that twill yield to nothing short of surgical neasires. But 1 have seen, many aggra- 'atedl cases cured by simple means. If there is p roud feh around the nail ~'ou will be able to do nothing until it is ~leared away. Get some powdered buint ~lum (you can powder and burn it your- ~ef if . necessary) and apply elosely, wýrk- 9i it as far in as possible. A few appli- rations will kil the proud flesh and sbrink ffending nail. A great essential is a pair of dlean ho\"e every morrung, and be sure that they are washed with a mild soap and thoroughly rinsed. It la woirth a special effort to have enough shoes so that you may not have to wear the sanie pair two days in succession. The extra pair should be well aired on their off day. These precautions wili relieve any ordmn- as cae o ithing feet. a=of iple wonder why their corna and bunionall not yield to ordinary treat- ment. It may be becauae they persist in wearing il fittin shoes but quite often it ia because they suifer with a foot defornity which needa correction. The weight of the body la normally dis tributed throughout the foot by a spring arch. If it camne down fiat there would be no0 such thing as springing or jumping or even tiptoeing. Fortunat-l tiaarl a very elastic and not easily destroyed al- thought it niay, by reason of sagging liga- ments, relaxed muscles, or ill-fitting shoes, boec much of its function. Faulty arches often causes symptoma akin to rhcurnatism; no doubt many cases are this day being treated. The likeliest subjects are those who stand much in one position, especially if of heavy build. Motormen, waiters and nurses are aniong the greatest victinis. The fanmer la per- haps not se susceptible ia these days of riding tools, but the farmier's wife, whe still does lher work standing on bier feet, is oftcn found among the unfortunates. There are many srch supporters on the market, intended to correct this t rouble. Their use very often gives relief. But if Important Announcement to the- Canadian Public By t\u0026e P\u003eoprietrs of MWNCARIVS jT hu Sme toournotict\u0026Mthe\"eis a tondemy, Ioclu 44 WINCARNIS » as a \"Beef Ic.m d Wm.\" W. want ta state epaial that 4,WINCARNIS 'Iis not a \"Beef, lion and 'Wine\"-there 18 DnoIkm wlié,mteein. '4WINCARNIS\" aud it is far uperior tayother wime onic. WINCARNIS is composed of thme hkrdmts: (1) Puïe. M\"waLupoiuy seected w... (2)-Etract of bed. (3) Extract ci maiL nuxe etht. r.uu. amukuWt6 L.masi ve ock o\u0026dbmdldth*md xestsive e!eeats \u0026mown bmof Ly recamim 7a aeir mm-= rtainma md e imbatéhh-vgpioist b ame r smtdism evsu iRemember-Ther Is No Subs*te wr PRICE .Pint Btdes, 90c.; Qnte Botdiog6$ .50. If pu*ro )btain WinSaria frm our dealer, ktuOslour Cnée A#sm.4 M.FS. a 6 orikrnd Stres, Toronlo.I THIE 19 14 WAR qÇCOMPLETE and accral Mim JZCt,,,rated and desriptive accmt a the great WorldStugl. Ever eaM who wishes to bc corredy infonned skould have one. Just send us a new submciber at $1 or 25c. for the War Book itueif, and it wiilbemailed you. Theclemandbhas been great~ and as the supply is now fIuntedio it will be necessary ta wmite withot delay. Over 300 Ilustrations. Colored Patriotic Covers and Colored Maps of the War Zooo THE WESTERN HOME'. IONTHLY T N LA on your paper wilitell you when your BIND IN YOUR RINEWAL WEEN DU TG HT BINDING lele- ' Th;' ith a i ed or, B pat. « .Rd 14 $ Tub gIng. - white mode! neker, â ne for ; )d for. ake a akirt The 8, t0, I ra. simple r ging- denilu, [secasê )i the in low a belt ervie- ,attem a con,- .The îedium Sleeve grace- le, and dress of the portion, fronts d wth mes is ., with Gala- sucker, gooL. i,8, 10",
         "TeWesterà Home Monthly There L. nothing a *oman appreciatea more than good needles. They are alwaYs useful, alwayâ acceptable and are uaed by every woman, whether sho ewa muci or lithie. MRS. HOUSEWIFE: W. have settled your needle worries ferever. 7%1s iandy needle beok ia a iandsomely bound case, in leatherette cover, bea'tifully designed and embossed 1h contains 142 sewing necessities, ensisting cf 75 gold- eyed aewing needies, 51 art werk needles, viz, 156 silk and ctten damn- era, 15 miliners needies, 1.5 crewel or embroidery needica, 3 rug or ta- peshry needles, 3 chenille needles, 1 bone stilleto, 1 bone tape or rubaon needie, 1 bone crochet, 1 steel crochet, 1 steel bodkin or tape, 1 =unci work, 2 mnedium vool darners, 2 fine -wool damnera, 2 in huyarn darnera, 2 fine cot ton darners, 2 -medium cotten damnera. MADE IN ENCLAND Th-.a ithe. met complets aewing net ever invented, and lu a regular work-bauket companion. The blggest And bout bargain ever off ered te- the women readers cf the. Weekly Free Pross and Prairie Farmer and The. Western Home Monthly. OUR OFFER: leWee\u0026y Fre Pros.am Praire Farmor fr yr. AL3 15 Uns -West oern .M.uthly for 1 yuar FOR $15 lb 'Dandy\" Noedie Case J SPECIAL COUPON FREE PRESS, Winnipeg-- Enclosed find S$1.50, for which send me The Weekly Free Press for 1 year, The Western Horie Monthly for 1 year, and the \"Dandy\" Needie case. ThIa Offer in good in Canada oniy. Send all ordorsdirect to Ireo Press, Winnipeg 1~ lo By Dr. Lcolnard Keene Hirahberg, A.B., MA., M.D. (Johns Hopkins). 1h used ta bo thought that a mother's lave was a sur protection of the infant fron harm. Science now shows that the instinct supposed ho bo present liail motiers ho properly defend tiemn from ill, is oftexi responsible fer the higi deati 1rate, particularly i the menths from May ho October, cf babies under five years of age. A matlier's love, despite the sweehness in the name, the noble, pure, and on- kindled tenderness whici blesseà the eartli in its geod itentiens, science new dis- cavera ha bo frequently fatal ho infants. A motier's ieart is wealc, and li this resta much danger. It la new feund tint methers net only make calamiteus mis- takes b y instict and intuition, buht se powerful are these erreneous habits\u003e cf race, inheritance, custom, ndassociatien, titeprinees;net enligliten tliem. Inawod a mether cf mne children, dm oont seoin te learn frein her mistakes wihithe first bern ones. Sie and lier owxi grandmathrs and aunits keep on deig the wrong thinga. Unlike the burned child wia dreads the fire, mothera wia, \"raised two cildren\" on beer, ceffee, hea, monts, dirty milk, gerin-fuil pacifiera, and other vicieus thhmgs, keep on deig se, witli al ef tie later-born children. In brief, unlike animals, methera wil net learn by trial and errer, rewards and punishinents. The most grieveus cf al thie injuious mistakes made by mothers, ia net te nurse their infants aht hie breast; net te give the bambino the milk cf their cwn human ieart's blood. Ih is net only thc selfisi, aristocratie, social parasite or woman wlio puts lier new bern babe into the liands of a nurse tiat is alone in this maternai felony. Even thie poorest women or those wio can leat afford microbes-f ree miIk, commit this sin. Bottle-fed babies have always been known te die like flies in first sunimers, second summers, -and third summers,' despite the \" second summer\" mistaken behief of ninety-eight per cent of uiiteach- able motiers. À $~- you are young and hope to build yot arches up agam don't use them. Use sp\u003c -eWeicare.sinstesd. You oaa work those exorcises out fo yoursolf.Ben by itting on the, foc witha cushion supp rting your leg abov the ankle and stretching te foot outaafa as possibe thirty times. Thon brmng il into) as complote fleion (bonding it u ward) as possible thirt7 times. Te mamn movoments tmrning the foot in anc aftethàt turig it out. you wiilbe sur prised to find how many unthouglit o muscles wifl wake Up. After you propoese a littie you can foUlom with exocises standinZ ou Turi your toes in , iegn1 on your toms and preme siowly out. PS peat twonty times.- With- foot parallk rmms the inner aide of the foot throwing tht body weight on the outer border. ]Repeai twnty tunes Waka*l mOi jPsteswith weight et Thee eercBesail tend to strengther the muscl\" of the foot and to restore thi fallen arch. They caa be supplemented by occasioially walkring without bringin the hel quite ho the groumd and by wa\u0026kig with the toes turned i rathez than out. Shees that wiil help should be straight on the inside, and- the i. ner aide of the broad heel should bo a quart. eh higher than the outer so as ho throw the body weight on to the outer aide of the foot. If I had to give a blanket prescription tc caver foot troubles in general it would be: Hase: One dosexi pairs. Light for sunumer and warm for witer. Exact fit. Waah. carefully i soft water with Ivo soap and rinse thoroughly. Apply fe pair oach mormng. Shoes: First quality, material and workrnanship. Roomy toes--straight i- side-broad heeL Suffcient quantity ta change at once when wet and allow a day'. airing after each day of wear. LastlY. Don't forget that the foot wlI give you a botter measure of service if yeu serve it withi a btter mneasure and that two pairs of shoes worn alternately wili lult much more than hwice as loqg as one pair worn continuously. i i Why Human MiIk la Best for Babies v ir Scientiflc ruusarsh- however, bas fôond e. that even the finest cows, tested ta M \u0026 dise vry d y boar w thar mikd, stabled inmarb1etjJ )r m\u0026d with strilized rubberg1ovesy re mi]kr clad like surgeons i an operaj ir room and .xilked ito bacteria-freepaj it an )tls tl ieaml n that must bo handed-even if boied an ke pasteurized-by a dosen persans befaoj d enters tho fardstn mu of even i r-cleanust babe. f lEven if these ideal conditiona-the, c of course, are too expensivo to carry out ~b) V wero rigidly enforcod, the metber' erroneous instinct and the naturail l.. i Y' aptitude of women toa appreciate th i. dangers of unseen bacteria mn a milk that Biiqswetad rich, wflalowthe mt LtMDles and botties when it reaches le But even at its best bottIe milk lui been definitely shown Ly diacoveries t S n lack a egion of necessaryth* swhl d aduit 111e, doms net oxclude. g Gao on the stomach, acid stomak y ulcers cf the bowel, constipation, 00te r tongues, and a whole hast cf 11f e-i a aduithtorments are new dfiitely -by laboratoryand linica icvret -cow's milk and other form ftf v feeding li childhcod's unhappy, but anocent heurs. ,By the time tieso discoveries are mad Dthe mother wlie boasts: \"h ad attention to theso extreme dctr rraised eleven cliildren my wa~ust a grandmother did before me,' m rgone where the dear sweet mothers ior mie anifs hber nase and \"doesnt a word cf it.\"' She muet comibat the proof, hi not to bo blamed'for tho chrnie ilsa cffier \"raised\" eleven. But more important even thanths dictment against even the puret She actual and definitely aertain Lthat tiose babies wio are fedd \u003ethe motier's breast; who aboeb._ proper, human milk ito their receive 1 by the dock nce dm dochor's ordors, are free of many trous diseases whici aimait surely themselves ito the babies, botti given mlk, foode, and artificial mst for human milk. 1Mothera' milk whici is the nrodu the human tissues, the white Llood puýscles,,the red blood stuif, the h juces generally contains the antidatst many poisons and chier human maldese. Net only is human milk a peftfd, ' drink, antitoin and medicine for ycn sterae, but it is definitely doiffereni1c ically and physicalyv, fïrcmeeyaoe' hi knewn thing under thesuln. That mether's milk as an elixir cf you 0ui lias been knewn te several savage fitthi tribes fer ages. There, the aged chieftaini ho sacrifice babies te the saie dangers thai the civilized mothera do, by giving them auW wit mi\u0026k and ether artificial feods, i rdeè il i to ebtain human milk fer themselves. jý Travellers wh used totell of thiswers 1 disbelieved, but geograpliers and anthro- Is pologists have recently co finned thdi. -thel They aise add that the aged ahiefhains au mou undeubtediy made, nôtot nly resistant the ravages cf pneumenia and ether enfle distempers, but take on a rejuvenescencmU and new yeuth whici proves tint human i milk ia an invigcrating as weil as immune ai agent.te It i. aise known tint pneumonia attaci* breast-fed babies rarely and even when 1ih U dee, tiey suifer less damage than doa these wlie are fed upon condensed mni% Mati ccw's milk, creams, advertised foodi, ae evaporated milks and the like. l e It is proposed by seme extreme scientistS te that each state pass a law appoihing a out medical board to pass upen every child ane under one year of age and its matiePatch( wlie refuses or pretends net te bo-able té' weg nurse their littie cnes with humn' 4iiotse milk. \"It shail be considered a misde qualit, meanor punishiable in the discretien f ý tqua1l the court,\" said one specialishi chidreof a pu diseases at a recent maedical meting,\"fr any woman te avoid nursing her child, you r until every effort lias been exhautedto- bave? do so\" Wih t Mothers who have by careless phy- four y sicians, aunts, friends, and their own per- laris sonal lack of persist\"nce, ceased ho nourisi Morn their ightly breathing babes with that Beed nost perfect of foods, human milk, cas 3'U l have this pabulum restored\u003e te theit ther bosomns even monthsafater it has dried an sd qi Up.f -ofe",
         "The Western 'Home M ont hi y Id Wheat rom Good Seed formera of the' Mddle West m. convinced of the value of id there le no, doubt that the ýWeat would produce 20 to 50 m nore per acre than wliat je r#eoted, and that of. infinitely ëf the fannn mill ishould blwout al hveled, broken se eed. iinferior stuif je aown it may inl true; but it is rare to aee a strop man grow up froin a i,olbaby. mis true o rpe fyou Nimper crops Laid banýner quai- tbat the baby plante-the ed % ound 'and full of vitality. ..Zpèrient Station found that ié ued that was fanned out of luced 3.68 bushels lema per acre e good aeed. The best grade Sby fanning and grading pro- 54bueheIs more per acre than the p\"aIty of grain from the threshing 'fanning and grading mil all the while, too. In the cels of hégrowimg plant ie tndency to produce white or taft or hard; large well-formed \u003clofkernels, or mail heads wth litsin them; :many heads or few. he le working hie own fanning the lumit the fariner should co- WUt Nature ta the fullest ex- rnpinsrkng out these best yield- or familles. We know of ayto accomphseh this than lhiga aeed plot on the farin. the way ta do it. emougli ,od eed to agow a.cou- Cen thecrop la ripen- it aid pick out 50 good thempbythe roota. wintr theheach plant out and keep the seed ofosch in te envelope or paper bag. When ~~tîtme comes measure out or \u003e an pual amount of each lot. oeed in rows of equal length. PWthe growingx rows aid mark bt:.Qb You like beet. Harvest the SJA eparate sheaves anal flail thein Espmatey during the winter. ý*Out the best ten yieldersanad f*Au equal amount of oach on equal eýpatcheof ground the third year. bb ualty.Pi ot the etyielder a1tan o will have enougli t YOU realize the full value of what bave? The seed patch je sown with Lwih thxee Years ago\u003e came fromin oe 4four years ago from n oe kennel. 4mare l taken the strain je abaoutely b_ More than that, it in the bout IRg seed of bec t uahity 4w you one Of the pYople hodo't -' there la much djff eene in othe I aui qu1t' weat froin different ~-Or fami1s Wefl, li forget your beliefsanad try it out. TheY didn't believe Coencu when he nid the earth wau round. Quite a few believe hie doctrine to-day This \"atrain\" breeding, oryNature'a fanning Min procees, gve us Swedish Select oats, Kloinwanzleboner sugar beets, Minnesota 169 wheat Petkus rye and a hundred other ça1ÏjQe familles of crpa. Your boys and girla wuld think it mighty interesting fui to t'y this out. It can make faîne for thei n ad dollars for you. Get your good eeed and atart a patch of winter wheat thua fali. Henry G. BeILl Value of Blood If the mai who iraises \"common\"y cattie could apend a feW. days on a market where stockera, feeders aid fat cattie ame way and buy the aet puebredbuf1ie could afford. There he would leari that blood tola, that it adds dollars to the Value of every animal marketed, whether it be a stocker, -i feed-Ô a beef animal. No cattle apmroach the top price in any clans unleas tey are well bd. The first cost of a sire has been oonidered too inuch by many cattle-raisersanad the ultimate benefite not enough. Cattie are now sell- ing for about twice as much as they brought a few years ago, yet the prioe of pure-bred bulle lias flot advanced at the Bmre rate. A young bull of any of the beef breeds can atill bc bouglit at a figure which wlll be returned in une or two crope of hie calvea; aid when the bull ia mature aid ready for market ho will re- turnmost if not all of ithimself. Under such circumstances there is no excuse exoept ignorance for contîninln to raise common or plain cattie, the Tdd that need excuses made for thein when the buyer conies. A Creid for the Country Boy I believe that the country which God made le more beautiful than the city which man inade; that lifo out of doora- and i toucli with the earth is the natural lfe of mai. I belleve that work with nature je more npig than work with the most intricate machinery. Ibelieve that the digaity of labor depend not on what you do, but how you do it; that opportunity cames ta the oy on the farn as often as to the boy in the city; that life le lareer and freer aid happier on the farin than in tie town; that my succeas depends not upon my location,. bKut myielf not upon my dreams, but upon what I actuai do- not upon luck, but upon pluck.I beîiee in working when you work aid playing when you play, and in giving a square deal ini every act of 11e. Recognized as the leading specific for the destruction of wormns, Mother Graves' Worm Exterminator has proved a boon to sufferlng children everywhere. It seldom fails. About the 'Farm. PTrade Msand Dsn Write for bookiet and crcular, termi.etc.\" Featherstonhaugh \u0026 Co. Fred. B. Featherstonhaugh,.K.C., M.G. Gersid B. Roxburgh ,B.A. Se. 209- 10 Bank of Nova 3Sotia4 Portage Ave. (Corner of Gary) WINNIPEG HAWK DCÇ! formi .ud Nn,~5*1 ~RU1S\u0026 Wheu writing advertl.cr. ples mention The Western Hoe m M.tbr. TG H BINDING has fôun to exdludi lay befon ble atala gloves by Md arsn oiled n s bef ore il even tuE *rr Out- mother' mtural L' date the, milkthmil eni\u0026k ta aches thi mlk lu veries Q Stomeea nl, 00te lya venet . but ii ire mde istr Pt;r MODEL IMPROVED CYCLE' HATCHM Thisa Dliiimachineai f a 2th Cetnq Wooder, huchea every hatchable ~reproomf; gLaaa widowt s0 that tb.e7tàmeaetesain aight without toucblns machine. Made cutirely of mitai weight 20 lb,. Securdy these machines before auto- lace tota..*Loo Moddl Portable THE MODEL INOVUTOR 00. LhItodln lMm. U4TOMIST, 09. Yen wM c et good satisfaction and the. best possible cash resuits by employing our services to lo* aftet? and dispose of your carlot shipinents of WIiest, Oate, BanIley and Flax. Liberal advmnces againat shipping bille at 7. per cent interest. Thompson, Sons$\u0026Co. 700 W Grain Ezohango ýW1nnJug CLARK'S POIIK\u0026 EMS The value of BXANS as tsr.t producing food needs no dernutration. Their preparation in âppetii£MC~ri a however, a matter entaiing considerable labour in the ordinary kitchen. CLARK'$ PORK \u0026 BUAN8 save you the Urne aýid the trouble. They are pre- pared only from the finest beans cômblned with delicate sauces, made frorn the purest ingredients, in a factory equipped with the most modem appliances. TrHEV ARE COOKED RERADY--SIMPLýY WARM UP TH£ CAN BEFORE OPUNINO W. Clark Montreqnal 7du idotes te îaladies. ect food, r youngî t, chemd .y other hieftaine pmr thai hem auW i ordeè vos. jý hbis wers anthro-' ed thiuk' tains Mu stant :tê- or senls niesceMC b humas immun 6 attacks when it' Lhan do L foodý, cientisti inting a ry child,' mothe -able té' humai misde- ýtion of' iildrenaO ng, \"fori rchild isted tu- is phy-1 th that 1k, can ) their 9 dried Cattia e n1he \u003calloway Rao»hMan.",
         "Th WeternHome Mmon thly rm me nufunotes: faqit b cÇnaithe -dragpiin S o*nmed ostoe e e ~t bm; o nsthS r pai imtay e-mg e boue.w *adm, ~ie - aOMt owei biobdushe Rave rmgdu ohmhorfer feodýng . y ~Aml1i~Woof f9fod embe bouad ultis me part is- Irtenoebng mate\"aiaen. ~aeggàk CErna fesis IMM potatoosa \u0026d fine ~~n MWell as seked biscut- wftI *ïmilk\u0026(orwater) sud xM d faMt workW i, viiibe foucivexy ovboeble frfleMcsekens 'iouitow u d m Mo m y b. made fcn*u:ýr»Pubtsbroad bran, oee phot clwvS ad aalaa meaoe pat btnuIsted biscuit mcm or mam zea i.a haï pat le moaL 8cld thmee \u0026Wouwt o putart harp.utnthse boeuitnc«y bomes of adcruxbly 'A ry-oerd ~d mni-ry hed is a ao~aefor Ibe birdste ruin lu r. tis lb. fnain-caR penD. They e Put'inthmseàaweek or Ivo before the maeto b. kifld. eed th u lalong ùho e trmugh, aMd wheu tisey wlu take no o maec tbmir owu accord, put Ilim 1 t -bi 11ta ind thia4 y oà b ,rretise remit. y% inslhig \u0026Bd th.ehik ae cn powing froin mm. \u0026Im and show. Do aigiu tiaever of Mua Fis,.Dairy Butter By W. IL HRdy, Tunnel 119 I. W. ère ail mare ltaI clanl in ul m the Of butter. Tlse milk ought to e .dmirav th ie cow in mcli a domueoidWtba ai would be praoticaB si em1 r. v- exoeeneWh is mmeuhat e9tensive tiaIbutter of ths\u003cie st perfectionwi b. uuitamlyprdec \" Te but riciues.ofi oeem before churn- ing isabout 30per cent. If it in voyricis or vry lhin il will cisur witix difficulty. se ,tanruas =tt «lie meii u ise beat cdiinfor urn n s vilas oblain- mgÎR h. creain trainthsemilk a cen- trLfgal OMMeam raborla tise ideai ereaming devics Every one who keeps four or more geod mlk cows ougist b yal menans l have a sepraor. The machie eau be quickly paid for lunlise aaving of butter fat alone. If I had 10 part with my mnachine I would immedialely procure anollier, eve thougli I would have to psy tisree lime. lise pria. my prusent oeusot. - pungCream Bdore eam entera th. cisuru il muet ai wayB b. wll sored. Souring or ripening huas the foilowing sdvantafea: It po duces.the ideal flaver in butter;, it =aes tise cream churu more eauily; it obviales diffidlts. rain foaaing or frothing lu cisurning; il permit. a higier céhurning =ertrisd il increases thse kep tof butter. CkriMe rain produoed under perfectly dean conditions will upally develop a dlean aur flaver wheu ripened aI a temneraureoe about 170 degrees. A mucis higiser, temperature will net produce quit. so fine a liaver, sud wili aIse injure thse body eft hé butter. At temperaturus mueis below 70 degrees cream viii ripen slowly, sud very low ripeung nl usually accomirumed wis tise rdct of etmore or Cr xdeial Cream visen il entera the cisuru should have about 0.55 per cent scid. Wisen this amount of scid bas been reached tise cresm vil have tisickeued se tht il vw pour Mmke yrup rem a dipper. One of thse essential polula lu, ripengcream la te prvet oe-r hich la tthe cause etmuh rif 'buter. Il la better to churu cream tee, eeet Ihan tee mour. Churnlng In order te obtain thse bust resulta lu cisurning thse temperature muet be auch that lthe crearn vii cisuru infrorn 30 te 45 minutes. I use a tisermometer te deter- mine tise lemperature of the creani. If crean- is ehurned in lkm. han 30 minutes lisere la usually a large los e o butterfat. If il is churned in more Ihan 45 minutes thse ruult is awaste of time and laber and lem. sat4fstory for subSojueut banlin. Thse bustkidnd et a churn la one tisaI bas ne inside fixturu 1ke tise common barrel cisuru. 1I-have uaed tise barrel type ef cisuru for years, and believe il bas ne equal. Beoeadding tise arem tise churu la rmnsed iraI vits scaldingvater and lisen vith oold water. Tis frsens the cisurn, and fille the pores efthtie veod vith vater se that the creari aid butter wiii net stick. I always aIrain the cream into tise cisuru. This remoe tise possibility eofvisite apeckhlin the butter which usuay coneist of crd o dled parti\"leofe creani. One Ihiekues ef cieese clatis makus a good straîner for Ibis purpose. The butter la gie IghU:mbae ci celor, the 'ce always bè4ng added te the cream. I never tiurn theobutter- into big lu. beeausethse buttennllk is tisen bsad t, meve, and there is asmo difficulty lu prnpe Sdistributing thse sait. The bute lurned util ths pricles are about t aise of painset what. When titis .4 is reached thse buttermilk le remoye ii thse butter washed with clean, pure Wa% bavmngas nearly as possible'tiie tsnPé attire of the butterilk. If thse buti dec. net float well when thse butterni bein drawn, soine cold water le added tas altlng Thse butter la salted'at thse rate oj.on ounce of sait te the pound of butter, c the, bustgrade etofr ait being When thse sait le evenly dtributed butter ie worked enogh.. Juet when pomntbas been reacisd cannot aliayMî told from tise appearance ef the lb immediately after workng, but b that bas net been sufficiently worked, show white strealce or moutles afler i*j six heurs. Whenever sucis streab eOCCU tise butter must be reworked until anil strealce have been removed. To avoi mottled or streaked butter the only s4 rule to follew la te, work it twioe. IN firet time it la worked lightl, Juatlm ougis te fairly dietribute tise ait then allowed te, stand six heurs or lm wisen white streak wil be noticed.-Ï butter ie then worked again tuti th. a le uuiforrn. For fancy trade butter oult let , up in one-pound prints wra p inu mentpaper. .Tisese prints e ar e 1 a emi and printer wbicis may b. oI tained from dealers lunafrySuppliesf emall satm. Thse pr ent wr ehould have on th e isenanie maker eoftise butter or the dairy l in it la made, sasthie helpe conaderabl adverisingtise rodue. As ýém thing thse bust prices for butter are r~ when sold direct te tise consumer. MPLET'E NýERVE FA-ILURE Could not move hand or foot-»Amazlng resuits effected by Dr,. CasseII's Tablets the famous BrItlah Remedy of world-wide ree-- The foliow4 gamnaing recovery of a mnax who ufered from such complete nerve failure that he had not moved for eighteen montha' \u0026oused such wide-epread interest last year ini the Mother Country, that we now publlsh it for the benefit of our Can\u0026lian frierkds. Here in the wonderful story of Mr. Thoum Sedgemore, of Lyndale Cottage, 19 Chapel Street, Budleigh Salterton, Devon, Englaald. He says:7 «I vas omletely helpîes, could net move band or foot, and bad been in tisis condition for eigisteen menthe when Dr. Cassell's Ta=ll cured me. The trouble liraI ahowed itsecfin the year 1908, and I sought advice. This proved useless, and I vas steadily getting verse. I vas advieed te, go to a special ins titution, visere I should bave the very best ekili available. I was treated there four menthe; but nothing they could do for me w as of the alightest avail. On the contrary, the trouble increase......... Wben I weut te the institution I vas just able te bobble on sticks from tise sta- tien, when I wae taken out I hail te be carried on a stre-tcher. I bad bardly tise power cf a single muscle, was s0 utterly heipless that I had te be f ed witis a .. speen juet as I lay. timn .daw bofel- .58mi a wbliuO.lfB Waiur. or .oite l ami laMe ub am p9 u vimi Ne 2SNL etu,~D5s 9«1 was told I eould not possibly recover; but 1 kept on hoping ail the same. I tried one thing and another, and disappointment followed disappointment; u in the end I. got Dr. Cassell's Tablets, and to the amazement of everybody wbo knew me 1 recovered; gradually power returned to my limbs, and I could be wheeled about in a bath chair. Soon 1 abandoned the chair for crutches, then I dropped the crutches and used a stick. Finally, 1 had no need even of a stick; I could go about on good sound limbe again, cured absolutely. I 'have been thor-- ougbly sound ever since, and have long been back at work. It is hard work, too but 1 amn quite lit for it.\" Striking as thie case undoubtedly is, the facts as here given are true in every detail, and are simply an* unvarnished story of what Dr. Cassell's Tablets are accomplishing every day in homes both here in Canada and elsewhere. Make a trial of Dr. Casll's Tablets to-day, an d you will never regret il. They are a remedy of world wide repute for N.rvou Breakdown Noursathenia Kidney Trouble malntitrition Nerve Failure SleePlemn Dyspepsia Wasting Infantile Weakneus Anasmia Stomach Disorder Palpitation And are apeially valuable for nursing mothers and young girls approaching womanhood. Ail druggists and storekeepers throughout the Dominion sell Dr. Cassell's Tablets at 50 cents. People in outlying districts should keep Dr. Cas- sell'e Tablets by them in case of emergency. 4. s '4, 544 -r (y SEND FOR A FREE BOX A free sample box will. .be sent you on rcceipt of 5 cents for mnailing and packing, by the sole agents for Canada, H. F. Ritchie and Co., Ltd., 10 Mc- CauI-street, Toronto, Ont. Dr. Cassell's Tablets are manufac- tured solely by Dr. Cassell's Co., Ltd., Manchester, England. * .5 '4. He IW Wol burd = ~wZa~U M~a.~jêgg, SulebffiUM sha..., be tw~JlaidaM ~wu.sioc.g lieiun~ HAssPAc~uMO UV ~5moe oe.uo. *aUCiLllOi UIIIIIIUIIUSIIIUEL .8 CM? I JL M\u0026 %Ov =",
         "Th e Westepn Home MeOnthly . BLOOD the 'C u. in prop about i wtbss rne ted IOER Have t. a and mention ar wanta. LSftoeUY GO.. m \u0026 ýW0manS sympathy discouraged? Is your doctor's bill finan el cial load? Is your pain a heavy btl n va burden? I know what these mean te -ýçmen-I have been discouraged leaoiied how to cure ruyself. I want ? 1 d tu b h .»Vý burdens. Why not end the doctor's bill? 1 can do this e do t rit f r f ee co nrd n d u .1 a.s..t _e- if ou will assist me. urde ' (t r $J do 18 tO, write for a free box I med w 0 trýýent. MRS. F . E . CUR eed e r box medY which bas been placed in my . U V - y b Il 1 if do 0 be given away. Perhaps this one th.ý y ta logue 0 tlce emd 10e in silver or stainps irOur UP-to-date 1914-1915 pig\u0026 Summer Catalogue, \u003eltining over 400 designs of ~des') Misses', and Children's terns, also a concise and nPrehensjve article on Dress- 9kn , giving valuable hints the home dressmnaker. SStru Home lVontly Winnipeg et .fBN ad p ý boIS Or PimIpies Start rorface or body you that the biaod lise ,à that before yon canà 11w usang a good medi j, ai the impurities o .kBiood Bitters is a b:i . one that hm si toefttepast fortY Yea from one end of tie as the best blood It cures boils, phn aarismg f rom be 19. Caffier, Rive troubled with bouls nat know what it w ïu ntil lie used Burdoa Jt cured him. PCURED. SBoycet, arker, 0C neck break out witb \u0026-v soosiinds of medic .'Two botties of Ikabanished them. 1% manufactured anly Book on 00 DSDISEI S and How to1 M. CLAY GLOVEI l W. si\"t. nt., N. Patriotisrn Perth, Feb., 1915. Dear Editor-Having been a sulent scrutinizer of your valuable magazine for some tinte, 1 bave decided ta express my opinion on the topics discussed in your correspondence columns. 1 arn an Eastern lad but bave studied many facts cf the Canadian West, but have not decided ta leave the \"Land of the rising sun,\" mthough there lsa lways a elinging ta the land of one's- birth. Many find the West fuifiling their model ideas, but for my part IE prefer 6\u0026nature's art,\" of Ontario, ta that of the Western plains. 'But, ta change the subject, I wouid suggcst this a tinte of seriaus considera- tion ta every anc vho lives in Canada, for wheu ve think of the great Euro- peau strugglc, wbich la waging wild at the prosont time. Wc sbould feel proud of the country in which wc live, vhcn ve sec how freely aur country bas respanded ta the \"'Cali. ta Arma\" lu the tinte of need, it ,shows the high esteent in which Cari- adians hold their protector, «'Oid England.\" .And vo, the rising generation, should make it an appointment ta mouid char- acteras s as nat ta lower the high stan- dard attained by aur forefathers lu the past ages, and littie hinta given in these corr-esondonce letters in that direction may becof much value in encouraging patriotiant in the hearts cf the prescrit youthful generation. Weil, as this is my first letter ta these pages, I don't want ta take up too much of this valuabie space. 1 hope other corresponderits wiil write ou some new topic. Thanking the editor for bis valuable space, 1 romain, A Canadian Suggestor. PI.I.. TTE invite readers ta mWake use of t tobrea W ,these colurnus, and an effort may eat il be made ta publiali ail in- res teresting letters reeeived. The large get rid of arnount of correspondence which is soni er you -ta un bas, hitherto, made it impossible for icine that every letter ta appear lui prnt, and, hn ut of the. future, letters received frorn subseribers wili receive first consideration. Kindly jood p note vo cannofl send any correspondents en on the the naines and addresses of the writers ana. One ?f the letters published. Persoa wish- l country ing ta correspond with others should di purifier scnd letters in stamped, plain envelopes fipes and under cover ta the Correspondence De- )d biood. partrnent and they wiii immediately be forwarded ta the right parties. or Olade, Have you Trial This? for years, Sask., Feb., 1915. vas ta, be Dear Editor-While leisureiy perusing ick Blood the colunans of your indispensable paper, I amn rather arnused by the way in which many of the corresjaondents deal with )nt., had the subject of \"Love. Sorne of the fair xpimples. ones are seeking a 'recipe for love, and cine witb following the old adage: \"«A stitch in Burdock time saves nine,\" I arn sending them a cure for love, as I amn bure they vil rby The soon need it vhen they succeed in fibd- rta, Ont. ing (?) the desired recipe. The cure-Take a grain of sense, haif a grain of prudence, a dram of under- standing, ane ounce of . patience, a pound of resolution and a handful of dis- SES hike, in termix thern ail together and Feed for twenty-four liaurs, then set them on a slow fire of hatred and strain clear ER, V.S. front the dregs of melanchoiy, sweeten- .T, UBA ing thent vith forgetfulness; then put them in the bottle of your heart, stop- -. j)ing them down with the cork of sound judgmcnt. Let thent stand fourteen days in the vater of cold affection. This, when rightly made and properly applied, is the most effectuai. remedy, in ~ the universe and was nover known ta ibei.OO. faiL. You may get the ingredients at âm5a the bouse of Understmnding i Constant JJ ' Street by going up the bill of Self *gwOt. Denal in the town of Forgetfulness ia _______the County of Love Me More. Now, dear editor, vhile wishing The Western - Home Monthly every succes and its readers special success, along this particular tibeme. 1 viii close by giving rny definition cf \"love.\" It is an inward ipeomprehlensibility and an outward ail overialiness. Love Me More. Somo Fine Stories AUx, Alta., Match 1.5, 1915. Dear Editor-May I join your carre- spondence columna? I have been a sub- scriber ta, your paper for the last six moutha. I wauid not bo vithout it now. It sure bas some fine atories in it. 1. arn an Arnerican girl mgo 20. I ive ou a farm 12 miles soutihwest of Alix. SWe sure have smne fine and around berc. \\'Thre is quito a lot cf railroad land that bas not been taken. It sure is a fine place for mixed farrning. I think A Yankee Foreigner is quite. right it wbwt she says about people eiighting a newcomer. We nover know wlieu we will have ta move irto a strarige place. 1 think cverybody ahould do unto others as they wouid be dane by. 1 think A Mèe Bacheior'a opinion af Correspond ence A Camziaid em Aberta, Feb. 6, 1915. Dear Editor-I have read your valu- eable paper froin timo ta time through tother subscribers until I became a sub- r scriber myseif. 1 bave often thought Iof writing to your correspondene *coiumns, but my letters mevê-je-t'beyond rmy own stovo, but. I willi try and do 8 better this time. I have noticed sorne 6 létters ln different magazines and papers of late'dealing with the Canadian men. IOne vriter sayo Canadian mea seem Istili ta have a very old.fashioned idea *of the uses of a wife. Others that Can- Iadian men do not' appreciate vornen. I think Canadian mon do appreciate wa- mon, but they have high iaeals of whist an up-to-date womnan should be. I think every young waman and ans shouid bave an ideai of their awh. Sonel cf the readers seem ta think we Can- adianis are looking for a slave. Not \u0026o. We are not looklng for the good-iooking rstreet girl with the fancy dress and bat, 1with the fais. bair and paint who can't ikeep a job for a week. W. vant the Lgirls from gond homes wlth high ideals 1and ambitions. Who eau cook and take care of ea bouse, who always look je*t and dlean, who are good ta their mothi- ers, sisters and 'brothers, vho 'have a smile for their friends. You may depend 6they wiil suit theïr husbands. I viii be pieased ta hear frovi readers and vil try and answer the samne. I wishi The Western Home Montbiy and its readers every success. Johnny Canuck., One Traim a Wook .Aberta, Jan. 28, 1916. Dear Editor-Havingr beenL a sub- seriber to your valumbie paper' for over a year,. and tbinking that it is. a mont interesting magazine, I aiways look fer- yard ta itn eomi ng every mon1tb. I wonder if I may venture ta join your correspondene coluren. I notice severai, interesting leitters, one front a correspon- dent at Mattawa, Ont. This lady states in ber* letters that the bachelors seem ionely and oppresscd. Wol nome may be like that, but the majority of thom are iiveiy and content vithi their lot. 1. admit that we get'ionely sornotimos, but not ta that extent. We know, o shouid know, that when vo go toa s new part of the country away frorn railroads and tovns, etc., that it vili be loneiy; therefore,-it is up ta us to have the aid pioneering spirit, and belp to improve our land, and aiso ta belip one another. The raiiroads viii soon corne, sebools and churches viii be built, and misa ve viii bave btter homes, etc.1 Whcre I arn living now, we have a new1 rai iromd and a town is building. We also get a train once a week, vhich ilaa great belip, it is a lot btter than 40 miles ta towu like it uscd ta be. We are trying ta stop them selling liquor; I hope that we viil succeed. Ifwe had the ladies ta vote it couid be dons, and I think that the day is near at baud wbon the ladies viil have the vote. Weil, dear editor, I guess that I viii bring my letter to a close. I arn also sonding the paper ta =y brotheil in the British navy. He is ou board anc of the Dreadnoughts iu the North Sea. I think that hie vil enjoy reading it. Hoping ta hear froin some cf the corrospondents. I wifl aigu myseif Bilent Alf. WJMcn writing sdvertiuers pies.. mentie. The Western HMme moathly5 TG H BINDING WONSUUTIOU A U«O TO 09 à FU\" m ..Ym wYaSM\u0026 CUU, avh U ig.. aC DRR. WOOnS NOIRWAY PUNI SYRUP, A cMd. if aeglected, vilMM= or later develop buta sme sert of hue trobl, sa vo would advise you that cm the frat sn of a cod or cougli you get rid of lt imdaey. l Ior this purpose vo kaow of aotbiag botter than Dr. Wood's Noeway Pine Syrup. ihua preypsrtion lias 'bee n o the market for tbi e t twenty-five year, and those who have used it have nothiag but words et pr\"b for its cfficacy. 1 Mrs H. N. 011,TmreS.S. ,wrltes: \"Las»Ï JZrnwy,1918. 1 developed,,= awful cold, and it hunt m o m e t.- long 1 vas afraidld 1* otald b* conumpion I oul om 0te ~ 5l sadnd iot get =ay ulop et sUor clioking féeelng la My th t 4lmba\u0026. snd 9omed\" 1 otdcog woudt=abbck la tbmf\u003cs came taume me, sud tal ne ou rernedy, Dr. Wood's Noeway Pin. Syeu' - ft Icould m agrw*t go l got s*oumo, Mmd the. two bottlmis yco4hi s»d that la nov a yesr ap.* Dr.- WQd~e oemay~ leop\"\u003e tu e trd mr; d e gpd\u0026 Tt la Mmbfctuted' oely' W re ' MilbmruCe. Im t«wshe auDetylane. Makça mad M its owa gas. Cool-c.a e.wk. No dirt, smoke. mor odor.' Over 200 styles, ra\"gb# £*m 100 to 2m00 Pode w Âbsoutol g teeh Wdltu o lotm.etl - LDEST w rate etic utter, mi ýein*. - ributed lwlen the qb but b '~ vorkedi tfter fi* ýea oe inti ani Ta avc e onlya vice. T F, just- sait. it 3 or S .ioed. T ~il tho ca ontha' lière c",
         "orbe Wetooi kolA.Mïwi6â* KideyDisease And liii Treatnmt Cur.d M.-.TLki. tarm Endom»d ?ha grmm., à pJwtr orf people areoomplîcate4 carnes whlch defy the se- ~~UL=tt i.xtotia, cr.tion of ordlnary kidney Medilcineu n - A~et »r. ih»q ýipIda«. M. . WH. Mosher, Brookyile. Ont., L= ~ 'utti write :-\"! used Dr. Charne'. ldney- M' onto ta..st ev Plls, and firmnly belleve there la nô Medicine te equal them. 1 was -~ troublai! for years wlth kldney direne. Zîb Wand thls treatment bas cured me. l\u003emw Apm Wbeu 1 began thé unes of thene Pills 1 .could -oagy walk from rny bed to s chair. Now I eau go te.-the fild and ~uwwn\u003ework 1k. any other man. Dr. Chane'rn a M ý httà~ lduey-lvr Plla, are -an excellent - extme ldou. %aI ý dthé W*\"ter,- ThI8 utatement la certlfied to by thé r1% -in y 10* Rev. B..]HL Emett, Baptlrnt minister of qs~flrn wha haBrockilile, Ont. ffl or« Br awakeutng the action of liver. They n bwl r CasKd vas semar- Mkney sud oweilla ncr. Contationd Wtaner% astr di noHe-adaclies Chronlc Indigestion, Kid- bâem t V Oudh ' for bie statemeut. ney DIsease, LIver Complut aud Itb .\u0026-ake o ined action on Baekache. One pili a dose, 26 cents a 5~n~kl~ue ansd boweiu, Dr. box, ail dealers, or Edme.nron, Date. Plus gur6 la Ce, LumlteG,' Toronto. TO LADIS A Bottle of Blush of Roses Bluah of Roses It d'rla75. In other 7ordi. in l a repula full- Bmmd 7 0 ot.that Iive te any lad abolutey free. The moet pr\" ae rprtion snd coin- r eonbutfezr. uies the mesa.sonesaspfled stull its use emnnot ho e ected bilUsEOF ROSES in clear au water- no Bedimeut to iM the pore. BÙS 0F ROSES 'ail poitively remove t-4 ,freddstmpes, iackheads, livenotsMo «-at\" erydPalas and lt-reum Remember Ibis. no matter how dark or sllow yoir complexion may h.. you wM m ee it Improvisa day by day until a elea, .nooth and beautifui con-. plexion in obtained. Gentlemen who admire a lady'.fiue, clear COImp!exion are flot adverse to f iïj the sieteneva u hymoulds. theheitate b ouse the IBLUSH 0F ROSES? lu la clear as water. takee the shine from the fae.' remove, ail the impurities of the skciu sud leaves no sigu like powder or paint. [lie only clear, Pure sud bannies, face preparation made. Cures eczema and au L sin diseases. Price 75o per bottie. Address Mn,. Frances E. Currali. Windsor, Ont. - Write For Free Trial Offer Blush of Roses Is Also For Sage by the T, EATONCO. LTD., TORONTO and WINNIPEG Moles, Warta and Small Birthrnarks are successfuly and permanentiy removerd by Eleotrolysis. ýThis is the oniy saf e and sure cure f or these blemishes. Thick, hevyeebrw may aiso be beautif uiIy shaped and rneed by this ethod. Ter re severa 1ipoor methodsofprrmn this work, butin the hande of an expert it may be done wi th very ittie pain, 1 eaviug no scar. I have made this work one of my speciaities, and with fifteen years' experienoe, the very best method in use, and a determination tç make my work a success, J. caflguarantee satisfaction Write for bookiet aud f urther particuiars. mVrs. E. COATES COLEMAN 224 smiTrH STREETr, WINNIPEG Phone Main 996 SUPERFLUOUS HAIR Moles and Warts .successfully removed. Eczema and acne treateri. Facial treatmients. Scalp trcatments. Sof t water Shampooing. Manictiring. Mrs. McConechy, Suite 5, Oredit Foncier BIdg., Regina, Sask. the girl ho vanta fe a vife la very thick fai. dthinansd t1h. blackei you, good. Ho sure imwe the kiud of a girl painted the cloner hoe vii stick. I ha hvaut.proved (t, lbeues 1 knoew vireof 1s Dmecs aure know if a girl eau take up I vu- bereft of mot\u0026er snd ouly n a heetead lu Peaoe Riverf If so, wiien four yeare -oid, and until I. would they 'write me about it. seventeen I did net undgratand the 1 rLape te se. tbia in print. Would ig of love fcor-home vos given ]ine. nome cf tihe mémbers please write. Wiil brother many yearseider thau yse euswer ail lettersansd carde. seujut Me out, and bestowed upon me 1 wil cloue, widhiug the papei- every wealtii cf affection tilat few experi success. aud 1 returued lb in 1k. measure, Blue Bird.. my heaTt vas starved. lince theu,'d - ing my life, lIhtave met withexpt Whlch lu thie Best Place? aiiy good friends-ouee t'wo yea Goodlsuds, Man., Mar. 6, 1915. agi\u003e after tweuty-ene oer f real ftien Dear Editor-I have been a reader cf ship. I have two now, oeeof fourte your valuabie paper ever eince.1 came years standing, aud one ten' years. Tti te 0auada, nearly three years ago, sud latter 1 have not accu for six years, bu I look foeward toeitn arrivai every montît we write te each otlher every vwe with the eagerness cf greetiug- an oi\u003c These friendships have neot existed vit ifriend. 1 amn pleased te notice that out sacri'fice, petty jealousiea, etc., h \"'Scout\" does net admnit thaït ho ea gtiuterrupted their even tenor manyt'. along without the ladies, for thr n-ut they have ouîy served te kait, ne doubbt tut a good vouiea, around rte oser together. honne and farrn oertaiuly helps te keep 1 'have alwayu fouud that if you thinga cuoving i proper erder. I arn an a. fricud you muet heonee. And. Englishman, 24. yeaxa old, and as I arn having met the right oue do net heaita tJhifflCiug of takiug up s homestead short- ti\u003e show your appreciation andlo ly, would like sorne of the readers in the Sernetimes oee f deceived. I have bee \"circie\" te *vene any information as to in more than oue iuetance, but the 6 'the Most favourable place. I shall\"be dia not deter me frorn ktill having fai very much obiiged. I hope the Editor in human nature. Good friends are scar' won't look upon me witih disdain, becauise sud When found Whould be treasured,f 1 ar nert a Bllbscriber, as I inteud te ho, their price is1'ar above ruies. if ever I manage te get a horcstead, And no'w we corne to the vital quet for there is net the aligfhtest deubt 'that -the love cf a life-partuer. How \"The Western Home Montiiiy» is the careful eue ahouid 'ie in dhoosing su j best paper for farmers it ie possible te Many young p opie enter into it ail t obtain. I wiil ans'wer ail ietterB with lightly. As iseaid in my former let' pleasure. Wishing the paper ever there are twe specirns of love,'o greatr sucess-Iarnof Which are real according te thio B. A. 'Nette. dividual. There ias love sa a pan aud love au a principle. The fo io Wherc Duty Canau appeals e t he physicai nature lu is a\u003e Man. Fe. 195. ous ferme. But the latter is inspia ïDea Baior an.,netb., 1915. by a higier motive. I eau befft descril ~esr»iitr-Ha i jutfihe it by cornparing it te s mother's lovaf réadiffrtihe correspondence columus cflirhldwhiisueuefli The estcrrn 'Home Mouthiy I thought I iercd-lk. Suh ia lov newil ive ça woullike te join the ranks if the editor Ctiig tey e tinug loeau lt e t will' spare me a lit'e corner f hie -valu- destToy it. cnatrt able paper. I wiii ju.st add bere tihat The B'fracopem ryteshud 'Western Home Monithly has been coniing ask themseives: Wili my love stand't te rny home for ast icat the Isat tentetcpoety ikeaisltnf lI? years, and ail enjoy il very much. How- fresf oet ArdneIiltion't ever, ike sorne, I do not tbink the cor- f'tente croe rer.c IMi gl_ o respondence lthe mos't âteresting part of twithe * xay parer of tned 'b tbe paper. Wilhug te ae eery hfrn e ip w I arn giad t sec tihaï; a new aubjeet coiint? If et, e yon ad beti lbas 'beeu introduced. I can quite agree 'ento usland Imes remaien'yoii ae with \"Thistie\" in the newsubjeet lie has'tnhosd ie rmn igl.;; introduced. I do not think we -have ne marriage ins a filwery patii; tberea l te iok d bh a huudred sud one thiugs te couteud Who rmg t ho nonoe.rVeswitlh, aud unless you are prpared'1t.à ber wle eai a om.There are many m orPrT u a nyrbeu espp. W'ho would hoe eniy tee glad to join teadflic yucnnee eur ap Tanks if it were 'not that duty demands es tha teyehul sayatI knew qny husband 'v yaS ~ tht he holdsta - home. 0f arrahlwa nagd*cli course lie Whbo offers his life for hisI arehiwsngod Ii Country is a kiero, and we are proud that ycars, sud ilave been married nearly twe we have se many here Who are offering ye idno mrr themselves for this giorious cause, but ors Young, good Iooking, brillia it is often casier tb go into danger then one r thefor Ieau neieron..i toestay at home and sece oved ones go, ot'h r b th, ear othr.lon lu and we anust think of tbc mothers and auer 'ad, eant to lovespect. wives 'w'ho 'have borne so braveiy this cus le omaded hm respect' trial. I think tlxere is no0 truer patriot- etudie mopred hi m -mioh îsm hanthi, ad wehop tht mny uoted bis love for hie mother and sistef a cf those brave fellows may return, and I Ilanae. e sokcewd i tor sedayb,\u00264 c ivili say in conclusion that I beartiiy lbnulas sinc oedquit nOur oseipdani ,, wiei there had been1n0 Suc'h ocason to bre asnh it.Orngréhpd test the loyalty of the sons of Canada. ver nhig but sunoot'h. We neuer te -Wihin Th Wsten HmeMonhlyqurrelled, -but outsiders made themoeciveu -~Wishing Te 'Western ome Ionthiy, some saying that 'he wu5 ' A. o good for nie, and -others thiat I * 1 1. i AK. too good for ]lim. Our love iw\"a' put Conteued Wih Lif tlicseverest test in more way-.7s tt u ,and very fewv, 1 venture to say, woiIl fui Kerrobert, Sask. 'have coule t'hirough the fiery furnace un- 44[UC Dear E'ditor-I. have becs a reader of scathed. I knew that lie was the e.1! The Western liome M1ontiy for the past man for -me, an'd 1 was fuliy conviuced six ycars, and take great interes't therein. that I'd neyer regret the stop 1 finaliy Inotice 'that sevc'rai of Your corres- took. We have had a bardstr pondence, inciuding \"Thistle,\" wish a truc since we were rnarried, and mnyt deinition of \"love.\" 1I w'rotc to you to eontcnd witb, but our loveb four years ago on this identical subject. lirighter than eve-r, sud we are bappy I was single tlien, xiow 1I-amn xarried; content with ecdlh Ver. and as \"Thistie\", wishcs thc opinion of Triuly,,love is worth seeking,-is woi marri'ed people I wili endeavour tô give keep'ing ^when found, is worth bardsbip, ï :2 mineas rieiy s pssileprivation and niany other eacrifice, ava There is milch divers ity of opinion on bonolir, for love ithout bonour is WL\" dte this sub ,jeet, but aIl truc love means sac- Love is the greatest biessiug 1f' t Zî U ft) rifice, we'c it bc tint of a mother, worid; it is the Divine spark straigh or friend, lover or life-partner, or any other from God. and ti hi oidWU lmE relation. Love 'witljout sacrifice is ]ron- be coid indeed. Hold it not iighitiy mY existenit and vijce-versa. Take tie Scrip- feiiow-readers. Be assurcd thbat ib will tures, for Î'instance. C.od Bo ioved the repay you ton thousand foid for anl -world tint 112~ gave fis onlv begotten sacrifie voli make in its cause. y \"\"(11 tilmat -e niigit bc savcd. -A mnothler T îvoulà rather bie poor as 1 am, wit On yci ujl arih' alnost aniv woridiv J)lcas- the weaIlh of love 1 possess of bus'hand ~îrcs rather tin nc li~er dhiid. A and frienis, asrc intiwodI d r truc friend w iii stick to yý u througlit'gooda misus love.ld' '~ ,.n%~% ''f",
         "The Western- Home IwonthÇY, dof PMI\u0026 Have Fruit-amtivosm Thefr Oawy IhIp THIS LETTER -k. l ouily aet 1 the mS 'en me. hau mlelee UPOn me1 expenieau meure, fo 5 theii du two year real trient ef tourteei rears. 1%, :years, bui very week , etc., h iany. in And w Let heoitat4 and hIby have beez ut the. lad aving fi Sare îcar.ý asuned, foi ai queatiq How vr oing aue i t al t rer lett \u0026 panmo 'le form in its v is inspirul ast desclt r's lovai, §elfl.1auj Il live alter it: iiould ea stand 1 itionfîe ug ete the glo ieed lbe ip vitb' ' had bett tiiere tri ýo cQntend red 1ià bear aire liippir iearly twe beceuse ber cai on,' him b. meot. thi Oth l' used bia4 ose dana ;éhip dsyi' W. nener hemselves Lth wu~ va îat I vas as put ta than oee [y, WOUl rnace UR, the osAi\u003e' stru MY t flna b 1Music GHT FREE YOUR GWN HOME d 1and most Relalile Seoel ot lAmdnm.-Establisbhd 1895. nOMourou Home Study Muglc Course lu your *efeyu.abst)eoi=fôe lessons for sither Vio,» Gita. non aj or Cornet. 66Ymne t o ps' ear..pui .tbaodwJ *oneuor Myaoe v~ls arOufle sons are ned.Ttatego Iyon donotknowons ~ our : 'fiu .e1'~iamp e and esa? ifl.. aby\u003e aniWe1ysd w,îb our fi .3 tuttionofer.yU _:\".ostagean ulotu .lba e endo, '~houasdi fuplrloverth, worid 14 aaknt o your wonderfu eboA before Orconvtneiug free bookiese wbca expia= Write now \u00260the â*iUzJN XCAK HOOL 0F MUSIC bigle Bldg. Chicago, lIWnois ~PJLOSES SURELY PREVENTEO 8 1 bY Cutter'$ Blacklev Pille. Low- ~WE led. fresh, 'eiisble. Dreferred b\u003e' S Western tockmen. because they DroteOt Whre ther vaccin« lau. Write for bookiet andi testimonial\u0026. Ifl.done. b. *mb*. 3** in i Ilà ti tu-auge page. biackles Pilla SI.UU is wo 50-dose pitue. 131aokles foil$ 4.00 bardgbipÏ Râ- 250 doses 10 aokleu Pl\" 'nJector 1-50 ne' fice SaVit î»Jecter, but'euttP : 500 doses. 20 P. et. ,,,ct implest, and strongest, Package dated, unuseà lipille exchangeable for date on Package, Do not use old vaeoine (ours ,y in t Iduattsorla. If it affords leu Protection than fresh rd. le- se r n b a unobtalnable. order direct chffl a .00 0tio St igh or M- 0- - WO PAY chaMes and aMp promptly. a-ndSWeetOrs 0 Pass duty free. - U \" R AT y - an It' 0 yhtly My LABORATORY. Berkeley. Californie. p os 5 aaft id b u rotp ed -M il d 0 os B ae PU - and Lt it will te a sýP est 2. yollr088. 1 ft for amy THE LABEL 0 'kt t 5 Ct t ý-Me. 9,M, with Ou YOUr paper will tell wheu your h hus-band subSCription expires. 81ad in your renewal NOW love vii liv, tlirougiiout eteruity, riches but a short span. Ged is love, loolk to and obey Hlm and \u0026ailse . vi folow. Contnte. A Sciiool Teaciier Lampinan, Sask., Feb. 23, 19\u003e15. Dear Edtor-- ar nont et ail sure whetlier you wiilo t me in wvien you learn vue I am. But I mey as veil own up et first and get it over. I arn one cf thse drea\u0026-ul oreatures ln a sehool teaciier. I suppose frorn that you will imagine me s being a. middle.aged spina- ter with nerves aud a bad temper. But I bave net reaciied that stage yet. Mucli syempathy eeems te b. f.lt for the loneiy bachelors cf the West. Wliat about the jýor girls who, have just left a hiome, congenial frieude, pienty ef amusement, and qIave corne te .paraely settled dis- tricés, witii nothing in view but the. go- u her burreved trâil that lead\u0026 te the arren littie achououse? Mail cornes- eidom, trips to towu are few ind fer between, and osie's hife la spent, -out of school heurs, i a crowded farmiiouse, 'where one is fortansite te have aâ room te, oue's self, and is usually made to feel like an ixupotor i the famiiy circle. \"But,'-' yeu .ay, «en ah. net read, or spend lier time sewing, or doing fancy work. Or she miglit help the. poor, hard- working fermer'. vif.» es, one cmn do the frat, and sewing and fancy work \" are very wei,but a girl 'who ham studied aU îher life bas no tirne for- learning housework, ae is incapable. And one gets se tired of sewing and readingi 0f course, there are compensations' Aud 1f, ithe West la deiightful ithe suimmer. It is only i the vinter on. feela *the awful lonesomenesascf the prairie. As regards the. suffrage I tinik tffiere is nt a reason Worth conteating against it, I held a vornan is as competeut te, vote as a -mnu on ail questions, and often more se. I1* la a rying aharne; 1* seems te me, te keep it fromntiiem. I think the militant suffragettes have much te their favor, aithougli I would Dot choose that way of getting the. vote. I think the. girls of \u003cinn circie make a. mistake i pitying these Western hachaI. ors. As far es I kno.w ,bley do net vlali for any cornfort, except 4rinking, smok- ing and novel reaclig. Tiey secrn te f eel that it is iiardiy Worthi vhile te be gentlemen wiue in 4tii West. They seern te think rewdyism la goo0d enougli fer tbhis place. 1 have also observcd that tiiongl ther. are very fev girls ent lier,, eacii ma» thinks they are extremeiy anxious for. 'bis attentions, Iu feot, tliey are bolder than l it Mal polit.. I suppose I arn taiking tee much, for my firat visit. I trust the gentlemeu are not offe'nded, as 1 have simply etatcd conditions as I have seen thern. I siiould bc glad te hear frorn any of the circie. \"Just Me.\" Camp Pines by Tvillgiit February 16, 1915. Dear Effitor-After mucli deliberation I have decided to write te yeur most interesting page. I have read the. letters witul different degrees cf interest, and if I may, I wiil pasa a few rewanks about tiiem. Freds, I agnee with you iunsorne things, not ail thougli, as I arn nearer a blonde than a brunette. Hig1i School Kid, I believe 1 would like te know you. Sunset Bill, you make me amile, but as tiîere iias been ge muah said about your letter lII paas along te \"«A Saskatchie- wan Batcii.\" I agrae witii yen and smre of the. otiier letiter vriters lu thinking that a womau 'wouid make a big differ- ence lu the civÎe laws if sihsd a vote, for I tiiink thiat ea voman underatands the influence of euvironment more thtan some of'tih. imen who vote in favor ef those degrading bars, but;' 1k. Buffalo Bill, I couid not vote for a few montha yet, even if the womeu 'had the. riglit te vote. To change the ubjeet. I don't know very niuch about the. West, the ,shores cf Lake Superior being my boun- dary uine. Photograpiyiy amny hobby, but I read a great deal. I have read the Aeneîd, the \"1Apoiogy o! Socrates,\" books by Corelli and Doyle, and, cf course, The Western Home Monthiy, and have rend them ail with interest. Last fall 1I went out on a hunting trip; it was my first taste of real outdoor life, and 1 certainly enjeo\"edtii. \"Camrp firesb twilight,\"1 and the long trampu tliroug the, woods. To get, back to everyday life, I arn s bookkeeper, but cen cook and sew also. I embroider and crochet a. littie, 80 if any of the- girls. would lik. to exciienge patterns with me I wiii gladly do se. I sec my letter is alto- gether too long, no I wil close with best wishes to the.Edltor and readers of this paper, a.nd borrowing a name, I wil aigu myseif, «Pallsa Atiene.\" one Sweet Song .Alta., March 4, 1015. Dear Editor-iFor some months past I have been an intereîted reeder of your excellent psper, and *6 in eniy now that I pick up en iç courage to write. \"Sunset Bill\".ham got rny Irishi up (al- though I arn a thoreughbred Canadian) over hiie letter wiioli va publisiied in the. February issue. .Maybc ail bis o- cailed love aff.irs \"bave Mi. merely a panamag fancy,\" but you tae. 1*frin me, Bil, wheu love ornes te you, you'il know it, aud it vont' b.cs'assin8g fancy.» I have seen toe muoh of happy inarriges to blier, 5\u00261 yen sy. I \u0026gree vith yeu far as high.school days go,- but after £11 \"lIife in vha;t vo make it,\" and -vo cau, make it a. \"grand nw'eet *onge if v. wish. Sec? Patrlotism. la .urely a good topie for discussion, aud it in just thro2gI the let- ter written by \"Tliistle\" that I was awakened te tth. fact that soldiers *ere liot th1e only heros,- Our fariner boys are entire)VIessential te everyone at present, aud there in one girl who wiii net ford \"The Fermer Feede Theèn AUl\" ,,'hen ail lAe other patrioti. song e e being sung. I amamsoplesseil to heur what \"ThUstle\" aays about «Sunat BII's letter. I, have, net lived en a ferin long maoue te know viiether a wveini hoUd f arm. or net. To me lit doesnt ceoin Just 'ti thing, but \u0026il ta\"t. differ, and seins think it lathe ýonlyway to live Ido pity nome of *the baciielors 'when ft. COiMeS te meki'ng, ove» if MaeTvisii does uMi they excel the vornen. I notice thei. jerity of thein are very willing to,e leve that part of the voek te us, and Ju.tly 00. Hoping tiiis letter in net tee long. to fiud space iu y6ur correspondence'ooluranu aud xeminding yenu ail my eddremand8\u003c name in vith the Editor., I amn, yours very sincerely, Northern Girl. Information Wanted SakFeb., 1915. Dear Editr-As I fiuisied reading the. letters iu the correspondence'colurnu of the. February inumber, 1 made Up my mind te write a ehoit letter. I haïve bec» a uilent reader of tii. great paper (tho beet yet' publiàh9d), and 1I vould like te join the merry circle right now.. I tik the letters priuted ini the colum are great and eheer one up immenscly, cspeciaily tii. ehorb winter day. I'rn right glad toesce \"Sunset Bil\" lis corne baek «gain te expiai» iiinielf. They sure did make eôme commente on your letter \"Bill\" but I don't tiiink the girls think amy lthe verse of yen fcor it. I 'myseif arn of -the same opinion es \"High Sehool Kid.\" \"Icecyle's\" letter in great, as aise is *'Thiatle's,\" aud I would like 'te see a few Seemarka on ethis subjeet. 0f course, it wouM not do *for us ail te go and leave the.lar'me, or vo siiould starve even if we did not get kiiied. I se.l i . \"Oid Country Papers\" there are a great many niore men gene from the. farms than from the towns, se some of us will b. doing our share by etaying Sit home and, growing wbcat. Another good eubject for discussion la the. one put forward by \"The Village Biacksmith.\" I would like te sec a few lettere from cuir friends whe bave been tiirough the. miii, as I shall some day cmbark onuthe mre trip myseif, if I 'ave any iuck. I miglit say I arn on the. \"lookout\" now for sa partner, one of thie fair sex preferably, se I hope some of the \"\u003cgirls\" wiii write, aise our '\"hcu- pecked huabands,\" as Pm waiting for sorne good advice before I venture tee far in love making Now I muet quit, and 1 hope tuis viii get by the waste paper basket and into print some time. Wishing the \"Montiiiy\" continued sue-. cess and ail its readers. I wiii intro- duce myseif as \",One of the. Boys.\"1 Re Says Re Tolci His Neighbers And Tliey Told Hlm to Try Dodès Kidney PM\u0026, Nike Ludy, Yoimg Kanitoba Famer, Slck for Two Yeats, Telh oy SeGot a New Lemotsf Lite. Camperville, Man.-pwul- Cured et Kidney sud Hwxt tvo yeare standing, à\u0026. -Miii. 11udyiri veil known youn; fatmer. livh\u003c W« Ihere, i. telllng lis nèlghboes ' -th4 1 oves his nov bas. cf lite te Dom 00 KM., uey Pilks \"For tee yeus,\"-Mr, Rudy et\" «'~I suffredv ith a trrIbie pain lrthMiad, of my back nd shoulderb. Itook'nuy- différent: medicitos, an\u0026 v under tlua doýtor's emne, but nothung' sosmed te de' me any basting good. Flnaily heurt â. emme va *Mi.d te My troubles. TIGHT N D IN G et Suaday SéSol la Slow He Cured HIs.lf RL.wMadaam Atos Sufer. M D ROAD, Oct., zat. 1913. 8S img ie I have tiiouglt cf e =effeted by jour 'trult-a-tlves\". I suffer rm ,epe sly in my ha»ds. talot of money without rumuts. havetaken\"Ifruit- 1« D o S months nov, and arn to tell you that 1 arn cured. hoeJuagùzent lias net left my std perhaps neyer viii, but the. î'sé al gene andlIcan do an, dwork. l'have gsaed 35 pounds IL A. WAUGH mmatlsr la ne longer the dreaded * il once vas. Rheurnatism la aÇger onue.cf the «\"'incurable W.\"Fruit-a-tireslias proved rvelioua paver. over hu 0S, 8ciatica, Lumbago-lu tfact, 61 aàch diseases vhich arise frorn lsrargemnt of tomach, boveis, y.or kn -gbox, 6 for $2.,5o, triai size, Ssent postpaid on receipt et SFruit-a-tires Limited, Ottawa.",
         "theWetn HmMntl Rev ta utiisetb* left-vrs ~yDoris, Richrd A MW lala *tÉ otmul wonveula boiutful paut of the menu, fltting, luto ~~ tha te- s bportaut,,for 4Mi îi»iieL te Underataud their vajne: ontalupetak s alte whieh to the. ystem, vikil. olive, *u~ab! man ngedent of Is at Md t@ 1.104 n beoiesa ment gaui, baligIe veetble asiad, and lut padusuit, eluhu, fruits sud Mia l -Io mtem k oqeto fthe ç.iuin*,it portion of comuai ay.be AMMADée -a ad vu n ome. left-over vqMtabhs, tii. two orthvée tomatees vWhon r not enough to atew may be Maiênmms te bold chopp.d Jettuce Z \u0026*wmixowtth talad dressing. The t.w où1 potatoos 1.11 over may b. diced, cboppe oIIms oudiparaley adddsud *$ Viiole..Biruted wlth French dress- M ' \"é 1pade ite a tasty' potato Mladt. lwnffast biat il. left-evera of meat, ii oretablea may b. utillaed eéther la 'b. mtgof. \"ILador in t ho family mornean peome 0vho do net care 4o M\u0026maynne\" eé=7aethey dlmlike clive oT For thm a boiled dresing. *I t 1he. mided place- as ths may b. ilxOi, ith a grealVarlety cf salad »MW si SaIsi reubtn-Mlx together one llhtly beataegg, a tIle sait, oe ao teampoen!ul.i -cf mlustard, eue toa- sppeenfl'of sugar, two -tablespoonfuls of mmdibutter sud three-fourthu cf a t a tinmcrean r rlch mik. When ahly mixed sud blended, add very yoe-ieurtii of a oupfulof vinegar. la duble boiler, stirrlng con- à yýyù'ntillthe mixture tikens, thon layonnais Dresslng-Ithla a common ides that mayonnaise dressing in dl- euit te niake, but if a few simple ruiles art remembered there eau b. ne faiing and the operatien in simplicity itseILf Inte \u0026 dish put eue or two egg-yelks, bal! a saitmpooifid of sait, oee a- apoon! nI cf powdered sugar, a very littie pep rsda scaut teampoonful ef mus- tr.Add olive cil, drop by drop, at Ornt beat inute the egg vith a silver f ork. Ms the mixture thiokeus, the oil may bo added more quiekly, pouriug s lutIle -ou, coitiiuiug tie beating without cessation. Add slowly, alteruatlug with the oil, ither vinegar, or lemon juice, or If proferred, both (in which case use about Iwo tablespoonfuls o! caci, four, cf oie aloi.). Continue stirriug in the cil uli lie mixture ls vory thick. Keep on dcs until wanted. lu mlxing mayonnaise have every- tbing very celd. The olive cil and the eggs should boti have been ou ico, the tork sud the plate on whieh the drose- jng is made ehould aise be cold. If the miture refuses te tiken or shouid ourdie, which il somotîmes doos if the cil is added toc quickly, stir in the yolk cf another egg aid continue the beating as beforor. The addition of a chopped pickie aud some capers couverts \"May- o nnaise dressing\" into \"Sauce Tartare,' i which in used with many delicious roc- Ipes. Mayonnaise may be jellied, for use with aspic salade, by adding a table- jspoonful of mei-ted gelatin, tirring until 1 moth sud eetting on ice. Cut in cubes ho deecrate the salad. French dressing jsecasiiy made. Mix a very little sait, a dash of pepper, three tablespoonfuls of vincgar and six of olive oil and stir until weil blended. Egg Saiad-Cut hard-boiled eggs dn lialves, rrcuove the volk and rub te, a îa 'de a ndii equ al quantity of sar- dines. frev(l fror O houes an\u003cl taiN. ti toe le ~ ba lit ti m \u003cnu s.Ar- range (risp) letture e Ia vr or wvtr rs on a fflate, Pile the saladl in a motuud in the conter and decorate the edge of the dliii 'wItii4ie wviles ef the. .ggs *11. witi mayonnaise dresulng, a sprig of. paraely stma i ti te p of each. .Autipan Sada-Mfix two cupfuls of coid ded potatoes with oue eupful ef chpe e.lery and oeemedium-alaed app e ut lu thm i eies. Mariate vith French dresslug, garish with parsley and celery tips sud one or two bright red nast\"urtma Data ýSalai-Rsmove 4hé atenes. from nmre well-washed dates sud ptuff with a litteecram cheese into whieh a littie currant jeily la *rorked. Pile en crisp Jetai.. baves sud serve with mayon- ais, dreasing, ite whieh the. white of au 1 em is batn amweIl sas the yolk. Cham siien 4ith Nuta-TO twe cupfuli of minced chiken meat ailow oue of chogped clo1.mlx viti oe ferred kind) ad imdisten. with mayon- nais.Lino a aalad bowl vith lettuce leaves, arrang e im alad iu the ceuter and deerate with rounds of oelery, pied iilgi with mayonnaise. Tomate and Cucumber Sala-Peel iùediu-sled tomatoes sud eut a slice off the. top of each. Remeve nmre of the. pulp and the core sud MIl chese cups withi..hredded cucumber slices moistened with French dressing. Arrange ou crisp bttuce baves. balla.Dispoé pr.tlIj onaro\u003e lttuce las or on créss ana serve wti may- onusia.dreaahag. Oriental Salai-olu thunsaiem of or- suqea aprinkie titi tripa of aàpIe, cu- cumber snd some raisins soaked in lemon juce. Over \u0026Il pour a tableapoonful of the jule from a eau of preaerved ginger snd let grow very cold. Serve on las- turtium leaves, with cream dressing and a few nasturtium seeds sprinkled over the top. Potate sam Tomate Sala-Cul home fresh boiled ptatoos juto amal dico wth alittle cbpjped nonion added. Pour French dressing over the top and shlow to stand for two hours. Scoop eut te- niato cupi, :1111 with the potato aalad and pile eream dressiug or mayonnaise on top of each eup. Aple Salai-Chopped apple and cel- ery with a .a W t, mixed with may- onnaise, makes a very tasty. alad. Serve in apple cases hollowed out and deoorate oaci portion with a celery plume. Grape-fruit Sald-Mix equal portions of gape-ruitpulpsud hoped celery. Arrange- innesta c'f lettuce sud serve with mayonnaise, with tips of parslcy te garnish the top. Fairy Salai-Ou imal baves of let- tuce ispread sliced bananas and celery. P'ut a. spoonful -of cream -dressiug with whipped oream on top of each and dec- orate vith a fewcaîdied violets. Btananas, sprinkled with lemon juice Bunaay menool Clam at Gladstone going for Ray Ride Cherry Sala-This maY be made from fresh or cauued cherries. Bemove thie etenes sud MIl oaci cavity with a Fil- bort nut. Serve sevorsi cherries ou a lettuce leaf toe aci person sud serve with cream dressing. Cream Dressing-With one-haîf tes. speonul cf sait, siugar sud mustard, sud dash of pepper add gradually two table- spoufuls of vinegar sud the yoiks of two eggs, beaten. Cook ovor hot water until tie mixture thiekeus, thon add oe tablespoonful of butter sud pour gradu- ally, whîle etirriug coutautly, ente the boston white ef au egg. Cool sud fold in eue cup of wiippod cream. This dressing je dolicieus with many fruit salade as je anotier boiled drose- i ream Dressing witi 01-Beat the yoiks of tirce eggs lizht sud add grad- ually, beating the white, one-fourti cup of olive oil thon two tablespoonfuis of vinegar and eue of lemon juice. Cook over hot water until tic mixture thick- eus and cools. Add gradually another tourth of a ctsp of olive oil, oe table- spoonful of powdered sugar, a pinch of sait and a dash of popper. Just before niixing witi the salad fold in twvo cups of whipped cream, beaten very stiff Fruit Saiad-One cup each of diced pineýapple, ]:alved strawberries, sliced bananas, sliced oranges and cierries. Sprinkle two tablespoonfuls of powdered sugar and marinate with Frenci dress- ing. Serve on lettuce leaves with niay- onn.aise or erearn idressing.~ Cream Cheese Salad - Moisten a crpayn (heese -%vtl a littie mayonnaise and a teaspoonful of currant jelly and add some ehopped olives, forming into smal wlh chopped peanuls and candied cher- ries, makos anotier dolicieus combina- tion. To add varioty te salad dressing add ci little cioppod iit or parsley, some ciopped caudied fruits, some pickle or some ciopped olives. Do net be afraid te try experiments in tie making of saisds. A ialf-cup of left-over cern sud a f ew striug beans or lima beans will make sàdelicieus saiad mixed with some mayonnaise dressing; tie few-slices of cold veal, net enougi te chop for a salad, may enclose some stuffed dates, some preserved cherries, or a section of orange. Rell oaci slice of meat around a littie portion of salad sud place one email mound ou a leaf o! lettuce. Cover witi ealad dressing. Pineapple Salad-Shredded pinoappie with some ciopped nuts makes a tasty salad. Serve ou bede cf cress witi auy preferred dressiug, an4d decorate the top cf the salad with a few Marschino cherries. Many salade are improved by sprink- ling a little grated cheese over them juet before adding the dre sing. The same eflect je obtained by serving cheese sticks witi salad. Crisp wafere accom- pany almeet any salad becomingly, aud Uittle tea, biscuits, split and spread with any mneat or fisi salad, are delicieus. The Oil for the Athlete.-Tn rubbing down, the athlete cati find nothng finer than Dr. Tiiomas' 1-clectric Oil. t renders' the mnuscles and sinews pliable, takes the soreness out of theiii and strengtlîens thcmn for strains that înay be put upon themn. It stands pre- coinent for tbis purpose, and athletes wvho for yeý,rs have heen\u003eusing it can testify to its value as a luhricant. The TMnsormatIom of a White eWhat ia the seno. of takiug lsem for moitis and menths at a 000 achool,\" asked a bright young ho keepI,, when if yen, know.how to ma\" whte sace yon eam cook anythiug earth tO The thin wbite sauce ie made of o -tablespoeipfjil of flour, one tablespoo fui of butter, sud one. cup ful Of liquid geuerahly milk.Seasoning is added taote, usùally eue-quarter of a teas fui of sait, aud oue-eightl4 of a Spoonful of peppeir. Mx the flour a seasouiug in the bottom of the sau pan, rub.-the- butter into the dry ingr ients-if it iane t seft enough, heat gently for a little wiile-tben add nilk, about a third at a time, ands the whole until il bousB. The a sheuld thoen be aémooth sud velvety, curiously enouçh it will be more vety if' the milk is eeld wheu ad probably because tihe bleudiug of the î gredieuts is then likely te be \u003e thorough. For a medium white sauce, tho gredients and method are the saine,b two tablespoufuls of butter and twe :fleur are used. For a thick 'witsa four tablespoonfuls of but-ter ad fo of fleur are called for. The proportio of fleur te liuid must always be but onerhaif lesB butter may be used a pinch-although, of course, the su will net b. se rich, and it will b. a g deal more difficuit te make it free f ro lumps. The Thin White Sauce Cream soupe, 80 called, are made on foundation cf thin white sauce. Sift vegetable pulp is added te the sauce f cream of corn, pea, spinaci, tomate, a se forth, or vegetables are choppedo sliced, as for cream of celery or aspar gus eoup. Custards, where tic eggs are stirr into a tii white sauce-properly swe.t ened, and tie pepper omitted-wilI ne separate and curdie, aud wiil net \"whe in eitier a pie or a cup. Excellent ice-cream cau be madea a tiiiwhite sauce foundation wha sugar and flavoring are added. Ifi couple of boston eggs are stirred iun tie fundameutai white sauce, sud sa gar, fruit sirup, ciopped nuls, and forth, are added, yeu wiIl ha. some tig thal yen may tali French ice cream, f rozen pudding, or custard ice crcam, as you wiii. The Medium White Sauce Al'tic creamed disies - crearne ciicken, creamed potatoes, creamed o ions, sud se forth--are simpiy tie in. gredient that gives the name te tic did warmed up in a medium white sauce. Croquettes of minced meat, flsi,« what net, eau have their ingrodieula \"bound\" together by a mnedium whib sauce. Stir the ciopped meat or olh# substance jute the sauce until tic mix- ture is of a geed coueistency te shape juotehie croquettes. Souffles cf cheese, chicken, rice, and so forth, are made on the basis of a nie- dium white sauce te which tthe name \"'ingredieut\" ie added. Two or tire: eggs te every cup of tic foundation ,sauce wili ho required àu addition. Sti tie yelks jute the sauce after removlng il from tie fire; fold tie etiffly beaten whites into the cempleted mixture juil before it is set iute tic oven, se liat it will rise and swell and bloat audp up as a preper souffle siould. Tii. Tiick White Sauce This je the iost difficuit of the thre: te make, because it iese thick tiat il wvi1l \"lump\" unless it is constant1l stirred. For a delicieus WMelsh rabbit, stif three cupfuls of grated or sliced ciees int one cupful of thick white sauce, bighly seasoned with paprika, mnuataT\u0026 red pepper, Worcestershire sauce, 01 anytiing eIse you can think of. Stir the whole over the fire until tic cheoil is nielted and the mixture boils. ThUi rabbit will neyer \"string,\" nover ourdie. nover \"separate,\" and At can ho success fully mnade by a novice. Try adding chopped olives te a rabbit, nmade like tie abeve, but with the brine from tl olive-bottle used as liquid for the fous- dation sauce.1 TGH I N DIN G Househcld Suggestions I",
         "White ng houg v to =a. ,de of o0 ablespoou )f liqui. added teasu af a t flour a~ éhe sauc ry ingre àl, heat i add I and t Ehe Bn Lvety, 51 More o enade of the h bemo ,the h same,bu nd two E and fou roportiou bc ,e used the sau bea g free fro ruade on B. Sîf saucef nato, iopped ýr aspa re sti ly swe.t -WilI n it \"whe made on Wh rred i and s and ve som ench, tard i ce cream 6med o0 sauce. flah, grediena M whib or othe the mlx- to shap î, and so ýfa me. ie nane \u003er three undation )nl. Stir -emovlflg F beateli lire jtist so that and PU he three 1that it nataiitly )it, stit 1 chees eý sauce, nugtard f.Stir cheest success, adding ude like rom Ce le foun y Fuli-Size Package Free At Your Grocer's This wcek your grocer will accept this coupon for a package of Puffed Wheat. Not a sainple, but a fuil-size package. We will pay him 12 cents for it. Ail over America-in every town and hamiet--grocers are waiting for these coupons now. Cut out this one and present it. There are no conditions-there will be no obligation. Let your folks enjoy Puffed Grains to-morrow at our cost.. Puffed Wheat, 12c ep Puffed Rice, l15ces Whole-Wheat Bubbles You wiIl find that pack~age filled wvith bubbles-airy, thin and flaky-puffed from grains of wheat. The grains are roasted by a fearful heat until they taste like toasted nuts. They are pulTed to eight times normal size by internai steam explosions. They are porous and fragile and crisp. They are fitted for digestion as grains neyer were before. Prof. Anderson's process-shooting from guns-has blasted every granule to pieces. Every element and atom is made avail- able as food. Millions enjoy Puffed Grains, morning, noon and night. They serve with cream and sugar-they mix them with bernies -they float them in bowls of milk. And countless childrcn when at play carry Puffcd Grains with them. This offer is made to let other millions know them Wc want your folks included. The Quaker Qats ompany Sole Makers PETERBOROUGH, ONT. SASKATOON, (9M) SABK. Here's a 1 2c Coupon Present this coupon to your grocer. it a 12-cent package of Puffed Wheat. big dishes-ten delightful meals. We make no requirements whatever. you what Puffed Grains mean to people. that nothing else offers such attractions. H1e will give you for That's enough for ten This is done to show Then you will realize Accept this invitation. Cut out the coupon now. Not be.. cause it is worth 12c, but to know what Puffed Grains are. There will bc many a time when you and yours will be glad you found them out. SIGN AND PRESENT TO YOUR GROCER 63w C Good in Canada or United States only 0 This ceiies that My grocer this day accepted thi$cou!,on as paym\"nt in full for a CL 12-cent package of Puffed Wheat. I q TO TEE GROcEr We wilI remit you 12- cents for this coupon when mai!ed to us, properly signed by the custorner, with your assurance that. the stated terins were comp!ied with. TEQUAKER OATS COMPANY East of Manitoba-Peterborough, Ont. West of Ontario-Saskatoon, Sask. Address ............. ................................... Dated ........ ..................................... 1915 This coupon not good if presented aller lune 25, 1915. Crocers must send ail redeemed coupons to us byJulu Isi. NOTE: No famfily in entitled to present morc than one coupon. If your grocer should bc out of either Puffed Wheat or Puffed Rice, hold the coupon until he gets new stock As every jobber is well supplied. he can get more stock very quickly. J' Ail Ameri*ca This Week Helps Itself te Puffed Grains I ''''III i - 1 qw M il il Il Ill Il Ili 1111111j',",
         "M AOAUE:--If you 'went t the store and bought a 36-iflCh Vr ta\"'meesure, and after spoflng many yards of good material you foure 2 ntedofd that the tape actually measure 2 nt-do 6 inches, ...wouid you not -feel that you had been 1inmposed u pon ? Well-thutes just what, would happen to you if you asked yousr d.atler for PUITY FWUR and he succeeded in selling you the t'just lés good\" kind under another trademark or urider his own TotE. DELER WHO SUBSTrITU TES HAS A SIELFISH'REASON Ne mnaks a greater immediate profit on the \"«just as good flour thon on PftWm WR So, it's up to YOU to suit yourself and get what you want, or to take what the substitutor gives you and assist hlm to build up hlm businessat VOUR EXPENSE. PuRUtYFWUR means full measure. Don't let the substituto r persuade you there is a \"'just as good\" kind. The dealer who gives you PUJRIY FLMUR when you ask for it is playing square with you and with us-Illhe is giving you FULL MEASURE. He is selling you service in retu-rn for VOUR good wiII. This advertisement is a salesman for 1 WRTU!0FEOilU R more Sread and' Setter Bread WESTERN CANADA FCGUR MILLS CO@gLIMIIED Mllers to the people"
      ],
